Authors
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Number of Reviews
192

Title
Review for Gingerbread Man, The (1998)
Director: Robert Altman
Cast: Kenneth Branagh, Embeth Davidtz, Robert Downey Jr., Daryl Hannah,
Robert Duvall, Tom Berenger, Famke Janssen
Screenplay: Al Hayes, Robert Altman, John Grisham
Producers: Jeremy Tannenbaum
Runtime: 112 min.
US Distribution: PolyGram
Rated R: violence, language, sex
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
The trailers for The Gingerbread Man boast that it's a film based on a
story by John Grisham, devised specifically for the big screen.  After
seeing the picture, I found that this statement essentially means that
it's a film about a Southern lawyer in a situation that doesn't require
him to use his skills as a lawyer.  Directed by the always-experimental
Robert Altman and starring the great Kenneth Branagh, I expected a lot
from this film.  What I got was a professional execution of a cliched
and only semi-amusing script; even worse, the conclusion provides more
questions than answers.  Unfortunately, The Gingerbread Man comes down
to little more than cheap shocks and Actors Faking Accents.    
Branagh is superb in the main role, featuring another flawless accent
completely dissimilar from his native British inflection.  He plays Rick
Magruder, a successful lawyer in Georgia.  The most prominent background
information we get on him is that his ex-wife, Leeanne (Famke Janssen),
hates him; and, because of a bitter custody battle, he only gets to see
his kids once a week.  The film opens with Rick meeting a strange woman
in a parking lot during a rain storm.  Her name is Mallory Doss (Embeth
Davidtz), and her car has been stolen by her crazy father, Dixon.
Naturally, the only thing Rick can do is take her home and seduce her
(she makes it really easy for him by taking off all her clothes to have
a crying fit).  The plot thickens when it turns out her father, played
by Robert Duvall, is terrorizing her by hanging her cat, among other
things.  Rick takes the case to court, at which point Dixon is sent to a
mental institution.  Not long after this, Dixon's destitute pals break
him out, and we are led to believe that he not only continues his
harassment of Mallory, but that his focus also falls onto Rick's
children.
There's a lot more to the story, but the last half hour or so is
reserved for unlikely plot twists, so I'll let you experience those for
yourself.  The problem with the story, I noticed, is that it's hard to
tell where it's going for at least an hour into it.  The threat of Dixon
never seemed threatening, so I was constantly wondering what all these
people were so incredibly worried about.  Then, just when it seems that
Rick is as useless a main character as I've ever seen, his kids are in
danger, and he must fight against the police and his ex-wife to keep
them safe.
The Gingerbread Man, as I said, relies on a story that is, for the most
part, composed of numerous plot devices and scenes that we've seen in so
many other films of the mystery and thriller genres.  Rick is a lawyer,
but he doesn't need to be:  his only source of motivation is his
children.  (Although the fact that he is a lawyer provides for one
particularly interesting scene in which he can't get help in a police
station because all the police men know he's a lawyer and hate him for
it.)  A lot of the film is suspenseful, but too much of it hinges on
cheap thrills (yes, you will see a cat knock over a glass bottle to
create a sudden loud noise and scare the characters).
Then, of course, we have the supporting characters, which is a vast
assortment of Actors Faking Accents.  Davidtz is a good actress, and
she's good here in her quiet, subtle way.  Robert Downey, Jr., whose
Southern accent is about as thick and exaggerated as any I've ever
heard, is fun to watch as Rick's detached partner.  Duvall has all of
two lines in the film, but still has fun with his role of the token
psycho.  Darryl Hannah plays Rick's secretary, and is almost completely
unrecognizable with the accent, dark hair, and glasses.  In fact, there
are so many Actors Faking Accents that I was distracted in every scene
because I know all these actors are faking these accents.  I wish the
film would have taken place somewhere other than the south, because then
everyone could have just spoken normally.
But that just points out another flaw of this film:  the setting has no
impact on the story.  The characters don't, either.  Rick never solves
anything because of his ingenuity or intelligence (he's even forced into
a pointless climactic battle in a rain storm on a catwalk with Tom
Berenger).  None of the characters are particularly well-drawn, though
they are interesting enough to have kept my attention.  Thrillers are
most effective when they rely on the characters to solve the problems
that the film offers.  The Gingerbread Man features a bunch of
one-dimensional people doing things that the story requires them to do.
But, it's not all bad.  Altman does a great job with the atmosphere,
and the fact that the film takes place almost entirely during a
hurricane is a nice touch for underlying tension and suspense.  The film
is adequately dark, and the music is subtle enough that it adds mood and
color to the scenes.  Not all of Altman's choices are great, though:  he
often makes it difficult to see (even Seven wasn't this ridiculously
dark), and I often found myself straining to pick up the image.  
I don't understand why The Gingerbread Man even needed to be a thriller
with car chases and gunfire.  This seems like it could have been an
almost completely psychological thriller.  For some reason, Altman and
crew have put their hearts into a story that just isn't very interesting
or even plausible.  It might prove to be a worthwhile evening of
entertainment for some, because it is a well-crafted picture.  But I was
hoping for a lot more than just a bunch of Actors Faking Accents.

Title
Review for Goodbye Lover (1999)
Director: Roland Joffe
Cast: Patricia Arquette, Dermot Mulroney, Ellen DeGeneres, Mary-Louise
Parker, Don Johnson
Screenplay: Ron Peer, Joel Cohen, Alec Sokolow
Producers: Chris Daniel, Patrick McDarrah, Alexandra Milchan, Joel
Roodman
Runtime: 102 min.
US Distribution: Warner Bros.
Rated R: sex, language, violence 
Copyright 1999 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
I'm not sure why the formal structure of a film review requires that a
brief synopsis of the plot be provided.  Readers who have seen the film
in question aren't going to be interested in a brief retelling of the
story; they're just interested in the opinion of the critic.  Readers
who are considering seeing the picture aren't going to want to know a
lot about the film before seeing it.  Sometimes, however, the film
itself begs a review with no plot synopsis.  Roland Joffe's Goodbye
Lover is this kind of film.  The trailer tells far too much about the
picture, and any plot synopsis that explains beyond the first ten
minutes is too explicit.  So, what you learn in the first ten minutes is
as follows:  Sandra (Patricia Arquette) likes sex.  She likes sex with
Ben (Don Johnson), who just happens to be her husband's brother.  Her
husband is Jake (Dermot Mulroney).  What these three people do is
something you shouldn't know going into the movie.
But that won't stop me from mentioning that the film is so busy and
packed with subplots that you're likely to walk away feeling assaulted. 
Goodbye Lover is a strange little film, one that passes for
entertainment but probably won't linger in the memory for long.  I liked
a lot of it, starting with a few of the performances, and there are some
very clever sequences scattered about the movie.  But it lacks
inspiration, and more often feels derivative of flicks associated with
Quentin Tarantino.  The Tarantino genre can be put to good use (recent
examples include Lock, Stock, and Two Smoking Barrels and Go), but
Goodbye Lover doesn't deliver the way it could.  It's also the kind of
movie that ignores the characters in favor of an elaborate plot, and so
emotional investment in the story is nearly impossible.
That's not to say that there aren't any characters, because there
certainly are.  They may be stock characters with one-note
personalities, but they're all interesting to a degree.  Arquette is
perfectly lurid and ridiculously sexual, and the motivations behind
Sandra's actions are fascinating; we're led to believe that she just
wants a comfortable life (later, this turns out to mean that she wants a
lot of money).  Johnson and Mulroney are believable as brothers, though
neither character is understandable on any human level.  The interesting
characters are on the periphery:  Ellen DeGeneres (whom I love) is grand
as Sgt. Pompano, a cynical cop who investigates the situation that
Sandra creates.  I also enjoyed Ray McKinnon, who plays Pompano's naive
partner.  Mary-Louise Parker is funny as the woman Ben seems to fall in
love with; she appears intensely uncomfortable in every scene she's in. 
And I like Joffe's direction; there are a lot of nice stylistic touches,
some tricky camera work, and an appropriate musical score by John
Ottoman.  I also loved the last scene, for it features a burst of irony
so overt that I couldn't help but laugh.
One problem I noted early on is the lack of inspiration; much of the
film marches relentlessly to its conclusion, force-feeding us obligatory
scenes just because they're required to tie up loose ends.  And you
might be wondering how all these characters are worked into the
labyrinthine plot that the screenwriters (Ron Peer, Joel Cohen, and Alec
Sokolow) have constructed.  You might also wonder why the picture
contains a serial killer named The Doctor, who kills young women by
injecting them with a deadly chemical, or why Vincent Gallo is present
as a hired killer, or why there are loud sex scenes that take place in a
church (though I did enjoy the sarcastic references to religion and
existence).  Goodbye Lover is fluff, but it didn't have to be -- there
is a place for complex black comedies, but the good ones make
characterization essential to plot.  And though Goodbye Lover is a
convoluted mess, it's not the worst movie I've ever seen that couldn't
be synopsized in two tightly-written paragraphs.

Title
Review for Celebrity (1998)
Director:   Woody Allen
Cast:  Hank Azaria, Kenneth Branagh, Judy Davis, Leonardo DiCaprio,
Melanie Griffith, Famke Janssen, Michael Lerner, Joe Mantegna, Winona
Ryder, Charlize Theron, Dylan Baker, 
Screenplay:  Woody Allen
Producer:  Jean Doumanian
Runtime:   113 min.
US Distribution: Miramax
Rated R:  language, sex, drug use
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
If you're going to make a two-hour Hollywood in-joke, why bother
releasing it to the general public?  If you're going to create a film
that will appeal primarily to big-name actors and People Who Know Woody
Allen, then why waste the time of the rest of us peons by playing it in
theaters?  While watching Celebrity, I realized that Allen had only
marginal interest in creating a story about real people.  What he really
wanted to do was continue on his recent kick of conceited
self-deprecation.  Celebrity is yet another film in which Allen tells a
story about himself, living in a world that he's familiar with, dealing
with people like the ones he actually knows.
Allen recruited poor Kenneth Branagh to bumble through this picture, in
an imitation of Allen so perfect that it almost made me like the film
more.  Branagh plays Lee Simon, a journalist-turned-screenwriter who
divorces his wife, Robin (Judy Davis), shacks up with some hot women
(Famke Janssen, Charlize Theron, Winona Ryder), and goes about trying to
get big stars (Melanie Griffith, Leonardo DiCaprio) to read his script
about an armored car robbery.  The usual elements of recent Allen films
are all here, including the sexual insecurity of the main character,
lots of self-loathing women, and a tiring continuum of episodes that are
only loosely related to one another.  
Unless you work in the film industry or know Woody Allen personally,
it's not likely that you'll find a whole lot of interest in Celebrity. 
Aside from all the in-jokes, the story falls far short of compelling,
and the characters are all empty and lifeless.  Branagh proves once
again that he's a superb performer, nailing his imitation of Allen
flawlessly.  The problem is that he's the same character Allen always
plays, a character who's getting more than a little dull to watch.  I
mean, come on, how many times have you seen this guy? -- he hates his
work, and he can't be satisfied by any one woman, and, at the end of the
movie, nothing has been solved.  He brings all of his problems upon
himself (crashing his car because he's receiving fellatio, and other
such stunts), so it's pretty hard to care about him.  In addition, isn't
Allen capable of creating characters who aren't just like him?  I know
he is, but he didn't do it in Celebrity.
The vacant emotional attachment with the main character is not
recaptured in the supporting performances.  Davis, playing the same
woman with low self-esteem that she played in Deconstructing Harry, has
a few touching moments, but ends up the same despicable celebrity-type
that fills the rest of the movie.  Some of the actresses are saved
because of their beauty -- Theron and Ryder, especially -- but they're
not likable people.  Only Famke Janssen, as a book editor interested in
Simon's new novel, has any life.  The men in the picture don't do much
better -- Joe Mantegna is pretty dull as the man who remarries Robin,
while DiCaprio, as a Christian Slater/Johnny Depp-type spoiled young
actor, is funny but disengaging.
What's really insulting about Celebrity is how dull and standard its
"themes" are.  Allen seems to think that he's making an insightful movie
about the way "normal" people look at celebrities.  The main problem
with this is that the character with whom we're supposed to identify,
Simon, is not a "normal" guy -- he's just as entrenched in the Hollywood
image as the rest of the characters.  The other problem is that the
image we get of these celebrities is no more enlightening than the view
the media gives us -- none of them register as realistic, interesting
characters; they mostly just function as set pieces for boring
dialogue.  In addition, Allen decides he needs a scene in which the
theme is expressed explicitly (Robin, in this scene, says something
like, "It's interesting to see the way we all look at the people we
celebrate!").  
Celebrity is arguably Allen's biggest misfire to date.  It does have a
few good scenes -- Theron's super-orgasmic model character is kind of
funny, and the last scene might have been moving had the rest of the
film shown us a character or two.  But Celebrity is a failure at the
core, unless Allen's point was to make a self-indulgent movie about
himself and his friends.  If he wanted to make his audience feel like
they were on the outside of a big joke, then he succeeded in that.  I,
for one, don't enjoy feeling like an outsider.  

Title
Review for Tarzan and the Lost City (1998)
Director:  Carl Schenkel
Cast:  Casper Van Dien, Jane March, Steve Waddington
Screenplay:  Bayard Johnson, J. Anderson Black
Producers:  Stanley S. Canter, Dieter Geissler, Michael Lake
Runtime:  83 min.
US Distribution:  Columbia Tristar
Rated PG:  mild violence
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
There are many films about that great jungle guy Tarzan, but I've only
seen a couple of them.  I've been subjected to Tarzan, the Ape Man
(1932) with Johnny Weissmuller, which is one of the earliest, if not the
earliest, of the series.  Although considered a classic by some, I found
it to be an intensely dull film on every level.  The other that I've
seen is Greystoke (1984), with Christopher Lambert as Tarzan and Ian
Holm as his friend.  That film I enjoyed very much; it's well-made,
well-acted, and seemed to update the very dated concept competently.
Now, in 1998, we are given Tarzan and the Lost City, staring Casper Van
Dien (of Starship Troopers) as the man in the title.  It's much more
like the 1932 film, although far worse in every way.  This is a
profoundly boring cinematic experience.  Not only is it boring--it's a
terrible film.  It's poorly acted, terribly written, ornamented in
sloppy special effects, and a shameless Indiana Jones rip-off.  Even the
sets and locations, which should be vast and exciting, are dull and
perfunctory.  I'm not a fan of Tarzan to begin with, but I can
appreciate a good film about him.  Tarzan and the Lost City had me
looking at my watch every five minutes.
I've thought long and hard about how to synopsize the story, but the
"story" of this 83-minute feature is so thin that I find it vastly
difficult to do so.  Van Dien, as I mentioned, plays Tarzan.  We are not
introduced to him as a character--he simply appears in an early scene,
dressed in a tuxedo, apparently having already passed the humanizing
phase that I thought was present in all Tarzan films.  
The next scene has him telling Jane (Jane March) that he needs to go to
Africa to stop somebody bad.  Jane is also given no real introduction;
when we first see her, it's like we're already supposed to know who she
is and what she's like.  This is a major flaw:  this film, since it's
not an official sequel or continuation of any story, should start from
scratch and introduce characters--especially the main characters--in a
formal way.  Since it doesn't, the characters are never explained or
developed, and there's nothing to care about.
Well, they get to Africa, and Tarzan quickly takes off his clothes to
be a jungle guy.  It turns out that he's there to stop a mad fortune
seeker named Nigel Ravens (Steven Waddington), who's butchering African
tribes in his trek to find the Lost City described in the title.  What's
in the Lost City?  Who knows.  Why does he want to go there?  Don't
bother asking.  Even the climactic scene provides nothing but a light
show (and a poorly-animated one, at that), and never do we hear a single
coherent explanation of what the freakin' heck this piece of twaddle is
about.  The film even uses magic in a few scenes to solve problems
(Tarzan gets bitten by a poisonous snake, and is saved my magical bees),
and where this magic comes from or what it is remains a mystery at the
end of the film.
Did I mention the film is boring?  The direction by Carl Schenkel is
without even a hint of style to make it interesting, and a dry action
film is never good.  There's not a single clever shot in the entire
film, and there's not a scene to be found that is interesting, exciting,
funny, or charming.  There are a lot of moments featuring tribesmen
dancing, and none of this is new.  When they finally reach the Lost
City, it's just a big map painting of a pyramid.  I was expecting to be
enthralled in the visual presentation of this film (I didn't see any
previews for it beforehand), but there's nothing here to elicit
wonderment or awe.
The acting just isn't good, but there aren't any characters, so it
barely matters.  Waddington overacts in a rare way, but it's still not
fun like most overacting usually is.  March has almost no lines, and
therefore doesn't have much of chance to prove anything.  Van Dien's
wooden (but not terrible) acting is appropriate for Starship Troopers,
but here he needs to carry the whole show.  He looks right for the role,
but he begins the film with a hint of some unknown accent, and slowly
loses it as the film progresses.  This isn't that big of a deal, really,
because the screenplay (written by *two* people with apparently no
judgment whatsoever) provides almost no dialogue through the second half
of the film.
Tarzan and the Lost City is not a good Tarzan film.  It's not a good
film by any comparison, or by any definition of a "good" film.  It is
not entertaining.  It is not well-crafted.  It's a boring chore, an
exercise in inadequacy and ineptitude.  I don't recommend it, even if
you like bad films, even if you love Tarzan films.  I didn't care about
Tarzan films before this, and I'll approach them with skepticism from
now on.

Title
Review for Postman, The (1997)
Director: Kevin Costner
Cast: Kevin Costner, Will Patton, Larenz Tate, Olivia Williams, James
Russo, Daniel von Bargen
Rated PG-13: Violence, sex, language
    It is the year 2013, and a war in 1997 leads to the end of
civilization as we know it. A man named Bethlehem--General
Bethlehem--has become master of the universe, controlling a semi-large
army using tactics similar to those of Hitler's. His day-to-day
activities include roaming the Beautiful countryside and taking supplies
from small villages of people who are obviously at his mercy. Oh yeah,
and before the apocalypse, he was a copy machine salesman.
    One day he makes the mistake of enlisting the Nameless Man, who
subsequently becomes a postman and saves the world and the human race
from the brink of destruction.
    Kevin Costner's The Postman is one of the worst films I've ever
seen. It's a multi-faceted mess; a heinous misfire; a laughable, silly,
pretentious, three-hour waste of life, time, and effort. To see it--to
sit through this film and attentively watch every second as I did--is an
experience that many, if not all, people should have, if for no other
reason than to understand what a terrible film in its purest of states
looks like. It is almost inconceivable to me that this movie was created
by the same man responsible for Dances With Wolves, for The Postman is a
film based on a flawed and ludicrous concept, and takes it to the next
level by adding offbeat humor, unintentional humor, awful direction, and
bad acting. These things alone don't make this film worthless: the movie
is ultimately destroyed by it's own seriousness. It plays almost like a
parody of itself and the genre to which it belongs, but in time we
realize that, dear God, this film thought we cared.
    General Bethlehem, played with fire and charisma by Will Patton, is
a fascinating character. He's not so enticing simply because of his
characteristics on screen, but because of what his presence in the film
does to it as a whole. Patton brings and authentic evil flair to this
unfortunately stock-evil character, but I like the scene in which he
screams, "You want a war! I'll give you . . . a war!" Patton, unlike
Costner, seems to realize this story's potential for satire. He
overacts, true, but it's so fun to watch, and I'm confident that Patton,
who is a great actor, knew what he was doing. Out of all the characters
in this film, he was the only one whose fate I cared about, which is
ironic given the "evil" sign hung around his neck. Although I liked him,
he serves simply to send this film to rock-bottom: his exaggerated
presence is what this film should have been, but he contrasts so sharply
with the rest of this wannabe feel-good slop that that nothing can be
taken seriously.
    Of course, the rest of the film would have still been awful without
him, but it would have been consistent awfulness and a lot more boring.
Nothing feels real in this movie; it is so phony and dead that any
attempt at a moving scene or moment made me laugh out loud. I really
hated the scene in which the Postman (previously referred to as Nameless
Man) flies by a little kid holding up a letter on the road, only to turn
around, stare at the kid for thirty seconds, and then ride back at full
speed and swipe the letter out of the kid's hand. Costner shot this in
slow-motion, no less, and I can't recall a scene that has such an
opposite effect as intended as this one. Scene after scene has this
quality, this good-intentioned garbage that looks fake, feels fake,
screams for attention, but elicits only laughter and snickering.
    The Postman is based on a book, and I wonder how much of this film's
failure is Costner's fault. It's hard to imagine taking this premise
seriously, even if the film had been done well. I, personally, just
think that postmen do their job. Sure, there are probably postmen who
really take pride in their work, but I just can't quite manage the
explosive energy that this film wants me to manifest. Giving mail,
picking up mail, sorting mail--it doesn't get my blood flowing. As if
this weren't enough, the film shoves this down our throats by asking us
to believe that, in the future apocalypses to come, postmen will be the
ones to set us straight. Aside from this, no history of what the hell
happened between 1997 and 2013 is explained, or even hinted to, and that
was the only element of this film that I wanted to know more about.
Everything else is showed in glorious, excessive detail, for Costner
obviously kept every bit of footage in the final cut. The film could
have been half this long.
    Bad acting and bad dialogue usually show up together, but I think
the actors in The Postman are mostly competent. The dialogue, however,
is not. One scene, in which the Postman is spoon-feeding soup to his
love interest because she fell down, is supposed to be moving. Costner,
however, couldn't resist a stab at humor, so she says something that
sounds completely rational, and he says, "You're so weird!" in a really
goofy tone. A lot of people laughed during this scene. I thought it
might have been funny in a different movie, but a film like The Postman
needs to be more careful with its dialogue--the film is overloaded with
verbal colloquialisms. Costner even says, "Bite me!" at one point. Most
of the dialogue, even when it isn't trying to be important, is awful.
    Yes, The Postman is the worst film of 1997. No amount of good
intentions can lift this from its fate. Even the Beautiful scenery and
nice, huge sets became nauseating after I had stared at them for three
hours. Like I said, many should see this film, and many probably will,
but for the wrong reason--you must marvel in the simple fact that
Costner clearly had no idea what he was doing. A hopelessly inane
concept, mixed with the worst possible elements of filmmaking and
acting, make this film an experience that you're unlikely to forget.
View it with awe and wonder, and ask yourself when it's finished, "What
on earth was he thinking?" The answer to that question would be
infinitely more interesting than this film.

Title
Review for City of Angels (1998)
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
City of Angels is the kind of love story that I enjoy the most: 
thought-provoking, moving, and completely unsentimental.  I find it
interesting that this film has been released the same day as My Giant,
which is a film that is undone completely by its wretched
sentimentality.  City of Angels is a wonderful film, enhanced by
interesting and well-rounded characters and some of the most immersive
imagery of the last couple of years.  It's a love story that takes the
familiar angel themes and makes them new and necessary to the story, and
avoids most of the cliches we're so used to seeing in films like this.  
City of Angels is an apparently loose remake of Wim Wenders' 1988 film
Wings of Desire.  I have yet to see Wings of Desire, so I am,
unfortunately, unable to make a comparison of the two.  I have heard,
however, that City of Angels is dissimilar from the original in numerous
ways, which makes me glad that this film isn't a rip-off of its source
material.  
Nicolas Cage stars as Seth, an angel who, like all of his angel
counterparts, is present to lead the dying to heaven (or somewhere just
like it).  One day, he is forced to take the life of a patient of Dr.
Maggie Rice (Meg Ryan), and his attention is called to her.  The angels
can make themselves seen to humans, but they can't experience any of the
senses (most importantly, touch).  He shows himself to Maggie, and she
falls for him, unaware that he is slightly unavailable because of his
apparition status.  
Seth wants to become human so he can feel her.  That's when he meets
Nathaniel Messinger (Dennis Franz), "former celestial messenger and
recent addition to the human race."  (As a side note, I found Messinger
to be the most fascinating character, for I can only imagine how
incredibly liberating it must be to live knowing what lies beyond
death.)  Messinger explains to Seth that it is possible for angels to
become human.  
Seth manages to convince Maggie that he is an angel (I know, it sounds
ridiculous, but the scene in which she finds out is exceptionally
well-done); after much deliberation, she tells him that she could only
be with a man who can feel.  This, of course, is when Seth decides to
take the plunge (literally) from a building; when he wakes up from the
fall, he is human, and happy to feel what it's like to have a split lip
and blood oozing from his forehead.
Since I love this film so much, I'll make a minor note that it
certainly isn't perfect.  Although it is original and mesmerizing, it
does fall prey to a few of the cliches of the genre.  The plotting of
the story by writer Dawn Steel is rather formulaic (though the details
are what make the story excellent, and Steel has done a great job with
them).  The ending, too, could have been more powerful and less
predictable.  These elements are minor, though, and barely detracted
from my overall enjoyment of City of Angels.  
The acting is superb from everyone involved.  This is perhaps my
second-favorite performance from Cage (my favorite being  The Rock). 
He's quiet and pensive, and his eyes are engaging when he speaks his
softly-toned words.  He's perfect for a role like this, and at the same
time he reassures us he's not bound by playing the psycho (though he is
good at it, as he shows in Face/Off).  Meg Ryan is a powerful, enticing,
and appealingly-chirpy actress, and her work here is some of her best. 
Dennis Franz, however, steals all of his scenes as the energetic
former-angel.
What I admire most about City of Angels is its overall presentation. 
Director Brad Silberling is a talented man, and he knows that a story
like this is driven by the characters, rather than forced
sentimentality.  His direction is steady, and he shows this in just
about every scene:  near the beginning, Maggie has to tell a mother and
her two children that their father is dead.  There is no music or
elaborate camera work; we simply see the reactions of the characters to
the information.  This is the way stories should be told, and the
strength of scenes resonates more completely when the emotions are real. 
The film also appeals to the senses in a way that few love stories do. 
Cinematographer John Seale (The English Patient) provides some of the
most stunning images I've seen on the big screen:  hundreds of
black-clad angels stand on a dim beach in the early morning hours (just
as an example).  The music, by Gabriel Yared (also of The English
Patient), is perfect for this film:  it's quiet and moody music (but not
sentimental!), and adds to the atmosphere and tone nicely.  The visual
presentation of City of Angels is easily the best of 1998 so far.  All
of this adds up to a film that is instantly set apart from other members
of this genre.  It's a film that relies on character development and
imagery to get the story across--the excellent actors and the
professional production values make City of Angels one of those rare
films that both entertains and instigates thought simultaneously.  

Title
Review for Abre los ojos (1997)
Director: Alejandro Amenabar
Cast: Eduardo Noriega, Penelope Cruz, Chete Lera, Fele Martinez, Gerard
Barray, Pepe Navarro
Screenplay: Alejandro Amenabar, Mateo Gil
Producers: Fernando Bovaira, Jose Luis Cuerda
Runtime: 117 min.
US Distribution: Artisan Entertainment
Rated R: Language, sex, violence
Copyright 1999 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
        In order to avoid spoiling the film, I can say almost nothing about the
twisted story behind Alejandro Amenabar's Open Your Eyes, a
psychological thriller unlike any I've ever seen.  The film is a
convoluted and fast-paced journey into the nightmare-like madness of a
Spanish man (Eduardo Noriega).  With each twist of the plot, the film
becomes increasingly interesting and profound.  The performances are
wonderful, with a standout presence from Noriega.  But what really makes
Open Your Eyes a unique experience is Amenabar's attitude towards his
film:  he avoids pretensions and overwrought preaching, and goes
straight for philosophical depth.  Open Your Eyes could have been a
ludicrously confusing film, but instead turns out to be an unforgettable
and intense expedition into the world of dreams.  

Title
Review for BASEketball (1998)
Director:  David Zucker
Cast:  Trey Parker, Matt Stone, Yasmine Bleeth, Jenny McCarthy, Robert
Vaughn, Ernest Borgnine
Screenplay:  David Zucker, Robert LoCash, Lewis Friedman, Jeff Wright
Producers:  Robert LoCash, Gil Netter, David Zucker
Runtime:  90 min
US Distribution:  Universal
Rated R:  vulgar humor, language 
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
BASEketball is a fantastic assembly of failed jokes.  I sat
straight-faced through much of the film, enduring the agonizing
experience of a make-fun-of-sports film that is rarely imaginative,
funny, or smart.  Oh, I know, a film like this isn't supposed to be
"smart," right?  Well, the funniest films have underlying intelligence
-- a feeling you get knowing that the makers had some kind of thought or
vision while creating their picture.  BASEketball gave me no such
feelings.  I just sat and watched actors romp around a script that
relies almost entirely on toilet humor.
It is a bad film.  I would have preferred to dislike it more, but the
presence of Trey Parker and Matt Stone keeps me from despising
BASEketball.  I've never seen these guys before (and I've never watched
an episode of "South Park," which is their creation), but they have a
strange kind of presence that had me entertained throughout
BASEketball.  I wasn't always laughing, but I was amused.  On the basis
of this, I begrudgingly award the film my lowest-possible rating in the
"mediocre" category.
Parker and Stone play a couple of loser buddies, Coop and Doug.  One
day, in their driveway, they create a game, which turns out to be a
strange and frightening amalgamation of baseball and basketball.  It
becomes a neighborhood hit, when finally a rich guy (Ernest Borgnine)
comes to buy the game and make it a professional sport.  Cut ahead five
years, and our heroes are playing in the national BASEketball league
(their team name is the Beers, which is supposed to be a joke).  
One of the rules of the game is that players can't trade teams, and
teams can't move to different cities.  This is where the story comes
in!  See, when the rich guy dies, another rich guy (Robert Vaughn) wants
to break the previously mentioned rules.  It's up to our heroes to stop
this other rich guy.  In the meantime, the two of them are fighting over
the nice-looking director (Yasmine Bleeth) of the Dreams Come True
Foundation.
Unlike Mafia!, BASEketball takes itself seriously from time to time.  A
film this silly should never, ever take itself seriously.  There should
be absolutely zero "tender" moments between our hero and the love
interest.  There shouldn't even *be* a love interest:  the mere presence
of a love interest is an immediate removal of points on my scorecard,
because it requires scenes in which the two characters kiss, or almost
kiss.  I despise scenes like these.  They aren't funny, and every scene
in a film like this should aspire to new comic heights.
It doesn't help that director David Zucker has no focus on his humor. 
Sometimes BASEketball spoofs films.  Sometimes it spoofs the sports
industry.  Sometimes it's nothing more than a big fart joke, no more
complex than Doctor Dolittle or There's Something About Mary.  I like
films that spoof specific things like films and sports, and even big
fart jokes have their place in certain movies, but Zucker never follows
through with any of his attacks, and the result is a slew of jokes that
seem like they all belong in different films.  Some of them are funny
(the locker room scene is great), but too many fall flat.  Not laughing
during a comedy is like an uncomfortable silence on a first date.
But there's something interesting about Parker and Stone.  They're both
endearing -- it seems they knew that much of this material wasn't very
funny; the interesting thing about BASEketball is that, despite it's
failure as a comedy, it's never boring.  In fact, is usually amusing,
thanks to Parker and Stone.  These guys have personality, and they
certainly know how to kiss (the scene in which they make up is rather
unexpected).  This isn't a good film, but it's a good introduction to a
couple of funny guys who may have found a place for themselves in the
industry.

Title
Review for Zero Effect (1998)
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
Zero Effect gets its title from the main character, Daryl Zero (Bill
Pullman), although we don't understand what it truly means until the
very last line of dialogue in the film.  Zero is a private investigator,
perhaps the best private investigator who ever lived (at least he'd like
to think so).  However, he's a socially inept being, and eccentric in
every possible way -- this fact certainly makes his talents as a private
eye even more bewildering than they already are.
Zero's accomplice is Steve Arlo (Ben Stiller), a "normal" guy who does
the business side of the job -- he's the one who actually speaks to
clients and explains Zero's greatness as an investigator.  The opening
scene has Steve explaining the many virtues of Zero's talents to
soon-to-be client Gregory Stark (Ryan O'Neal).  It turns out that Stark
has lost a key to a safe deposit box, and is now being blackmailed for
something that he apparently knows nothing about.
Zero takes the case, and the plot thickens.  His path leads to a young,
pretty paramedic named Gloria Sullivan (Kim Dickens).  Despite her
luminous and seemingly-harmless presence, she turns out to be the one
blackmailing Stark.  Through his investigations, Zero learns why, but
not without developing feelings for Gloria -- feelings that, because of
his reclusive behavior, are new and confusing to him.
I have no particular affinity towards the mystery genre of film.  I can
idly enjoy movies about private investigators, and, every once in a
while, a film like Chinatown comes a long that blows me away (actually,
no private eye film has ever reached Chinatown's greatness).  Zero
Effect, which is Jake Kasdan's first effort as writer/director, is a
film about a private investigator that succeeds in all attempts:  it's
an original, funny, and completely involving motion picture.  With so
many cliches available to this genre, I find it amazing that Kasdan
avoided all of them.  But he didn't just successfully avoid flaws:  he
has created a great film here, one that had me interested and fascinated
from the first shot to the final moment.
Take, for starters, the great cast of characters.  Pullman is terrific
as Zero, showing a comic flair that I really haven't seen from him since
Spaceballs.  Zero is the kind of guy who seems at ease switching
personalities so frequently as he does here; the fact that he's an
almost exaggeratedly twisted, emotionally unstable man outside of his
profession is not at all difficult to believe.  Pullman's performance is
much more layered than it might seem at first glance, and the occasional
voice-over as he's going through the motions of his job are insightful
and often hilarious.
Ben Stiller is also a very funny individual; he's the kind of comedian
who makes normal lines sound funny.  "I'll shoot you," he says to Stark
at one point.  "I have a gun, and everything."  His character is also
well-drawn, with an interesting subplot involving his girlfriend (Angela
Featherstone) who is not happy with the extensive amounts of time he
must spend away from her due to the unpredictability of his job.  O'Neal
also gives his character a bit of depth; and Kim Dickens, last seen (and
underused) in Mercury Rising, gets a chance to show us her talent here,
giving Gloria the realism this kind of character really needs.
I find Zero Effect to be an immensely funny and witty film.  Kasdan's
humor is of the best kind -- soft spoken, and mostly dialogue-driven
(though there are some great visual jokes).  It's the kind of humor
that's funny even after you've seen it five or six times.  There's one
scene in which Zero talks about how detached he is, an how that makes
him such a great detective.  What we see during this narration are
various shots of him sitting on a bed, or standing motionlessly, with
his hair destroyed and an utterly blank look painted on his unshaven
face, his eyes pointing to something off camera, but obviously to
nothing in particular.  I can't convey to you how funny this is, but
what makes it great film making is that it has a point -- scenes like
this are frequent, and they provide solid characterization of Zero.
As a side note, I don't consider myself an average viewer when it comes
to comedy (not to sound elitist) -- I find things funny that many do
not, and vice versa.  There was a clump of people near me in the theater
laughing uproariously through this film, and the rest of the theater was
relatively silent through most of it.  I have a feeling the humor here
won't appeal to everyone, but there's certainly enough story and
character development to keep anyone's interest.  
Jake Kasdan, son of writer/director Lawrence Kasdan, is only 22 years
old.  I found this out after seeing the film, and I can't remember ever
being so impressed with a film maker.  His direction is stylish without
being pretentious, and his writing is mature, full, and developed.  Zero
Effect is the kind of film that I'll buy for my collection -- smart,
original films like this are rare as it is, but this one actually has a
heart and a soul.  At the end of the film, I was involved in the
characters, and I was satisfied with the outcome.  And, with Kasdan's
undeniable talent at such a young age, all I can do is hope to see a lot
more from him in the future.

Title
Review for Deconstructing Harry (1997)
Director: Woody Allen
Cast: Woody Allen, Billy Crystal, Demi Moore, Robin Williams, Judy
Davis, Elisabeth Shue, kirstie Alley, Bob
Balaban, Richard Benjamin, Eric Bogosian, Hazelle Goodman, Mariel
Hemingway, Amy Irving, Julie Kavner,
Caroline Aaron, Eric Lloyd, Julia Louis-Dreyfus, Tobey Maguire, Stanley
Tucci
Rated R: Language, sex, nudity
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    I don't know a single person that doesn't think that Woody Allen is
annoying. I, myself, am one of those
people. I think he is intensely annoying. I watch him jitter and shake
around the screen, spewing
half-sentences like a broken verbal machine gun, with those black little
eyes magnified behind those
ridiculously thick glasses, and I wonder why I repeatedly go to see the
films that he writes, directs, and
stars in. It doesn't take me long to figure it out--he's really funny.
That's usually what it comes down to.
Maybe the character he plays isn't always really funny, but his
supporting characters are so funny, and the
situations are absolutely hilarious.
    Deconstructing Harry is his latest film, and I imagine that to
obtain complete enjoyment, one should know
Woody Allen pretty well. I, for one, do not--I have not seen a lot of
his films (I think this marks the fourth
or fifth), and what I know of him outside of his work is just what I
read in the tabloids and Entertainment
Weekly. But I know that this film is one big stab at himself, and I can
assume that it is successful. But like
most of his films, this one is successful because of the numerous
interesting characters, and the witty,
sharp, Woody Allen humor. What this film seems to have that his others
do not is a jagged edge, a kind of
licentious and hateful quality, an element present simply to make more
fun of himself.
    It's about Harry Block (Allen), a godless, sex-crazed author who, at
the time of the film, is in complete
disarray. He's just written a book that gives up the secrets of some of
his closest friends and ex-girlfriends,
and none of them are particularly happy with the situation. He's never
allowed to see his kid, his parents
have all but disowned him, his sister and her husband look down upon him
because he isn't a true Jewish
man, and so forth. On top of all this, he can't get motivated to write
anything significant, so his life is on
hold.
    The film is kind of a journey for Harry to understand himself, or
maybe make himself better, should he
reach the point of caring about himself. It leads to a situation in
which he's driving in a Volvo with a
hooker and a corpse, on his way to get honored by the school which
expelled him. Like all of Allen's
films, he has a huge cast. It's nearly distractingly large, with almost
every part filled up by a big-name star.
Most of the women turn in the best performances, with genuinely funny
moments delivered by Judy Davis,
Kirstie Alley, Julia Louis-Dreyfus, and Demi Moore. If you're familiar
with Allen's films, then you'll know
what to expect--it's the same kind of humor, pacing, and mood to which
we're all accustomed in his
movies.
    This one, however, seems to suffer from a peculiar storytelling
technique. Because of the nature of the
story, Harry frequently relives pieces of short stories that he has
written; most of them star a guy thinly
disguised as himself, and tells a true story. He remembers one of the
first stories he wrote, about his first
encounter with a prostitute. Another story he remembers is one in which
he goes to hell to save the woman
he loves. Throughout the film, the action also switches to a different
cast doing the exact same thing,
which is meant to represent the book which he has just written (the one
that everyone is upset at him for).
If my explanation of this is confusing, then I'm doing my job--it is
also rather confusing in the film. I didn't
put the pieces together until the last quarter of the movie. It's really
not that obvious, nor is Allen's reason
for doing it (though I imagine if you're familiar with all of his work
then there is something here to give you
a hint). The flashbacks sure are funny, though.
    Towards the end, he actually meets the character that he created,
his alter-ego, and this individual gives
Harry all kinds of advice. I like the idea (look into your writing for
advice), and the central idea behind his
character--he can function in the artistic world but not in the
realistic world--is a fascinating one.
Ultimately, the film aside from the comedy works because Allen really
thought about his concepts and
materialized them effectively (although the flashbacks to his stories
could have been less confusing).
Whether you love him or hate him, you're likely to enjoy Deconstructing
Harry. And if you know Allen
really well, you'll probably get a lot more out of the film. As for me,
it proved to make a worthwhile
evening of entertainment, even if though is about a godless, sex-crazed
author in complete disarray.

Title
Review for eXistenZ (1999)
Director: David Cronenberg
Cast: Jennifer Jason Leigh, Jude Law, Willem Dafoe, Ian Holm, Don
McKellar, Callum Keith Rennie, Sarah Polley, Christopher Eccleston
Screenplay: David Cronenberg
Producers: David Cronenberg, Andras Hamori, Robert Lantos
Runtime: 97 min
US Distribution: Dimension Films
Rated R: strong violence, sexual imagery, and language
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Making a movie out of a video game is a pretty bad idea.  We've seen
numerous critical and box office failures that began as depthless video
games (how can a video game really have depth?) and resulted in
depthless movies.  Making a movie about a video game -- now that's a
different story.  As technology progresses, video games are getting more
advanced and immersive, and the political and ethical questions
concerning our urge to lose ourselves in virtual reality is in full
swing.
Of course, David Cronenberg's new film, eXistenZ, is the fourth movie
in the last two months (and the third in the last two days) to deal with
an aspect of this theme.  The other films -- The Thirteenth Floor, Open
Your Eyes, and The Matrix -- range from bad to wonderful, but they all
tackle the virtual reality craze from a slightly different angle. 
eXistenZ is the first to do it using video games as its theme, and one
could easily make the argument that Cronenberg's movie is the most
pointedly critical of the bunch.  It's also the most blatantly strange,
and the most sexually perverse.  And while I disagree wholeheartedly
with many of Cronenberg's claims, I found myself entranced and delighted
with just about every scene of his movie.
eXistenZ is the name of a computer game created by Allegra Gellar, an
abrasive character played by the fearless and mesmerizing Jennifer Jason
Leigh (she forfeited her role in Eyes Wide Shut to make this film, which
impresses me).  During the trial run of eXistenZ, an assassin attempts
to assassinate her, and she's taken off by Ted Pikul (Jude Law), her
bodyguard-in-training.  While on the run, they meet with several people
who are anti-video games, and who attempt to kill Allegra and destroy
her game.  Fearing that her game is moribund (the pod which houses the
game seems to have consciousness), she decides she needs to play
eXistenZ with someone friendly -- namely Ted, who has no interest in
doing so.  Naturally, they enter the game, and things unpredictably
progress from there.  
eXistenZ is worthy of Cronenberg's name.  Aesthetically, the movie is
just plain strange.  The extended metaphor between sex and the game is
anything but subtle; the pod I mentioned earlier is organic and pulsates
with orgasmic pleasure whenever it's used.  Players jack in to the pod
by using a phallic umbilical cord inserted into a suggestive bio-port in
the spine (you must be fitted with a bio-port in order to play the
games).  And though I found the sexual imagery to be in fairly bad
taste, I had no problem soaking it up with silent satisfaction.  The
movie looks just right, with bland colors and appropriately perfunctory
sets.  Howard Shore's musical score is superb, using deep stringed
instruments the way they're meant to be used.  And I love that the film
is set in the vague future; it gives the story a degree of dreadful
believability.
The film is artistically advanced, and Cronenberg does a splendid job
of creating a world that really feels like a video game.  I have more
than passing knowledge of the history of video games (I was once a
zombie at the mercy of my Nintendo), and so I was right at home in the
world of eXistenZ.  There are details in this game world that could have
only been inserted by someone familiar with the way games work -- the
arbitrary nature of the plots, the one-note characterizations, the way
key figures in the story loop mindlessly when they're not being spoken
to.  When it focuses on these elements, the film is really quite funny. 
I love the scene in the Chinese restaurant, in which our heroes are
forced to compose a bone gun out of mutated amphibian parts, shortly
before shooting the Chinese waiter for plot-progressing reasons.  The
film also features an array of wonderful actors, including Leigh, Law,
Ian Holm, Willem Dafoe, Christopher Eccleston, and Sarah Polley.
eXistenZ is most compelling and also most frustrating on a thematic
level.  The basic idea is nothing particularly new -- we've all heard
the argument that the closer we get to virtual reality, the further we
get from true reality.  Then there's the question, "What is reality,
anyway?"  Cronenberg isn't interested in these over-explored ideas.  He
just wants to show us what happens when people become incredibly
obsessed with a life that isn't theirs.  But I was mildly disappointed
with the end of the film, for it creates more questions than it answers,
and Cronenberg doesn't drop enough hints throughout the film for us to
figure out what really happens.  And I was annoyed with the insinuation
that video games lead to mindless violence.  A few months ago, when the
media found time to drool over the massacre in Littleton, Colorado, I
found myself enraged at the screenshots of Doom (a popular and violent
video game) and the implication that playing games like this makes you
shoot real people.  
I digress.  Even though the ending isn't quite satisfactory,
Cronenberg's eXistenZ is an artistic success and an
intelligently-constructed argument against virtual reality.  As we
approach the end of the millenium, we're going to be seeing a lot more
movies like this one -- films that inspire paranoia and breed neurosis. 
But this whole "Is it real or not?" genre is starting to grow on me. 
Perhaps we'll be spared the displeasure of more films based on video
games; instead, we'll be subjected to movies about video game
programmers who can't tell if they're in the real world or the virtual
world.  If these movies turn out to be as fun and imaginative as
eXistenZ, I won't have any problem buying in to them.

Title
Review for Desperate Measures (1998)
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    Desperate Measures is a film that takes an interesting idea, adds
two great actors (Andy Garcia and Michael Keaton), a director who knows
what he's doing, and ends up giving the audience a lot of action film
cliches. There is so much potential here that it is a little upsetting
to see that the script misleads the film into a by-the-numbers formula.
As standard as it is, the execution is professional, and the acting
superb. I recommend it based specifically on these merits.
    Garcia stars as Frank Connor, a San Francisco cop whose son, Matt
(Joseph Cross), has leukemia and needs a bone marrow transplant. Through
a few illegal maneuvers, Connor learns that the only available donor
that matches his son is Peter McCabe (Keaton), a brutal mass-murderer
with an IQ of 150. McCabe agrees to the transplant, but only to be given
the chance to escape. Naturally, he does escape, and then Connor is
forced to fight against the local police (they are trying to kill
McCabe) in order to save the criminal and ultimately save his son.
    I've read that the story for this film is silly, but I
disagree--during a time of the year in which films bankrupt on new and
clever ideas are dominant, it's kind of nice to see something that is
high-concept. The problem here lies in the regression from good ideas to
overused action cliches. What begins with enticing dialogue between the
hero and the villain ends in car chases and roof-leaping mayhem. It's
not that these elements are purely bad, it's just that we've seen it all
before. There isn't anything new about these particular chase sequences
or roof-jumping stunts.
    I observed another large problem in character motivation. Most of
the film takes place in the hospital, after McCabe escapes. However,
instead of getting out of the building (which doesn't seem like it would
be as hard as getting away in the first place), McCabe sticks around and
takes hostages, almost as if he's trying to give Connor a chance to
catch him. Later, despite his high intelligence, McCabe does some things
that don't quite add up. Nonetheless, Keaton does a good job with the
character (he can say lines like, "I am immortal!" without sounding
dumb).
    Garcia is also good here, but he's given very little to do. Frank is
not an interesting character. The interactions between this man and his
son (Cross does an excellent job as the child) are moving, but Frank as
a character is little more than something to drive the plot. In the end,
we're rooting just for Matt. Marcia Gay Harden, who plays Matt's doctor,
has some good scenes but is ultimately not very interesting because of
the script. Near the start there's also a moment that bothered
me--McCabe warns Connor not to try and get inside his head. This scene
reminded me of The Silence of the Lambs, but neither the dialogue nor
Keaton can recreate the magic of Anthony Hopkins in the role of Hannibal
Lecter.
    There is, however, a lot to like about Desperate Measures; what I
liked most is the cinematography. Barbet Schroeder (Single White Female)
does some interesting things with camera angles and lighting, and the
set production is sharp and ominous. The film feels tight and organized,
but almost too organized, and often predicable. Because of the nature of
the film, it's possible to predict the outcome of the story after just
seeing the preview, although getting there is still entertaining.
    So, Desperate Measures becomes another entry in the long line of
thrillers. And, like most of them, it doesn't have a lot to set it apart
from the crowd. The execution is good, and the magnetic performers do a
lot to help it out, but these elements end up just keeping the film from
being unwatchable. Someone out there needs to make a shocking,
unpredictable film like this. With a sharper script, Desperate Measures
could have easily blown away the competition.

Title
Review for My Giant (1998)
Director:  Michael Lehmann
Cast:  Billy Crystal, Gheorghe Muresan, Kathleen Quinlan, Zane Carney,
Steven Seagal, Joss Ackland
Screenplay:  David Seltzer
Producers:  Billy Crystal, Peter Schindler
Runtime:  1:37
US Distribution:  Columbia
Rated PG:  language, mild violence, crude humor
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
If there's one thing I just can't stand, it's a film that oozes with
sentimentality.  Here's a note to all film makers:  films are more
effective when the emotions of the characters speak for themselves. 
Swelling, saddening music is not a good way to tell us that the people
in the film are unhappy, and that the situation is hopeless.  Alas, My
Giant is a film that uses manipulative sentimentality so frequently and
with such high intensity that I forgot as I watched it that there are
other ways of getting audience members choked up.
What reminded me was that I wasn't choked up, or even the slightest bit
moved, for that matter.  My Giant is a forced, contrived, and
conspicuously un-cute (I detest the word "cute" but I've chosen to use
it because the makers clearly wanted to create a "cute" film here).  It
takes a premise that might have been interesting (I liked the preview),
and bogs it down with endless plot turns and cliches, all of which are
intended to get some kind of easy emotional rise from the audience. 
Maybe it will work for some people.  It didn't work for me.
Billy Crystal plays Sam Cayman, an agent who, at the beginning of the
film, is in Romania.  He's in Romania because the kid actor he made
famous is doing a film.  The screenplay has him in Romania so he can get
fired, get in a car accident, and get saved by an enormous individual
who stands almost eight feet tall.  His name is Max (Gheorghe Muresan),
and Sam thinks he'd be a great movie star because of his size.
Subplots are as follows:  Sam has a son and a wife (Kathleen Quinlan),
and he's never around for them, so they move to Chicago.  Max is in love
with a woman named Lilianna who moved away from Romania twenty years
before the film begins.  Sam convinces Max to go back to America with
him so they can make lots of money, and so their various subplots can
all be resolved.  Sam is broke.  Max is dying.  Pass the kleenex.
My Giant, as a comedy, is only moderately funny.  It has its moments,
the best of which features Steven Seagal making fun of himself.  In one
great scene, Sam gets his son on the phone to talk to Seagal; of course,
his son doesn't believe that he's actually speaking to Seagal, and he
goes off about how bad of an actor he is (I would quote the line I like
but it would probably lose its effect).  
Crystal is always entertaining, and he has a few good lines here (some
of which are subtle throwaways that many will miss entirely); often,
however, he's countered by a slew of jokes that aren't funny, and cause
an involuntary rolling of the eyes.  Muresan is kind of fun to watch,
but he just can't act very well.  Quinlan, on the other hand, is a great
actress who needs to get a role that shows off her talents.  She was
underused last year in both Event Horizon and Breakdown, but at least in
those films she had moments in which she could show us her stuff.  Here,
the best thing she gets to do is fake a Romanian accent.
All of these disappointing ingredients create a film that, for much of
its running time, is simply mediocre.  As My Giant lumbers to its
inevitable conclusion, however, director Michael Lehmann (who did a
great job directing the underrated Hudson Hawk) and scriptwriter David
Seltzer pile on every cliche imaginable, each one intended specifically
to pull at our heartstrings.  Sam's multiple engagements with his family
are all completely hackneyed (how about a main character who has a
healthy relationship with his family?).  Later, it turns out the entire
story is supposed to be a great big metaphor signifying Sam's reunion
with his family.  And some people might think that what Sam does for Max
towards the end is a valiant thing, but I had a few morality problems
with it (and I apologize for being vague).
It's icky.  It drips with gooey, wannabe human emotions.  My Giant
could have been a straightforward and funny family film.  More
importantly, it could have been moving on a level far deeper than it
is.  Instead, it's a complicated, overlong, and under-engaging film that
elicits too few laughs and strives for superficial tears.  And since it
left me feeling completely unmoved, I stand by my position that
sentimentality is evil and will ultimately destroy the world.

Title
Review for Blast from the Past (1999)
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Every once in a while, a movie comes along that makes me wish it had
less of a plot.  Blast from the Past, for instance, is a film with some
great acting and a few truly funny moments, but is often compromised by
a really silly story that is neither believable nor terribly original. 
That's too bad, because the heart of Blast from the Past features a
funny, touching relationship between two young people who are made for
each other.
The film begins in 1962; Calvin and Helen Webber (Christopher Walken
and Sissy Spacek) find themselves frightened that the Cold War is going
to end in a nuclear holocaust, so they retreat to a fallout shelter for
thirty-five years.  Calvin assumes that the world above has been
annihilated, but he's wrong -- the only thing that blows up is their
house, due to an unexpected (and very convenient) plane crash.  Helen,
at this time, is pregnant, and gives birth to Adam within fifteen
minutes of entering the shelter.
Jump ahead thirty-five years; Adam has grown into a man (Brendan
Fraser).  Calvin has taught Adam the ways of the world -- how to box,
speak French, and verbalize thoughts clearly.  (Helen, by comparison,
has taught him how to dance.)  Adam decides he wants to meet a girl
("I've only been thinking about it for the last fifteen years," he
assures his mother).  So, he goes to the surface, and what ensues is
pretty obvious:  he falls for the first attractive girl he meets, Eve
(Alicia Silverstone).  Eve is your typical 90s-girl; she lives in LA,
and finds it hard to keep a job longer than six hours.  She likes to
date, but finds that most of her boyfriends feature good hair and nice
posteriors, but lack in cognitive abilities.  
This kind of story has been done a few times.  I suppose there are
people out there who would assert that the fish-out-of-water comedy has
an infinite capacity to entertain.  I agree to an extent -- there are
countless possible formulas for the fish-out-of-water comedy, and the
makers of Blast from the Past have chosen The Walking Anachronism -- the
man who doesn't fit in because he's a product of another era.  Brendan
Fraser makes the perfect outsider; with the crew-cut, gleaming teeth,
and bulging eyes, Fraser seems to be straight out of the 60s (I'm sure
his pastel clothing helps the image, too).  
Silverstone is also at her comic best; with this role, she proves to me
that she can escape the ditsy plague that hangs over her head like a
rain cloud.  She and Fraser complement each other with silky smoothness;
they do it so well that every scene they share is a mass of enjoyment,
hilarious and affecting.  It's one of those stories where you want the
characters to get together, and you know they will, but you fret over it
anyway.  Walken and Spacek are both very funny, but Dave Foley, as Eve's
gay friend, steals all of his scenes.
But the dopey plots frequently overtake the film like a wave of
nausea.  I was willing to suspend my disbelief of the premise:  I mean,
come on, it's not like the Webbers fallout would have gone unnoticed for
thirty-five years (even if they did build something on top of it).  And
I really doubt that a middle-class family of the 60s would have enough
resources to survive for thirty-five years underground.  The problem is
that this goofy background story takes up far too much of the film
(almost forty-five minutes, to be exact).  When Adam finally reaches the
surface, the picture takes itself a little more seriously.
Until, that is, the rest of the story is introduced.  The main focus is
the relationship between Adam and Eve (and yes, they do recognize the
significance of their names).  But why do we need a dumb subplot in
which Adam and Eve sell baseball cards to acquire frozen poultry?  And
why is there an annoying scene in which Eve sends a psychiatrist at
Adam?  Blast from the Past is far more effective when it concentrates on
its characters, and lets the actors do the work.  It's often funny, yes,
but it's inconsistent.  Perhaps the fish-out-of-water template can only
yield a silly plot like this.  I just wish someone had put more faith in
Fraser and Silverstone:  I'd rather have watched them talk for 90
minutes then ever have seen the inside of that ridiculous fallout
shelter.

Title
Review for Waterboy, The (1998)
Director:  Frank Coraci
Cast:  Adam Sandler, Fairuza Balk, Kathy Bates, Henry Winkler
Screenplay:  Tim Herlihy, Adam Sandler
Producers:  Jack Giarraputo, Robert Simonds
Runtime:  
US Distribution:  Beuna Vista/Touchstone
Rated PG-13:  language, crude sexual humor
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
There are critics out there who want you to believe that Adam Sandler
is the devil.  I, myself, must disagree, because he makes me laugh.  In
fact, he makes me laugh so hard that I doubt I'll ever dislike one of
his films.  The guy is so funny.  He also has range (another point that
could probably be heavily debated), and isn't unbearable when he's
forced to do a little bit of acting.  I really noticed him in Happy
Gilmore (Sandler plays rage so well), and he was slightly more serious
in The Wedding Singer.  It seems now that he can only get better.
And here comes The Waterboy, a movie guaranteed to make a killing at
the box office.  It's a profoundly dumb film, and probably wouldn't be
much without Sandler, but he's in it nonetheless.  I am of the opinion
that Sandler can make any film funny.  He'd be funny in a documentary,
or in an infomercial, or in a sappy romance with bad dialogue.  For
those of you who hate Adam Sandler, I offer a half-apology for my
gushing.  Actually, I think you should wake up and realize that here we
have one of the most talented comedians ever to utilize a silly voice on
the big screen.
The Waterboy, directed by Frank Coraci and written by Sandler and Tim
Herlihy, is not a wealth of insight into the sports world, but it offers
a little bit of intelligent satire and a whole lot of laughs.  Sandler
plays Bobby Boucher, a social moron who works as a waterboy for a
college team.  Everyone hates him, and his only friend is his Mamma
(Kathy Bates).  It's inevitable that the evil coach Beaulieu (Jerry
Reed) fires him, and that he gets a job as the waterboy of a lousy
college team.
The lousy team makes fun of him, too, until he loses his temper one day
and tackles one of the guys.  But Bobby doesn't just tackle him -- the
guy gets laid out, and so Coach Klein (Henry Winkler) begs Bobby to play
for the team.  Despite his Mamma's warnings, Bobby plays for the team. 
>From there, the picture is pure formula -- Bobby helps the team win, his
Mamma gives him a guilt trip, the other team tries to thwart him, etc.
-- but at least we're never expected to take all of this seriously.
The real problem with an Adam Sandler movie is that there's not much to
look at besides Adam Sandler.  In this case, the supporting cast holds
up pretty well -- Bates is good as Mamma, though her role is perhaps a
bit larger than I would have liked.  Winkler is also pretty funny, and
Fairuza Balk, who plays Bobby's love interest, is interesting to watch. 
But Sandler is the star, and the film is really pretty dull when he's
not doing his dopey-eyed silly-voiced routine.  
I prefer Sandler when he's in his violent mode -- as he was in Happy
Gilmore -- but he's still a pleasure to watch in The Waterboy.  I think
it's a good idea to let Sandler write his own characters, because he
knows his capabilities and what makes people laugh.  Not everything hits
the mark -- a few of the running jokes fall flat, and the story, as I
said, is little more than glorified nonsense.  Still, if an evening of
laughs is all you want, then look no further than The Waterboy.  If
you're the type who thinks Adam Sandler is the devil, I'm more inclined
to send you my condolences. You're missing out on the early years of a
funny guy who will be around for a long time to come.

Title
Review for Species II (1998)
Director:  Peter Medak
Cast:  Natasha Henstridge, Justin Lazard, James Cromwell, Marg
Helgenberger, Michael Madsen, George Dzundza
Screenplay:  Chris Brancato
Producers:  Frank Mancuso Jr.
Runtime:  
US Distribution:  MGM
Rated R:  strong sexuality, sci-fi violence/gore, language
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
I find it a marvel that Species II was even made.  Species was,
perhaps, the most disappointing film of 1995:  it was (and still is)
nothing more than a long, violent, and unoriginal excuse to show off
Natasha Henstridge's anatomy in various flattering positions.  And, as
far as I could tell, most people agreed with my position on that film. 
It did make about $60 million in domestic markets, so I suppose it
wasn't a total flop.  However, it doesn't seem like the kind of picture
that warrants a sequel.  Most sequels are shoddy remakes of critically
acclaimed box-office successes.  Species II, however, is a sequel to a
critically lambasted film of marginal box office success.  
And, almost miraculously, it is a better film than the original.  It's
goofy in a lot of the same ways, but the story is more interesting (and
stays interesting through the end, unlike the original film), the acting
is better, and the film is more exciting.  It's not a great film--it
does suffer from numerous cliches of the genre, and lacks in other
areas; but it's an exciting and watchable film.  In other words, it's a
big surprise.  Actually, my expectations of Species II were so low that,
in retrospect, I suppose a pleasant surprise like this was inevitable.  
The film begins with all-American astronaut Patrick Ross (Justin
Lazard) landing on Mars to pick up soil samples.  It turns out that the
vile alien DNA that created the alien in the first film, Sil, is in this
soil.  Naturally, Patrick gets infected with the DNA.  The hook of the
Species series is that the aliens are really big on procreation:  they
constantly crave violent and athletic sex.  And the sex always ends in
the bloody birth of a new alien child.  In Species II, these birth
scenes are even more gory:  the women Patrick takes to bed inflate like
balloons, and subsequently their stomachs explode so the small
human-looking aliens can emerge.  Of course, it's almost a direct
rip-off from the Alien birth sequences, but it didn't bother me too
much.
The government, it turns out, is growing another alien to study.  This
one is named Eve, and is played by Henstridge.  When Patrick returns
from Mars, he and Eve develop a bond so strong that all they think about
is sex.  And, for everyone going to see this film for a shot of
Henstridge in the buff, you won't be disappointed.  (It makes me wonder
if this entire film was created just as an excuse to show us her
breasts.)
I liked the special effects.  It's interesting to see good old models
instead of digital stuff, but I imagine this will be one of the last
films to use them.  And the obligatory big-alien battle in the
conclusion is surprisingly well-done.  Lately, we've had a few really
irritating conclusions that feature big, poorly-animated aliens; Lost in
Space and Mortal Kombat:  Annihilation come to mind.  Species also has a
scene like this, but this sequel beats out all the contestants.  The
alien looks great, and the battle is well-choreographed.   
The acting here is also fun to watch.  Michael Madsen and Marg
Helgenberger reprise their roles from the first film, and they both do a
good job.  Henstridge is entertaining (though I don't really think she
can act).  I especially liked Lazard as the bad alien, but I wondered
what James Cromwell was doing in the small, useless role of Patrick's
father.  The characters, overall, suffer from the same element that most
sci-fi and action characters suffer:  they aren't very interesting.  
The film, overall, is pretty formulaic.  It doesn't do anything out of
the ordinary, and many of the death scenes are needlessly graphic (and
sometimes unintentionally funny).  And it ends with that awful "It still
isn't over!" cliche.  Nonetheless, I enjoyed the film.  Species II is
exciting, and it has a flash of intelligence and interest that most
entries into this genre lack entirely.  And the very fact that it
exceeds its predecessor is a feat in itself.  

Title
Review for Vampires (1998)
Director:  John Carpenter
Cast:  James Woods, Daniel Baldwin, Sheryl Lee, Thomas Ian Griffith, Tim
Guinee, Maximilian Schell
Screenplay:  John Carpenter, Don Jakoby, Dan Mazur
Producers:  Sandy King
Runtime:  104 min.
US Distribution:  Columbia/Largo
Rated R:  strong violence and gore, language, sexuality
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
Why are vampires so popular?  Why are so many people obsessed with the
idea of human-like creatures that suck blood in order to survive?  Why
does anyone care about garlic and holy water and crosses and sunlight? 
Why are there people who dress in black and put on white makeup to go
see a movie about vampires?  There are people in this world who believe
that vampires do, in fact, exist.  This is a sickness.  It's an
obsession.  And I, unfortunately, just don't get it.  Perhaps I
shouldn't get it -- maybe I'm not supposed to.  Vampires don't interest
me.  They don't interest me because they don't exist.  I can watch a
movie about vampires and be entertained, but my attraction to the
subject goes no further.  
The title of John Carpenter's Vampires is no joke:  this film has
vampires.  It's all about vampires.  There are vampires in every shot. 
Vampires get slaughtered on a regular basis.  It's rare that Carpenter
lets two minutes pass without showing us macho dudes decapitating
vampires, or macho dudes driving stakes through vampires' hearts, or
macho dudes dragging vampires out into the sun so the vampires can
explode.  But if you look past the vampire motif, what you have is a
predictable and disappointing gore-fest:  Carpenter has done better than
this.  Vampires starts out interesting, incorporating the violence with
offbeat humor.  By the end, though, the violence overtakes the humor,
and we're left with a corny vampire flick drowning in an ocean of
wretched excess.
And at the center of the excess is James Woods, playing super-duper
vampire hunter Jack Crow with the kind of energy we've come to expect
from a James Woods performance.  Like most vampire hunters, Jack has a
deep-seated hatred for vampires, because they had something to do with
the death of his family.  He's one macho dude, too, because he's willing
to kill anyone or anything in order to get what he wants.  After an
introduction in which we see Jack and his group of hunters kill a bunch
of vampires, Jack's group is quickly eradicated by the vampire master,
Valek (Thomas Ian Griffith).  So, with only his trusty sidekick, Tony
Montoya (Daniel Baldwin) and a soon-to-be-vampire prostitute (Sheryl
Lee), Jack heads out to kill Valek.
I think Carpenter knows how silly the entire vampire thing is.  I sure
hope he does, anyway.  I realize I'm probably offending one in ten
people who might read this review, but I just can't help it.  I find
this obsession with vampires deeply confounding.  Carpenter, who has
made some good movies (The Thing and Escape From [wherever] come to
mind), begins Vampires with the right tone:  it's funny and
appropriately tongue-in-cheek.  The violence is so extreme that we can't
possibly believe it (Valek actually splits a guy in half with his
fingernails).  And some of the one-liners are pretty good.
But the story isn't very interesting, and Carpenter can't maintain the
humorous tone to the end.  A major problem lies in the Jack character,
who just isn't very nice or sympathetic.  Later in the film, when a
young priest (Tim Guinee) tags along, Jack becomes a rather hateful guy
(the bathroom interrogation scene is brutally unpleasant).  And the
violence takes hold of the film by the climactic scene, proving that a
vampire movie can not keep from coming across as pornography for the
violence-obsessed.  (There's a scene that features gratuitous slaying of
dozens of monks, and to call this "exploitative" would be excessively
kind.)
And, based on this film alone, I would hypothesize that Carpenter is
somewhat of a misogynist.  The only non-vampire women in the picture are
prostitutes (referred to by the male characters only as "whores");
Sheryl Lee's character is slapped around by the Baldwin character, and
then we're supposed to believe that they love each other.  Most of the
vampires who blow up due to sunlight exposure are women, screaming
wildly and relentlessly.  Vampires isn't social commentary, and I doubt
that Carpenter consciously decided to uphold a "hatred of women"
stance.  It's just one more element that adds to the generally
unpleasant tone of the film.
It's a good thing Woods is the star; he's really the only actor who can
rise above the mediocre dialogue and characterizations.  Baldwin is a
watchable presence, but doesn't do much acting.  Lee is on hand simply
for aesthetics.  Griffith is actually good as a vampire, but, with two
lines a dialogue, he doesn't prove himself as a thespian.  All things
considered, Vampires is just another vampire movie:   thoughtless and
excessive pornography.  If vampires were real, I might be a little more
kind to the film:  it does, after all, offer a few new insights into the
breeding habits of the blood-sucking creatures.  But, seeing as how
vampires don't exist, I'm left wishing that Carpenter had made a movie
that doesn't just appeal to the people who will dress up to see it.

Title
Review for There's Something About Mary (1998)
Directors:  Peter & Bob Farrelly
Cast:  Cameron Diaz, Matt Dillon, Ben Stiller, Chris Elliott, Lee Evans,
W. Earl Brown, Harland Williams
Screenplay:  Ed Decter, John J. Strauss, Peter & Bob Farrelly
Producers:  Frank Beddor, Michael Steinberg, Bradley Thomas, Charles B.
Wessler
Runtime:  117 min.
US Distribution:  20th Century Fox
Rated R:  strong comic sexual content, language
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
Up front, I will humbly admit that I laughed with frequent intensity
throughout most of There's Something About Mary.  Unfortunately (perhaps
only for myself), that is not enough to make me like a movie.  This
particular picture, written and directed by Peter and Bob Farrelly, is a
pointless and insipid romantic comedy at the core, and is set apart from
the crowd of insipid romantic comedies only because of its ridiculously
cheap humor.  It has no story, weak characters, and, like all romantic
comedies, it expects us to care. 
See, I don't mind laughter.  I engage in it every once in a while, but
I like to feel something when a film is over.  I felt so indifferent, so
unmoved at the end of There's Something About Mary, that I can't give it
a positive review.  I laughed equally hard during The Opposite of Sex,
but that film is smart and subtle, in addition to being funny.  The
Farrellys -- whose credits include the boring Dumb and Dumber and the
unwatchable Kingpin -- have a talent for making us laugh at disgusting
and painful images.  But it's just not that interesting, and not the
least bit satisfying.
Ben Stiller, although he is third-billed, is the main character, Ted. 
The film opens thirteen years in the past, when Ted is in high school. 
Inexplicably, he gets invited to the prom by the luminous Mary (Cameron
Diaz); when he goes to pick her up on prom night, a few awful things
happen -- Mary's mentally handicapped brother (W. Earl Brown) attacks
him, he gets in a fight with Mary's stepfather (Keith David), and he
gets his genitals stuck in his zipper.
Flash ahead thirteen years; Ted's still thinking about Mary, so he has
private investigator Pat Healy (Matt Dillon) find her in Miami. 
Naturally, Healy falls for Mary, and Ted is left in the dust.  The film
progresses from there, as Ted discovers numerous individuals who have
all been hopelessly swept away by Mary, and who are all now stalking her
and attempting valiantly to win her affections.  
All right, so if you're less critical than I, and you simply want to
laugh, then don't let these words stop you.  I'd be doing a horrible
disservice to the Farrellys if I didn't remind myself continually that
There's Something About Mary is a uniquely funny film -- the laughs are
more-or-less constant (aside from a few unbearable lulls), and you're
likely to find yourself guffawing so loudly that you won't be able to
hear the people around you doing the same thing.  Typically, it's good
form to give examples of points made in a review, but much of the humor
here is intended to be shocking, and, therefore, I shouldn't tell you
about it.
I can, however, mention all of the groaners, from the "touching" scenes
all the way up to the point at which the Farrellys make it clear that,
dear God, there's a story buried somewhere in this mess.  Movies like
this shouldn't even bother with stories and characters; it's a pointless
endeavor, condescending and cloying.  You wouldn't even have to see the
preview to predict the outcome of this film -- all you'd need is a
five-word synopsis of the story, and then you'd know.  I realize
consciously that no one was trying to surprise me with the turn of
events in this film, but, for once, I'd like to see a film like this
that actually manages to capture my interest without the use of
fishhooks or semen.
In the acting arena, Ben Stiller is amusing, but not given the kind of
sarcastic and cynical material that makes him funniest.  But he makes a
good hero, and I like that he's constantly unaware of everything.  Matt
Dillon, however, shows superb comic timing -- watch closely the scene in
which he's first telling Mary about his job, helping mentally deficient
people.  Diaz, in all of her shining beauty, still manages to express a
hint of intelligence and warmth, and is therefore a pleasure to watch. 
Lee Evans and Chris Elliott are both fun in unpredictable supporting
roles.
Now that they're on their third movie, I'm reasonably certain that the
Farrellys don't know the first thing about cohesive storytelling or
narration.  As directors, they're not terrible, but they don't strike me
as gifted.  As writers, they should stick to the jokes and sight-gags,
because the "serious" material here is enough to keep my eyes
permanently facing the back of my head.  So, shall I leave you admitting
that There's Something About Mary is pretty darn funny, or should I
emphasize that it lacks even the most pathetic attempts at depth and
intelligence?  Well, perhaps I'll do a little of both:  There's
Something About Mary is the funniest unsatisfying film of the year.

Title
Review for Night at the Roxbury, A (1998)
Director:  John Fortenberry
Cast:  Chris Kattan, Will Ferrell, Dan Hedaya, Molly Shannon, Richard
Grieco, Loni Anderson, Elisa Donovan, Gigi Rice, Meredith Scott Lynn
Screenplay:  Will Ferrell, Amy Heckerling, Chris Kattan, Steve Koren
Producers:  Amy Heckerling, Lorne Michaels
Runtime:  87 min.
US Distribution:  Paramount
Rated PG-13:  sex humor, language
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
When I was sixteen, I was driving a bunch of my friends around town,
and it was way past my curfew.  We were having a great time until I got
pulled over by someone tailing me closely with his brights on. 
Stupidly, I stopped, and I saw someone get out of the car behind me. 
Suddenly, there was a large gentleman standing next to my open window. 
He asked, "You guys like skinheads?" and proceeded to punch me in the
face, breaking my nose.  He started pulling my friends out of the car,
and I thought we were going to die.  It is perhaps the most frightening
thing I've ever endured.
And yet, this situation is much funnier than A Night at the Roxbury,
which is a pathetic and limp excuse for a comedy.  I'd rather get
punched in the face by skinheads than ever sit through this film again,
because, on top of being boring (there is *one* joke in this movie),
it's really quite a pitiful experience.  "Saturday Night Live" has never
been a must-see show for me (I was born long after the original
"classic" episodes with the original "funny" cast), but now I submit
that an SNL skit is a worse choice for a film than a video game (both
groups have their anomalies, which include Wayne's World and Mortal
Kombat).  A Night at the Roxbury is creatively defunct and lacking in
the most crucial arena:  comedy.
I did chuckle in the beginning, however, as director John Fortenberry
introduces us to Steve and Doug Butabi (Chris Kattan and Will Ferrell). 
It's funny for a few seconds that they swing their heads in unison to
music emanating from nowhere.  It's sorta funny to watch them walk down
the street and deliver crude pick-up lines to women who hate them.  It's
mildly amusing to see that they still live at home (in the same room),
and work retail in their father's silk plant shop.  But, you see, an SNL
skit is usually about five minutes -- and that's normally four minutes
too long.  This film is apparently runs 87 minutes, and that means that
86 of those minutes are spent either 1) looking at the Butabi brothers
swing their heads again, 2) listening to Dan Hedaya and Chazz Palminteri
deliver awful lines, or 3) watching a pointless and insipid plot grind
its gears and expire into a pathetic lump of screenwriting cliches.
The plot, should you give a flying rat's ass (I only use that line
because it's put to such good use in the film), centers around our
beloved brothers trying to get into the biggest club in town.  You
guessed it -- it's the Roxbury!  You see, Richard Grieco gets them in
(yes, Richard Grieco is in this movie, drowning in makeup and looking
ultrasupercool).  It turns out that the club's owner (played by an
unbilled Palminteri) really likes the brothers, and wants to use their
ideas with his next club.  In addition, we have a subplot in which the a
social climbing bimbo (Molly Shannon) wants to marry Steve, and so the
brothers have a fight which leads to Doug moving into the guest house of
their father's estate.  
Like I said, the film is funny for about one minute.  After that, you
start to realize the original reason for this concept being a skit:  it
doesn't have depth, or characters, or anything that would make you want
to sit in a theater for 87 minutes.  A Night at the Roxbury serves best
as a reminder that "Saturday Night Live" and its producer, Lorne
Michaels (who is responsible for this film and many others) should stop
wasting their money and ours.  
I don't know how talented Kattan and Ferrell are, but neither is
particularly loathsome here.  I didn't hate watching them, but, as I
said, it just gets boring.  The two men also co-wrote the film, and I
don't entirely blame them -- to stretch this concept from five to 87
minutes must have seemed like an impossible task.  Apparently, it was. 
I doubt they had much choice in the matter, and the fact that they at
least wrung one minute of laughter out of the refuse pile is . . . well,
it's pretty sad.
The rest of the acting is either unfunny or just plain bad.  In
addition to Grieco (does anyone even remember "21 Jump Street?"), we
have a cameo from Loni Anderson, who has no lines.  Then there's Hedaya,
who always acts the same; here, his sameness is intensely annoying. 
Palminteri is one of those actors I just don't like, so his "Did you
grab my ass?" running joke is about as funny as the book of Revelation. 
Molly Shannon seems to have some spunk, but she mostly just comes across
as a nuisance.  Mixed in with all these performances is this God-awful
story, which even takes itself seriously in one scene towards the end
(when the Butabis make up).  
There were a few other people at my screening of A Night at the
Roxbury, and most of them laughed about as frequently as I did (however,
the Token Laugher sat right behind me, which was kind of irritating). 
There are really funny movies out there -- funny movies with depth and
insight.  There are also funny films that don't aspire to anything, but
keep the jokes coming so constantly that you don't really care.  A Night
at the Roxbury attempts no depth, and just isn't funny beyond its
premise.  If anyone ever tells me that they're planning on seeing this
film, I'll suggest that they save themselves the trouble by finding some
skinheads instead.  And I won't be kidding.

Title
Review for Scream 2 (1997)
Director: Wes Craven
Cast: Neve Campbell, David Arquette, Courtney Cox, Jamie Kennedy, Laurie
Metcalf, Jerry O'Connel
Rated R: Strong violence, gore, language
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    Is there a point at which a film can become so absurd that you
simply stop watching it? I almost got to that point during the climax of
Scream 2, which is one of the silliest, loudest, most obnoxious finales
to a film I've seen in a good long while. The film itself is an exercise
in self-awareness, where every cliché and every shot of someone being
pounced by a knife-wielding maniac is observed with a tongue-in-cheek
attitude. It seems almost pointless to even talk about the film, for
anything that I might decide to criticize it for is probably an
intentional element added by director Wes Craven and writer Kevin
Williamson not out of ignorance, but to keep the tone consistent.
    Okay, so the story is kind of weak, in that Scream sort of way, but
it doesn't matter because the characters all talk about how sequels are
"by definition," lesser films than the originals. There are, of course,
addendums to this postulate: Aliens, The Godfather Part II, Terminator
2--but, for the most part, sequels kind of suck (figuratively speaking,
of course). So some psycho goes around killing innocent college students
in an attempt to upset and later destroy Neve Campbell. "Someone has
taken his love for sequels one step too far!" shouts the preview. I
think that's an accurate assessment of the film.
    After some initial setup-gore, the characters from the original
film--Gail Weathers (Courtney Cox), Dewey Riley (David Arquette), and
Randy the movie nerd guy (Jamie Kennedy)--talk about who the killer
might me. They discuss at great lengths the ideas behind cliché
characters, about how the boyfriend isn't the killer because it's
already been done, and so forth. All the gore aside, this film is so
funny. I laughed frequently, and I'm not talking about chuckles--it was
like "HA HA HA!" funny.
    A film like Scream 2 can be successful for no other reason than it's
almost sickeningly complete tone. I mean, come on, if there is someone
standing next to a corner, then a killer will jump out from behind that
corner and drive his knife into that person several times. There's no
question about it. It's going to happen. But here we have a problem--the
movie is so funny, so unrealistic, that it actually one-ups its
predecessor as far as laughs an concept goes. In the process, the gore
and violence feels out of place and often forced.
    Scream had some genuinely frightening moments in it--the opening
scene, in particular, was tense and horrifying because we didn't know
what was going on. There isn't a single startling moment in Scream 2,
not one ounce of suspense, and the numerous shots of a knife plunging
deep into the backs of college students is really intrusive. Scream's
attitude was like, "Woah, this is like one of those horror flicks or
something." Scream 2 feels more like, "Check it out, we're in another
horror movie, and that's not possible, but isn't this wild?" I think it
would have been even better if they thought there was a killer, but it
was something else (strange forms of suicide or something like that) so
they all turn out to be wrong, but they can talk about sequels anyway.
Of course, that would be even sillier than the film already is.
    As is, the horror is an excuse for the comedy, and though it works
for the most part, elements feel out of place. The last twenty minutes,
for example, deliver an unsatisfying conclusion to the point of me
rolling my eyes and giving up on the film. Then, the heroine does some
stuff (I'll keep it a surprise) that really rubbed me the wrong way, and
I was left with a bad taste in my mouth. It looses its self-awareness
and becomes absurd out of carelessness. And that's problematic. But
reflecting back on the pre-conclusion part of the film, it's really
funny. For what it is, Scream 2 works. And if you like to laugh, then
you'll be doing some of that during the course of this film.

Title
Review for As Good As It Gets (1997)
Director: James L. Brooks
Cast: Jack Nicholson, Helen Hunt, Greg Kinnear, Cuba Gooding, Jr.,
Shirley Knight, Skeet Ulrich
Rated PG-13: Language, nudity, violence
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    I never thought any film labeled as a "romantic comedy" could be
this good. I always associate a certain vocabulary with films commonly
referred to as romantic comedies; words in this vocabulary
include--trite, phony, contrived, dull, formulaic, careful, and shallow.
I was relieved as I watched As Good as it Gets because I couldn't
associate any of these words with this film. In fact, James L. Brooks'
new film is the antithesis of all of these words combined, a moving,
often thought-provoking story about a truly awful individual.
    That individual is Melvin Udall, a racist, gay-hating,
obsessive-compulsive curmudgeon. He's also a novelist and lives in an
upper class apartment in New York. Across the hall is Simon (Greg
Kinnear), a gay artist who is, of course, extremely nice, and has a cute
little dog. Melvin eats lunch every day in the same diner, and his
waitress is always Carol (Helen Hunt), a mother just barely scraping by
because her son is sickly and always needing medical attention.
    One fateful day, Simon is painting a picture of a friend of a friend
(Skeet Ulrich), whose friends are in the other room, stealing all of
Simon's things. When Simon goes to investigate, he gets beaten within an
inch of his life. He loses all inspiration for painting and soon runs
out of money. Meanwhile, Melvin really likes Carol, and despite his
conduct towards her, he pays for real medical care for her son, who soon
recovers completely. Then, the three people unite in a road trip to
Baltimore in order for Simon to get money from his parents, to whom he
hasn't spoken in years.
    The first thing that really struck me about As Good as it Gets are
the risks it takes, in dialogue and ultimately in characterizations.
Melvin, for instance, is not one of those likable old curmudgeons--this
guy is really despicable. In one extremely tense scene, he makes the
mistake of insinuating that Carol's son doesn't have a long time to
live, and her reaction to this is one of complete emotional rage. He
also makes jokes--jokes that aren't really intended to be funny--about
people's weight, religion (he attacks Jews in one scene), and sexuality
(note the almost endless jokes about Simon and his homosexuality).
    Though these moments aren't exactly pleasant, they do help to create
a very solid character. This character is brought to life even more so
by Jack Nicholson's performance--as far as I'm concerned, this is his
best performance since One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest. Nicholson tends
to have that "I'm Jack Nicholson" aura around him when he's playing bad
guys or token characters, but here he gives a deep and convincing
performance as Melvin. Later developments of the character are extreme,
and we can still see the same old Melvin there, but we know he's trying
thanks to Nicholson.
    The supporting performances are of the best this year. Helen Hunt
proves once again that she can effortlessly upstage the sometimes
limited realm of television and gives a truly moving performance as a
strong-minded woman who really loves her son. Kinnear, too, goes way
beyond anything I've ever seen him in (I still remember him from Talk
Soup) and creates this frustrated man with ease.
    There is something truly magical and refreshing about this film--it
left me with a smile on my face that lasted for hours and hours after
the film was over. The mixture of different people is fascinating and
fun to watch. I loved these characters, and I loved their interactions
through Brooks' witty dialogue and realistic situations. I wanted to
believe that these people are alive somewhere in New York, just as
depicted in this film. And when the screen blacks out in the end, I knew
they were going to go right on living, and that everything would be
okay.

Title
Review for Chinese Box (1997)
Director:  Wayne Wang
Cast:  Jeremy Irons, Gong Li, Maggie Cheung, Michael Hui, Ruben Blades
Screenplay:  Larry Gross, Wayne Wang, Paul Theroux, Jean-Claude Carriere
Producers:  Jean-Louis Piel, Lydia Dean Pilcher, Wayne Wang
Runtime:  109 min.
US Distribution:  Trimark
Rated R:  language, sex
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
There's a unique feeling of desperation intertwined with the events
that unfold in Wayne Wang's Chinese Box.  The film tells the story of a
man named John (Jeremy Irons) during the last few months of British
colonialism in Hong Kong.  John has lived in Hong Kong for fifteen
years, though he feels that he doesn't know his home at all.  He takes
pictures of the city, and writes about it, but nothing he says or feels
is certain or concrete.  The only thing he knows without doubt is that
he loves Vivian (Gong Li).  
Vivian, however, is an ex-prostitute who is associated with Chang
(Michael Hui); she wants to marry Chang and raise a family with him, but
his social standing ensures that he can not ever have such a
relationship with an ex-prostitute.  Vivian clearly has strong feelings
for John, but refuses to make them known to him.  Somewhere in the
middle of all this, John meets a woman named Jean (Maggie Cheung), who
dresses with eccentricity and seems to live a strange and vibrant
existence.  He tries to interview her, to find out about the scar that
covers half her face, but she's resistant at first.  Soon, a strange
parallel develops between his relationship with the two women.  
Wayne Wang has directed several other pictures, but the only one I've
seen is Smoke.  I didn't enjoy that film, but now that I can compare it
with Chinese Box, it is clear to me that Wang is not a one-trick film
maker.  There is so much to admire about Chinese Box, but I think the
most interesting aspect is Wang's consistent tone and atmosphere.  Every
scene is shot with a handheld camera, and this gives the film a jittery,
in-the-moment feeling.  It also keeps the film in John's perspective,
and this is a good decision because it keeps the setting foreign, and
even a little bit threatening.  The atmosphere is eerie and very
effective.
Wang's execution of his story (which was actually written by Larry
Gross and Jean-Claude Carriere) also helps to characterize the three
main people in his story.  John, played by Irons with that flustered
strength that Irons always manifests so effortlessly, is a
well-developed and interesting character, and a perfect type of person
to place at the center of this story.  Early in the film, he learns that
he has leukemia, and that he probably only has about six months to live,
and this puts a fascinating dimension onto his actions.
His associations with these two enigmatic women is really at the heart
of the story.  There are climactic scenes with both Vivian and Jean, and
both of these moments are perfectly created by Wang.  The best scene in
the film is towards the end, and it comes about when Vivian leaves Chang
to revert to her prostitute life; John finds her, and she puts on her
act for him, but he manages to break it down and prove to her that his
feelings are true.  This scene is perfect moviemaking, and is strong
mostly because of the acting.
Gong Li is a beautiful, talented actress, and is wonderful here in a
quiet, understated way.  Cheung's performance is entirely different, but
complex in that it's clear that she's hiding almost everything about
herself that's important to her.  The presence of these two interesting
female characters is one of the most prominent strengths of Chinese Box.
Wang does, however, make a couple of severe missteps that have
surprisingly strong negative effects on the film.  There is one scene
that completely disrupts the film's detached sense of frenzy -- it's a
series of shots in which John is in the hospital, learning that his
cancer is fatal, and then he goes outside and sits; during all of this,
horribly sentimental music twangs in the background (it's actually
performed by Ruben Blades, who plays John's friend Jim).  It changes the
tone of the film so abruptly that I was literally ripped from the
picture just at the moment when I wanted to be most absorbed in it.
Wang also seems uncertain about his reasoning for placing his story
against the backdrop of the disintegration of British colonialism in
Hong Kong.  It's something that he clearly feels strongly about, but
Chinese Box isn't long enough to focus on this fascinating love story
and still make a meaningful political statement.  Aside from these
elements, however, I can do nothing but enthusiastically recommend this
film -- Wang is a gifted film maker, and he has done a fantastic job of
creating a unique love story that draws you in and forces you to care.

Title
Review for Mod Squad, The (1999)
Director: Scott Silver
Cast: Claire Danes, Giovanni Ribisi, Omar Epps, Dennis Farina, Josh
Brolin, Steve Harris, Michael Lerner
Screenplay: Stephen T. Kay, Scott Silver, Kate Lanier
Producers: David Ladd, Tony Ludwig, Ben Myron, Alan Riche
Runtime: 93 min.
US Distribution: MGM
Rated R: language, violence, sexuality
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Claire Danes, Giovanni Ribisi, and Omar Epps make a likable trio of
protagonists, but they're just about the only palatable element of The
Mod Squad, a lame-brained big-screen version of the 70s TV show.  The
story has all the originality of a block of wood (well, it would if you
could decipher it), the characters are all blank slates, and Scott
Silver's perfunctory action sequences are as cliched as they come.  By
sheer force of talent, the three actors wring marginal enjoyment from
the proceedings whenever they're on screen, but The Mod Squad is just a
second-rate action picture with a first-rate cast.

Title
Review for Your Friends & Neighbors (1998)
Director:  Neil LaBute
Cast:  Amy Brenneman, Aaron Eckhart, Catherine Keener, Natassja Kinski,
Jason Patric, Ben Stiller
Screenplay:  Neil LaBute
Producers:  Steve Golin, Jason Patric
Runtime:  99 min.
US Distribution:  
Rated R:  Graphic sexual dialogue, strong sexuality and language
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
Some films are cynical, and others make you crave for something as
benign as cynicism.  To call Neil LaBute a cynical filmmaker is a vast
understatement, for here is a man who has made two of the most
disturbing films I've seen in the last five years.  His debut feature,
In the Company of Men, is a harsh tale of two men exercising their
hatred of women on an innocent one.  His new film, Your Friends &
Neighbors, is far more brutal -- it illustrates the lives of six
miserable people and their miserable sex lives.  
The six characters are all related in some way.  Aaron Eckhart and Amy
Brenneman play a married couple who provide the facade of being happy to
their friends; the man, however, can only be sexually pleased with
masturbation, and his wife thinks that his lack of performance is
because of her.  They're friends with a boyfriend-girlfriend couple,
played by Ben Stiller and Catherine Keener.  Stiller's character is a
self-absorbed drama professor who likes to talk during sex, and Keener
is a bitchy woman who hates talking during sex.
The central conflicts arise when Stiller's character expresses interest
in the Brenneman character, and the two attempt an affair.  At the same
time, Keener meets a woman (Natassja Kinski) and has an affair with
her.  On the outset of all of this, not directly related to any
particular aspect of the film, is Jason Patric, who plays a womanizing
monster.  He's friends with Eckhart's character.  On a side note, I've
gone out of my way to avoid using any of the characters' names; this is
because LaBute refrains from using their names at any time during the
picture.
If you're looking for fun, you won't find it in Your Friends &
Neighbors.  This is an ugly, painful film.  I didn't like it, so much as
I "liked" it and admired it for its strength.  I've seen it twice, and
it certainly passes for entertainment -- there isn't a boring moment,
and I imagine most viewers will be adequately diverted regardless of how
they like the film.  There are individual scenes that are horrifying,
but you'll find that the overall impression is what hurts the most. 
LaBute thinks we're all hopelessly screwed up, and this film is a deeply
compelling argument for that assertion.  Its central theme, I believe,
coincides with his reasons for not using the characters' names.  It also
explains why the locations are never described, why everything takes
place in generic apartments, gyms, and restaurants.  LaBute wants his
film to look like Anyplace, USA, in which Everyone is sexually depraved.
I'm almost embarrassed to admit that I laughed through much of this
picture.  As hopeless as it is, as ugly and harrowing as LaBute makes
it, he wrings distant and uncomfortable laughs out of odd situations. 
One of the funniest scenes has Eckhart and Brenneman in a grocery store;
Eckhart says, "I think that, for a while, we just need to treat each
other like . . . meat.  You should see me as a giant . . . penis, and I
should see you as a big . . . vagina."  It's kind of a disturbing
thought, but it's one of the lighter moments in the film, one that
permits guiltless laughter.  The second half of the film is far less
forgiving.  In the film's most intense and most horrific scene, Patrick
talks about his "best" sexual encounter -- and he calmly describes a
homosexual rape that he committed in his teen years.  Perhaps I
shouldn't be discussing all of this in my review, for a lot of the film
works because it takes its audience by surprise.  I doubt that it
matters much -- this scene gripped me even the second time I saw it. 
The six performances are all superb, and LaBute's writing is sharp and
realistic.  Patrick is at his very best here -- I've never seen him act
like this, and the character he creates here is one of the most vivid
and hateful I've ever seen.  Eckhart is also fantastic; after seeing his
turn in Company, it's surprising to see him as a sympathetic character. 
Brenneman is the best of the female parts, and is also the most
sympathetic character -- she doesn't talk a lot, but the array of
emotions she flies through are all believable and upsetting.  Stiller
and Keener are good, but play mean-spirited people; Kinski is also good,
but her character ultimately becomes hopelessly pathetic.  
And that's where the film falters.  In the Company of Men has
characters you could latch on to -- people lived through that story. 
Nobody lives through Your Friends & Neighbors.  A certain level of
cynicism is okay, but I can't believe that we're all as bad off as
LaBute wants us to think.  Some of the story elements aren't completely
believable -- for instance, I find it difficult to believe that
Patrick's and Eckhart's characters would be friends in real life. 
What's to be said for a film that attacks its audience as strongly as
this, and then tells them that there's no way out?  I can only hope that
LaBute is warning us, saying, "Don't let this happen to you."  I'd hate
to think that LaBute wants us to know that we've already let it
happened, simply by being human.  

Title
Review for Practical Magic (1998)
Director:  Griffin Dunne
Cast:  Sandra Bullock, Nicole Kidman, Dianne Wiest, Stockard Channing,
Aidan Quinn, Goran Visnjic, Evan Rachel Wood, Alexandra Artrip
Screenplay:  Robin Swicord, Akiva goldsman, Adam Brooks
Producers:  Denise Di Novi
Runtime:  103 min.
US Distribution:  Warner Bros.
Rated PG-13:  some violence, intense thematic elements, sensuality
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
At the center of Practical Magic are two immensely attractive women. 
The two women are, of course, Sandra Bullock and Nicole Kidman.  Both
are talented actresses, and have displayed their talents in many films. 
Any film in which they are visible for most of its running time is, by
definition, watchable.  Sometimes, however, they star in films that,
without their presence, would be simply unwatchable.  This is the case
with Practical Magic, which is a film so deeply entrenched in stupidity
that I fear my IQ dropped ten points from watching it.
Practical Magic is a the cinematic equivalent of a nuclear meltdown: 
it's disastrous from the first shot, and it only gets worse, waving its
wand of simpering senselessness over audiences until, finally, they
either give up or stumble out of the theater to safety.  This film gave
me a headache.  The bad dialogue attacked my ears.  The stupid concepts
assaulted my intelligence.  The pointless special effects scraped at my
eyes.  And it's all smashed together into one big wish-I-were-witty lump
by director Griffin Dune.  
It's the story of two sister witches, Sally and Gillian Owens (Bullock
and Kidman).  The film begins with a look into the past, as "their
ancestor" (as she's described) is shown to escape a hanging during the
Salem witch trials, thanks to her super special powers.  Flash ahead a
few hundred years, and our protagonists are young girls, learning that,
when they hear a certain kind of beetle squeak, then the man they love
is dead (this, of course, is how their father died).  So Sally wishes
never to fall in love, while Gillian can't wait to do so.  When the
setup finally ends, we're thwarted with a formula film of such
inescapable badness that I wonder if anyone was conscious during the
making of the film.  
Sally, as expected, wants to deny her witch heritage and raise a
family.  So, she meets and instantly falls in love with her
husband-to-be, who promptly dies after supplying her with a couple of
daughters.  Gillian, on the other hand, is running around in paradise,
drinking and dancing all the time.  But wait!  The plot synopsis isn't
done!  Conflicts arise when they accidentally murder Gillian's psycho
boyfriend.  Then, to give the film a romantic input, Aidan Quinn is
introduced as an investigator looking for the psycho (who, apparently,
is wanted in other cities for murder).  
This is the kind of film where every element is poorly conceived; the
most obvious deficiency is in the script.  Adapted from the novel by
Alice Hoffman, the story fails to recognize characters or plot on a
comfortable level.  Each character has one big trait:  Sally is
down-to-earth; Gillian is racy, etc.  And, due to the exceptional lack
of depth, story developments that are supposed to be sad and/or moving
strike with no impact whatsoever (the death of Sally's first husband,
for instance).  
The banality of the first half is soon accentuated by the pure idiocy
of the second half, which features elements from decent films like The
Frighteners the The Exorcist.  A good example of this is the scene in
which the psycho inhabits Gillian's body for no purpose at all.  When he
gets himself out, he's a black-and-white shade and really really crazy
(kinda like the spooks in The Frighteners).  It's poorly done and
derivative, but it's also pointless and unexplained.  The ending
sequence, which features a bunch of chanting soccer moms with brooms, is
truly abhorrent, and made me cringe with hatred.  
The strangest thing is that the film is totally arbitrary when it comes
to the magic and the witch stuff:  these women seem to have almost no
powers; all they seem to be capable of is putting people to sleep. 
Little details -- where the magic comes from, why these women are able
to use it, why the psycho comes back to life, why he keeps haunting them
(I could go on and on) -- are never explained or even hinted to.  But,
alas, by this point, I just wanted to escape the theater.  I was glad
they didn't spend more time explaining.
Dunne's direction is as misguided as any I've seen this year.  The film
shifts gears frequently, from soft and cuddly (scenes with the children)
to gooey and sentimental (all the romance junk between Bullock and
Quinn) to dark and evil (the ghost scenes) to slapstick comedy (anything
having to do with potions).  And it wants to be so funny; there are
scenes that try so hard to be edgy and wickedly clever (everything with
the psycho, for instance), but they all just fall flat.  It's a bubbling
cauldron of elements that make no sense and don't fit together.  I
longed for some consistency, some idea of what the film was trying to
accomplish.  It fails in every way:  I found none of it interesting,
engrossing, or funny.  
Well, I take that back.  Dianne Wiest is mildly amusing as one of two
aunt witches (the other is played by Stockard Channing, who just acts
silly).  The one scene that has a bit of life is the one in which
Gillian walks in on the soccer mom meeting and says, "Hold on to your
husbands, ladies!"  And, of course, there are two immensely attractive
women to look at.  But Practical Magic is just plain bad -- a confused
disaster, tedious and cloying and singularly moronic.  I'm sorry that
two beautiful women had to star in this example of stupidity; no matter
how attractive they are, their looks can't alleviate my aching brain.  

Title
Review for 8MM (1999)
Director: Joel Schumacher
Cast: Nicolas Cage, Joaquin Phoenix, James Gandolfini, Peter Stormare,
Christopher Bauer, Anthony Heald, Catherine Keener
Screenplay: Andrew Kevin Walker
Producers: Judy Hofflund, Gavin Polone
Runtime: 124 min.
US Distribution: Columbia
Rated R: Strong violence, sex, language
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
About four years ago, Andrew Kevin Walker wrote the intelligent and
subtle script for Seven, which is easily one of the best films ever
made.  Walker writes about normal people who go face-to-face with evil
forces they can't possibly understand.  His script for 8mm is nearly as
good as that of Seven, but Seven had David Fincher in the director's
chair.  8mm has Joel Schumacher, who was responsible for the ludicrous
failure of Batman & Robin.  Indeed, 8mm is not as good as it could have
been:  I constantly got the feeling that Walker and Schumacher wanted to
tell different stories.
Walker wants to tell the story of an average guy confronted with moral
decisions so deep and disturbing that he nearly loses his mind.  This
kind of conflict, while slightly contrived, is still immensely
interesting if handled with care.  But Schumacher is more interested in
mood than in characters, and often handles scenes in ridiculous and
unbelievable ways.  There are moments when the writer and director are
in sync, and those are the best in the film.  And, as a suspense
picture, the movie works more often than it doesn't.  I just can't help
but think that 8mm could have been an existential thriller with the same
force and conviction as Seven.  
The likable Nicolas Cage stars as Tom Welles, a private investigator
who is commissioned by an elderly lady to determine the authenticity of
an 8mm film she finds in the safe of her dead husband.  The film is
referred to as "snuff" pornography -- pornography in which a woman is
raped and murdered in the movie.  Welles initially believes that "snuff"
is an urban myth -- the movies that do exist are all phonies.  But he
watches the film, and sees a teenage girl get hacked to death by a giant
man in a leather mask.  The movie looks real, but he can't tell, and so
he goes searching.
His searches lead him all over the country, from Cleveland to Hollywood
to New York, and back again.  While Tom is roaming all over the country,
his wife (Catherine Keener) is left in the dark as to his whereabouts. 
While searching through missing children files, he stumbles across the
girl's true identity.  Later, he meets Max California (Joaquin Phoenix),
a adult bookstore clerk who leads him down a strange and twisted path
through the underworld of illegal pornography.  
Walker is better at writing thrillers than most other screenwriters who
specialize in the genre, simply because he knows how to characterize,
and how to integrate character with the turns of the story.  The film
opens with development of Tom's marriage, and we immediately take a
liking to both him and his wife.  This sets us up for the rest of the
film because we care about Tom -- we want him to succeed.  Too many
films abandon character and story in favor of spectacle, but Walker
knows how to construct a good script.  It also helps that Cage is in the
main role; he's such a powerful, believable actor, and he brings the
necessary desperation to Tom without going over-the-top.  The other
actors all fill their roles nicely, with standout performances from
Phoenix and Peter Stormare (as a nutty porn-god).
But the emotional center of 8mm is what rings true; the way this dirty,
disgusting world affects Tom is a truly interesting conflict.  He
develops an attachment to the young girl in the movie, and fights for
her, even when no one else does.  He doesn't understand what makes these
people do what they do, why they're willing to destroy young women to
make a buck.  And there's one scene towards the end of the film that
truly moved me:  Tom is on the verge of killing a man, but he can't do
it.  He's not a murderer.  He goes to his car and calls the girl's
mother, saying, "Tell me how much you loved her."  That he needs the
girl's mother to give him permission is a perfect, subtle comment on his
character, and gives a moral side to the film that is both meaningful
and moving.
But I just didn't get the feeling that Schumacher was as interested in
the characters as in the mood.  Atmosphere is definitely important in a
film like this; 8mm is a dark movie, but it looks great, and Mychael
Danna's musical score underlines the eerie visuals smoothly.  But the
film frequently falls head-first into absurdity:  one scene, which
features three psycho porn-freaks and a crossbow, is particularly silly,
and I could have done without a climactic stabbing in the rain.  I also
think Schumacher takes the wrong tone with a lot of the material:  he
often seems a little too fascinated with the porn stuff, and so the film
often comes across as exploitative.
I don't know if Walker worked directly with Schumacher, but their
intentions don't seem to  correspond.  At the heart of 8mm is an
exceptionally well-conceived conflict, a situation in which a real
character is confronted with terrible things and is forced to do
terrible things himself.  But Schumacher almost drowns out the substance
with his style, and so the film misses the mark.  8mm is a thriller
worth seeing, but I can't shake the thought that it could have been the
truly disturbing experience Walker wanted it to be.  

Title
Review for Armageddon (1998)
Director:  Michael Bay
Cast:  Bruce Willis, Billy Bob Thornton, Liv Tyler, Ben Affleck, Will
Patton, Peter Stormare, Keith David, Steve Buscemi, Owen Wilson, William
Fichtner
Screenplay (story, etc.):  Jonathan Hensleigh, Robert Roy Pool, Tony
Gilroy, Shane Salerno, J.J. Abrams, Paul Attanasio, Ann Biderman, Scott
Rosenberg, Robert Towne
Producers:  Jerry Bruckheimer, Gale Anne Hurd, Michael Bay
Runtime:  150 min.
US Distribution:  Touchstone
Rated PG-13:  disaster violence, language
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
Cinema has been around for about a hundred years now.  It's not my job
to recap this century every time I talk about a new film, but I'd like
to think that I'm beginning to understand the art more as I watch more
films from before my time.  Recently, I've seen the films of Hitchcock,
Capra, Fellini, Godard, Kurosawa, Chaplin, Lang, and many others.  
Those men were talented artists, and their films reflect their genius. 
They are likely to be remembered for . . . well, quite a while.  
I like this film, too.  Yes, it's a disaster-slash-action movie.  True,
its budget is a lot more money than I'll ever see in my lifetime.  And
there's not a doubt in my mind that the only reason it was conceived was
to make a lot of money.  In fact, I bet the producers of Armageddon
would have worked towards a lousy film, had they thought it would've
been more profitable.  I certainly don't care what their intentions
were, because Michael Bay (The Rock) is such a skilled director that I
doubt he'd ever make a film that is difficult to sit through.
Of course, skillful direction doesn't complete the package, but the
rest of Armageddon manages to keep everything together.  The story is
well-thought out (and perfectly paced to provide for an abundance of
action sequences that never feel out of place), the acting is terrific,
the script is sharp, and -- get this -- there are characters.  Yes, you
read that right.  Armageddon actually has characters you can care
about!  If you don't like this film, then you have a problem with the
genre itself:  Armageddon is as good as a film like this can be.
If you've seen Deep Impact, then you know the basic framework for the
story.  It turns out that an asteroid the size of Texas is going to
strike the earth eighteen days from the start of the film.  So, it's up
to the U.S. Government to stop it.  (Why the U.S. is always exclusively
saddled with these problems is never fully investigated.)  Their plan --
to send a group of experienced oil drillers up to the asteroid, drill
down several hundred feet, and detonate a nuclear warhead within.  
The head driller is Harry Stamper (Bruce Willis).  His group of men is
a colorful bunch, including A.J. (Ben Affleck), Chick (Will Patton), and
Rockhound (Steve Buscemi).  There's also an interesting triangle formed
between A.J., Harry, and Grace (Liv Tyler), who is Harry's daughter. 
A.J. and Grace are, of course, romantically intertwined, and dad isn't
too happy with the situation.
It's absurd to wish for a complicated story in an Event Movie or a
Special Effects Movie or whatever it is you'd like to call Armageddon. 
It's not about story -- it's about viscera and action, and
thrills-a-minute, and all that stuff.  It's incidental, really, that the
story is cohesive and even remotely believable, because most people will
be too wrapped up in the explosions to give two seconds' thought to what
actually happens.  But Bay is the one to congratulate in this case, for
he has made a film so entertaining and so visually sharp that I doubt
any director could have done it better.
I think most of the budget went to cameras alone, because Bay films
every action sequence from about thirty or forty different angles.  Take
the spectacular opening scene, for instance, in which a meteor shower
obliterates New York.  A meteor flies out of the sky and crashes into a
building, which sends fireballs erupting into the air and cars spinning
like tops upon other cars.  The action itself might take five seconds in
real life, but Bay edits so quickly that we get the same scene in six
different ways.  I like his quick-edit style, because it's abrasive and
exhausting to watch.  It's also very loud, and obnoxiously noisy at
times.  But it's fun to be obnoxious sometimes.
The special effects in this film put every other 1998 blockbuster to
shame.  Deep Impact, visually, has absolutely nothing on Armageddon, and
to offer a comparison between the quality of this film and Godzilla is
simply laughable.  Special effects are very important in a film like
this:  if they're not good, then the image is not convincing, and the
film doesn't work.  Everything here looks bright and explosive -- from
the little meteors bursting through skyscrapers, all the way to the
shots of the earth through the jutting rocks on the ominously
approaching asteroid.  The effects that don't look totally real are
still a pleasure to behold, and I credit everyone involved for creating
the first blockbuster so nice-looking that it actually qualifies as art.
Of course, all of this would add up to little more than an
above-average light show, if I didn't get the feeling that Bay cares as
much about his characters as he does about his action.  The film is two
and a half hours long, and not all of that is spent submerged in numbing
action.  Much of the film is dedicated to developing the various
characters' subplots.  I won't suggest that these are complex
characters, but their problems are real, and the emotions aren't put
forth in a sentimental and overbearing way.  In fact, there are three or
four scenes here that had me pretty choked up, and that's a lot more
than I can say about Deep Impact, which was banking on the feel-good
parts of its story.
Bruce Willis is terrific, and I'm glad to see him bigger than life
again (recent turns in films like Mercury Rising have been very
disappointing).  Tyler and Affleck are great together, and make a
convincing couple -- all of the scenes between them work on a
comfortable level.  Patton, who is a magnificent actor, thankfully is
not wasted here, and the minor subplot revolving around his ex-wife and
son is very moving.  The comic relief from Buscemi and Peter Stormare
(who plays a crazy Russian astronaut) is nifty, and keeps the film
lively and funny.
I wasn't challenged to think real hard while watching Armageddon, and I
don't mind too much.  But the film doesn't insult my intelligence --
it's pitched perfectly to entertain, which is what all it really wants
to do.  It's not mindless and escapist, but well-crafted cinema.  It
might have been created for the wrong reasons, but men like Michael Bay
have my respect for showing me that they are interested in making
something good, in spite of the producers and the budget.  I'm not
saying that films like this are risky moves.  What I am saying is that
Armageddon is a big, loud, expensive motion picture that reminds me that
art often comes in the strangest of forms.  

Title
Review for Deconstructing Harry (1997)
Director: Woody Allen
Cast: Woody Allen, Billy Crystal, Demi Moore, Robin Williams, Judy
Davis, Elisabeth Shue, kirstie Alley, Bob
Balaban, Richard Benjamin, Eric Bogosian, Hazelle Goodman, Mariel
Hemingway, Amy Irving, Julie Kavner,
Caroline Aaron, Eric Lloyd, Julia Louis-Dreyfus, Tobey Maguire, Stanley
Tucci
Rated R: Language, sex, nudity
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    I don't know a single person that doesn't think that Woody Allen is
annoying. I, myself, am one of those
people. I think he is intensely annoying. I watch him jitter and shake
around the screen, spewing
half-sentences like a broken verbal machine gun, with those black little
eyes magnified behind those
ridiculously thick glasses, and I wonder why I repeatedly go to see the
films that he writes, directs, and
stars in. It doesn't take me long to figure it out--he's really funny.
That's usually what it comes down to.
Maybe the character he plays isn't always really funny, but his
supporting characters are so funny, and the
situations are absolutely hilarious.
    Deconstructing Harry is his latest film, and I imagine that to
obtain complete enjoyment, one should know
Woody Allen pretty well. I, for one, do not--I have not seen a lot of
his films (I think this marks the fourth
or fifth), and what I know of him outside of his work is just what I
read in the tabloids and Entertainment
Weekly. But I know that this film is one big stab at himself, and I can
assume that it is successful. But like
most of his films, this one is successful because of the numerous
interesting characters, and the witty,
sharp, Woody Allen humor. What this film seems to have that his others
do not is a jagged edge, a kind of
licentious and hateful quality, an element present simply to make more
fun of himself.
    It's about Harry Block (Allen), a godless, sex-crazed author who, at
the time of the film, is in complete
disarray. He's just written a book that gives up the secrets of some of
his closest friends and ex-girlfriends,
and none of them are particularly happy with the situation. He's never
allowed to see his kid, his parents
have all but disowned him, his sister and her husband look down upon him
because he isn't a true Jewish
man, and so forth. On top of all this, he can't get motivated to write
anything significant, so his life is on
hold.
    The film is kind of a journey for Harry to understand himself, or
maybe make himself better, should he
reach the point of caring about himself. It leads to a situation in
which he's driving in a Volvo with a
hooker and a corpse, on his way to get honored by the school which
expelled him. Like all of Allen's
films, he has a huge cast. It's nearly distractingly large, with almost
every part filled up by a big-name star.
Most of the women turn in the best performances, with genuinely funny
moments delivered by Judy Davis,
Kirstie Alley, Julia Louis-Dreyfus, and Demi Moore. If you're familiar
with Allen's films, then you'll know
what to expect--it's the same kind of humor, pacing, and mood to which
we're all accustomed in his
movies.
    This one, however, seems to suffer from a peculiar storytelling
technique. Because of the nature of the
story, Harry frequently relives pieces of short stories that he has
written; most of them star a guy thinly
disguised as himself, and tells a true story. He remembers one of the
first stories he wrote, about his first
encounter with a prostitute. Another story he remembers is one in which
he goes to hell to save the woman
he loves. Throughout the film, the action also switches to a different
cast doing the exact same thing,
which is meant to represent the book which he has just written (the one
that everyone is upset at him for).
If my explanation of this is confusing, then I'm doing my job--it is
also rather confusing in the film. I didn't
put the pieces together until the last quarter of the movie. It's really
not that obvious, nor is Allen's reason
for doing it (though I imagine if you're familiar with all of his work
then there is something here to give you
a hint). The flashbacks sure are funny, though.
    Towards the end, he actually meets the character that he created,
his alter-ego, and this individual gives
Harry all kinds of advice. I like the idea (look into your writing for
advice), and the central idea behind his
character--he can function in the artistic world but not in the
realistic world--is a fascinating one.
Ultimately, the film aside from the comedy works because Allen really
thought about his concepts and
materialized them effectively (although the flashbacks to his stories
could have been less confusing).
Whether you love him or hate him, you're likely to enjoy Deconstructing
Harry. And if you know Allen
really well, you'll probably get a lot more out of the film. As for me,
it proved to make a worthwhile
evening of entertainment, even if though is about a godless, sex-crazed
author in complete disarray.

Title
Review for October Sky (1999)
Director: Joe Joohnston
Cast: Jake Gyllenhaal, Chris Cooper, Laura Dern, Chris Owen, William
Lee Scott, Chad Lindberg, Natalie Canerday
Screenplay: Lewis Colick (book by Homer H. Hickam Jr.)
Producers: Larry J. Franco, Charles Gordon
Runtime: 108 min.
US Distribution: Universal
Rated PG: language, alcohol use, thematic elements
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
The brilliant opening shots of October Sky present to us Coalwood, West
Virginia, a small mining town subtly crushed beneath news that the
Soviet Union has launched the first satellite, Sputnik.  In Coalwood,
every grown man works in the mines, and just about every grown woman is
a housewife.  The quiet first shots introduce a world very few of us
understand -- they show us a group of people who feel helpless against
an international force that appears to be technologically superior.  
October Sky isn't about the Soviet Union, but the launch of Sputnik
inspires a young man named Homer Hickam (Jake Gyllenhaal) to build
rockets.  He doesn't want to build real rockets (not yet, anyway); he
simply wants to create something that shoots into the air.  So he rounds
up his friends, Roy Lee (William Lee Scott) and O'Dell (Chad Lindberg),
hires the class nerd (Chris Owen) to help him with the math, and starts
building rockets.  This, of course, is not what Homer's father, John
(Chris Cooper), wants.
John is one of the head coal miners, and is proud of his job.  He wants
Homer to work in the mines, just like everyone else, but Homer won't do
it -- he wants to go in space.  John works against his son, but not out
of meanness:  he simply resents what his son is trying to do. 
Meanwhile, Homer and his friends are helped along by Miss Riley (Laura
Dern), a high school teacher who gets them to enter a national science
fair when it becomes clear that their rockets are successful.
October Sky is an immensely moving film, one that frequently forced me
to hold back sobs.  It's based on the true story of NASA engineer Homer
Hickam, and features one of most colorful arrays of characters to appear
in any film in the last few months.  Brought to life by inventive
direction from Joe Johnston and subtle, layered performances from a
wonderful cast, October Sky is that rare teen-angst movie that has all
of the necessary pieces for serious drama.  Even more odd is that the
pieces are properly assembled.
Well, maybe I shouldn't call it a teen-angst movie.  On the surface,
though, it truly is in the spirit of the recent Hollywood teen flicks. 
Homer is a teenager for most of the picture, and the film dabbles in the
usual assortment of peer pressure and parental conflicts.  What sets
October Sky apart from the others is . . . just about everything. 
Superficially, the movie looks great:  the aforementioned opening shots
are of the best in the film; Johnston is a talented visual artist, and
Coalwood is observed in a somber, ponderous tone.  The film feels
temporally authentic, and, though I was born two decades after the
events of this film take place, I felt like I understood it.  It made
sense to me.
This ties in with the setting; Johnston recognizes what the time period
did to the people, and the current events in the background effectively
staple the film and hold it together.  One of the most interesting
moments has the residents of Coalwood standing outside, waiting for
Sputnik to pass overhead so they can steal a glance.  It's quite a
moving moment, and, when Homer sees the satellite, his transition from
Indifferent to Rocket Builder is clear and instantaneous:  he wants to
go into space.
Of course, the transition wouldn't be effective if Gyllenhaal weren't
such a terrific actor.  I've never seen him before, but he carries the
largest role in the film with grace and dignity that most actors his age
lack entirely.  He also works well with the other actors, particularly
Cooper and Natalie Canerday, who plays his mother.  Cooper, who was so
good in Lone Star, is very powerful here; certainly the most relieving
aspect of October Sky is that the father isn't demonized into oblivion,
as so many fathers in films like this are.  His motives are always
clear, and he does do nice things for his son -- the conflict there is
real, and it's realized.
The picture works on many levels, but I was most often taken with the
little details.  Homer's mother has some of the best scenes in the film;
her quiet, almost unnoticeable attraction to Myrtle Beach adds to the
nice development of her character; the scene in which her husband goes
into the mines to save someone shows us a brief moment that speaks
worlds about her character:  "If he dies in there, I won't shed a
tear."  Only in a film this good could minor characters be fleshed-out
so clearly. 
It's necessary that Homer get stopped along the way -- there need to be
characters who try and hinder his progress.  But there are a few too
many; the police arrest him, the school principal doesn't like what he
does, his father obstructs him, and the other kids in school all make
fun of him.  I realize that the story is "based on a true story," but
one or two of these frustrating subplots could have been abandoned with
no harm done to the story at all.  Otherwise, however, October Sky is a
truly excellent film.  Aside from giving us a brief history lesson on
Sputnik, it presents to us a group of characters who earn our sympathy. 
Based on this film, I feel a little better knowing that the real Homer
Hickam is out there working for NASA.

Title
Review for Urban Legend (1998)
Director:  Jamie Blanks
Cast:  Alicia Witt, Rebecca Gayheart, Jared Leto, Joshua Jackson, Tara
Reid, Michael Rosenbaum, John Neville, Robert Englund, Natasha Gregson
Wagner
Screenplay:  Silvio Horta
Producers:  Gina Matthews, Michael McDonnell
Runtime:  100 min.
US Distribution:  TriStar
Rated R:  horror violence/gore, language, sex
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
Imagine this:  you're walking down a really dark hallway.  It's so dark
that you can't see anything -- not even the walls, not even your hands! 
(The only thing illuminated is your face.)  You're looking around
slowly, plodding through the darkness, scared of something that may or
may not be there.  Suddenly, a half-second crack of extremely loud
guitar music radiates from a six-foot stack of speakers right next to
you.  Would you be scared?  I sure would be.  I'd fall to the floor,
convulsing, perhaps even weeping, and I doubt that I'd ever recover from
the incident.
In real life, this would be frightening.  But in a horror movie, the
formula doesn't work quite the same way.  For instance, the scene
described above is a common one in Urban Legend, with each segment
ending in that ultra-loud burst of music.  When we see people walking
through dark hallways, we know that they're probably just going to have
the stuffing scared out of them.  On occasion, he or she might get
gutted by some maniac, but, typically, scenes like this are false
alarms. 
Urban Legend is wholesale false alarms, none of which are particularly
alarming.  Ever since Scream came out in 1996, the studios have been
rushing to bring out their own teen horror flicks.  They range from the
watchable (I Know What you Did Last Summer) to the silly (Disturbing
Behavior), but I have yet to see one that does everything right.  Urban
Legend is perhaps sillier than all of them, sporting a kinda-cool
gimmick/plot.  It's watchable badness, with some decent moments of
suspense and good acting.  But I wonder if the director, Jamie Blanks,
had any idea that the film is inherently and completely ridiculous.  
Like most of these new-wave Teen Horror Flicks, Urban Legend has a
gimmick in place of a story.  The gimmick is that the killer murders
people based on urban legends.  Urban legends are those stories that
everyone knows and thinks are true, but really hold no truth
whatsoever.  I sat in quiet astonishment as the fable of Mikey, the Life
Cereal kid, is discussed on screen.  I heard that story probably twelve
years ago (when I was just a tyke), and in all this time I've never
heard anything that proved the tale true or false.  It's slightly
amusing the way Urban Legend uses this group of famous stories to create
a sequence of interesting set-pieces.  Strictly as a formality, the film
has a main character:  her name is Natalie (Alicia Witt).  She's a
college student, and -- just as our young heroines in all of the other
Teen Horror Flicks -- she's the girl the killer wants to abuse
emotionally.
This film is profoundly silly, but there's stuff I liked about it. 
First, there's Alicia Witt.  She's a great actress (very Witty), and,
when given the right material, extremely funny (remember her on
"Cybil?").  The script for this film, which was written by Silvio Horta,
doesn't give her much of a character to work with, but she's fun to
watch anyway.  Also fun is Rebecca Gayheart (Noxema girl!); she overacts
on a nuclear-meltdown level, but I think she's aware of it.  In
addition, the film features John Neville (as the evil Dean) and Robert
Englund (for a guy so well-known, you'd think he'd make a good movie
every once in a while).  There are lots of actors in this film, but no
characters -- that tends to be a problem when we're trying to manifest
sympathy for the figures on screen getting all hacked up.
Blanks has a good visual style, and the film is competent in its
execution.  There are a few really nicely-done scenes, including a
gore-fest that has something to do with a dog in a microwave; the
opening scene (which features an uncredited Brad Dourif in a role not
unlike his first in One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest) is spectacular and
beautifully ironic.  There are some good camera angles, and Blanks
injects enough atmosphere to keep the film from being dry and
uninspired.  It's just too bad that the film is overflowing with cliches
and scenes that end with loud bursts of music.  
Even for a horror film, there are necessary elements missing.  It isn't
very scary -- it relies a little too heavily on gore and gratuitous
violence (some of it is simply unpleasant).  What makes films like this
really scary is a believable explanation for everything.  That's where
Urban Legend really loses it -- the final fifteen minutes of the film
are laughably absurd (I'm not exaggerating -- I was laughing).  Did
Blanks know how silly all of this stuff is?  Perhaps.  It would have
been nice if the urban legend gimmick had been put to better use, but
I'm more concerned with the numerous scenes that rely on that crack of
loud music to scare the audience.  It's so hard to scare us when we know
it's coming anyway.

Title
Review for Prince of Egypt, The (1998)
Director:   Brenda Chapman, Steve Hickner, Simon Wells
Cast:  Val Kilmer, Ralph Fiennes, Sandra Bullock, Danny Glover, Jeff
Goldblum, Steve Martin, Helen Mirren, Michelle Pfeiffer, Martin Short,
Patrick Stewart
Screenplay:  
Producers:  Penney Finkelman Cox, Jeffrey Katzenberg, Sandra Rabins
Runtime:   99 min.
US Distribution: DreamWorks
Rated PG:  intense depiction of thematic elements
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
At the beginning of The Prince of Egypt, I was glad to see a few words
regarding the origin of the story of Moses.  First, it explains that the
source text of the film is the book of Exodus; it then makes the point
that this is the story behind the religion in which "millions of people
believe."  I like this statement because it doesn't explicitly say that
the book of Exodus is factual, or that Christians are the only ones who
are right.  It's just too bad that the film itself does.
The Prince of Egypt is an energetic, visually masterful animated film
of questionable morality.  It depicts the doings of Moses -- his
attempts to free his fellow Hebrews, who have been enslaved by the
Egyptians.  The story is a familiar one:  as an infant, Moses (voiced by
Val Kilmer) is sent down river by his slave mother, only to be rescued
and raised by the Pharaoh (Patrick Stewart) and his wife (Helen Mirren).
  
Moses grows up with his brother Ramses (Ralph Fiennes); but, as a young
man, he learns of his true heredity.   So, Moses heads off into the
desert, rejecting his Princehood and vowing to free his people.  When
his father dies, and Ramses becomes the Pharaoh, Moses is forced to wage
war on Ramses and the Egyptian people.  Along the way, he talks to the
burning bush, parts the Red Sea, and massacres thousands of people for
the good of his own.
I realize that The Prince of Egypt has been adapted from another text,
and that criticizing the material means that, transitively, I'm
attacking the Bible.  The difference between the book of Exodus and this
particular film is that the source text is not so biased -- it shows
both sides of Moses' doings; it explains the horrors of the plague that
destroys the Egyptian people.  The Prince of Egypt, however, is more
interested in setting up a good guy-bad guy scenario, so that the
Pharaoh is simply evil, and Moses is simply good.  But never was I given
a reason to think that Moses was any less sinister than Ramses.
I can't deny that the film is extremely powerful in its visual
presentation.  The animation, particularly in the scene in which Moses
parts the Red Sea, is spectacular.   (I might even go so far as to use
the "jaw-dropping" cliche, because my jaw certainly did drop.)  The film
is lively and entertaining, and paced very well, and features a lot of
talented actors:  Kilmer does a good job sounding important, while
Fiennes does an equally good job sounding sinister.  The supporting cast
is colored in familiar voices, with notable roles by Jeff Goldblum
(present mostly for comic relief), Patrick Stewart, and Danny Glover (as
Jethro).
  
But I have a major problem with the way Moses and his actions are
depicted.  I know this isn't the first time this story has been done
(anyone ever seen The Ten Commandments?), but this is the first time
it's been geared towards kids.  Are kids just supposed to overlook the
scene in which the metaphorical hand of God comes down and slaughters
children in their beds?  Oh sure, the Egyptians are "bad," right?  Yeah,
they're just as "bad" as Southern slaveholders in the 19th century.  
I'll agree that slavery is "bad," but it's not a straightforward issue. 
I'm not attacking religion or Christianity, nor do I think Moses was a
bad guy.   What I'm saying is that The Prince of Egypt is a powerful
movie that would have been much more powerful if it had shown Moses in a
questionable light.  He killed a lot of people, and he did it in the
name of God.  If Moses had lived today, he would have been labeled a
religious fanatic just before being sent to prison.   There are good
lessons to be learned in the Bible, but I think we could have overlooked
the one that tells us that death in the name of God is beautiful.

Title
Review for U.S. Marshals (1998)
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        For three and a half years, I've been saying, "What's the big deal
about The Fugitive?"  I never really knew.  Now that I've seen U.S.
Marshals, I think I finally understand.  I can't fathom why the
Kopelsons chose this complicated, convoluted, and often strikingly
uninteresting script to carry the sequel to one of 1994's biggest
films.  This is a long film, and it doesn't need to be.  There are a lot
of characters, and there don't have to be.  On top of all this, the
basic framework for U.S. Marshals is basically identical to that of The
Fugitive, which takes the film dangerously close to the level of
"rip-off" rather than "sequel."
        One of the seventeen main characters is Sheridan, played by Wesley
Snipes.  He is a tow truck driver, but only in the beginning.  Later, he
is arrested and charged with the murder of two secret agents.  So, he
gets stuck on a plane.  Conveniently, U.S. Marshal Sam Gerard (Tommy Lee
Jones) is also on that plane, but because of another prisoner that he
captured in the obligatory introduction-action sequence (the one that
shows us our hero doing his best).  
        The plane crashes.  Sheridan escapes.  Gerard is allowed to say his
line from the first film:  "We've got a fugitive!"  This is about thirty
minutes into the story.  Sequences shortly after this take place in a
swamp, and there are moments when Sheridan takes people hostage while
Gerard has him at gun point and could just shoot him in the face without
harming anyone.  
        We learn of new characters.  Robert Downey, Jr. plays agent John Royce
who is forced into Gerard's team despite Gerard's protest.  This leads
to an involvement with Royce's employers, who turn out to be somehow
related to Sheridan, and this opens up a subplot involving a murderous
Chinese diplomat.  Oh, and let's not forget the other U.S. Marshals, for
whom the film is named:  Joe Pantoliano, whom I like, reprises his role
from the first film; there are, in actuality, about five Marshals in the
film, and all of them are given too much screen time for me to have not
remembered their names just one day later.
        Sheridan has a girlfriend, Marie.  Marie is played by the wonderful
Irene Jacob.  I'm not sure why the character is in the film, though, and
Jacob's considerable talent is wasted (though she does make her scenes
easy on the eyes).  
        U.S. Marshals didn't strike me as a goofy movie as I watched it, but I
think of it that way in retrospect.  The story is silly and complicated
for no reason.  It's not even very plausible.  Not only that, but the
makers don't trust the audience:  when Gerard makes an important
revelation towards the end of the film, we are force-fed a flashback of
an earlier scene in the film that provides information needed to solve
the puzzle.  
        The action sequences are good.  I liked the scenes taking place in a
home for old folks, and that sequence culminates with a leap, from a
roof onto a train, that is truly spectacular (although you can see that
in the preview).  I also liked the acting.  Jones is charismatic and
continues in the manner than got him an Oscar for the same role in the
earlier film.  Snipes makes a good hero, although our sympathy is torn
because his character is too complicated for easy audience involvement. 
The other Marshals are all nice, and the bad guys are adequately bad,
but everything here tastes a little too familiar.
        Harrison Ford is basically what makes The Fugitive a good movie.  He
played a nice, normal guy (I even remember his character's name, and I
haven't seen the film in years) with whom everyone can identify.  We
really wanted to see him succeed.  But Sheridan is a special forces
agent--there is really no suspense in his situation, and almost no
payoff in the conclusion.  And, by the end of the film, director Stuart
Baird has truly lost sight of what the film is--and should--be about: 
Gerard chases Sheridan.
        This isn't a terrible or even extremely mediocre film.  As a strict
action film, this one has good acting and nice set-pieces.  But what
about the story?  What about the involving characters that made the
original film a satisfying and entertaining picture?  That's what got
lost in this sequel.  U.S. Marshals has too much plot on which it must
focus, and ends up flailing wildly and not really getting anywhere.

Title
Review for Kiss or Kill (1997)
KISS OR KILL is an honest attempt at something different by
writer/director Bill Bennett, but unfortunately his effort is a wacky,
crazed, emotionally confused mess of a film. That's not to say that it's
bad--there are some moments that work, and some material that is both
funny and moving, but the overall picture here is a labyrinthine
disaster so hyperbolic that it actually manages to hide much of its
insanity in its own craziness.
Matt Day and Frances O'Connor star as Al and Nikki, an Australian couple
on the run from the police for accidentally killing a guy but
intentionally stealing all of his valuables. They take off across the
desolate Australian landscape and meet an interesting array of
characters, most of whom end up with their throats slit at the hands of
. . . someone. Yes, it's a road movie-slash-love story. It reminded me
somewhat of the loathsome THE DOOM GENERATION and a little bit of
KALIFORNIA, but Bennett has no problem escaping cliches and common plot
devices--if nothing else, KISS OR KILL can be described as innovative.
But the problems can not be ignored. First, we're talking style overkill
here. Bennett likes short takes. Really short takes. I'd guess the
average take-length is around two seconds. Not only do the takes change
constantly, but the angles change with each take. The result is jittery,
and hyper, and the thought of it makes my heart pound quickly. Through
the whole film I felt uneasy and tense. I almost called Bennett
brilliant for this, but I realized something: he uses this approach
through the entire film, even when the action is focusing on the two
cops (Chris Haywood and Andrew S. Gilbert) pursuing the heroes. If
Bennett threw us the style fastball only during the scenes containing Al
and Nikki, I could see some point in it. As it is, there is clearly no
reason for its presence other than his need for style.
The script is outright sloppy. The characterizations seem almost
completely random, and hardly effective. Nikki is the most interesting,
because her past is explained (well, one element of it, anyway) so at
least we know something about her other than what's on the surface. Al,
on the other hand, is an opaque window--there might be something there,
but any hypothesis would simply be a stab in the dark. At one point the
plot twists and Al may or may not be who we expected--either way, it
makes no sense. His actions in the last half of the film--not to mention
the interactions between himself and Nikki--are simply unfounded. I was
constantly questioning motivation, but I never got the answers. There
was a moment towards the end of the film that felt true and solid, but
it was just a moment--the rest of the film lacks this kind of honesty.
The only characters that I really liked were the two cops. The best
scene in the film has the younger giving the older a fake story about
his life--it's a wonderful scene, and ironic that it has nothing to do
with the rest of the film. In fact, the cops-n-robbers part of the film
is never integrated smoothly, and the quick transitions from cops to
robbers is intrusive. Not only that, but a legal scene in the last third
of the film feels contrived--I don't see how the laws in Australia could
be so easily avoidable.
The acting is great all around, with a particularly strong performance
from O'Connor (mostly because she has the most to do with her
character). Bennett's direction, aside from his ludicrous stylistic
attacks, at least allows the film to progress in a manor that does, in
fact, feel progressive. It doesn't meander and it's far from dull.
But it's unsatisfying. Even in the closing scenes the characters'
relationship is sketchy, but it seems like it shouldn't be--here is a
couple who has made it through a lot of junk, and yet Bennett can't even
level with the audience about what is going through their minds. The
shell of this film is an interesting one, and Bennett clearly has a
great deal of talent in what he does, but he needs to learn the value of
solid characterizations and the point of stylistic approaches.

Title
Review for Thirteenth Floor, The (1999)
Director: Josef Rusnak
Cast: Craig Bierko, Gretchen Mol, Armin Mueller-Stahl, Vincent
D'Onofrio, Dennis Haysbert, Steve Schub
Screenplay: Josef Rusnak, Ravel Centeno-Rodriguez
Producers: Roland Emmerich, Ute Emmerich, Marco Weber
Runtime: 
US Distribution: Columbia
Rated R: Violence, language
Copyright 1999 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
        The Thirteenth Floor is a bland, obligatory exercise in genre
film-making.  If I hadn't recently watched The Matrix and Open Your Eyes
-- both of which are similar but far superior -- I might have been a
little nicer to this picture.  Craig Bierko makes an adequate hero as
Douglas Hall, the rich co-creator of a perfect human world simulation
who is suddenly blamed for the murder of his boss (Armin
Mueller-Stahl).  Everything that was subtle and smart about the
previously mentioned films is battered over our heads in this one, and
characters stare at each other for maddeningly-long periods of time and
refuse to communicate on any realistic level.  The acting is okay, but
the film suffers from every logical flaw one could think of, and
features a script (co-penned by director Josef Rusnak) loaded with
cliches and stock characters.  There are individual scenes and ideas
that work -- I like the thought of a sentient computer program -- but
none of the film's strengths are recognized to any meaningful degree. 
Producer Roland Emmerich, based on this and his previous directorial
efforts, seems hell-bent on bringing us the ultimate standard in
mediocre science-fiction.

Title
Review for Man in the Iron Mask, The (1998)
Director:  Randall Wallace
Cast:  Leonardo DiCaprio, Jeremy Irons, John Malkovich, Gerard
Depardieu, Gabriel Byrne, Anne Parillaud, Judith Godreche
Screenplay:  Randall Wallace
Producers:  Randall Wallace, Russ Smith
Runtime:  130 min.
US Distribution:  MGM
Rated PG-13:  Violence, sex
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        I've never been a huge fan of frenetic adventure films featuring soups
of various European-accented actors dressed up in flashy, cumbersome
clothes while brandishing those thin fencing-type swords with the
jewel-covered handles.  On that note, I'd say that my exposure to the
genre is rather limited:  I've seen only portions of the numerous films
about the Three Musketeers, and my knowledge of the books on which these
films are based is even more limited.  
        Randall Wallace's The Man in the Iron Mask, based on the famous
Alexander Dumas novel (which is part of a trilogy about the musketeers),
is a film that fits securely into the description above.  This is not a
film of profound depth or thought, and I didn't expect it to be.  But I
did want it to be significantly more than well-built sets and Leonardo
DiCaprio screaming "Wear it....until you die in it!"  And while it is
technically sound and acceptably light on intrusive continuity problems,
Wallace's film is overflowing with multitudes of characters and scenes. 
The result is a frantic movie that is entertaining, but lacking in focus
or anything to stimulate thought.  
        DiCaprio plays Louis XIV, the tyrannical young king who refuses to
award the peasants of France with edible food.  He's mostly interested
in bedding young women, but on occasion he pretends to care about his
country.  His personal bodyguard is D'Artagnan (Gabriel Byrne), a
highly-feared general.  D'Artagnan was once one of the musketeers.  The
musketeers--Aramis (Jeremy Irons), Athos (John Malkovich), and Porthos
(Gerard Depardieu)--are an aging bunch now, and have settled into
less-adventurous lives with the emergence of Louis XIV.  
        Conflicts arise when Athos' son, Raul (Peter Sarsgaard) is sent off to
war because Louis is interested in his fiancée, Christine (Judith
Godreche).  When Raul is killed, Athos declares Louis as his enemy;
therefore D'Artagnan, who was his close friend, is also his enemy.  The
remaining three musketeers develop a plan to get Louis out of the
throne.  Aramis knows of a man--whose identity and existence is unknown
to most people due to a big iron mask wrapped around his face--who can
help.  He is the twin brother of Louis, and has been jailed by the King
in fear.
        The film frequently feels less-than-authentic.  Take, for instance, all
of the various accents.  DiCaprio, once again, plays a period character
with a straight American accent.  Depardieu seems to be trying to hide
his French accent for some strange reason, while Byrne and Irons have
slightly lightened their British inflections; even Malkovitch, who can
usually get away with it because is voice is so unusual, can't manage to
make his lines fit in.  The film also allows an occasional anachronism
(actually, I'm guessing:  a word that rhymes with "sits" that references
a lady's bosom just doesn't sound natural in this time period).
        The film doesn't even tell us what it's about until about the 45-minute
mark.  Sure, there's foreshadowing with glimpses of the man in the mask,
but the Musketeers' plan almost feels like a subplot because it occurs
so late in the film.  The main characters seem to be Louis and his
counterpart, but the heroes are the musketeers, and their plan is the
one we're supposed to root for.  I suppose this explains Wallace's
attempt to characterize these men, but with the mangled focus, character
development scenes tend to intrude on the story, and usually feel
pointless.  The best example of this has Depardieu (who is not my
favorite actor) running around nude; he finds a rope and decides it's an
omen suggesting that he hang himself.  This scene does elicit laughs,
though it still feels forced and out-of-place in the film.
        On the whole, I'm disappointed in the performances.  Irons and
Malkovitch are passable, but not up to their capabilities.  DiCaprio is
okay, but I wish he'd try and take on an accent one of these days (he
does do a good job making us realize which of the brothers he is playing
at any given moment, though).  Depardieu takes the French machismo
element of his personality light years beyond my preference, and is
simply annoying to watch.  There are no significant women roles, which I
found irritating; Godreche is uninteresting because the character is
weak and shallow, while Anne Parillaud, who plays Louis' mother, is
given little screen time.  The best in the film is Byrne, and he is
good:  he shows charisma and energy rare to his performances.
        What The Man in the Iron Mask comes down to is, essentially, mindless
entertainment.  The sets are great, the costumes professional, the
scenes are paced well, and the action sequences are exciting.  For a
film that seems like it's engineered to appeal to the younger
generations, it's not a bad film.  But I think most people over the age
of twenty are going to want a little more focus and thought put into a
story that's been told so many times.  

Title
Review for Good Will Hunting (1997)
Director: Gus Van Sant
Cast: Matt Damon, Robin Williams, Ben Affleck, Minnie Driver, Stellan
Skarsgard
Rated R: Strong language, some violence
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    Where the heck did Matt Damon come from? A few months ago I hadn't
even heard of him, let alone seen his face. When I saw The Rainmaker, I
was impressed with his obvious talents as an actor. Now here's Good Will
Hunting, which he stars in and co-wrote with his real-life friend Ben
Affleck (who co-stars as well), and it's a terrific film. It's a
thoughtful, extremely well-written (albeit not entirely original) story
that manages to take hold of the audience on multiple levels. I
thoroughly enjoyed it from start to finish, but it surpassed simple
entertainment--it's a direct, honest story that made me think and left
me uplifted.
    Damon plays the title character, Will Hunting, a cocky boy genius
who has grown up in various foster families. His life has been anything
but easy--aside from the frequent beatings he got from his foster
parents, he was constantly in trouble with the law, and his only form of
education came with his own initiative to continually read books of all
kinds. At the time of the film, he is working as a janitor on the
Harvard campus. One night he covertly solves a difficult proof posted by
math professor Dr. Lambeau (Stellan Skarsgard); shortly after, he is
arrested for assault and battery. Lambeau bails him out of jail, but the
judge rules that he must remain under the supervision of Lambeau (which
involves helping with difficult math concepts), and that he must see a
psychiatrist.
    The first part is easy; Will finds any form of math to be a breeze,
so much that he puts Lambeau and many other accomplished mathematicians
to shame with his effortless talent. Finding a psychiatrist, however,
tends to be more difficult--it takes four failed attempts with various
doctors before Lambeau goes to an old college friend, Sean McGuire
(Robin Williams), who agrees to see Will because of the challenge Will
presents.
    Will is anything but a cooperative individual. To describe him as
arrogant and smug would be an understatement--this kid thinks he knows
everything. He judges people after thirty seconds of contact, and
doesn't use the slightest hint of tact or politeness in most situations.
He makes the mistake of assuming too much about Sean, who quickly puts
Will in his place. Will also meets a young British student named Skylar
(Minnie Driver) who teaches him a little about love and relationships
with women.
    Good Will Hunting is primarily a success because of it's honesty.
The director, Gus Van Sant, doesn't distance us with a lot of arty fluff
(which never works in dramas of this kind). He uses a lot of still
camera work, with long takes and slow panning (note the scene on the
lake in which Sean calmly tells Will that he doesn't know anything); the
result is often mesmerizing, and it allows a direct line for the
audience to understand the characters without a lot of nonsense getting
in the way. The script, ornamented with sharp dialogue and great scenes,
only accentuates the ease with which we can understand these people.
    Equally important are the performances, all of which are dead-on for
the mood of the film. Damon is astonishing--easily one of the best
performances from a young actor in recent years. He gives Will a great
energetic quality, something that tells us that there is a nice guy
hidden behind those cocky eyes of his. Driver, sporting her natural
British accent, is down-to-earth and very appealing; and Ben Affleck,
who plays Will's close friend Chuckie, is much more believable than I
would have expected after seeing Chasing Amy. Skarsgard proves vast
diversity in his exceptional talents, for this mathematician couldn't be
more dissimilar from the paraplegic oil worker he portrayed in Breaking
the Waves.
    As good as all of these performances are, none of them can touch
Robin Williams--although he is clearly under a great deal of restraint
here, this performance is quite possibly his best. I've never been a
huge Williams fan; films that he often does, like Mrs. Doubtfire and
recently Flubber, tend to grate on my nerves, but when he goes dramatic,
there is something special about his conduct. The thought of him
grappling Will's neck and hissing, "I will end you!" with intense rage
sends shivers down my spine. Sean is a tortured individual, and Williams
makes these levels obvious with very little dialogue. He has my vote for
best supporting actor this year.
    I love watching films that obviously come from the heart. Damon,
Affleck, Van Sant, and the rest of the people involved weren't
interested in the money or the business or anything like that. They
wanted to make an straightforward, touching film. Their effort was not
in vain--Good Will Hunting is a great movie, one that gets to the point
and treats its audience with a little respect. I, for one, will be
eagerly awaiting Damon's next project.

Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
Director:  Steven Spielberg
Cast:  Tom Hanks, Edward Burns, Tom Sizemore, Jeremy Davies, Vin Diesel,
Adam Goldberg, Barry Pepper, Giovanni Ribisi, Matt Damon
Screenplay:  Robert Rodat
Producers:  Ian Bryce, Mark Gordon, Gary Levinsohn
Runtime:  169 min.
US Distribution:  DreamWorks/Paramount
Rated R:  extreme and graphic gore and violence, profanity
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
Saving Private Ryan is perhaps the first film I've ever seen that
called me back for a second viewing before I even decided the way I felt
about it.  I knew it had invaded me the first time, for I had
ultra-violent nightmares the night after I saw it.  I couldn't stop
thinking about the film for three days; the graphic viscera of every
scene imprinted images on my mind, images that aren't likely to ever
leave me.  I doubt there are many films in existence that are as
visually powerful as Saving Private Ryan, and I know there's not one
that's more horrifyingly violent.
As everyone knows, this is Steven Spielberg's latest war film, though
his first attempt at actually capturing the horror of warfare.  I've
never been in war -- and it's not likely that I ever will be -- but I
think experiencing Saving Private Ryan is the closest I'll ever come. 
After watching this film, I felt like I had survived a war.  I was
tired, exhilarated, battered, and disturbed.  It's not a pleasant
experience, but it's a profoundly powerful one, and I recommend that
everyone see it.  It puts the realism back into violence.
After a short prologue, Spielberg jumps right into battle, with a truly
amazing recreation of the invasion of Omaha Beach on June 6th, 1944.  We
meet our characters, Captain Miller (Tom Hanks), his Sergeant (Tom
Sizemore), and their men, Privates Reiben (Edward Burns), Mellish (Adam
Goldberg), Jackson (Barry Pepper), and Wade (Giovanni Ribisi).  They
forge the beach and, after about a half hour of watching their comrades
undergo intense attack from the Germans, they manage to take the beach. 
It's at this point that Miller gets a new assignment:  he and his men
are to go inland and search for Private James Ryan; Ryan's brothers have
all been killed in combat, and the powers-that-be want to get the
remaining man back to his mother in Iowa.  The film progresses from
there, with Miller and his men engaging in various battles and risking
their lives to find a man who may not even be alive.
Saving Private Ryan is the most violent film I've ever seen.  Paul
Verhoeven has a knack for gory violence, but his films are cartoons by
comparison.  And horror films that bank on gore are nothing compared to
this, because here it all feels real.  Spielberg is entirely responsible
for the look and feel of this film, and it proves that he can paint a
portrait of pure terror without holding back.  In general, the style is
sharp, and every scene appears to be in deep focus (one can see every
dust particle that goes flying into the air with each explosion).  I
read that Spielberg drained 40% of the color from the film, and what
results are images that look stark and harrowing, particularly in the
ravaged town where the final battle takes place.  In addition, the sound
effects editing and special effects are so good that viewers simply
forget that they are watching a film.  
The violence is not exploitative, and that's why it feels so real.  We
get glimpses of a man lying on a beach, holding his entrails, calling
for his mother.  We see men explode into bloody fragments of human
waste.  We see soldiers get blown to pieces by machinegun fire, while
their mangled limbs disperse about the ground.  Nothing I can write here
will prepare you for the images in Saving Private Ryan, and nothing I
say can describe it in a way that feels as realistic as Spielberg has
made it.  I've never experienced a film that feels as real as this one.
The film is long, and Spielberg manages to form his characters
effectively.  Hanks gives a touching, subtle performance as the Captain,
whose identity is concealed from his men.  He is convincing in this
role, even though he doesn't initially seem like a military type
(although I imagine that this is the point, seeing as how most people
drafted into war aren't the military type).  Sizemore is excellent,
giving a powerful performance as the loyal Sergeant.  Jeremy Davies is
terrific as an interpreter who gets forced into battle, and his subplot
is fascinating.  Other supporting performances by Burns, Goldberg,
Pepper, Ribisi, and Matt Damon (as Private Ryan) are all surprisingly
memorable.
Many people accept Spielberg's name as solid gold, as if his attachment
with any motion picture assures its quality.  I think he's talented,
but, like all directorsb he has his ups (Schindler's List, Empire of the
Sun) and his downs (Always, Indiana Jones and the Temple of Doom). 
There are elements common in all of his films that I don't like, and he
frequently uses sentimentality at the worst times.  Saving Private Ryan
has some serious problems in this arena; the first and last scenes, for
instance, are truly unbearable, and should have been cut from the film
entirely.  On the whole, however, the sensitive material here is handled
with surprising honesty, and a few of the scenes are powerful because
Spielberg is almost cold in his observations of them.  
There are other flaws, aside from the occasional sentimentality.  Even
though the film looks disturbingly real, the story still has that
contrived Hollywood feel.  The general idea is a good one, and the
framework is effective, but a lot of this relies on chance and luck, and
I don't like it when stories need to fall back on luck.  There are also
some character developments late in the film that had me puzzled.  Most
frustrating, however, is that, for all the realism in the war scenes,
the main characters who die are all given quiet, cinematic death
scenes.  That's not to say that they aren't engrossing or moving scenes,
because they are, but it's moments like these that remind me that I'm
watching something that isn't real.  It would have been far more
effective to kill characters for whom we feel something in the same
graphic manner that floods the rest the film.
In addition, I'm not sure how Spielberg wants us to feel in the end. 
It seems that he wanted to make a film that was simply about war, but
Saving Private Ryan spends more time on the characters and story than it
does on the horrors of war.  The first and last shots are of an American
flag, but I'm not sure why.  The film feels oddly indifferent to the
purpose of World War II -- in some scenes, the Germans are almost
sympathetic, and sometimes Spielberg demonizes the American soldiers.  I
actually like this element, but it makes me confused about the moral
center of the film.  And even though it's so violent, I'm not sure that
it's particularly anti-war.  I like that the film stimulated my thought
in this manner, but I would have preferred a little more guidance.
It's not often that I bother with negative criticism when I recommend a
film so highly.  Saving Private Ryan, as a whole, is not even close to
perfection -- there are flaws in its execution that are too large to
ignore.  But as a war film, as a violent, forceful, and aggressive
vision of some of the most violent moments in human history, it is as
close to perfect as it could have been.  So many of the images in this
picture are stamped on my brain, and have forced their way into my
subconscious in a manner no film ever has.  And for all the violence,
for every mind-numbing shot of a human being undergoing intense physical
torture, this is still a film that I will want to watch in the future. 
Spielberg may be overrated, but it takes a unique talent to make me want
to repeatedly endure a film this unpleasant.

Title
Review for Rush Hour (1998)
Director:  Brett Ratner
Cast:  Jackie Chan, Chris Tucker, Tom Wilkinson, Elizabeth Pena, Tzi Ma,
Julia Hsu
Screenplay:  Jim Kouf
Producers:  Roger Birnbaum, Jonathan Glickman, Arthur M. Sarkissian
Runtime:  97 min.
US Distribution:  New Line Cinema
Rated PG-13:  action violence, language
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
It's hard to imagine sitting through anything starring Jackie Chan and
not finding at least some kind of guilty enjoyment from the
proceedings.  This has happened recently, as American audiences have
gotten some of his five-year old hits on the big screen.  Some of his
films are mediocre, and some of them are well-made fluff.  Rush Hour is
the first film I've seen of his (and I haven't seen a lot, so don't be
too harsh on me) that actually strikes me as a film with a purpose. 
Sure, it's a buddy-cop movie in the spirit of Lethal Weapon, but it has
all the components for a successful formula:  big laughs and light
action.  It's a hugely appealing film, one that passes swiftly and
leaves you feeling good.
Oh, and I forgot to mention that it also stars Chris Tucker.  Lots of
people hate Tucker; I'm not one of them.  I did find him excessive and
grating in The Fifth Element, but I've found him likable in the numerous
interviews I've witnessed.  And he made me laugh really hard in Rush
Hour.  Here you have a superb combination of comic elements -- Chan,
with his goofy, brilliant physical comedy, and Tucker, with his
obnoxious and perfectly-timed verbal comedy.  Rush Hour works
effortlessly as an elaborate canvas for two skilled comedic artists.
The story, however, is pretty dumb.  I almost let it bother me, but the
film is too skillfully executed to dislike.  I've gotten used to the
idea that most action films are required to have dumb stories, but that
doesn't stop me from wishing otherwise.  Tucker plays James Carter (why
did they pick that name?), a loud-mouthed cop who makes you wonder how
he ever got the job.  A bunch of bad Chinese guys come to the states and
kidnap a young girl named Soo Yung (Julia Hsu), daughter of the Chinese
consul in the United States.  Chan plays Chinese cop Lee, who comes in
from China to help with the case.  
When the FBI assumes control, and Carter is assigned to look after Lee,
the two engage in a culture clash.  It's a well-intentioned culture
clash, with all kinds of nifty themes to keep the audience from getting
too offended.  Naturally, our two heroes have become good friends, and
their main goal is to save Soo Yung.  For some reason, despite their
progress, the FBI doesn't want them helping, and they are forced to work
alone on the case, which ends up a destructive endeavor.  Overall, none
of this is very important.  My irritation with the banality of the story
was fairly intense through half the film, but by the end, I was
successfully diverted.  
When you realize that the story is dumb and deserves no thought, it
becomes clear that Rush Hour is composed of only a few prominent
elements:  the performances of the two leads, and the direction. 
Director Brett Ratner is best described as competent, for though he
doesn't mess anything up and make the film needlessly confusing and
tricky, he adds almost no interest to the story.  It's paced well, which
is a plus, but there's no style in his direction.  It also would have
been nice if he had been a little more consciousness of the silly story,
rather than play it straight.
Nonetheless, Chan and Tucker are the stars, and they carry the mediocre
script with ease.  Chan is very funny when he's speaking English (the
outtakes at the end are really entertaining), and though there aren't a
lot of action sequences (the ones that are present are clearly present
to showcase Chan's talents), he makes the best of all of his dialogue. 
He's just a likable guy to watch, and Rush Hour caters to that quality. 
Tucker, on the other hand, is a surprise:  I expected him to be
irritating, but he's not.  He's funny, his lines are funny, the faces he
makes are funny, and the way he uses his screeching-tires voice is
funny.  
And, because of these two talented men, Rush Hour is funny.  It's a
film that is everything it aspires to be; it doesn't skimp on the story
and direction as much as it simply diminishes the importance of those
elements.  Let's face it:  you're going to see this film to watch two
comedians in action.  And since these comedians are so good at what they
do, there's basically no way you won't like the film.  I certainly liked
the film, and I approached it with a solid sense of uncertainty.  Chan
met my expectations, and Tucker exceeded them -- these two guys are
worth watching in anything.

Title
Review for Opposite of Sex, The (1998)
Director:  Don Roos
Cast:  Christina Ricci, Martin Donovan, Lisa Kudrow, Lyle Lovett, Johnny
Galecki, Ivan Sergei, Colin Ferguson
Screenplay:  Don Roos
Producers:  Michael Besman, David Kirkpatrick
Runtime:  105 min.
US Distribution:  Sony Pictures Entertainment
Rated R:  strong language, sex
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
The Opposite of Sex features a lot of loveless intercourse between
various people of various sexes.  It also features an array of crimes
and acts of violence, including murder, robbery, breaking and entering,
and battery.  I've seen most of this material before in many different
films, but it all feels fresh and original in this particular movie. 
That might be because writer/director Doug Roos has taken such an
intensely cynical angle on his material that even the narrator herself
knows how cliched all of this stuff could be.
Of course, it helps that Christina Ricci is the narrator.  Ricci is a
talented young actress, and there's not a woman out there whose voice
oozes more cynicism than hers.  In fact, she's so sarcastic so much of
the time that I wonder if she's capable of sincerity.  I don't think she
has yet had to play a role that forced her to show a normal set of
emotions, and The Opposite of Sex is no exception:  here, she plays
sixteen year-old DeDee, a girl who goes to destroy the life of her
half-brother just to score a few bucks, and maybe pick up a boyfriend
along the way.
The half-brother, Bill (Martin Donovan), is a gay high school English
teacher;  with him lives his boyfriend, the dumb-but-pretty Matt (Ivan
Sergei).  When DeDee comes to visit, she immediately destroys the
household -- she convinces Matt that he's not gay, and from that point
they regularly engage in sex.  She then informs Matt that she's
pregnant, and convinces him to run off with her and leave Bill.  Then,
Bill goes searching for them, and finds . . . wow, what a complicated
story this is.  I didn't think much about it as I was watching the film,
but Roos has written a series of events that best be described as
unpredictable.  
It's always entertaining to watch these events unfold, and the
entertainment value of the film is helped along nicely by DeDee's
mean-spirited narration.  She plays jokes on us, and points out the
obvious, and makes fun of us just when we're suppose to care about
what's happening.  The film is uproariously funny; perhaps the funniest
sequence is a series of shots in which we see Bill looking very
depressed after he finds that Matt has left him.  DeDee's voice soon
comes in, and then she tells us that it's silly for us to feel the way
we do, and that the scenes we're seeing are nothing but manipulation of
the audience.
I kind of felt that Roos did this just to cover up the fairly routine
story, but I resolved my worries knowing that it really doesn't matter. 
The story is interesting enough, and that he adds this kind of rare
humor and wit to the material is truly refreshing.  He even nears the
boundaries of film in a scene or two -- there's a scene towards the end
that turns out to be a joke, and while I'm not sure that this is within
the Rules of Cinema, I sure enjoyed watching it.  
But wit can only go so far without a little bit of emotional resonance,
and Roos easily manages that by giving us an assortment of interesting
and colorful characters.  Ricci is, as I said, terrific, and, as her
character points out, DeDee kind of grows on us by the end, even if she
is an acidic bitch.  Donovan is superb -- he layers his character with
verbal and physical subtleties, and is ultimately very convincing in the
role.  Sergei is adequate as the profoundly dumb boyfriend, while Johnny
Galecki has fun going over-the-top as Matt's secret boyfriend.  Most
interesting is Lisa Kudrow, who plays Lucia, a stiff friend of Bill's. 
Lucia is adamantly opposed to sex, but that's mostly because she's never
had it.  Kudrow is fascinating here, and paints a colorful portrait of
the most interesting character in the film.
But what is this film about?  Well, I think Roos has some interesting
things to say about the human need for sex.  I'm not going to pretend
that my hypotheses are even close to what he was thinking, but The
Opposite of Sex had me fascinated all through its running time, and then
beyond that.  It's rousing to watch a film that is both hilarious and
provocative at the same time; sadly, a good sense of humor and a good
sense of intelligence rarely go together in today's comedies.  So, my
final words to you are simple:  see The Opposite of Sex if you want a
little substance to back up the laughs.

Title
Review for Dark City (1998)
Director:  Alex Proyas
Cast:  Rufus Sewell, Kiefer Sutherland, Jennifer Connelly, Richard
O'Brien, Ian Richardson, William Hurt
Screenplay:  Alex Proyas, Lem Dobbs, David S. Goyer         
Producers:  Andrew mason, Alex Proyas
Runtime:  104 min.
US Distribution:  New Line Cinema
Rated R:  Violence, nudity, language
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        Dark City is an imaginative, entertaining pre-cult film--intense and
visually absorbing.  It harnesses a lot of new ideas, some of which are
profound, and others absurd, but all are compelling.  I say "pre-cult"
because I imagine that Dark City, like Blade Runner and 2001, will
probably be a cult hit in a few years, and will be remembered in the
long run as great entertainment.  
        Rufus Sewell (whom I've only seen as Fortinbras in Branagh's Hamlet)
plays John Murdoch, a man who mysteriously wakes up in a bathtub and
doesn't remember who he is.  He receives a strange phone call from an
alleged doctor (Kiefer Sutherland) who tells him that he has no memory,
and that there are people after him.  John quickly makes it out of the
hotel and onto the streets of the Dark City in which he lives.  
        His objective now is to find out who he is; he finds out that he has a
wife, Emma (Jennifer Connelly), and that she hasn't seen him in three
weeks.  Not long after this, he finds that he is wanted for the murders
of six women, though the detective in charge of that case (William Hurt)
isn't sure what to believe.  John, with the help of the doctor, is
finally allowed to know about an experiment of an extraterrestrial race
called the Strangers.  The Strangers' purpose is to understand the
effects of memories on human beings.  The Strangers have a power, called
"tuning," that allows them to alter physical reality.  Their interest in
John lies in the fact that he also has this power.
        For the first half of the film, I was impressed with the visual
presentation of Dark City, but completely disengaged from the story and
the characters.  I realized, though, that this is because even John
doesn't know who he is, and for us to sympathize with him, it takes more
time as he uncovers the details of his own past.  Later in the film,
there are scenes between John and Emma that are extremely moving, like a
moment in which he is talking to her through a pane of glass in a police
station.
        In fact, by the end of the film, I was impressed with how well all of
the characters are developed.  Sewell does a great job in the lead, and
with this film he proves that he is a solid leading man.  The beautiful
Connelly is as luminous as ever, and she truly shines in more than one
moment here.  Hurt is extremely dark and brooding (he has a lot of
screen time, but I think he opens his mouth twice); and Sutherland,
although he overacts (Peter Lorre syndrome, I think), he still manages
to be likable in his role.  Good characters is a very good thing in a
film that exists primarily to showcase masterful sets and special
effects:  it makes our enjoyment of the film effortless and smooth.
        Proyas has done a great job with the look of this film.  The city
itself is a deep and complex setting, just as interesting as any of the
human characters in the film.  Proyas, who also directed the visually
powerful The Crow, takes elements from other films such as Batman, Blade
Runner, and his own previous film, and manages to make a new and unusual
setting by extending on these concepts.  Some of the sets here--like the
Strangers' meeting place--are truly breathtaking.  And in the final
scenes we get to see the City from afar, and it is quite a sight.
        I do have issues with the science depicted here, though.  I'd like to
see what studies fuelled Proyas' ideas revolving around the memory, but
for some reason I don't think that our memories come in the form of
liquid.  There's also more than one instance later in the film that
doesn't treat basic concepts of physics with respect.  
        But, when all is considered, this is a fantasy film, and these are
allowed to extend beyond common cinematic boundaries from time to time. 
Dark City is a good, original film that I found very refreshing, given
the level of rehashed garbage that we've already gotten this year. 
Proyas--with his visionary, moving picture-style of direction--should
have a long life in the business.  

Title
Review for Big Daddy (1999)
Director: Dennis Dugan
Cast: Adam Sandler, Cole Sprouse, Dylan Sprouse, Jon Stewart, Leslie
Mann Joey Lauren Adams
Screenplay: Steve Franks, Tim Herlihy, Adam Sandler
Producers: Sidney Ganis, Jack Giarraputo
Runtime: 
US Distribution: Columbia
Rated PG-13: language, crude humor
Copyright 1999 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
        Adam Sandler isn't known for appearing in deep, thought-provoking
films, but he's still a really funny guy.  Most of his movies are
successful not because of the film making behind them, but because they
let Sandler do what he does best without a stupid plot to drown him
out.  Big Daddy is the first film in which the story seems more
important than Sandler's comic performance, and it's a miserable
failure.  Sandler plays a thirty-something loser who gets attached to an
orphaned young boy (played by Cole and Dylan Sprouse).  As one might
expect from the synopsis, director Dennis Dugan resorts to the usual bag
of manipulative and sentimental sequences, including a repulsive 
courtroom battle and a lot of teary scenes in which characters say
"good-bye" to one another; in addition, there's a ridiculous amount of
disgusting toilet humor (urine and vomit both get more screen time than
Sandler himself).  There's a hilarious running joke featuring a female
doctor who previously worked at Hooters, and the film features passable
performances from Sandler, Joey Lauren Adams (as the love interest), and
the two young boys, but the film on the whole is trite and
disappointingly unfunny.

Title
Review for I Still Know What You Did Last Summer (1998)
I Still Know What You Did Last Summer (1998)
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
A film with a title as long and clunky as I Know What You Did Last
Summer poses a problem for film makers:  what should be done in the case
of a sequel?  Well, it wouldn't suffice to shorten it to something like
I Know 2 or Summer 2; so, the makers of this particular sequel came up
with the even-longer I Still Know What You Did Last Summer.  The only
problem with this title is that the "summer" in question was two summers
ago in the context of this film.  A more appropriate title would have
been I'm Still Aware of What you Did Two Summers Ago, or You Know What
You Did Two Summers Ago?  Well, I Still Know.  If they make a third film
in the series, we might have something like Remember Me?  I'm The Guy
Who Knows What You Do in the Summer, and I'm Back for More!
And yet, something tells me that more time was spent naming this film
than actually thinking about it, for I Still Know... is a film so
painfully awful and pointless that it makes me realize just how vapid
the horror-film genre can be.  I've written a lot about violence
pornography lately, but no film illustrates my point better than this
one:  this film is banking on its excessive and exploitative use of
violence and gore.  The picture fails on a fundamental level:  I can
appreciate successful pornography to a degree, but I Still Know... is
not scary.  It's not disturbing.  It's a stupid and hateful chunk of
hackwork without a glimpse of intelligence or worth.  And, to top it all
off, it features every cliche known to the genre:
1.  The heroine survivor of the first film, Julie James (Jennifer Love
Hewitt), is having nightmares about her horrible experience.  In
response to this, she never hesitates to investigate strange noises in
the dark while holding a sharp knife.  The strange noises usually turn
out to be Karla (Brandy), who is too-cool-for-words.
2.  Since the film can't take place in a setting similar to the first
film, the girls conveniently win a vacation to go to the Bahamas.  They
win by incorrectly guessing the capital of Brazil (they say Rio, when,
in fact, it is Brasilia...but this has a point later!).  Even though
Julie really misses her boyfriend Ray (Freddie Prinze, Jr.), the two
girls bring along Tyrell (Mekhi Phifer) and Will (Matthew Settle) for
sexual reasons.
3.  Well, when they arrive at the Bahamas, there are some convenient
discoveries:  it's storm season, and there won't be any boats going to
or from the island.  Also, there are no guests because it's storm
season.  The only people present are a few employees of the hotel. 
Since police officers are useless in horror films anyway, it's no big
deal that the hotel has no security guard or anything like that.
4.  People start dying.  The Bad Dude in a Slicker with a Hook goes
around sticking his weapon in people's mouths and hands, and plunges
giant sharp objects into people who pose no threat whatsoever.  Later
on, the killer's identity is discovered and everyone who had more than
three lines survives.  But this isn't before a profoundly dumb series of
plot devices is employed to land our heroes in a final confrontation in
a tropical rainforest.
>From a screenwriting standpoint, I have trouble believing that someone
over the age of ten composed this script.  To call it amateurish is
pretty kind; I'm more inclined to believe that a middle-school
horror-flick freak wrote it as a joke for his friends.  I mean, come on,
I've seen horror films that aren't entirely original, but I Still
Know... is pathetic.  The Bad Dude in a Slicker with a Hook, like Freddy
and Jason and Michael Myers, is really good at killing people violently,
never being seen, and instantly cleaning up his mess so the person who
saw the dead body looks crazy to all her friends.  In addition, he has
immense strength, and can lift hundreds of pounds with one arm.
The acting is very bad.  I love to look at Jennifer Love Hewitt, but
she just isn't any good in this movie.  She's at her best when she's
being nice, but the rage part of this (shouting "Come and get me!  I'm
right here!" in the rain) doesn't quite work.  Brandy is spunky and all
that, but really just annoying.  Settle and Prinze, Jr. do what they can
with non-characters, but Phifer is the absolute worst, mixing dreadful
overacting with his dreadful dialogue.  There aren't any characters
anyway, so caring about any of these people is not an option.  
But let's talk about the violence.  The movie was incompetently
directed by Danny Cannon; even a lousy script can be turned into
something slightly interesting and suspenseful by a good director, but
Cannon seems to think that huge bursts of music are scary.  He seems to
believe that people walking down dark hallways is frightening.  He
obviously thinks that teenagers want to see buckets of blood, because
that's the only thing you can count on getting out of I Still Know... 
But, unfortunately, Cannon just wants to exploit the violence.  We don't
care about characters who are introduced and killed in the same scene --
it's nothing but gratuitous crap.  The scariest movies I've seen leave
everything up to the imagination:  Seven and The Shining qualify as
truly frightening films, because they have a level of humanity that the
typical teen-slasher ignores completely.
It upsets me to know that teenagers live and die for this kind of
thing, and that Hollywood is happy to provide it for them.  I Still
Know...  is as bad as they come -- it makes me realize the good things
about a moderately stylistic film like Urban Legend, and the interesting
character aspects of H20.  While watching people get stabbed and diced
to bits for no other reason than to please popcorn munchers, I got a
sick feeling in my stomach.  No thought was put in to this movie -- it
exploits mindless violence for the purpose of making money.  
This is not a moral issue; I can live with a film that just wants to
entertain, as long as it at least tries to be art in even the vaguest
way.  I Still Know..., like too many movies, has been made for the sole
purpose of making money.  It's rare that a film so bad is also so
inherently offensive.  Violence can be art, but not like this.  Violence
can even be funny if its done in the right way.  I'm not saying that I
expected this film to be smart or satirical, but I at least expected it
to do its job.  It makes me wish that a thoughtful script were more
important than a lot of dead bodies.  The fact that it's not worries me.

Title
Review for Shakespeare in Love (1998)
Director: John Madden
Cast: Joseph Fiennes, Gwyneth Paltrow, Geoffrey Rush, Ben Affleck,
Colin Firth, Judi Dench, Simon Callow
Screenplay: Marc Norman, Tom Stoppard
Producers: Donna Gigliotti, Marc Norman, David Parfitt, Harvey
Weinstein, Edward Zwick
Runtime: 122 min.
US Distribution: Universal
Rated R: sex, nudity, brief profanity
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Playwright Tom Stoppard and screenwriter Marc Norman took on an
astonishingly difficult task:  they wanted to write a script about
William Shakespeare that parallels Shakespeare's works.  They also
wanted to poke fun at the way all of us envision Shakespeare:  I mean,
really, who doesn't think of Shakespeare as a guy seething with so much
passion that he can barely write a play without exploding into a
passionate, introspective verbal couplet of iambic pentameter?  Stoppard
and Norman are men who love Shakespeare, and they wanted to make a movie
for everyone else who loves Shakespeare.
And, despite the difficulty of their task, they have succeeded. 
Shakespeare in Love is one of the smartest, funniest, most touching
films of the year.   It's so rare that a picture with such high
aspirations succeeds in all of its endeavors, but here we have a movie
that defines success:  it is at once charmingly acted and flawlessly
written.  It could have been a smug, self-important movie that panders
to die-hard Shakespeare fans, but the appeal of this film is almost
universal:  if you've ever read a play by Shakespeare, or know anything
about his life, it's likely that you'll find grand entertainment in
Shakespeare in Love.
Joseph Fiennes, brother of Ralph, stars as Shakespeare himself; he's a
delightful, irresistible lad, concerned mostly with women and detached
from life's more serious problems (debt, plague, etc.).  He's
commissioned to write plays for various people:  Queen Elizabeth (Judi
Dench) wants comedies, while local slimeball Philip Henslowe (Geoffrey
Rush) needs him to write a play so that he can pay off his debts to Hugh
Fennymann (Tom Wilkinson).  Shakespeare, however, has trouble focusing
on his work.  He begins work on a comedy about a boy named Romeo and a
girl named Ethel.
This all changes, however, when he meets Viola De Lesseps (a radiant
Gwyneth Paltrow), a young heiress set to marry the financially-oriented
Lord Wessex (Colin Firth).  Shakespeare instantly falls in love with
her; he first meets her when she pretends to be a man to try out for the
part of Romeo.  He discovers her identity and confronts her later; she,
of course, falls in love with him, although their love is doomed because
she absolutely must marry the tyrannical Lord Wessex.  But she continues
to act because she loves Shakespeare's writing so much, and soon the
production (which later becomes Romeo and Juliet) is set to be
performed.
Shakespeare in Love is an amazingly good film, not because it works as
great entertainment, but because it pays attention to detail and knows
its subject matter.  I was instantly won over by Joseph Fiennes in the
lead role:  he has such searing optimism and energy; he's clearly a man
who admires Shakespeare, and even in the shortcomings that he gives his
character (inability to turn away from women, attention deficit
disorder), we sense a great deal of affection and care.  He practically
overflows with passion in every scene.  Fiennes is matched by Paltrow
(whose English accent is so good that wonder where she actually comes
from); she is an actress who exudes strength and conviction in every
performance I've seen her in.  The two performers work perfectly
together, taking the passionate scenes as far as possible without making
them melodramatic, and wringing the comedic scenes for every conceivable
laugh.
Of course, it doesn't hurt that they have a masterful script to work
with.  Stoppard, whose play Rozencrantz and Guildenstern are Dead
inspired an interesting film, is full of dry wit and boundless
understated humor (all of his plays have similarly dry humor).  The
first intelligent step Stoppard and Norman took was harmonizing the
events of the film with Romeo and Juliet.  One of the funniest scenes in
the film is an imitation of the famous terrace scene from the play; in
the movie, Shakespeare is bumbling about while Viola is trying to fend
off her nurse maid.  Director John Madden does a fantastic job dabbling
in slapstick humor -- scenes like these would have seemed obtuse in the
hands of a lesser director.
I'm going to have to see the movie again; I'm certain there are
numerous references that I missed.  In fact, I doubt it's possible to
gather everything with just one viewing.  Stoppard is a master of
detail:  you'll notice familiar lines placed throughout the film, not as
lines of a play, but as dialogue, suggesting that Shakespeare simply
spoke like that all the time.  There's also a brilliant running joke in
which Shakespeare is in constant competition with Christopher Marlowe
(and the fact that Marlowe is played by the openly-homosexual Rupert
Everett is a joke in of itself), proposing a slightly twisted
explanation to Marlowe's mysterious death in a pub.  There's also a
scene featuring a wide-eyed dog that is so funny that I hurt myself
laughing.  "There's no dog in this play?"  "No!  No dog!"
The ensemble cast is perhaps the strongest this year.  Geoffrey Rush is
nearly unrecognizable as the detestable Henslowe; Wilkinson is also hard
to recognize, but has a great role as a thug who takes his part as the
apothecary so seriously.  Ben Affleck, playing one of the actors in the
company, shows great range, both in his accent (his is almost as good as
Paltrow's) and in humor (he has some of the best one-liners in the
movie).  Colin Firth, always stuck playing the sap, does a good job
being hateful.  Judi Dench, however, has the best supporting performance
as Queen Elizabeth:  rarely has so much depth been conveyed in so few
words.  
My single, minor complaint about Shakespeare in Love is that I feel
like I could have been more moved by the end.  The story is moving, but
there are a few missed opportunities in the final scenes.  But my
quibbling is not important.  What is important is that I acknowledge the
quality of this picture, the sheer skill with which it has been written,
acted, and produced.  Shakespeare in Love tries so many things, and
nails every one of them:  it's a film that both loves Shakespeare and
makes fun of him, a film in which the actors, writers, and director are
all perfectly in sync.  It's also a movie that has the potential to
introduce a lot of people to Shakespeare's work in a positive way,
without seeming condescending or superior.  I admire this film not only
because it passes so pleasantly, but because it has lofty aspirations
and succeeds in them.  Not just any film can poke fun at Shakespeare and
get away with it.

Title
Review for Pecker (1998)
Director:  John Waters
Cast:  Edward Furlong, Christina Ricci, Mary Kay Place, Brendan Sexton,
Martha Plimpton, Lili Taylor
Screenplay:  John Waters
Producers:  John Fiedler, Mark Tarlov
Runtime:  87 min.
US Distribution:  Fine Line Features
Rated R:  sexuality, graphic nudity, language, drug use
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
John Waters' new film, Pecker, tells the story of its title character,
a teenage boy (Edward Furlong) who likes to take pictures of everything
he sees.  The film closely follows a few months of his life, during
which we are introduced to the various people he knows.  There's his
girlfriend, Shelley (Christina Ricci), a harsh and cynical girl who runs
the local laundromat; she's very decided on her laundromat policies. 
Then there's his insane and intensely happy family, soccer-mom (Mary Kay
Place) and bartending dad (Mark Joy), and his maniacal sugar-freak
sister, Little Chrissy (Lauren Hulsey).  Included in, but not residing
with, the family is Tina (Martha Plimpton), who DJs in the local gay
bar.
All of this is a rather colorful backdrop to a strangely perfunctory
subplot involving art dealer Rorey Wheeler (Lili Taylor) who sees
Pecker's work at his first show (which he holds in a burger joint).  She
thinks he's "brilliant" and "a genius" (those art dealers are always so
quick to label), and soon the entire art world agrees with her.  He has
his opening in New York, and his photos immediately sell for huge
amounts of money.  With his popularity, however, Pecker soon becomes
disliked in his hometown of Baltimore as the residents are hounded by
reporters wanting insights into Pecker's life.  
Waters, over the last few decades, has made some interesting pictures,
almost none of which I've seen.  The only one I have seen is Serial Mom,
which I enjoyed immensely.  Pecker is also enjoyable, and often
hilarious, but, by the end, I wondered what it was all about:  the film
really has no center.  Its themes are pretty limp; we've had more than
one criticism of the art world this year (Henry Fool and High Art come
to mind), so Pecker seems weak by comparison.  As entertainment, it more
or less works, but I can't help thinking that the film could have been
better.  
I like Furlong as an actor, but I haven't seen him do much of anything
interesting since Terminator 2.  He's not unlikable here, but he
displays very little of the energy that he did in his first
performance.  I think he can act, and he does have presence, but he
doesn't show much of that in Pecker.  Ricci, on the other hand, has
certainly proven herself (even if you only count 1998 films); she's also
strangely sedate here, though she has a few shining moments (the scenes
involving her attacking her customers are very funny).  Most of the
other performances are highly energetic:  Place and Joy create
wonderfully cloying parents; Plimpton is likable as a
homosexually-obsessed woman; Taylor is perfectly pitched for satire; and
young Hulsey is dead-on as the ADD child.
But I'm not sure what brings it all together.  Waters is telling a
story, but the story is one we've heard before:  small-town kid makes it
big and decides he doesn't like it.  What makes Pecker unique is its
unbelievable sense of giddy madness.  This film is ridiculously happy
and upbeat; Pecker's home life, for instance, is everything a kid could
hope for (actually, the family values displayed in the film are
surprisingly strong).  But how does this compare to the dirty scenes
featuring lesbian strippers (one of the film's funnier moments)?  The
last line of the film, which has Pecker shouting, "I think I'm gonna
direct movies!" makes me wonder if Waters was attempting some kind of
rough autobiography.  In all honesty, I don't know what the film is
about, and I left it feeling rather indifferent.
I did, however, enjoy myself as I watched it.  I laughed frequently,
the high points including the lesbian dance sequence (truly hilarious)
and a great scene outside a male strip bar where heterosexual patrons
are dying to get "tea bagged."  Pecker has its moments -- and there are
many -- but I wish Waters had been a little more straightforward with
what he was trying to accomplish.  It's a film that will make you laugh
and leave you feeling unmoved, unless, of course, you've never ever seen
a film about a small town kid making it big.  Even so, it doesn't add
much dimension to the premise.  

Title
Review for X Files, The (1998)
Director:  Rob Bowman
Cast:  David Duchovny, Gillian Anderson, Martin Landau, Blythe Danner,
Armin Mueller-Stahl, John Neville, Glenne Headly
Screenplay:  Chris Carter, Frank Spotnitz
Producers:  Chris Carter, Daniel Sackheim
Runtime:  120 min.
US Distribution:  20th Century Fox
Rated PG-13:  some intense violence, gore
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        I find most of television so intensely boring that I simply never turn
on my set, unless I'm watching a movie.  I don't even have cable, so I
went to Radio Shack to buy an antenna specifically for the purpose of
watching "The X-Files" every Sunday night.  It's the only show that's
worth an hour of my time each week (though, since I don't watch reruns,
I'm glad that I have six months of the year to avoid television
altogether).  I am an avid fan of the show, and have been for about
three years now.  And I love Gillian Anderson.
        The X-Files is the film that continues the story where the season
finale left off.  The film is like a two-hour episode, except that there
are a lot more special effects, the plot is thicker, and the resolution
is more satisfying.  This is a terrific film, both for fans of the
series and for those who have never seen it (I imagine that viewers
unfamiliar with the show will find the film to be solid and riveting
entertainment).  I expected to like it more than any episode I've seen,
and my expectations were met.  Actually, the film takes a few risks in
its story and plot devices, but, thankfully, the makers managed to do it
right.
        When the finale ended, the FBI branch known as the X-Files had been
destroyed, and our heroes, Mulder (David Duchovny) and Scully (Gillian
Anderson) were left stripped of five years of hard work.  The film picks
up soon after; and Mulder and Scully have been reduced to field agents
investigating a bomb threat in a Federal building.  But wait, I'm
getting ahead of myself.  The film actually opens in the ice age, about
32,000 years prior, during which a couple of prehistoric guys get
attacked by a vicious alien.  
        The alien's blood infects them (fans of the show will certainly
remember the Black Cancer), and the story jumps into modern times,
during which a young boy is also infected with the cancer.  It turns out
that the bomb was planted to kill the boy, and Mulder and Scully uncover
the cover-up despite the fact that Scully has resigned from her position
in the FBI.  Soon, they find out that the whole thing has to do with
aliens.  As I've written before, it's not easy to write plot summaries
for films like this, because everything needs to be a surprise.
        Fans of the show will know what to expect, and I seriously doubt any of
them being disappointed with the film.  Director Rob Bowman has done a
great job expanding the eerie feeling of the show to the big screen,
making small adjustments and minor changes to utilize the possibilities
that film allows over television.  There are some truly suspenseful and
well-created scenes here (late in the film, when they're in the alien
spacecraft, you'll see one of the better action sequences in recent
cinema).  The special effects are very good, and the production design
by Christopher Nowak is fantastic.
        What I find interesting is that The X-Files is actually a great way for
series neophytes to get into the story.  Our heroes are given subtle
introductions (we're not expected to know them on the outset), and the
film explains enough of the story that prior knowledge of the series
isn't required to understand the film.  There are, of course, little
elements that the makers have included as payoff to the fans, but I'll
keep those as surprises.  It takes a lot of thought and understanding of
the series to create a film using roots as complicated as the ones that
the series provides, and then create a coherent film that anyone can
understand clearly.
        The series is strong for a lot of reasons.  It's original (though it
has many ties to "The Twilight Zone" and owes some homage to Hitchcock),
and impressively eerie for a television show.  What really makes the
series shine, however, are the actors.  Duchovny has so much presence,
and is just a fun guy to watch.  He has that confidence that will
someday make him into a bankable leading man.  Anderson is equally good,
and paralyzingly beautiful; she's also a strong actress.  Both
performers have acted in little more than their series, however, though
I think they'll both get their chances to prove themselves very soon.
        I enthusiastically recommend The X-Files, both for fans and non-fans. 
1998 is a summer filled with disappointing blockbusters, and this film
should satisfy where most of the others leave you completely dry.  It's
an intelligent film, and takes you places that you might not have been
(or, at least, might not have seen so many times that they feel
familiar).  The X-Files is impressive in concept, as well:  fans of the
series are likely to be highly critical, and to take the premise beyond
the series is a risky move.  It's nice to see a risk pay off for a
change.  Actually, it's nice to see a risk at all.

Title
Review for High Art (1998)
Director:  Lisa Cholodenko
Cast:  Ally Sheedy, Radha Mitchell, Patricia Clarkson, Tammy Grimes,
Gabriel Mann, William Sage
Screenplay:  Lisa Cholodenko
Producers:  Dolly Hall, Jeffrey Levy-Hinte, Susan A. Stover
Runtime:  101 min.
US Distribution:  October Films
Rated R:  strong sexuality, drug use, language
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
High Art is a story about women, told by a woman.  It's not loud and
sentimental, but quiet, subtle, and intelligent.  There aren't a lot of
films like this, so this one naturally feels different from most stories
about women.  Our protagonist is Syd (Radha Mitchell), an assistant
editor for a photography magazine called Frame.  She's a young woman who
is deeply interested in her own job -- we can see the intensity in her
eyes as she gazes upon photographs that she loves and admires.  She
lives with her boyfriend, James (Gabriel Mann), and upstairs lives Lucy
Berliner (Ally Sheedy).  
Lucy is a retired photographer, and Syd is instantly entranced by her
work.  Just as she's learning of Lucy's artistic abilities, she also
learns of her personal habits.  Lucy is a drug addict, but, more
importantly, she's a lover of women -- her girlfriend is a crazy
low-voiced German named Greta (Patricia Clarkson).  Syd convinces Lucy
to come out of retirement, Lucy grasps on to Syd's ambition to give
herself energy, and the two women head towards a relationship that could
only be successful in a perfect world.
A friend of mine, who occasionally sees the art house films with me,
made a valid point the other day:  it seems like every art house film
has something to do with homosexuality.  I wouldn't say *every* art
house film does, but the issue is more completely explored in
independent films than it is in mainstream pictures.  High Art does
explore the issue, but it explores it from the rare perspective of a
neophyte woman, who has only been with men in her life.  Perhaps that's
what I find so interesting about this film -- most movies about lesbians
glorify and romanticize the sex, as if to appeal strictly to straight
men, but the love scenes in High Art aren't the slightest bit arousing. 
They are as disturbing for the viewer as they are for the characters who
don't quite know what they're doing.
Writer/director Lisa Cholodenko is a skilled storyteller.  I love her
direction in this film -- it's soft, and so slow that it almost feels
motionless.  Cholodenko observes the beauty of the female figure, but
she doesn't exploit it.  There are moments in this film during which Syd
does not look glamorous or stunning -- in fact, most people would say
she looks like a wreck -- but there's something in Cholodenko's vision
and in the pictures that Lucy takes of Syd that capture everything
subtle about Syd's figure.  Mitchell is a beautiful actress, and manages
to convey beauty without ever looking fake or flashy.  At the same time,
Lucy, despite her bony figure and dim eyes, comes across as oddly
desirable.
The film isn't elusive, but it doesn't come right out and tell us what
it's about.  It works on many levels -- in some scenes, it's a rather
acidic attack of the vicious photography industry.  More often, it seems
present primarily to diagram the unique relationship between Syd and
Lucy -- the mentor/student dynamic that arises through admiration and
progresses through desire.  The development of the characters in this
sense is well-orchestrated by Cholodenko:  it's believable that Syd
could fall for a woman like Lucy; at the same time, it's interesting
that Lucy, in her detached and foggy existence, finds someone that she
truly cares about.  High Art isn't a pleasant film, but this
relationship feels oddly pure.  
Cholodenko does owe a lot to her performers.  Mitchell, an actress with
whom I'm not familiar, is very good here.  Many of the subtle character
details I mentioned above are noticeable because of her talent as a
performer.  The first love scene between the two women truly showcases
her work, and illustrates perfectly the way her mental desires do not
coincide with her physical needs.  Sheedy, on the other hand, has never
been so honest and down-to-earth as she is here.  Neither actress has
any scenes that could be used as clips for Oscar nominations, but that's
the point -- this is a film that relies entirely on subtlety.
The very last sequence is the best in the film, and it brings the story
together with all of its themes.  It's not painless, but it's
emotionally satisfying in a way few movies are.  My only complaint with
High Art is that it's almost too subtle for its own good -- I could see
many people walking away from the film not knowing what to make of it. 
In fact, most of what I think the film is about is pure speculation.  I
do like to speculate, but I'm not sure that Cholodenko has given us
enough guidance as to what to make of her picture.  But this aside,
there is something special about a film that can take a subject with so
much baggage and still do new and interesting things with the premise. 
Because of this, I can assure you that High Art lives up to its title.

Title
Review for Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels (1998)
Lock, Stock, and Two Smoking Barrels (1998)
A Capsule Review by Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director: Guy Ritchie
Cast: Jason Flemyng, Dexter Fletcher, Nick Moran, Jason Statham, Steven
Mackintosh, Vinnie Jones, Sting, Lenny McLean, P.H. Moriarty
Screenplay: Guy Ritchie
Producers: Matthew Vaughn
Runtime: 105 min.
US Distribution: Gramercy Pictures
Rated R: strong violence, language, sex, drug use
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Guy Ritchie's relentlessly funny and violent picture is one of the most
artistically original movies I've seen in months. The ingenious plot,
which centers around four friends who get mixed up in a series of
crimes, is flawlessly designed and brought together in the conclusion,
and Ritchie never misses the chance for a terrific shot. The movie does
fail to create real people, and there isn't a shred of humanity to be
found anywhere in the picture, but Lock, Stock, and Two Smoking Barrels
is still great fun.

Title
Review for Mask of Zorro, The (1998)
Director:  Martin Campbell
Cast:  Antonio Banderas, Anthony Hopkins, Catherine Zeta Jones, Stuart
Wilson, Matt Letscher
Screenplay:  Terry Rossio, Ted Elliott, John Eskow
Producers:  Doug Claybourne, David Foster
Runtime:  135 min.
US Distribution:  Sony Pictures/Tristar
Rated PG-13:  intense action and violence
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        The Mask of Zorro is a decent action picture, with an adequate script
and good acting.  The story is straightforward and cohesive, and the
characters are reasonably well-defined.  It's also a film that, aside
from the obvious effort that the performers have put into it, could have
been made by a machine on an action film assembly line.  Sometimes it's
thrilling, sometimes it's not, but it's always the same old action film
stuff -- simple entertainment and instantly forgettable.  Mix in some
irritating cliches common in Hollywood period pieces, and we have
another big, loud blockbuster that you'll stop thinking about thirty
seconds after the credits roll.
        Is that what you want?  I mean, is that what people in general want?  I
suppose that's possible; Armageddon, by comparison, is a film that
aspires to be about as much as this one does, but I found the asteroid
flick a lot more exciting and much more satisfying in the end.  Maybe
it's because this subject matter is so common (the film feels almost
exactly the same as The Man in the Iron Mask, and has many of the same
problems).  Maybe it's because I've already seen entire cities explode
this summer, and so seeing a mine blow up just isn't all that
thrilling.  Maybe it's because, once again, I've walked away from a
movie getting exactly what I expected to get.  Here's an official dare
to all mainstream directors -- try surprising me for a change!  
        I have no particular affinity towards the legends of the legendary
Zorro, but the story here seems like a nice one to continue the tale. 
It begins with Zorro himself as a middle-aged man, played by Anthony
Hopkins.  His real name is Don Diego, and his nemesis is Don Rafael
Montero (Stuart Wilson).  Montero loves Diego's wife, but, in a fatal
engagement, his guards kill her.  Montero has Diego imprisoned, and
takes Diego's young daughter to raise her himself.
        Twenty years pass, and focus is shifted to a young bandit, Alejandro
(Antonio Banderas) and his brother.  When his brother is killed by a
wicked general (Matt Letscher), Alejandro vows to take revenge.  That's
when he meets Diego, who has just escaped from prison.  It turns out
that the two knew each other when Alejandro was a child, and so Diego
decides to teach the young man how to fight.  The two men then help one
another to put their demons to rest, but not without the aide of a long
series of semi-interesting action sequences.
        The Mask of Zorro is not a dull picture.  Director Martin Campbell
(Goldeneye) seems to have a knack for observing characters who swiftly
overcome twenty-to-one odds and then smirk at their adversaries.  Some
of the sequences here are very well-staged -- I liked the scene that has
Zorro on the backs of multiple horses, as he overtakes a group of guards
from behind.  The final sequence is also well-done, and features a lot
of people falling from high places.  On a technical level, there's a lot
to admire here, such as the authentic sword battles and the impressive
sets.
        But very little of it had me gaping with amazement or shaking with
excitement.  The music and cinematography are both very routine, and
films like this are where film makers should go over-the-top with style
(as Michael Bay did in Armageddon).  Yes, it's fast-paced, and there are
enough explosions to hold the focus of even the most hopeless victims of
ADD.   I found the film pleasing to look at, but the only moments that
will be etched in my mind are the ones I saw twenty times in the
previews.  In addition, the script is not very witty, and lacks a
substantial amount of humor; the few laughs present are supplied by the
performers.
        Ironically, what I liked most about the picture is the acting and the
characters.  While the characters aren't strong, they are at least
consistent, and the exceptional cast is impressive.  Banderas is always
charming, and he's charming here, and wrings what humor he can out of
the script.  Hopkins forces us to care about his character; there's one
extremely touching scene that almost changed my entire view of the
film.  This scene also includes Catherine Zeta-Jones, who plays the
young lady to whom Montero has been lying for twenty years -- she is the
true daughter of Zorro.  Zeta-Jones is luminous and spunky in the role,
and holds up well against the pros.  Wilson is terrific, giving the
villain a little bit of depth, while Letscher has fun giving his villain
no positive attributes whatsoever.
        As a period piece, the film feels sloppy.  While Hopkins and Wilson are
both good, neither of them manage a Spanish accent, and therefore the
film never sounds authentic (even Banderas seems to be covering up his
natural inflection).  The dialogue is adequate, and while it never reeks
of anachronisms, there isn't a single line of memorable dialogue in the
film.  When all is considered, The Mask of Zorro is just another summer
blockbuster -- technically adequate but utterly methodical.  It's nice
to see a loud movie that isn't stupid, but this film just doesn't have
much of a personality.  

Title
Review for Cruel Intentions (1999)
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
        When I first saw the preview for Cruel Intentions, I turned to my
friend and said, "Dangerous Liaisons for Kids!"  It was clear to me that
the film would be an obvious chunk of plagiarized nonsense, owing
everything it is to Stephen Frears' 1988 masterpiece.  Imagine my
surprise to see that writer/director Roger Kumble has given credit to
his source material:  Choderlos de Laclos is recognized for his novel
Les Liaisons Dangereuses in the opening credits.  And I was impressed.
        In fact, I was much more impressed with this recognition than with the
actual film, which is an appalling excuse for a movie.  It's kiddie-porn
hackwork, complete with earthy sex-talk and fully-clothed hand-jobs.  I
suppose this kind of movie was inevitable; with all the teen high-school
angst movies coming out, there was certainly room for a pretentious and
laughable movie about a bunch of teenagers who think they're smarter and
more beautiful than all the other people on earth combined.  Cruel
Intentions is a mess in every possible way, and it fails primarily in
the way I expected it to:  I hated all the characters, and I hate
everything they do.  
        I also hate Ryan Phillippe, so perhaps my opinion is not as objective
as it could be.  Phillippe plays (check out this name) Sebastian
Valmont.  Wow.  Isn't that a memorable name?  I could just say it over
and over again.  Sebastian Valmont.  It kind of rolls off the tongue, in
the spirit of phrases like Sanguine Vapors and Velvet Sandwich. 
Sebastian Valmont is the coolest guy who ever walked the earth; there is
no woman he can't have, no material object out of his reach.  He has all
the money, all the sex -- all at his fingertips.  And, luckily, his
parents never enter into his life -- no, in the world of Cruel
Intentions, adults don't really exist.  The ones who do are irritating.
        Sebastian Valmont lives with his stepsister, Kathryn Merteuil (Sarah
Michelle Gellar), the bitch-queen of the universe, and also the woman
every man wants.  Since these two rich kids are so bored, they only
thing they can do is challenge each other with meaningless sexual
liaisons.  Kathryn wants Sebastian Valmont to de-virginize Cecile
Caldwell (Selma Blair), a naive dork-chick who has somehow wronged
Kathryn.  But it's too easy for Sebastian Valmont -- he wants to nail
Annette Hargrove (Reese Witherspoon), the "paradigm of chastity and
beauty."  So, Sebastian Valmont and Kathryn make a deal (which is too
explicit to state here).  But -- dear God! -- Sebastian Valmont actually
begins to fall for poor Annette Hargrove.  
        Dangerous Liaisons is a great movie because the characters are all
believable, and because of its masterful acting.  Cruel Intentions is
bad for many reasons, but it lacks both believable characters and
masterful acting.  Kathryn Merteuil is simply a hateful witch, a girl so
loathsome that I would probably enjoy pouring hot lead on her.  She is
supposed to be mean, but Glenn Close gave the character some depth in
Dangerous Liaisons.  Gellar, while aesthetically pleasing, is
one-dimensional and utterly repulsive.  Witherspoon has a truly
beautiful face, but her character isn't the moral staple she's supposed
to be:  sure, she won't have sex until she's in love (is this really a
*moral* issue?), but she does some things in the last few scenes that
are more than a little reprehensible.
        But I can't forget Mr. Phillippe, who continues to exceed my
expectations with his impenetrable, invulnerable blandness.  I have to
give him credit and say that he did, in fact, manage to change his
facial expression about three times during the course of Cruel
Intentions.  And there's one point in the film in which he shouts,
thereby defeating my hypothesis that he is vocally monotone.  True, he
is bad, but it doesn't help that he has no character to work with. 
Kumble has drained all the interesting aspects from this character,
leaving us with a sex-crazed lunatic who is supposed to be sympathetic
because he falls in love with a moral flower and shuns the wicked bitch. 
        The film fails in every other way, too.  First of all, nobody talks
like this.  Even the "intellectuals" I know don't bother with this kind
of pointless and pretentious yammering.  For a while, the movie looks
like it might play itself for laughs, but it ends up taking itself so
seriously that there's no way we can join it.  Cruel Intentions also
manages to come off as soft-porn in more than one scene.  Earlier I
mentioned a fully-clothed hand-job; this occurs between Kathryn and
Sebastian Valmont, both of whom are intended to be hateful at this point
in the movie.  So, if we hate them, then what's the point of an extended
sex scene?  Titillation, of course.  It can't even work under the
pretense of "meaningful love scene," because we hate the characters.
        It's interesting to note some of the parallels between Cruel Intentions
and Dangerous Liaisons.  Kumble is clearly familiar with the earlier
film; many of the scenes have a similar tone, and there are moments in
Frears' film that Kumble imitates almost completely (such as the last
scene, in which [spoiler warning!] the antagonist is humiliated in front
of her peers).  But kids don't act like this.  Nobody acts like this. 
In his translation, Roger Kumble forgot character development and
sympathy -- some pretty crucial elements.  The result is a picture of
confounding badness, a kiddie-porn mess that thinks it's really deep and
profound.  I'll give Cruel Intentions credit for realizing its
influences, but that doesn't change the fact that it's awful.  

Title
Review for Apt Pupil (1998)
Director: Bryan Singer
Cast: Ian McKellen, Brad Renfro, Bruce Davison, Elias Koteas, Joe
Morton, Jan Triska
Screenplay: Brandon Boyce
Producers: Jane Hamsher, Don Murphy, Bryan Singer
Runtime: 111 min.
US Distribution: TriStar
Rated R: strong violence, language, brief sexuality
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
A story about people should have sympathetic characters.  Bryan
Singer's Apt Pupil, which is based on a novella by Stephen King, is a
story that centers around a strikingly unpleasant teenager and a Nazi
general in hiding.  These characters are well-drawn and created with
charisma by the actors, but they're not nice people.  In fact, they're
both monsters in their own ways, and I think that this is the point of
the film.  But, by the end of the picture, I was left with a bad taste
in my mouth:   here is a story about a smart kid who acquires first-hand
information about the Holocaust, and becomes a beast of a human being as
a result.  
What happened to the old-fashioned lessons, like "learn from your
mistakes?"   Or, perhaps, "learn from the mistakes of others?"  Apt
Pupil, though a riveting cinematic experience, is a deeply cynical look
at human nature.  I really can't say why without giving away the end,
but I can say this:  the only thing the characters learn from their
mistakes are ways to escape consequences in the future.   I wonder if
this was Singer's purpose; his last film, The Usual Suspects, was also
about bad people, but most of them had likable traits.  The only people
who win our sympathy in Apt Pupil end up emotionally scorned or brutally
murdered.   
The teenager's name is Todd Boden, and is played by Brad Renfro.  Todd
is a straight-A student; the film opens just as he becomes obsessed with
Nazi Germany after his history class covers the subject for a week.  One
day, while riding the bus, he notices an old man get on and sit behind
him; Todd recognizes him as a Nazi general that he had seen in text
books.  One month passes, and Todd finally knocks on the old man's
door.  His name, apparently, is Kurt Dussander (Ian McKellen), and Todd
has a proposal for him.
He wants to know all about the Holocaust, about "the things they won't
tell us in school."  Why should Dussander tell him anything?  Well, Todd
has assembled pictures and fingerprints, and is giving him no choice: 
if he doesn't tell his stories, Todd will go to the police with his
evidence.  So Dussander agrees, and he tells Todd his stories.  Every
day, after school, Todd goes to Dussander's house, absorbing more and
more of the truly awful stories that Dussander has to offer.  Todd
begins to falter in school, and soon the tides turn -- Dussander takes
control of the situation.
It's an original premise, and a gripping film.  Singer is a sharp
director; his techniques are subtle -- scenes build tension without the
use of intrusive music or intricate camerawork.  But holocaust material
isn't exactly audience-friendly; there are scenes here that seem to lack
taste and judgement.  There's a scene in which Todd is showering and
imagining himself among Jews in a concentration camp; the men around him
are sickly and thin, and while it's an effective image, it seems present
more to manipulate than to inform.  Singer doesn't approach the subject
with care; in fact, the Holocaust really isn't under examination here. 
What's interesting is the dynamic between Todd and Dussander.
It's just too bad that both characters are so hateful.  Dussander is
supposed to an enigma, and, for a while, he is:  at first, it seems that
he believed that the experiments he was "forced" to perform were simply
things that "needed to be done."  Later, though, it's clear that he's
lying:  he enjoyed torturing the Jews.  This is never spoken outright,
but McKellen's performance -- which is one of the best this year -- is
so darkly clever that it's impossible to miss Dussander's true feelings
in the matter.  He is a Jew hater, and he always will be.
But Todd, played ambitiously by Renfro, is not a hero.  He forces
Dussander to tell his stories, blackmailing him with incriminating
information.  It's too soon to feel hatred for Dussander at this point,
so Todd seems more malicious than founded in his demands.  Later, Todd
comes across as downright sadistic -- one of the film's most perplexing
and most disturbing scenes has Todd forcing Dussander to put on a Nazi
costume and march by his command.  Singer films this segment with
perfect harshness, but, by the end of it, Todd seems more psychotic than
Dussander.
That's a crucial flaw when you're dealing with a story as intense as
this.  Only two characters win our affections by the end:  the school
guidance counselor (effectively portrayed by David Schwimmer), and a
homeless man (Elias Koteas) willing to sell his body for a shower and a
place to sleep.  Without a place to send our emotions, Apt Pupil strikes
as deeply unpleasant experience:  a disturbing, completely engrossing
film that makes you feel bad and doesn't manage to convey any solid
message.   It's a disappointment, really, given the talent involved.  I
don't recommend that you avoid the film -- no, it's too powerful to
dismiss.  Just be warned that Apt Pupil is meticulously unpleasant in
almost every way, and I'm not sure why it needed to be.  

Title
Review for Negotiator, The (1998)
Director:  F. Gary Gray
Cast:  Samuel L. Jackson, Kevin Spacey, John Spencer, David Morse, Ron
Rifkin, J.T. Walsh, Regina Taylor, Joey Perillo, Siobahn Fallon
Screenplay:  James DeMonaco, Kevin Fox
Producers:  Arnon Milchan, David Hoberman
Runtime:  140 min.
US Distribution:  Warner Bros.
Rated R:  violence, profanity
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        I'm not sure of the Negotiator to which the title of this film refers: 
is it Danny Roman (Samuel L. Jackson), a Negotiator accused of taking
hostages to prove his innocence, or is it Chris Sabian (Kevin Spacey),
the Negotiator Roman wants called in to talk to him?  Perhaps it's not
important.  What is important is that Roman has been accused of killing
his partner, and now his friends and colleagues all believe he's is
guilty.  So, he heads up to the Internal Affairs office, where he
suspects Inspector Niebaum (J.T. Walsh) is conspiring against him.  And
he takes everyone hostage.
        The Negotiator is, unfortunately, a professional execution of a very
mediocre script.  I came close to recommending the film with more
enthusiasm, but the problems in the story grew very tiresome by the last
scene.  Like so many thrillers, The Negotiator starts off with an
interesting premise and concludes with sequences that make no sense.  It
should have been all psychological, featuring a showdown between two
terrific actors (Jackson and Spacey).  It has great scenes between the
two, but there's too much contrived plot here to fully enjoy the
chemistry.  By the time the credits rolled, I wondered if I had seen a
masked entry into the Fugitive series.  
        The film was directed by F. Gary Gray, and he is good at what he does. 
Just about every scene here -- even the ridiculous ones at the end --
are sharp and exciting.  Consider, if you've seen the film, the scene in
which men armed with machine guns go in to kill Roman, without Sabian's
consent.  Gray shoots this scene with skill, and it has the kind of
claustrophobic feel that action scenes in small places need to be
successful.  The problem is that the scene is not necessary, nor is it
realistic.  The Negotiator's strongest points are in the electricity of
the dialogue, and scenes like this break my concentration. 
Screenwriters should learn that, more often than not, words are more 
interesting than bullets.
        But there is a lot to like about this film, particularly in the
performances and Gray's observation of them.  Spacey is a miracle of an
actor, and I'm elated that he's not being typecast as a psycho.  The
first scene with him is terrific, showing him in a comical scene with
his family (this scene is also nice because few thrillers even take the
time to show us a little bit about the characters).  Physically, Spacey
is not an imposing man -- he's actually much shorter than most of the
other actors in this film -- but he has a way of delivering dialogue
that demands attention.  He's a magnetic screen presence, and one of the
few of these who can actually act.
        Jackson is equally good, and plays the desperate man well.  Jackson is
one of the more versatile actors working today, proving in film after
film that he's not bound by any limitations as a performer.  He speaks
his lines with conviction and ease, and never lets the audience slip out
of the moment.  The two actors are fascinating together, even when
speaking through a telephone.  One of the best scenes in the film is a
moment in which the two stars and the director are working perfectly in
sync -- just as Sabian arrives on the scene, and he's talking to Roman
for the first time, the two men speak calmly as Sabian is preparing to
negotiate with him.  It's hard to explain the energy in this scene, but
it's all visual, displaying the talent of the actors intertwined with
Gray's swift style.  
        There are also some terrific supporting performances.  Paul Giamatti,
whom I will always remember as Howard Stern's nemesis, Pig Vomit, is in
every movie this summer; here, he's hilarious as one of the hostages. 
David Morse continues with his string of roles that require him to play
bad ass military guys (which he does well).  The late J.T. Walsh is
adequately dark as the mean Internal Affairs bad guy.  And Regina Taylor
gives a good performance as Roman's wife.  None of the characterizations
in this film are particularly strong, but it's one of the few pictures
I've seen in which acting talent actually makes up for the lack of
characters.
        Reader, you can't understand how much I want to like this movie just a
little bit more than I do.  The acting is so good.  The direction is so
good.  But the script is so silly, so profoundly dumb, and so shameless
in its regression from interesting to absurd, that I just can't quite
say that The Negotiator is a good film and live on with my clear
conscience.  Why did we have to have another story about a man clearing
his innocence?  Why did I need to see more silly scenes in which people
hack into computers to find out hidden information (the computer is the
*worst* place to keep incriminating information)?  Why did there have to
be silly shootouts, and machinegun battles in close quarters?  Actors
this talented don't need all this plot -- just contrive a crisis, put
them in a room, and let them do the rest.

Title
Review for Wrongfully Accused (1998)
Director:  Pat Proft
Cast:  Leslie Nielsen, Kelly LeBrock, Melinda McGraw, Richard Crenna,
Michael York
Screenplay:  Pat Proft
Producers:  Bernd Eichiger, Pat Proft, James G. Robinson
Runtime:  90 min.
US Distribution:  Warner Bros.
Rated PG-13:  sex related humor, language
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
It's hard to motivate myself to write a review for a film when I know I
will have spent more time on it than the makers spent assembling the
film.  The film in question is, of course, Wrongfully Accused, which has
been written and directed by Pat Proft and stars Leslie Nielsen.  See,
it just isn't funny.  I laughed approximately five times, and each time
it was a weak and uninspired display of hilarity.  There are so many
jokes in this film -- I would lose count if I tried to keep track.  It
spoofs just about every popular film, from Casablanca all the way up to
Titanic, and it botches every single gag.  
In fact, I can't recall a single film reference that I found funny. 
Oh, wait!  I laughed when the usher pointed to the seat with a
lightsaber.  Other than that, we're talking dust-in-the-mouth dry.  I
think I smiled a few times, but there is so much room for uproarious
entertainment in a film like this, and Wrongfully Accused simply fails. 
I know it's bad when a film makes me realize the good things about a
comedy like BASEketball, which actually had some pretty funny moments. 
And this one pales in comparison to Mafia!, which had me laughing from
start to finish.  
If you've seen the unfunny trailer, then you know what to expect.  It's
a parody of The Fugitive, with about thirty other film references piled
in for good measure.  Nielsen plays Ryan Harrison (it's probably
supposed to be a joke that Harrison is also the first name of that actor
who played the main character in The Fugitive...oh, what's his
name...).  Harrison is Lord of the Violin; the first scene is arguably
the "best," for it is mildly amusing to see Nielsen fake violin playing
and then instigate a mosh pit in front of the stage.  
>From there, however, it's a drop-off into a limp and lame graveyard of
meaningless jokes and unfunny plot developments.  See, Harrison's
adversary is the one-armed, one-legged, one-eyed man.  Harrison needs to
prove his innocence, because he's been framed for the murder of the
husband of a woman he really likes (Kelly LeBrock).  He's also being
chased by a U.S. Marshall; Richard Crenna has this role, and fails
miserably in mocking Tommy Lee Jones to any degree of funniness.
It's not the material that flops, but Proft's approach.  The one-armed,
one-legged, one-eyed man, for instance, isn't very funny, though it
seems like it should be.  I think it would have been funny to see an
armless man, though, who walks around without prosthetic limbs.  Other
references are equally flat:  the Titanic scene (which is in the
preview) just isn't interesting at all.  It's not funny to see the
heroes kissing, and then get hit in the face by a big steel girder.  
What makes a spoof funny is exaggeration:  if the girder had hit them,
and they went flying off the screen, while screaming loudly and
violently, then I might have laughed.  
The performances don't really help out.  Nielsen plays it straight, as
he always does, but the problem is that he's the same character as he's
been for the last ten years.  LeBrock is okay, but looks disinterested. 
The only other character worth mentioning is Crenna's, and, as I said,
he misses the mark by miles.  
It's not worth my time, or anyone else's, to sit through a dumb
90-minute comedy that will have you laughing for twenty-five seconds.  I
don't even know how a film like this got produced and released:  humor
is, for the most part, universal, and I can't imagine anyone finding an
acceptable percentage of Wrongfully Accused bearable.  It's a comedy
that won't make you laugh, and a spoof that barely spoofs its targets. 
Nobody put any thought into this production.  Learn from my mistake and
don't waste your time with it.

Title
Review for Big Hit, The (1998)
Director:  Kirk Wong
Cast:  Mark Wahlberg, Lou Diamond Phillips, Christina Applegate, Avery
Brooks, Bokeem Woodbine, Lela Rochon
Screenplay:  Ben Ramsey
Producers:  Wesley Snipes, Warren Zide
Runtime:  
US Distribution:  Sony Pictures/TriStar
Rated R:  violence, language, sex
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
I didn't hate The Big Hit, even though it is a stupefyingly terrible
film.  For the entirety of its running time, my eyes were attached to
the screen, and I never once got bored.  I found the film interesting
because of its unique awfulness:  this is such a confused disaster of a
film that it's entertaining to watch it in the same way that it's
entertaining to witness a thirty car pileup on a freeway spaghetti
bowl.  
As a narrative, The Big Hit is pure garbage, never truly deciding its
genre and constantly crossing all kinds of boundaries.  It reminded me a
lot of Grosse Pointe Blank, which is a similar film that fails in a lot
of the same ways.  It's fine to mix genres, if the film makers know what
they're doing.  Unfortunately, writer Ben Ramsey and director Kirk Wong
don't seem to know how to handle the material, and the result is an
action film that wants to be a comedy.  The biggest problem with the
amalgamation, in this case, is that the film is absurd and the comedy is
out of place.  But it sure is a fascinating failure.
Marky . . . er, Mark Wahlberg stars as Melvin Surley, a hitman.  He's a
good hitman, apparently, although his tactics seem a bit rambunctious
(he doesn't snipe or make clean kills--he just kicks the door down and
shoots everything).  He works with a few other hitmen--Cisco (Lou
Diamond Phillips), Crunch (Bokeem Woodbine), and Vinnie (Antonio
Sabbato, Jr.).  They're a nice bunch of muscular guys, who stand around
in the locker room after working out and compare masturbation to sex.  
They all work for a man named Paris (Avery Brooks), who is rich,
powerful, and in constant need of four sloppy hitmen.  It is very
important that they never go beyond their boss and do work on their own;
this, of course, is where the plot comes in.  They decide to kidnap a
young Japanese girl named Keiko (China Chow), who has a rich father. 
When they do this, it turns out she is Paris' . . . Goddaughter!  It's
very bad to have Paris against you.
The story is standard action film stuff.  It's nothing new, and nothing
particularly offensive (but certainly not the slightest bit
compelling).  Clearly the major selling point of The Big Hit is that
it's a John Woo-type of action film mixed in with some really hip
comedy.  It's true that a lot of the action sequences resemble recent
films that go for the same idea (such as Face/Off and The Replacement
Killers, which are both far superior).  There are stunts that are fun to
watch:  the opening sequence has Melvin and two of his partners going in
to kill some guy who has nothing to do with the story.  They use night
vision goggles and really powerful handguns.  Melvin is also very good
at breakdancing, and uses this talent to avoid bullets and knives.
Like I said, it's not boring; most disasters aren't.  What makes it so
bad is its genre-shifting madness.  It seems to start out as a
quirky-but-realistic action comedy, as Melvin is seen transporting bags
of human remains.  Then, as soon as they go to their first hit, it turns
into a music video with bodies and bullets flying everywhere.  Then,
somewhere in between, it turns back into comedy.  Keiko turns out to be
a spunky little girl; in one amusing scene, she is forced to read a
letter out loud, indicating that she has been kidnapped, but the letter
is littered with grammatical errors that skew the meaning of the words. 
And scenes like this work alone, but Wong applies this goofy tone to
scenes that should be more serious, or not be in the film at all.  One
of the most irritating moments has Paris ordering Cisco to come up to
his office after he learns that Keiko has been kidnapped; when Cisco
gets there, Paris and his men are standing around as if they knew Cisco
did it, but they let him out of there, telling him to find the
perpetrator.  The scene is played for laughs, but it isn't funny.  
And since it doesn't quite work as a comedy, it tries to fall back on
the action, which also fails.  This is a film where people fly fifteen
feet backwards when shot with a handgun.  Cars land on tree branches and
are supported by them.  Characters betray each other without a second
thought.  Grenades are thrown in tight places.  People jump out of tall
buildings and survive.  People outrun tumbling cars, and get out of the
way of falling objects in small fractions of seconds.  Most frustrating
of all, though, is the film's definition of a hit man:  these guys are
anything but subtle, quiet, and skilled individuals.  They're more like
socially depraved militia men (Melvin has an extensive collection of
firearms in his garage, including missile launchers and hand-held
machineguns).
The characters each have one trait that distinguishes them from the
rest; this obviously doesn't make for deep or interesting people to
watch.  The acting is kind of fun, though--Wahlberg is a good actor, and
his innocuous presence in this film is charming in a silly sort of way. 
Phillips certainly has fun with his psychotic character, while Christina
Applegate, who plays Melvin's fiancée, is convincingly air-headed.  
The Big Hit is an action film that unknowingly spoofs itself in trying
to be funny.  The funniest parts are supplied by the actors, and not by
the numerous failed attempts at sight gags and one-liners.  It's a true
disaster, one that makes me believe that the goofy and unrealistic tone
is completely unintentional.  Despite all this, though, I must reiterate
the entertainment value here.  You can cherish the awfulness of a film
like this.  If you embrace The Big Hit for the catastrophe that it is,
you just might enjoy yourself.  

Title
Review for Out of Sight (1998)
Director:  Steven Soderbergh
Cast:  George Clooney, Jennifer Lopez, Ving Rhames, Dennis Farina, Don
Cheadle, Albert Brooks, Steve Zahn, Catherine Keener
Screenplay:  Scott Frank
Producers:  Danny DeVito, Michael Shamberg, Stacey Sher
Runtime:  120 min.
US Distribution:  Universal
Rated R:  violence, language, sex
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        Perhaps it's time for me to say a little about my reading habits.  I
really do like to read, and I've enjoyed many books in my lifetime.  My
problem is that I'm a slow reader, and not very dedicated -- I'll enjoy
portions of a book and then set it down for months at a time (it's taken
me the last six weeks to get through the first one hundred pages of Anna
Karenina, even though I'm loving the book).  In addition to this, I
typically don't read anything created after the 19th century.  The only
reason I bother with this bit of information is because I feel bad
admitting, time after time, that I haven't read any of the books on
which these films are based (the only exception, I believe, is Great
Expectations).  
        However, I don't think it should be necessary to read the book
beforehand in order to judge the quality of the film.  Needless to say,
I haven't read the Elmore Leonard novel Out of Sight, on which Steven
Soderbergh's new film is based.  I can't say how faithful of an
adaptation it is, or if it lives up to Leonard's vision.  I can say that
it's a terrific film, with sharp acting, great dialogue, and pumping
full of energy and style injected by Soderbergh.  It's certainly a nice
distraction from 1998's lineup of brainless blockbusters, all hopelessly
wishing that size mattered.  Out of Sight proves that it doesn't.
        I had originally written George Clooney off as a one-note actor,
incapable of depth but occasionally showing a little flair.  After
seeing his latest performance in this film, I've changed my mind -- this
guy can act, but he also has that forceful presence that most certainly
will make him one of those $20 million superstars.  Here, he plays Jack
Foley, a middle aged guy who robs banks for a living.  He does it
because it's fun, I think, but the film opens with him getting caught
because his car won't start.
        He goes to jail -- which is interesting -- only to break out five
cinematic minutes later with the help of his friend, Buddy (Ving
Rhames).  We're then introduced to Karen Sisco (Jennifer Lopez), a U.S.
Marshall who, conveniently, is waiting with a shotgun as Jack escapes. 
Fortunately, they take her hostage, and she and Jack spend some quality
time in the trunk together as Buddy drives them to safety.  The central
conflict arises when both Jack and Karen become obsessed with one
another, though their respective jobs make them superficially
incompatible.
        We soon learn that the film is not told in sequence (and, since this is
a gritty crime comedy, flashbacks of Pulp Fiction should arise).  At
first, I kind of felt that it was a gimmick, but I guess it was a
gimmick in Pulp Fiction, too.  It's a fun gimmick, though, and
Soderbergh treats the material with enough humor that everything comes
off naturally.  I've only seen a few of Soderbergh's films (I was
impressed both with Kafka and sex, lies, and videotape), but I think
he's excellent at what he does.  He's an artist without making it
obvious, and without being pretentious, which is always admirable.  He
uses tricks, yes (lots of freeze-frame stuff here), but it all adds to
the smooth and quirky currents in the film.
        As I said, Clooney is terrific, and he's matched by Lopez.  Lopez is,
of course, beautiful, but she can act, too.  I can sense that she's
honing in on her skills, for she comes off more natural here than she
has in any of her previous ventures (not that Stone gave her much help
in the loathsome U-Turn).  The two actors have arresting chemistry with
one another -- the best scene in the film, by far, is the seduction
scene.  The brilliance of this scene is also due, in part, to
Soderbergh, for he cuts back and forth from their quiet discussion in a
bar to the physical act which takes place a few minutes later.  The
scene is a series of soft nuances and glances, layered upon light
dialogue, and the result is one of the better love scenes in recent
cinema -- meaningful and engrossing.
        The supporting cast is strong, led by the always-reliable Ving Rhames. 
Dennis Farina, who plays Karen's father, is good, as is Don Cheadle as
the profoundly stupid villain.  Steve Zahn, who plays Jack's
nearly-brain dead accomplice Glenn, steals all of his scenes (and that's
in a film where every scene is already at a high level).  All of the
actors are helped by the dialogue and the intelligently-constructed
script by Scott Frank.
        Out of Sight is certainly a light film, although there are a few heavy
moments that will linger in the memory.  Overall, I can recommend it
simply as great entertainment.  Not every film has to change your life,
and it's nice to see a movie that uses the art to tell a great story and
simply to entertain its viewers.  As for the book, this film is good
enough to make me believe that there might be something in the text
worth looking at.

Title
Review for Misérables, Les (1998)
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        Those of you who frequently read my reviews are not likely to be
surprised by the fact that I have not read Victor Hugo's novel Les
Miserables.  I don't know if a lot of people have, though I imagine many
are familiar with the popular musical based on the novel.  I haven't
even seen that.  Going into this film, I had almost no knowledge of the
story or its characters (I even expected the film to be a musical). 
Walking away from it, I'm kind of glad I had no prior experience with
the material.  Writer/Director Bille August's film version is a
straightforward, beautifully told film.  
        Liam Neeson stars as the miserable Jean Valjean; in the beginning, he
has just been released from a 19-year prison sentence.  He is allowed to
stay in a convent by a kindly priest despite his rude and destructive
behavior.  The priest's words of wisdom influence him, and he makes a
vow to change himself.  Nine years later, we are informed that he is now
the mayor of a town called Vigo; nobody knows his real name, and that he
is wanted for skipping his parole nine years ago.
        Conflicts arise when Inspector Javert (Geoffrey Rush) is assigned to
Vigo.  Valjean remembers Javert as one of the prison guards who
constantly beat him, and Javert remembers Jean to be a convict.  Javert
is hell-bent on upholding the law, and he does everything in his power
to bring Jean to justice.  Along the way, Valjean meets and falls in
love with a peasant woman, Fantine (Uma Thurman), and vows to take care
of her daughter, Cosette (played later by Claire Danes).
        Les Miserables is visually a solid and often striking picture.  The
production design by Anna Asp is authentic and vast, and the sets don't
look like sets (they look like real towns and villages); Gabriella
Pescucci's costumes are noticeably spectacular.  Basil Poledouris'
soundtrack is thick and usually well-placed (though it does get a bit
heavy at times).  Many scenes in the film have a memorable photographic
quality, such as the climax, which takes place next to a dark river in
the grey obscurity of early evening.  
        Augusts keeps the story simple (which I hear is a good thing, since the
novel is so complex) and easy to follow.  He manages to develop the main
characters and most of the subplots adequately.  I was also impressed
that he didn't go overboard with flash and style, which is something so
many directors seem to be doing to classic stories these days (such as
Baz Luhrmann's vicious tragedy William Shakespeare's Romeo + Juliet). 
This film feels solid and whole, and each scene has a certain amount of
importance and vigor that keeps the audience interested.
        Liam Neeson is terrific in the main role; Neeson is the kind of actor
who does solemn desperation extremely well, and Valjean is certainly a
man who clearly fits that adjective.  Thurman, in her small role, is
very good, and proves that she has a lot of range and can perform in a
very non-glamorous role such as this one.  Rush is absolutely incredible
as Javert; I don't remember ever feeling so strongly about a villain as
I do here; he adds depth and complexity with subtle glances and nuances,
and effortlessly makes each of his scenes intense.  I can't be as
charitable for Danes, however; though I know she is a talented actress,
here she tends to overact when it might have been better to underplay
the character a bit.
        Les Miserables is, as I've said, a solid, intelligent motion picture. 
My only complaint is that it feels a bit too easy, and perhaps too
staged.  Each scene is grand and huge, and exploding with Poledouris'
score, but I didn't always want them to be.  For the most part, Les
Miserables is not a subtle or deep picture.  It's a good movie, and
tells its story well, but August tends to hand-feed us themes and scenes
that would have worked better had they been more subtle.  However, in a
film this exciting and well-produced, a few minor flaws are easily
overlooked.

Title
Review for Twilight (1998)
Director:  Robert Benton 
Cast:  Paul Newman, Susan Sarandon, Gene Hackman, Stockard Channing,
Reese Witherspoon, Giancarlo Esposito, James Garner, Liev Schreiber, M.
Emmet Walsh
Screenplay:  Robert Benton, Richard Russo
Producers:  Arlene Donovan, Scott Rudin
Runtime:  96 min.
US Distribution:  Paramount
Rated R:  Violence, language, sex
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        It's not a good sensation to walk away from a film feeling hungry for
more.  At the end of Twilight, when the image blacked out and I saw the
word "Cast" peek up from the bottom of the screen, I was wondering where
the other three or four reels had gone.  Much to my dismay, it turns out
that I saw the whole thing.  Twilight is a mystery that runs just over
90 minutes; there are three extremely interesting and well-acted
characters that are given a depressingly short amount of time to make
their appearances and tell their stories.  I can't think of a film that
feels more rushed and unexplored as this one.
        The first scene is unimpressive, and had me prepared for an overall bad
film.  Paul Newman stars as Harry Ross, who, in this opening scene, is
in Mexico to retrieve a young woman (Reese Witherspoon) who is on
vacation with her boyfriend (Liev Schreiber) without the consent of her
parents.  Things go wrong, and she accidentally shoots him in the leg. 
The scene is dry and poorly choreographed, and is plagued by an insipid
and unoriginal music score.  
        Fortunately, things pick up a little.  We are transported two years
past the time depicted in the first scene; we learn that Harry lives
with some old friends, wealthy actor/actress couple Jack and Catherine
Ames (Gene Hackman and Susan Sarandon).  Basically, Harry is Jack's
personal private investigator.  Jack sends Harry on a job that he
describes as "safe"--he must deliver a package to a woman.  When Harry
arrives at the address, he finds a bleeding man who has been shot (M.
Emmet Walsh), and he tries to kill Harry.  Quickly, Harry finds himself
caught up in a web of criminal activities, and his primary motive in
attempting to bring the issues to closure revolves around his wanting to
know if the Ames are responsible.
        In the end, I found myself disappointed not in the film's execution,
but in it's completely limited approach to a situation that is so
complex and interesting.  Perhaps the best thing about the film is
Newman, who is a fantastic, seasoned, and completely engaging performer
to watch on screen.  He's great here--Harry is funny and well-written,
and he has a life outside of what we see.  Newman's performance is deep
and sympathetic, and he had me hooked immediately--he plays his part
like a pro.
        Hackman and Sarandon are equally good, and are both given fascinating
characters to embody.  Jack, who is dying from cancer, is a very flawed
individual, but Hackman elicits our sympathy and makes us like him
despite some of the things he does.  And Sarandon, as the woman who will
do anything for her husband, is also excellent:  she shows all of the
depth and complexity that she did in Dead Man Walking, but in half the
screen time.  There is also a colorful supporting cast, including James
Garner and Stockard Channing.
        These characters are so well-written that I simply can't believe
writer/director Robert Benton didn't do more with them.  Twilight could
have been a full hour longer without overstaying its welcome.  I wanted
to see these people in more situations; I wanted to see them interact
with each other more.  I wanted to see moments of emotional rage, and
moments of quiet, probing tenderness.  There are small bursts of all of
these things in Twilight, but the moments are so short and yet so tasty
that I felt kind of the same way I do when I eat just one potato chip on
an empty stomach.
        And it doesn't help that there are things here that I didn't like.  The
subplot involving a delusional man who thinks he is Harry's partner is
intrusive and pointless.  Much of the dialogue feels forced:  in one
scene, Witherspoon (who plays the Ames' daughter) meets Harry as he is
watching Jack and Catherine cuddle on their bed.  "This is their story,"
she says.  "You and I just have bit parts."  And while it's a nice
comment and probably holds a lot of truth, it feels wrong as dialogue,
and is certainly out of place from a girl who we're lead to believe is
of questionable intelligence.
        It's common to criticize a film because it feels long and tedious; I
criticize Twilight because of the opposite.  Benton rushes the
fascinating story to a premature conclusion, and the result is a film
that feels incomplete.  The three hours of Titanic feel swift, but we
are fulfilled and exhilarated when it's over.  The 90 minutes of
Twilight feel alarmingly brief--they whet our appetites for a main
course that will never arrive.

Title
Review for Palmetto (1998)
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
Woody Harrelson typically stars in films that I detest.  More
importantly, perhaps, is the fact that Woody Harrelson typically plays
as characters that I detest.  Natural Born Killers, which is one of the
worst films of all time, features Harrelson as one of the most
deplorable excuses for a human being I've ever seen.  Kingpin, one of
the worst comedies of all time, features Harrelson in an unsympathetic
role as another terrible guy.  And other films in which he has a
significant part, such as Indecent Proposal (which I hate) and recently
Wag the Dog, all show Harrelson playing scum.  In Palmetto, Harrelson
plays more scum, but this time he's good-natured scum (but, regrettably,
very stupid scum).  
Harry Barber is his name.  He lives in the small town of Palmetto,
Florida.  Upon his release from jail in the opening scenes, he is
courted by his old girlfriend, Nina (Gina Gershon), and goes to live
with her.  Not long after this, Harry finds himself sitting in a bar, at
which point he accidentally meets Rhea Malroux (Elisabeth Shue), who has
a business proposition for him.  She wants him to be a voice on a
telephone, telling her rich husband that he has his daughter, and that
he wants $500,000 for the kid.
Of course, everyone will be in on the joke, Rhea tells Harry.  There
won't be any kidnapping, because the daughter, Odette (Chloe Sevigny),
wants some of the money, so she is doing it willingly.  And everything
goes as planned for about five seconds, until Harry makes various
revelations at even intervals throughout the film, until suddenly what
has been clear to the audience since they all saw the preview is finally
clear to Harry, as well.
Palmetto is okay.  I enjoyed it for what it is, which is a low-key,
absurd film highlighted by some terrific acting and a bunch of plot
twists that seem to be present only because plot twists are pretty fun. 
These are the kinds of plot twists you can't predict (they all caught me
by surprise), but the interesting thing is that, looking back on the
film, there are hints towards all of them.  I like it when films do
this, because it's clear that at least they didn't come out of nowhere.
I love Elisabeth Shue.  She is luminous and wonderful.  I can watch her
for hours.  She's great in Palmetto, although she is the kind of
character that I would imagine most actors probably wouldn't want to
play:  Rhea is all superficial gloss, and there is no substance beneath
that which we can see.  Without giving away too much of the plot (I fear
I already have...), let me just say that in order to understand the
things she does, we would need a psychologist analyzing her every word
and action.  I don't doubt that there are people like this in the world,
but if I were to meet them, I'd like to know what makes them act this
way.  
I like Gina Gershon, too, but she seems more suited to play the role of
the lustful wench that Shue has.  And Michael Rapport is one of those
actors that I dislike immensely.  I can not think of an actor that
irritates me more than this man.  I think back to Copland and cringe.  I
reflect on my experience watching Metro, and the thought of him annoys
me.  He's obnoxious, and full of himself, and overflowing with
testosterone and machismo.  I don't like him at all.  And for those of
you who have seen this film, there is a scene towards the end featuring
chemicals.  I like this scene very much.
The tone of the film, provided by director Volker Schlondorff, is
fairly well-established.  Palmetto has a lot of atmosphere, and the damp
and scummy setting of this small Florida town is rich in texture.  As I
watched, I was somewhat reminded of the far-superior Body Heat, of which
Palmetto often seems like a remake.  
Unfortunately, the film disintegrates into pure ridiculousness by the
final scene.  Most of the film isn't even remotely plausible, but I was
adequately sidetracked through most of its running time.  It's only at
the final twist that I finally gave up.  I liked the way Palmetto
unravels, but absurdity can do in even the most interesting pictures.  I
did get something new out of Palmetto, however--I can now be confident
that Woody Harrelson isn't bound by playing awful people.    
>From 0-10:  6
Grade:  C+

Title
Review for Hard Rain (1998)
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    Here it is, the next chapter in the ever-so-popular DISASTER! genre.
Hard Rain, however, goes the extra mile: it sets up a big burglary in
the middle of the disaster, and then the characters have to deal with
both situations simultaneously. There is a problem, though--the disaster
looks good, but everything else in the film is bad. I truly believed I
was seeing a real-life flood on screen, but in the end the
implausibility of the situations and the depthlessness of the characters
is what stuck with me. Somehow, I don't think this is what was intended.
    Christian Slater stars as Tom, an armored car guard. The film jumps
right into action, and we immediately see Tom, with his partner Charlie
(Edward Asner), getting robbed by a bunch of guys led by Jim (Morgan
Freeman) who "just want the money." After they make short work of
Charlie (accidentally), Tom takes off with the money and hides it, while
the bad guys chase him, of course, because they "just want the money."
So, after Tom is smacked upside the head with a crucifix by Karen
(Minnie Driver), he is put in jail for looting. He tells his story to
the Sheriff (Randy Quaid), who leaves Tom locked up in his cell. It
turns out that the sheriff wants the money, too, but he doesn't "just
want the money"--he wants to kill everyone else, as well.
    The screenplay, penned by Graham Yost, is garbage on a fundamental
level. Here we have an intensely standard situation, and the only thing
that makes it even remotely unique is the fact that it's set in a flood.
The film takes approximately zero seconds developing the character of
Tom, so right off the bat, when we're thwarted with all kinds of
troubles for him to deal with, it's very difficult to care, since we
don't know who this guy is (aside from what he looks like). The other
protagonist, Karen, is given this same depthless quality, which doesn't
help in scenes when she's chained to a banister in a sinking house, or
any other scene in which she's in peril and we're supposed to be
concerned.
    I can just see some guys standing around yelling, "Ooooh, wouldn't
it be great if Christian Slater hid under the water while jet skis went
over him!?" "Wouldn't it be wild if there were big power boats crashing
through enormous stained glass windows!?" "Wouldn't it be insane if
damns and houses were broken into little pieces!?"
    The film also goes into some strange territory by developing the bad
guys more than the good guys. Jim (played with conviction by the
ever-watchable Freeman), is at least given an expository scene before
all the mayhem begins; later, we even see that there might be a more
human side to him than this money-hungry old man. And then the sheriff,
played with high camp by Quaid, is simply a force (he isn't even given a
name). There is nothing human about him, and his actions in the film
point towards confusion and psychosis. Like most everything else, he's
present to drive the plot to its inevitable conclusion.
    In addition, we're given moments that are simply absurd. Take, for
instance, the scene in which Tom is locked in the cell in the police
station. The water is rising quickly, and there's no way out. This scene
is actually very intense, and one of the best in the film, but it ends
with a cheap way out--the light in the ceiling just happens to lead to
the roof; by the time he figures this out, Karen, who doesn't even know
him at this point, is on the roof trying to get him out.
    There's also a lot of things that I just didn't like. A big part of
the conclusion takes place in a church, which, of course, includes
religious symbolism; a bullet going through a stain-glass portrait of
Jesus, the church burning in a Holy conflagration--these things are
included, but are given no thought. Also rather irritating are the
endless shootouts in the rain, with no mention of these new types of
rifles and revolvers that can fire when completely submerged in water.
The film also could have done without the attempted rape scene--there
certainly wasn't any need, except maybe to show that a very religious
woman doesn't mind stabbing a man in the bad of the neck with a pocket
knife.
    Okay, okay, the film is a mess. I'm sure you get my point. Here's
the kicker, though--it's entertaining. The director, Mikael Salomon,
seems to know what he's doing as far as images go. There are some really
spectacular moments, like a scene in which the characters speed around
the halls of a high school on jet skis. The flood itself is
spectacularly filmed, and I never once questioned the fact that I was
looking at a true disaster. In fact, there isn't a dry moment in the
film. Every minute is drenched in water.
    I wouldn't be surprised if Hard Rain started out as strictly a
disaster film. I remember its original title being The Flood, so this
leads me to believe that a lot of the gunfire and money grubbing here
was an afterthought by the film makers. It's not a boring film--you'll
watch it and probably enjoy it for the most part. But at the center is
an emotional void, a complete lack in anything of substance. Hard Rain
has an advantage because there haven't been very many films about
water-oriented disasters. The only one I can think of in recent memory
is Titanic, and that film succeeds in every way this one fails. Hard
Rain is mindless fun, but it's *so* mindless that I walked out the
theater wanting to apologize to my brain.

Title
Review for Love and Death on Long Island (1997)
Director: Richard Kwietniowski
Cast: John Hurt, Jason Priestley, Fiona Loewi, Sheila Hancock, Maury
Chaykin
Screenplay: Richard Kwietniowski
Producers: Steve Clark-Hall, Christopher Zimmer
Runtime: 103 min.
US Distribution: Cinepix 
Rated PG-13: brief strong language, sex, thematic elements
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
I think many will miss the point of Love and Death on Long Island.  I
do not say this condescendingly; I say this because I think that, in
order to completely understand what the characters do in this film, you
almost have to have been there yourself at some point in your life.  And
I'm not sure that everyone has the capacity to do what the main
character, Giles De'Ath, does here.  If you watch carefully, though, and
digest all that the picture has to offer, perhaps you'll find yourself
understanding something that you might not have even considered before.
Love and Death is a beautiful, touching film--intelligently funny,
perfectly acted, and absolutely realistic in every sense of the word. 
It had me deeply interested from the very beginning, and it's the kind
of film that manages to surprise you with realism and character
development.  This is also the kind of film that engages themes and
ideas in such a complete way that you'll be discussing and thinking
about the film long after it's over.
John Hurt, in what is perhaps the best performance of his lengthy and
distinguished career, plays aging British writer Giles De'Ath.  He's one
of those detached artists who refuses to acknowledge anything that has
to do with progress and technology; consequently, he doesn't know the
difference between a microwave and a VCR.  One day, after locking
himself out of his house, Giles decides to take shelter in a movie
theater, where he thinks he's going to see a film based on an E.M.
Foster novel.  He stumbles into the wrong theater, and is subjected to
Hotpants College II, a puerile film that obviously doesn't interest him.
Just as he's getting up to leave, he sees an actor that catches his
eye;  his name is Ronnie Bostock (Jason Priestly).  Giles instantly
develops a fixation on the young man.  He buys magazines intended for
teenage girls to find pictures of and articles about him, which he
organizes into a a scrapbook.  He buys a television and a VCR just so he
can rent all of Ronnie's films.  Giles even dreams about him at night,
fantasizing that he's a participant on a game show that asks questions
specifically about Ronnie Bostock.  
After he's had enough of this, Giles finally heads overseas to Long
Island.   Through a series of actions that come dangerously close to
stalking, he finally meets Ronnie's fiancée, Audrey (Fiona Loewi). 
Audrey is fascinated with Giles, and invites him to meet Ronnie.  When
Giles and Ronnie finally meet, Giles explains his belief that Ronnie has
rare talent, and that he has a screenplay in mind for which Ronnie would
be perfect.
Even on the surface, there's nothing familiar or tired about Love and
Death on Long Island.  Written and directed by Richard Kwietniowski
(based on the novel by Gilbert Adair), the film is packed with of
details and intelligent subtleties.   Kwietniowski is clearly a man who
has been in a position similar to Giles', and his understanding of what
Giles feels is key to the success of this film.  At first, Giles
understands his obsession is ridiculous:  he's terribly concerned that
people may see him pick up a copy of Sugar at the magazine rack; when he
goes to see Ronnie's film over and over again, he can't even bring
himself to say the name of the picture.
But Giles' burst of emotions near the end of the film is not the
slightest bit difficult to accept or understand:  here is a man who has
been married for almost his entire life, and, suddenly, he has
inexplicable feelings towards a man of less than half his age.  Hurt's
performance here is dignified and extremely moving; he brings grace and
incredible comic timing to each of his scenes.  He delivers his clever
dialogue the way only a pro can manage.  He ornaments the performance
with physical and verbal nuances that help to create the round and
fascinating character that Giles is.
Priestly also gives a great performance as the disgruntled actor;  he
manages to satirize his own previous Beverly Hills, 90210 image in
playing a teen idol who stars in second-rate films, including Tex Mex
and Skid Marks (which gets its title from this line of dialogue: 
"You're the skid marks on the underpants of life!").  
The film is profoundly funny in its dry, British way.  When a diner
owner (Maury Chaykin) finds out that Giles is from London, he wonders if
Giles has ever run into a guy named Stan Brickowski.  A line like this
is initially funny because of its obvious absurdity;  when you think
about it, though, you realize that you, too, have probably asked someone
from a different region if they know someone that you know from that
particular region, even though the chances of it are essentially
non-existent.  It takes clear insight into the minds of people to be
able to make jokes out of this kind of material.
But what sends Love and Death beyond the threshold of greatness is its
themes.   This is a film that recognizes the true, uncontrollable chaos
of love.  It realizes that love makes no sense, and that it can occur
between any two people.  It ignores social trappings and gender
stereotypes, and deals with Giles in such a way that we can understand
him despite the uniqueness of his situation.  This film is so deeply
successful in illustrating its themes that it's impossible to walk away
from the picture without carrying new insight into the varied dynamics
that human relationships often have.
There are some standard genres of comedy into which Love and Death
would easily fit -- the film is so potent and intelligent as a comedy
that one could ignore its themes and enjoy it simply for the
entertainment it provides.  But this is a film that does so much more
than entertains:  it clearly illustrates a part of human nature that a
vast majority of the world ignores entirely.  It takes genius to realize
such a theme and create a funny and moving film to put forth the ideas. 
Love and Death on Long Island is a wonderful film that everyone should
see and take seriously down to its most subtle detail.  

Title
Review for Pushing Tin (1999)
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
        John Cusack and Billy Bob Thornton are in top comedic form in Pushing
Tin, a strange little movie about air traffic controllers.  Directed by
Mike Newell (Donnie Brasco, Enchanted April), the film is hilarious and
entertaining for the first hour and a half, but slumps into
senselessness for its conclusion.  The characters are well-drawn and
perfectly acted by the cast, and the movie works when it focuses on the
rivalry between the two stars.  But it could have been a great movie if
it had found the right way to end (which would have included no baptism
scenes in a Colorado mountain stream).  It also doesn't have a lot to do
with air traffic controlling -- we get the feeling this story could have
been about stock brokers on Wall Street.  Nonetheless, Pushing Tin has
more charms than annoyances, and is therefore worth a look.

Title
Review for Half Baked (1998)
Director: Tamra Davis
Cast: David Chappelle, Jim Breuer, Harland Williams, Guillermo Diaz,
Rachel True, Laura Silverman, Steven Wright, Clarence Williams
Rated R: Language, drug use
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    I think it might be mildly inappropriate for me to suggest that you
go out and smoke large quantities of marijuana before watching Half
Baked. Of course, if you are in the target audience for this film, it is
very likely that you will do so without my urging. Still, I think it is
necessary (and almost certainly intended) that viewers who want to enjoy
this film get stoned before hand. I, for one, did not. I just watched
it. All I had in my system was a sub sandwich and half a beer.
    And that's probably why I didn't like it. I guess I liked some of it
(I did laugh sometimes), but the film is far beyond all implications of
the word "stupid." It's a lawless and inept film with short bursts of
humor-inducing mayhem and even shorter bursts of creativity. These
bursts, although small, are still present at least, so I'm consciously
giving Half Baked credit for trying. But it's just so dumb.
    The best scene in the film is the first one, where we meet our four
heroes as young teenagers learning the virtues of smoking weed. They
first try it and, of course, it does nothing. Soon, though, they're
stumbling around in a convenience store saying "Woah" a lot. We see them
in ever-so-slow motion, holding gargantuan candy bars and bursting out
of immense soda cups. And it's very funny, even if you aren't stoned.
    But from there it's all down hill. It turns out the focus is on
Thurgood (David Chappelle), a custodian (who does not like to be
referred to as a "janitor"). He lives with his three buddies, Brian (Jim
Breuer), Scarface (Guillermo Diaz), and Kenny (Harland Williams). Kenny
accidentally kills a diabetic police horse (you read that right) and is
sent quickly to jail on $1 million bail. The three guys decide that the
only way to save their friend is to steal marijuana from the hospital in
which Thurgood works (it's *really* good weed) and sell it on the
street.
    Naturally, their plan works out until the local drug czar Samson
(Clarence Williams) finds out that much of his profit is going the way
of these dope heads and makes life very difficult for them. Meanwhile,
Thurgood is trying to maintain a steady relationship with a beautiful
woman whom he loves (Rachel True). Her father is in jail for trafficking
drugs, and she is adamantly opposed to them, so Thurgood has to lie
about what he spends all of his time doing.
I liked the acting. Chappelle is often funny, and Harland Williams as
the poor imprisoned Kenny is just about the funniest guy in the film.
But Half Baked is too silly to be taken seriously in any way. I know it
wasn't meant to be taken seriously, but it's not witty or satirical like
it could (and should) have been. And because it's so unreasonably
unrealistic, it doesn't serve as an effective portrait of today's youth
or anything else. It's mindless entertainment in its purest form. I
suppose I could advocate the makers and say that the film is so
backwards and psychotic because it is supposed to be through the eyes of
the characters, but I think I'd be giving them too much credit.
    Movies like this are typically destroyed because of their need for a
beginning-to-end story. The story in this one is particularly dumb. It
is dumb not simply because of its nature, but because of its completely
slapstick execution by director Tamra Davis. The fact that Kenny kills a
diabetic police horse is ridiculous enough (the scene is very funny,
actually), but the numerous scenes that follow--which include attempted
rape and frequent use of the phrase, "He's my bitch!"--push the envelope
of believability. And the last half of the film, including a
double-cross and a police stakeout, are so bad that I found myself
taking deep breaths and staring at the ceiling of the theater.
    I suppose that, maybe, I could have suspended my disbelief, but only
in comparison to the rest of the film. It's going along okay until the
heroes start flying through the air. Then Snoop Doggy Dog jumps out of
the bushes, Willie Nelson talks about the sixties, Jerry Garcia comes
back from the dead like a genie only to smash a drug dealer in the face
with his electric guitar, and I wanted to scream, "When did we enter the
Twilight Zone!?" I guess it was at the same point that I walked into the
theater to watch Half Baked.

Title
Review for Kissing a Fool (1998)
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        We all see a lot of romantic comedies.  Studios love to release them
because people go and see them regardless of the fact that they are
almost always completely predictable.  And, naturally, this addition to
the genre doesn't break that particular tradition.  What Kissing a Fool
(what does the title mean?) does do, however, is provide a bunch of
likable and realistic characters in a situation that, miraculously,
doesn't feel banal and lifeless.  
        The story centers around Max (David Schwimmer) and Jay (Jason Lee), who
are best friends.  Jay is a writer, and Max is a well-known
sportscaster.  Jay introduces Max to his editor, Sam (Mili Avital), and
the two hit it off immediately.  They are engaged within a fortnight,
and soon they move in with each other.  But it can't be that simple: 
Max suspects that Sam might cheat on him, so he tries to get Jay to see
if she will.  How Max expected the details of this operation to ensue is
still under question.
        Boy, it just sounds like your typical, insipid romantic comedy, right? 
Well, yeah, the plot kind of works that way.  However, due to the great
characters and acting, I didn't even notice the gears of the plot
turning slowly-but-surely to provide for the foreseen conclusion.  The
film is totally hilarious, which doesn't hurt; it also manages to avoid
a lapse in laughter towards the end as the plot has to sum itself
up--everything up through the last frame is fun and entertaining.
        However, my biggest reason for liking Kissing a Fool requires for me to
once again officially disagree with Roger Ebert and one particularly
untrue statement he makes in his review of the film.  He says, "...none
of the characters behaves at any moment like any human being we have
ever met."  I guess me explaining the lack of truth in this statement
forces me to admit that my primary reasons for enjoying Kissing a Fool
are somewhat personal.  The character Jay, played by Jason Lee, is me! 
I suppose that it's very presumptuous and perhaps even arrogant of
myself to say such a thing (I know myself *really* well...?). 
Nonetheless, it is true, and almost disturbingly so.
        Lee's portrayal of me...er, Jay, is realistic and extremely
entertaining.  I also enjoyed him in Chasing Amy as the Friend, Banky. 
He is a lot different here (not just in appearance); he actually proves
he can play different kinds of characters.  Jay is really uptight and
ridiculously affected by his surroundings, so it comes as no surprise to
me when he becomes physically ill every time his ex-girlfriend, Natasha
(Vanessa Angel) is even mentioned.  All right, so, maybe not everyone
will like Jay as much as I did . . . but he seems like such a nice,
affable guy!
        David Schwimmer seems intent on breaking Matt Damon's record for number
of times he uses the f-word in a single line of dialogue.  I lost count
in this case, so I'll grant him the award.  I liked Schwimmer here, and
even though his character is the kind of guy I'd like to stab to death
in real life, I enjoyed watching him.  In fact, I know people just like
this, so I could watch and believe everything he does here without
questioning him.  Sam, played well by Avital, is the one character who
could have used a bit of fleshing-out.  She seems rather cardboard-ish
here, mostly because the screenplay doesn't give her a lot to do aside
from react to the two main guys.
        It must be me.  Every situation in this film feels like something that
has either happened to me, or that I've seen happen to someone I know. 
I can't be that different from everyone else--that's why I think someone
out there might watch this movie and say, "Yup, that's how it goes."  I
really enjoyed Kissing a Fool, and I think that if all romantic comedies
were this funny and realistic, we might not have to be so wary of the
genre.

Title
Review for One True Thing (1998)
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
One True Thing, based on the novel by Anna Quindlen, tells the story of
an average small-town family afflicted with a crisis.  The film stars
Meryl Streep and William Hurt as Kate and George Gulden; Kate is your
typical housewife, calmly cooking dinner each night and participating
cheerily in her clubs, while George is a stoic literature professor at
the local university.  The story is actually told through the eyes of
their daughter, Ellen (Rene Zellweger), who comes home for Thanksgiving
in the beginning of the film.
It is at this point that Ellen learns that her mother has cancer. 
George insists that Ellen come home and stay with Kate, despite Ellen's
intense journalism job in New York City.  Ellen obligingly obeys her
father's orders; initially, she hates what she has to do, and resents
her mother for it.  We learn that the two women weren't terribly close
as Ellen was growing up, and that neither of them feels that they can
get along with the other.  Subplots arise when it becomes clear that
George is more concerned with his work than his family life, and soon
Ellen suspects that he's having an affair.  
There are two types of goo:  there's bad goo, in which the characters
are weakly defined, weakly acted, and take part in a story that only
wants to make you cry (and usually fails).  Then there's good goo, in
which the characterizations and acting are strong, and the story is at
least marginally interesting and not completely contrived.  One True
Thing, for the most part, fits securely in the second form of goo.  It
is sentimental, and made many people in my screening cry profusely.  But
it's admirable in its triumph of characterization over manipulation, and
ultimately it's a worthwhile bit of goo.
What really sets apart the film are the three terrific lead
performances.  Streep is a pro, and while it's clear that she can play a
role like this without a lot of stretch-work, she's immensely appealing
and always endearing.  Hurt is also a well-seasoned performer, and is a
rare screen presence who manages to rise above his familiar face and
create a character worth watching.  Oddly enough, One True Thing gets
its real burst of life and emotion from Rene Zellweger (Jerry Maguire). 
It certainly helps that she's luminous and smart, but this alone isn't
enough:  her performance here is deep; it resonates and holds the film
together on an emotional level.  We endure all of Ellen's experiences
through Zellweger, and this makes most of the difference between One
True Thing and its bad-goo siblings.  
The film isn't perfect, of course.  Director Carl Franklin keeps the
story at a good pace, but there are a few too many scenes that want to
make us cry.  I counted about six, spread out at even intervals through
the second half of the film.  That's not to say that these scenes aren't
moving, for they are -- none of the sentimental moments in One True
Thing reach that unbearable level of cloying insincerity.  By the end,
though, I felt like Franklin had tried to manipulated me too much.  A
little is okay, but I was exhausted from fending off an emotional
response.  
A film like this doesn't need a compelling story to be successful, but
there are a lot of interesting themes explored in One True Thing.  The
bonds between mother and daughter, and also between father and daughter,
are well-described (even if they aren't universal truths), and the
family unity is very well executed by Franklin and the actors.  It's so
much easier to wimp out and make a film of bad goo that might
superficially please audience members; I was glad to sit through One
True Thing and find that my heartstrings hadn't been yanked by big heavy
chains.  

Title
Review for Snake Eyes (1998)
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
Quick!  You're out of time, over budget, and there's no ending on your
film!  What do you do?  Well, you think of the dumbest, most ridiculous
coincidence that could never happen in any galaxy, and then you spend
more money to film it with the futile hope that your audience will not
notice how utterly stupid it is.   Unfortunately, it turns out that
everybody notices how stupid it is.  But hope is not lost!  You can now
tack on an 11th hour romance between two people who spent most of the
film screaming and running away from one another.  
Actually, I'm just speculating.  I don't know what Brian De Palma was
thinking as he pieced together the last twenty minutes of Snake Eyes. 
Here is a film that starts off so well, and continues to hold interest
well into its story, and then falls completely apart with what is
perhaps the silliest ending to a good film I've ever seen.  Somewhere
out there, I am certain, there is an appropriate ending for Snake Eyes. 
But the ending that is present came inches away from completely ruining
the film for me.
The film stars Nicolas Cage as Rick Santoro, a semi-crooked cop.  We
meet him on fight night in an Atlantic City casino; we know he's really
happy to be there because he's smiling widely and shouting joyfully at
every person he meets.  He encounters a few of his friends, most notably
his best friend, Kevin Dunn (Gary Sinise), who is a military guy
escorting a senator.  Well, a few rounds into the fight, the senator
gets shot, and his blood is spattered all over Santoro.
It's now up to our obnoxious protagonist to solve the mystery of the
murder.  It seems so easy at first, since Dunn has already killed the
alleged sniper.   Soon, however, it turns out there's a conspiracy:  a
woman (Carla Gugino) had also been targeted for assassination, but she
got away.  The conspirators wanted her dead because she found out that
US missile tests were being rigged so a new kind of missile could be
released despite its lack of safety.  And so on.
The only real problem with Snake Eyes is the existence of the last
twenty minutes.  Other than this rather conspicuous issue, Snake Eyes is
a fantastic and intelligent thriller.  De Palma is a visual genius; his
style in this film feels fresh and original (and arguments that he's
derivative of directors like Hitchcock don't hold water).  He's a master
with the camera, and the result is a film that excites you with its
nearly uncontrolled energy.  
Take, for instance, the first shot.  This must be the longest steadicam
shot of all time.  It goes for nearly twenty minutes, from the first
moment all the way through the assassination of the senator.  The way De
Palma weaves this is astoundingly smooth, and I can only imagine how
difficult it would be to shoot a sequence like this.  I also liked the
way the assassination is shown from several different points of view; De
Palma uses this technique to drop hints as to who the conspirators may
be, which is an interesting trick.
Cage is a magnetic, eclectic actor, and he's perfect for this role.  
There's not a whole lot of acting beyond his personality as an actor,
although there are character developments later in the film that give
him something to do aside from his shouting.  Sinise is also excellent,
although I fear that he may be typecast in roles like this.  Sinise has
a way of making every line of dialogue convincing, with a kind of
confidence that few supporting actors manage.  Cage and Sinise work well
together here, and the film raises interesting questions about the bonds
and boundaries of friendship.
But it all breaks apart at the 80-minute mark.  I'm not going to
describe the climax, but you will know it when it arrives.  It's the
scene that doesn't make a shred of sense.  And then we're given a
minor-yet-overlong epilogue which is more depressing than interesting. 
Finally, De Palma force-feeds us a chance meeting that ends in a silly
promise and an exchange of phone numbers.  Don't get me wrong:  I
recommend Snake Eyes for the first two acts.  It's just the wretched
third act that keeps me from enthusiastically recommending what is
otherwise a terrific thriller.  I wouldn't be surprised to find out that
someone clubbed De Palma and finished the film without his input, for I
don't understand how a man with such good instinct in the realm of
visual presentation could have conjured up a conclusion so profoundly
dissatisfying.

Title
Review for 54 (1998)
Director:  Mark Christopher
Cast:  Ryan Phillippe, Mike Myers, Neve Campbell, Salma Hayek, Brecklin
Meyer
Screenplay:  Mark Christopher
Producers:  Ira Deutchman, Richard N. Gladstein, Dolly Hall
Runtime:  95 min.
US Distribution:  Miramax
Rated R:  language, sex, drug use 
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
54 is dull, perfunctory, uninspired, and boring.  A greater writer
might have created a lyrical sentence for each of those adjectives,
flowing in lovely arangements with soaring metaphors.  I, however, would
rather cut to the chase.  54 is dull, perfunctory, uninspired, and
boring.  There is nothing in it -- not a glimpse of depth, nor a shimmer
of intelligence or insight.  There is no electricity in any of the
scenes, or a moment of interest in the story or its subplots.  And it's
underdeveloped, and features an array of bland characters played by
actors who think they're in this year's Boogie Nights.  They are so
wrong.  The picture has been assembled by Mark Christopher.  Based on
this film, I don't know how he got a job in the business.  
54 is supposed to be an amazing insight into the world of the dance
club of the same name, which originated in the 70s and closed down in
the 80s.  I don't know if this film went into production after Boogie
Nights was released, but Christopher has managed to plagiarize Paul
Thomas Anderson's brilliant work in every possible way, from the
framework of the plot down to the style of the cinematography.  What it
lacks is everything that made Boogie Nights great:  depth, intelligence,
energy, fascinating characters, and challenging themes.  54 can't even
measure up to The Last Days of Disco, which is flawed, but still smart
and entertaining.  It's remarkably bad timing, I'd say, to release a
film this tedious after a couple of noteworthy pictures of the same
kind.
I have exaggerated, though:  there is one interesting character, and
one terrific performance.  That character is Steve Rubell, played with
more perceptiveness by Mike Myers than this limp production deserves. 
Steve Rubell is the owner of Studio 54, and if Christopher had focused
on him, then Myers could have forced a good film out of this wreck all
by himself.  Alas, we are instead guided to endure the trials of a young
man named Shane (Ryan Phillippe), a going-nowhere New Jersey teen who
gets a job in the club, thanks to Rubell's homosexual impulses.  It's
here that he meets his friends, the array of uninteresting characters: 
his co-worker, Greg (Brecklin Meyer), his wife, Anita (Salma Hayek),
and, of course, the love interest, Julie Black (Neve Campbell).
Shane is just an innocent young fool in the beginning, and he has a
reasonably sturdy home life.  (Some of the scenes with his father border
on interesting, while Heather Matarazzo, who plays his sister, pushes
Phillippe off the screen.)  But he decides to envelop himself in the
disco scene, and succumb to peer pressure and to drugs.  Why his
"friends" push him into drugs is never really explained, but the fact
that they are "friends" is questioned only is superficial ways (Greg
gets really mad at Shane because he's been elevated to bartender
status).  There isn't a single conflict that takes center stage, except
that Shane has some kind of unexplored reservation with the business in
which he works.  
Most of the film is dumb, and most of the dialogue is inane.  There's a
scene late in the film in which Shane confronts Julie Black, and, in the
next scene, they're arm-in-arm without a bit of development.  Then,
they're kissing in a bowling alley!  This is five minutes of material,
thrown into the picture at the last minute (well past the one-hour mark,
and this isn't a long film to begin with).  Campbell is a talented
actress, but she needs a role that gives her a little depth.  This one
doesn't.  And Phillippe has almost no presence whatsoever; this
performance pales in comparison to Mark Whalberg's star-making role in
Boogie Nights.  He seems dumb and misguided, and his voice never changes
tone.  I guess he was picked for the color of his hair and the shape of
his body, but he seems pretty lanky to me.  He's all wrong for a lead
role, but it doesn't help that Christopher has forgotten to develop his
characters.  By the end of 54, Shane's most notable trait is his stupid,
fake accent.  
The rest of the performances are wasted.  Hayek is an energetic,
talented young actress, and does almost nothing here.  Meyer is
endearing, but allowed to be no deeper than cardboard.  Only Myers, by
sheer force of talent, manages to rise above Christopher's wading-pool
of a script.  Rubell has been written just as depthless as the rest of
the characters, but Myers is good enough to inject subtleties that help
round out the performance.  In fact, Myers is the sole reason to see 54,
and all it really does is make you wish that the film had revolved
around him.
I've read that Studio 54 has been recreated down to the last detail. 
Frankly, I don't care.  It's easy to recreate something technical like
this.  A fairly skilled production designer and a few carpenters can
manage such a task.  Besides, Christopher keeps the lights so low that
the sets are invisible, anyway.  Aside from Myers' performance, 54 is a
complete failure.  It's dull, perfunctory, uninspired, and boring.  Some
may find my comparisons to Boogie Nights unfair, but they're so obvious
to me.  In any event, 54 is pallid without the contrast.  It doesn't
even work as mindless entertainment:  it's so shallow that the most
escapist viewers are likely to dismiss it.  So, don't forget those key
words:  dull, perfunctory, uninspired, and boring.  Everything else I
said was just padding.

Title
Review for Newton Boys, The (1998)
Director:  Richard Linklater
Cast:  Matthew McConaughey, Skeet Ulrich, Ethan Hawke, Vincent
D'Onofrio, Julianna Margulies, Dwight Yokam, Gail Gronauer 
Screenplay:  Richard Linklater, Claude Stanush, Clark Lee Walker
Producers:  Anne Walker-McBay
Runtime:  122 min.
US Distribution:  Twentieth Century Fox
Rated PG-13:  violence, language
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
It must have been nice to live around 1920, when one could stumble into
a bank and belligerently order the clerks to hand over all the money,
and then stumble back out on to the street and mosey back to the horse,
and then get away, having "not been seen."  The Newton brothers were
smarter than this, but their tactics are frequently as conspicuous. 
Apparently it didn't matter, because they are the most successful bank
robbers in American history.  
And their story makes a darn good movie.  The Newton Boys is a pleasant
surprise:  I expected something far less than this entertaining,
well-acted, and thoughtful film.  
Matthew McConaughey has the largest role as Willis Newton, the brother
who engineers most of the bank robberies.  At first, his accomplices are
his two younger brothers, Joe (Skeet Ulrich) and Jess (Ethan Hawke), and
Brentwood Glasscock (Dwight Yokam), the bomb expert.  Later, their
brother Dock (Vincent D'Onofrio) gets out of jail and catches up with
them.
Willis masterminds each robbery, and is responsible for upping the
stakes as time goes on.  They start off small, blowing up  safes in the
middle of the night and taking the money.  Soon, they move up to
breaking into two banks simultaneously.  Not long after this, they are
going to the bigger cities and taking a lot more money.  Willis
justifies his actions by saying, "It's just one thief stealing from
another," and the good thing is we believe him (at least a little bit). 
Bank robbery is a serious thing, but I liked the light tone that
director Richard Linklater has taken with this film.  The bank robberies
are simultaneously suspenseful and funny; they are also well-filmed, and
enhanced by an appropriate musical score.  The sets are authentic, and
certainly not inexpensive:  huge blocks of city streets from this time
period have been constructed for the film, and the result is a picture
that is visually flawless.
But what makes this such an enjoyable film are the characters, and the
actors who portray them.  McConaughey adds one more bit of proof that he
can hold his own as a leading man; he manages to make Willis the crazed,
eccentric man that he is, while still demanding our like and sympathy. 
And later, when he meets his love, Louise Brown (Julianna Margulies), we
truly believe that he cares for her.  Surprisingly, this is one of the
best-written romances I've seen in a while, for the female character is
fleshed-out, and Margulies plays her part well.
The rest of the cast is made up of a group of talented young actors who
are all making names for themselves.  Hawke, who plays the most jovial
(and most volatile) of the brothers, is perhaps the most entertaining to
watch.  Ulrich is quiet and reserved as Joe, and he does a good job
adding dimension to his character.  D'Onofrio, who has been playing
small parts for a while, is good here, though not given a lot of screen
time.  
Don't leave when the credits begin:  interviews with the real Willis
and Joe Newton role through the credits.  After seeing the film, it's
vastly entertaining to watch these old men talk about what they did so
many years ago (and Willis is still justifying the robberies).  And it
also serves to show how well McConaughey and Ulrich play their roles.
The Newton Boys is a charming, entertaining film.  Its success lies in
its simplicity, and I don't understand why all film makers can't go by
this easy set of guidelines:  make the characters round and interesting,
use talented actors, treat the material with respect, and everything
else will usually fall into place.  

Title
Review for American Werewolf in Paris, An (1997)
Director: Anthony Waller
Cast: Tom Everett Scott, Julie Delpy, Vince Veluf, Phil Buckman, Julie
Bowen, Pierre Cosso
Rated R: Violence, gore, nudity
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    Here's a note for any film maker intending to include a scene in
which characters bungee jump from the Eiffel Tower: the tower itself is
not composed of straight, vertical lines. The support beams curve away
from the center closer to the bottom, so anything that falls off the top
is likely to smash into the side of the tower no later than halfway
through the fall. So, in effect, people bungee jumping from the top will
not reach the ground until they collide with many steel girders,
bouncing their way down, down, down, until they reach the bottom as a
dead lump.
    The characters in An American Werewolf in Paris didn't have this
problem--they found an alternate version of the Eiffel Tower, which
represents more closely the Washington Monument, so they were not only
able to avoid hitting the side of the tower, but to clear every bit of
the building itself and land safely in the grass clearing hundreds of
feet away. I bet that Andy (Tom Everett Scott) didn't realize how his
life would change when he selflessly leaped from the top of the tower in
order to save a beautiful girl (Julie Delpy) attempting suicide. Of
course he saves her, in a stunt that makes every Schwarzenegger film
look realistic, and sets her on the ground, only to collide with a
girder on the way up (I suppose some points may be given for
understanding that there are, in fact, girders on the Eiffel Tower).
    The girl's name is Serafine, and she is a werewolf. Andy and his
friends find this out the hard way. When Andy becomes a werewolf
himself, he uncovers a plot in which a group of nihilistic werewolves
trap unknowing Americans and kill them. Their ultimate goal is to turn
the entire world into werewolves; Andy, with the help of Serafine, must
stop him at all costs! But only after he comes to terms with the fact
that he is a werewolf, and that the woman he loves is also a werewolf.
    Most horror films set up rules and guidelines by which the
characters act and ultimately destroy the evil bad guys. There are no
such rules in this film. I was under the impression that only silver
bullets could kill werewolves, but here they seem rather weak (many of
them die by multiple gunshots from a standard hand gun). Aside from the
concept not following what I know about werewolves, nothing else in the
film seems to be guided by any laws or rules.
    Take, for example, the Eiffel Tower bungee-jumping scene, which is
later upstaged by a Statue of Liberty bungee-jumping scene. There are
also tasteless moments in which Andy talks to ghosts. (These ghosts are
unique--they are the victims of werewolves, complete with the original
bloody wounds; they are damned to walk the earth until the werewolves
that have taken their lives die.) The entire idea behind the ghosts is
unfounded and absolutely pointless. The film also includes those
irritatingly dumb scenes in which Andy's friends try and get him ready
for a big date with Serafine by telling him what to wear and what to
say.
    All of this adds up to one big problem: in a film that lacks even a
hint of realism, it is impossible to care, or even get excited, about
the characters and the situation. There was not a doubt in my mind that
everything would be okay, not because it's a typical horror film and
everything is always okay, but because I knew the characters could just
cast an "Everything is Okay!" spell and everything would be okay. A
situation that appears to be certain death provides an escape when the
floor falls out from underneath a character for no particular reason.
Don't ask why Serafine loses all self-control when she turns into a
werewolf, and why the other werewolves seem completely aware of
themselves and others. Certainly don't question the pseudo-science in
which the bad werewolves synthesize a drug which can induce the werewolf
effects at any time during the day (which has a laughable, "scientific"
explanation having something to do with the moon cycles).
    As bad as this film is, I have to admit that it's not without guilty
pleasures. Director Anthony Waller should get someone to give him a real
script, because he could probably do some interesting things. And the
acting is rather entertaining, especially from Scott. There are also a
few really funny moments, and I actually liked the CG werewolves (they
don't look too cartoony). If you love werewolf or horror films, then you
might like this silly film. I'm not a big fan of either one, but I can't
say I wasted my money here. It's a bad film, yes, but it's charming in a
tasteless, lawless manor. I didn't like it, but I sat through it, and I
can't say I was disappointed. I got what I expected after seeing the
preview.

Title
Review for Afterglow (1997)
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        Afterglow is about a group of people who remain in tangled, destructive
marriages, but the film doesn't quite explain why.  The characters are
all interesting and well-acted, and the film is moody and atmospheric;
but, at the end, I didn't know where the characters were emotionally. 
This lack of closure doesn't help the fact that the characters commonly
engage in situations that don't feel realistic, and say things that I
wouldn't expect people to say.  
        The film centers around two marriages.  One consists of Jeffrey and
Marianne Byron (Jonny Lee Miller and Lara Flynn Boyle).  He is a smart,
cold, and cocky business man, while she is a quiet, needy housewife who
just wants a baby.  The other marriage has Lucky and Phyllis Mann (Nick
Nolte and Julie Christie).  Lucky is a plumber who sleeps with all of
his clients; Phyllis is a depressed, alcoholic ex-actress who allows him
to sleep around.
        The story develops as it becomes clear that Jeffrey has no intention of
supplying Marianne with a child.  When Marianne hears about Lucky from a
woman who has him fix her pipes frequently, she calls him up, and they
begin an affair.  Then, through a series of unlikely events, Jeffrey and
Phyllis become attached, unknowing that their spouses are off doing the
same thing.
        The first problem I found is that the film relies far too much on
improbable coincidences.  What were the chances of Jeffrey and Phyllis
going to the same bar to watch their spouses cheat, and then end up
spending a weekend together based on one meeting?  It doesn't even seem
all that necessary to have this be an element of chance--one of the
characters could have sought out the other, and the effect would have
been the same.  This kind of material feels almost giddy in nature, and
the thought of the situation is goofy outside of the dark vision of
writer/director Alan Rudolph.
        In fact, the film is almost too dark.  Some of this is downright
depressing, and it never lets up--not even in the end.  Jeffrey, for
instance, is a character of little heart:  he actually tells his wife,
point blank, that he doesn't care one bit that she wants a baby, and
yet, we are expected to believe that he loves her.  The dynamics between
the couples feel inexplicably strange, so strange that I can't tell if
it's unrealistic, or just unusual.  Lucky and Phyllis have an equally
odd relationship, for I can't imagine any wife consenting to her
husband's infidelity.  Rudolph does attempt to explain her mentality on
the issue, but I couldn't by it.    
        The acting partially makes up for all of these disturbingly unique
character interactions.  Christie nailed a Best Actress nomination for
this performance, and she deserves it.  Phyllis is a woman who
constantly undergoes pure, emotional torture, and the often-subtle ways
that Christie emits these feelings is truly effective.  Nolte, whom I
normally detest as an actor, is actually good here (he's toned down that
macho image he always seems to be brandishing).  Boyle is quiet and
appealing, and takes her character through realistic developments.  And
Miller, who I still remember from Hackers, turns in another fine
performance while managing a near-perfect American accent (although he
pronounced "mountains" as "moontains").  
        In the end, the film left me feeling down, though I'm not sure this is
what Rudolph intended.  A subplot that involves the Mann's absent
daughter is potent, but extremely saddening, and ends with an unsure
conclusion.  And what we're led to believe happens to the Byrons doesn't
really feel good.  I don't know if it's proper to hold these elements
against Afterglow, because it's entirely possible that Rudolph intended
the audience to feel this way at the end.  And, if this is the case, I'm
not sure why.  I don't like leaving the theater wondering what I was
supposed to get out of the film.

Title
Review for Boxer, The (1997)
Director:  Jim Sheridan
Cast:  Daniel Day-Lewis, Emily Watson, Brian Cox, Ken Stott, Gerart
McSorley, Eleanor Methven
Screenplay:  Jim Sheridan, Terry George
Producers:  Arthur Lappin, Jim Sheridan
Runtime:  113 min.
US Distribution:  Universal
Rated R:  Sex, language, drugs, violence
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
When Danny Flynn (Daniel Day-Lewis) is released from prison after
fourteen years served for involvement in the IRA, he heads back to his
hometown of Belfast.  Times are rough--the IRA is in full swing, and
Danny's old neighborhood has been reduced to a war-torn ghetto.  When he
arrives, he immediately meets up with his old friend and boxing trainer,
Ike (Ken Stott).  Together, they reinstate an old gym and assemble a
boxing league.
The IRA members for whom Danny went to jail--most notably Harry (Gerart
McSorley)--give Danny a bad time because they feel that his actions are
breaking up the community.  Most people recognize that Danny is actually
helping his fellow citizens, but Harry is not in his right mind.  Even
though he is in danger, Danny remains in Belfast, but only because of
Maggie (Emily Watson), the woman he left behind to spend fourteen years
in prison.  Maggie's father, Joe (Brian Cox), is also a member of the
IRA, but he is interested in slowing the destruction, and finds himself
at odds with Harry.  
The Boxer, directed and co-written by Jim Sheridan, is an intelligent,
brilliantly-acted film.  The story is straightforward and easy to
digest, while the characters are intricate and uniformly interesting. 
Sheridan's direction and pacing is also impressive:  he handles the
story with just the right tone and mood, and the result is an
accessible--if not always completely involving--drama.
I realized as I watched The Boxer that I had never seen Daniel
Day-Lewis in any film before.  This is only relevant because I can't
asses the quality of this performance in comparison to his others; I can
say, however, that this is an excellent performance in its own right. 
Danny is a brooding, thoughtful character--he seems to frequently hold
his words, and he only bursts out once or twice during the film. 
Day-Lewis' portrayal of this man is extremely good; I can tell he is the
kind of performer that loses himself in the character, and this allows
the audience to forget that they're watching a performer do his job.
This is Watson's first performance since Breaking the Waves, and I'm
still as impressed as I was when I first saw her in the earlier film. 
She's a dynamic, emotive actress, and she demands presence the way few
actresses can.  I'm actually surprised that she didn't nail a nomination
for this role--in just two performances, Watson proves she has more
range than most performers working in the business.  The leads are
complimented by a talented and seamless supporting cast:  Cox does a
good job as Maggie's constantly-agitated father, McSorley elicits plenty
of negative reactions as the IRA man who has lost his mind, and Stott is
likable as Danny's alcoholic friend.
A love story like this can only work if we like and identify with the
characters and their story.  Sheridan's script is quiet and subtle
enough that the political subplots don't get in the way of the human
story behind it.  Danny and Maggie are realistic, well-drawn characters;
what makes their relationship interesting is that it's not static--it
changes and evolves through the film, and in ways that make us care
about the people.  
Technically, the film is terrific.  The cinematography is always
impressive, particularly during the boxing matches.  These scenes start
off slowly, but Sheridan's eclectic use of the camera increases in
intensity, and the matches are very exciting to watch.  Similar build-up
is used throughout the film, which results in numerous mini-climaxes
that keep the film entertaining.  However, the film could have been a
bit more emotional.  I like how Sheridan steers clear of that awful
manipulative sentimentality, but some of the scenes that should be
moving feel dry, and are carried only by the performers themselves.  Not
all scenes are like this--much of the film, including the conclusion, is
very satisfying.  
I felt that Sheridan was a little too charitable with Danny's
character, however.  By the last scene of the film, he hasn't done
anything wrong:  he is, essentially, a perfect individual.  The one
complication which I assumed would lead to a violent outburst on his
part was resolved without his involvement, and each time he is forced to
make a split-second decision, he makes the right one.  While this
doesn't hurt our perception of him, his perfect judgment and seemingly
endless wisdom make him slightly difficult to handle as a realistic,
everyday character.
Nonetheless, The Boxer is a good, solid film.  It's a smart, original
love story that both entertains and gives its audience something to
think about.

Title
Review for Bulworth (1998)
Director:  Warren Beatty
Cast:  Warren Beatty, Sean Astin, Halle Berry, Don Cheadle, Laurie
Metcalf, Oliver Platt, Paul Sorvino, Jack Warden
Screenplay:  Warren Beatty, Jeremy Pikser
Producers:  Warren Beatty, Pieter Jan Brugge, Lauren Shuler-Donner
Runtime:  
US Distribution:  20th Century Fox
Rated R:  language, violence, drug use
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
When Bulworth ended, I allowed myself a sigh of relief:  it is possible
for me to enjoy political satire.  There have been several recent
political films that didn't do a whole lot for me -- Wag the Dog, for
instance, I found to be an intelligent but heartless film, while Primary
Colors is unbearable and unwatchable in its awfulness.  Bulworth is a
far better film than these, both in its execution and lasting
impression.  It's a tremendously funny and intelligent picture, but it
also has an emotional center -- writer/director/star Warren Beatty
allows the audience to identify with his character, and, in turn, we
like him and actually care about the story.   
Beatty plays incumbent Democratic Senator Jay Billington Bulworth; the
film opens and we see Bulworth sobbing as he watches his television
spots over and over again.  He hasn't slept in days, nor has he eaten,
and, almost instantaneously, he goes insane.   He's not stark raving mad
(not outright, anyway), but he's definitely bonkers.   It's the final
weekend of his campaign, and his assistant, Murphy (Oliver Platt) has
written him a speech to feed to a group of Black people in a church in
the ghetto.   Bulworth begins the speech, but suddenly goes off track
and just starts being honest.  "You mean," one lady asks, "the
Democratic party doesn't care about the African American community?" 
"Well," he shouts, laughing, "isn't that obvious?"
The story is propelled by a device in which Bulworth puts out a
contract on his own life (he muses later that it's a bad thing to make
decisions when you're suicidal); he keeps seeing a man in sunglasses
(Graham Beckel) whom he believes to be the hitman.   Bulworth also meets
Nina (Halle Berry) with whom he becomes infatuated.   Suddenly, in the
short span of this weekend, Bulworth's no-nonsense "truth in politics"
methods become a national sensation, and he shoots ahead in the polls
despite the fact that he's appearing on television wearing gang clothes
and spewing more profanity than coherent sentences.
Beatty's work on both sides of the camera is excellent.  His script and
direction are both extremely sharp, as is the surprisingly strong
characterization of Bulworth himself.  Here is a man who's reached his
limit, and his way of lashing back is by screwing over the entire
political structure.  I like that the film doesn't take a clear shot at
any of the political parties or affiliations, but at politics in general
and how everything is run by the rich (although the anti-rich sentiments
do get a bit tiresome by the end of the film).  Some of the segments are
simply hilarious, such as a lengthy rap that he delivers at a luncheon
dedicated to him.  
Much of the film is completely absurd, but that's the fun part about
it.  It's an angry, serious film at the core, but the package that
Beatty has created is so much more accessible than recent attempts in
the genre.  What adds to this feeling is Beatty's portrayal of Bulworth;
this is a performance that deserves recognition on a higher scale.  
Beatty is so much fun to watch here -- he's always funny, but he's also
subtle in ways that flesh out his character without dialogue or hugely
noticeable actions.   Beatty is so good that Bulworth, despite his
shortcomings as a human being, is an entirely sympathetic and likable
character almost from the beginning.
The supporting cast is vast and colorful.  Berry is luminous, as
always, and adds to her repertoire of solid supporting roles.  Don
Cheadle has a good role as a drug dealer who uses gun-toting toddlers to
do his dirty work.  Oliver Platt is an actor who should be careful, for
someday I fear he may induce a heart attack with the intensity of his
acting (though he's very funny to watch).  Paul Sorvino adds the
Southern accent to his list of mastered inflections.
Is Bulworth offensive?  I suppose some may see it that way.  I wasn't
offended by the film, but then again, I hardly care about politics.  I
think that people who find this film offensive will just be blindsided
by the honesty of the story.  The film isn't perfect, of course -- the
ending didn't quite work for me, and the a few of the scenes between
Bulworth and Nina feel forced (although the eclectic dance sequence is
fantastic).  But these are minor quibbles about an otherwise brilliant
film.  Bulworth is a smart, uproariously funny picture that proves to me
that political satire can scratch far deeper than the surface.  

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
Star Wars:  Episode I -- The Phantom Menace (1999)
Director: George Lucas
Cast: Liam Neeson, Ewan McGregor, Natalie Portman, Jake Lloyd, Ian
McDiarmid, Samuel L. Jackson, Oliver Ford Davies, Terence Stamp,
Pernilla August, Frank Oz, Ahmed Best, Kenny Baker, Anthony Daniels
Screenplay: George Lucas
Producers: Rick McCallum
Runtime: 131 min.
US Distribution: 20th Century Fox
Rated PG: mild violence, thematic elements
Copyright 1999 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
A fellow critic once stated his belief that a reviewer should not speak
of himself in his own review.  I've attempted to obey this rule in
recent months, but to do so would be impossible in this case.  The fact
is, nearly every person who goes to see The Phantom Menace brings
baggage in with them.  The original Star Wars trilogy means so much to
so many people.  For me, they calibrated my creativity as a child; they
are masterful, original works of art that mix moving stories with what
were astonishing special effects at the time (and they still hold up
pretty darn well).  I am too young to have seen Star Wars in the theater
during its original release, but that doesn't make me any less dedicated
to it.  On the contrary, the Star Wars trilogy -- and The Empire Strikes
Back in particular -- are three items on a very short list of why I love
movies.
When I heard that George Lucas would be making the first trilogy in the
nine-film series, I got exited.  When I first saw screenshots from the
film, well over a year ago, I embarked on a year-long drool of
anticipation.  And when the first previews were released last
Thanksgiving, I was ready to see the film.  But then there was the Hype,
the insane marketing campaign, and Lucasfilm's secretive snobbery over
the picture.  In the last weeks before the picture opened, while
multitudes of fans waited outside of theaters and stood in the boiling
sun days in advance just to be the first ones in the theater, I was
tired of hearing about it.  I was tired of seeing cardboard cut-outs of
the characters whenever I went to KFC or Taco Bell.  I just wanted to
see the movie.  Reader, do not misunderstand.  I did not have an
anti-Hype reaction.  The Hype was unavoidable.  I understand and accept
the Hype -- it's just what happens when the prequel to the most widely
beloved films of all time get released.  
Five minutes into The Phantom Menace, I knew there was a problem.  "Who
are these Jedi knights?" I asked.  "Why are they churning out stale
dialogue with machine-gun rapidity?"  "Why aren't these characters being
developed before their adventures?"  "Why is there a special effects
shot in nearly every frame of the entire film?"  These were just some of
my questions early on.  Later, I asked, "Where's the magic of the first
three films?" and "Why am I looking at my watch every fifteen minutes?' 
By the end of the film, I was tired, maddened, and depressed.
George Lucas has funneled his own wonderful movies into a pointless,
mindless, summer blockbuster.  The Phantom Menace is no Star Wars film. 
Take away the title and the Jedi talk and the Force, and you're left
with what is easily one of the most vacuous special effects movies of
all time.  It's an embarrassment.  I looked desperately for a scene in
which a character is explored, or a new theme is examined, or a special
effects shot isn't used.  There are a few of each, but they're all token
attempts.  The fact is, George Lucas has created what is simultaneously
an abysmally bad excuse for a movie and a pretty good showcase for
digital effects.  This is not what I wanted to see.  I didn't want to
leave The Phantom Menace with a headache and a bitter taste in my mouth,
but I did.
The story centers mostly around Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson, looking lost
and confused) and his apprentice, Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor, who
scarcely has a line in the film) and their attempts to liberate the
people of the planet Naboo.  Naboo is the victim of a bureaucratic war
with the Trade Federation; their contact on Naboo is Queen Amidala
(Natalie Portman), the teenage ruler who truly cares for her people. 
After picking up Jar Jar Binks (a completely CGI character, voiced by
Ahmed Best), they head to Tatooine, where they meet young Anakin
Skywalker (Jake Lloyd) and his mother (Pernilla August).  Qui-Gon knows
that the Force is strong with young Anakin, and so the Jedi Knights take
the boy with them on their journeys.  The bad guys are Darth Maul and
Darth Sidious, neither of whom have enough lines to register as
characters.
There isn't anything particularly wrong with this story when looking at
it in synopsis form.  The way Lucas has handled it, however, it
unsatisfactory.  First of all, we don't learn one single thing about
Qui-Gon Jinn.  Not one thing.  What was his life like before this film? 
Well, I imagine he didn't have one.  That's why he feels like a plot
device.  This probably explains why Neeson looks so hopeless in the
role, and why he's recently retired from film (I don't blame him,
honestly).  Obi-Wan, a character I was really looking forward to
learning more about, is even less interesting.  McGregor has just a few
lines, so anyone hoping to see the engaging young actor in a great
performance is urged to look elsewhere.  Since these two men are the
focus of The Phantom Menace, Lucas has served us a big emotional void as
the centerpiece of his movie.  
Things start to pick up when our characters reach Tatooine; young
Anakin is perhaps the only truly fleshed-out character in the film, and
Lloyd does a thoughtful job with the role.  I was also hugely impressed
with the sand speeder scene; rarely is an action sequence so fast and so
exciting.  And when Anakin says goodbye to his mother, I found it
moving.  Also fairly good is Portman, and she manages to give a little
depth to a character where no depth has been written.  Jar Jar Binks is
one of the most annoying characters I've ever had to endure, but he's
more interesting than most of the humans.
As soon as the relatively-brief segment on Tatooine is over, it's back
to the mind-numbing special effects and depthless action scenes.  I've
seen many movies that qualify as "special effects extravaganzas," but
The Phantom Menace is the first one I've seen that had me sick of the
special effects fifteen minutes into the movie.  The reason is obvious: 
George Lucas has no restraint.  I can't say that I didn't find the
effects original, because I did -- the final battle between Darth Maul,
Obi-Wan, and Qui-Gon is visually exceptional, as is most of the film. 
But I also found the effects deadening and tiresome. 
My breaking point was near the end of the picture, as Anakin is getting
questioned by Yoda and the other Jedi masters; in the background, we see
hundreds of digital spaceships flying around through a digital sky, and
I wanted that to go away.  Can't we have one stinking scene that isn't
bursting at the seems with a special effects shot?  I got so sick of
looking at the CGI characters and spaceships and planets and backgrounds
that I really just wanted to go outside and look at a physical landscape
for a few hours.  
And then there's the question of magic.  What was lost in the sixteen
years between The Phantom Menace and Return of the Jedi?  I have a
feeling that Lucas was so focused on how his movie looked that he forgot
entirely the way it should feel.  John Williams' familiar score is no
help, nor is Lucas' direction.  I think it comes right down to
characters:  there are none here.  I longed for the magnetic presence of
Han, Luke, and Leia, but I got no such thing.  And what about the
ridiculous expectations?  Mine weren't that high; I simply wanted a film
that showed me the roots of the films that I grew up loving, a story
that had a few characters and a few great special effects.  Instead, I
got two hours and fifteen minutes of a lifeless and imaginative computer
graphics show.  I don't hate The Phantom Menace as much as I resent it: 
I'd like to forget that it exists, and yet I can't.  It's here to stay. 
I can only hope that Episodes II and III have something of substance in
them, because if they don't, then Lucas will have pulled off the
impossible task of destroying his own indestructible series.

Title
Review for Senseless (1998)
Director:  Penelope Spheeris
Cast:  Marlon Wayans, David Spade, Rip Torn, Brad Dourif, Patrick Ewing,
Matthew Lillard, Tamara Taylor
Written by:  Greg Erb, Craig Mazin
Producers:  Eric L. Gold, David Hoberman
Runtime:  88 min.
Production Company:  Miramax/Dimension
Rated R:  language, sex
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
Marlon Wayans (yet another Wayans brother?) is a pretty funny guy.  He
seems pretty nice, too.  Even though he doesn't have a lot of screen
presence, he made me laugh quite a bit as I watched Senseless.  And I
suppose that this is the point of the film--get us to like Marlon
Wayans.  Unfortunately, Wayans can't significantly overcome this dopey
script.  The movie has funny moments, yes, but most of them originate
with the profoundly dumb idea on which Senseless is based.  The comedy
is an excuse for the lame story, but everything would be so much funnier
and less painful if this statement were the other way around.
Wayans stars as Darryl Witherspoon, a poor (money-less) college student
trying to make money in order to pay for school, and to help out his
mother and his three siblings.  He tries giving blood four times a day,
but this proves tiresome.  He does various odd jobs about campus, but
none of them seem to pay well.  Finally, he agrees to be part of an
experiment led by Dr. Wheedon (Brad Dourif).  The experiment has Darryl
injecting glowing green slime into his buttocks (and we get to see this
process several times!).  The end result allows Darryl's senses to
become hyper-alert.
He can read microscopic typing from hundreds of feet away.  He can
smell non-existent body odor.  He can hear the ticking of a watch ten
feet away as if it were church bell in his ear.  Once he is able to
control his senses (and the rectal itching dies down), he finds that his
new heightened senses will be particularly useful to win a coveted
accounting job for a big company.  His primary competitor for the job is
the evil Scott Butler (David Spade, who is totally hilarious here), a
Rich Boy who gets everything handed to him by his rich father.  Along
the way, there is the obligatory love affair with a beautiful woman
(Tamara Taylor).
I suppose a pretty good word to describe this film is generic.  Aside
from Wayans, there's nothing much new here.  Not that this is
necessarily bad:  stock-comedies can be enjoyable, even if they aren't
very original.  As a story, however, Senseless is particularly bad.  The
screenplay doesn't even ask me to suspend my disbelief (uhhh, so what
are the side effects of this miracle drug?), so I didn't feel inclined
to take any of it seriously.  Was I supposed to?  Well, the film itself
takes all the moments with Darryl's family extremely seriously.  Most
dopey comedies like this require that there be serious moments, even if
the tone doesn't match the rest of the film.  
This is where director Penelope Spheeris comes in.  I remember her work
on Wayne's World to be pretty good, and here it's certainly not awful. 
But scenes within the film clash magnificently with the rest of the
film, such as all the subplots revolving around Darryl's pierced-up
roommate, Tim (Matthew Lillard from Scream).  And in one moment, a
strange revelation is made about Janice's heritage, and I was very
curious as to why.  It provides an interesting sequence in which Wayans
fondles Rip Torn...and I suspect that this is the sole reason that this
plot detail was included.
And that's what Senseless comes down to.  This is not the kind of film
one can hate--it's just kind of there.  There's no objectionable
material (well, I suppose there's some toilet humor).  Wayans is funny,
Spade is funny, and all of the actors are competent, but the story is
here for no other reason than to provide a few funny sequences for
Wayans to run through.  When the film is over--should you decide to see
it--take a step away and just think about how phenomenally absurd the
entire thing is.  Then ask yourself if you cared as you watched the
film.  When I ask myself that question, I realize that I didn't care too
much.  I guess it deserves points for that.

Title
Review for Hilary and Jackie (1998)
Director:  Anand Tucker
Cast: Emily Watson, Rachel Griffiths, James Frain, David Morrissey,
Charles Dance, Celia Imrie
Screenplay: Frank Cottrell Boyce 
Producers: Nicolas Kent, Andrew Paterson
Runtime: 120 min.
US Distribution: October Films
Rated R: language, sexuality, disturbing images
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Hilary and Jackie is about two musician sisters and their lives
together.  As a child, Hilary du Pre (Keeley Flanders) is a phenomenal
flautist who overshadows her cellist sister, Jackie (Auriol Evans).  The
girls love each other very much, but Jackie doesn't like the competition
aspect of their lives, forced upon them by their mother (Celia Imrie). 
So, she quickly masters her instrument, making it clear to everyone that
she is a musical genius.  Soon, Jackie is the focus of everyone around
her.
Inevitably, the girls grow into young women; Jackie (played by Emily
Watson as an adult) is now performing solo recitals, but Hilary (Rachel
Griffiths) is struggling with her flute lessons.  From that point, the
film shows us the next twenty years from the perspective of both women. 
We first see Hilary's life, in which she meets and falls in love with
Kiffer Finzi (David Morrissey).  The last third of the film is told
through Jackie's eyes, and we see her rise into stardom and her decline
into multiple sclerosis.
Hilary and Jackie is one of the most masterful films of 1998.  Not
since The Truman Show have I seen a film that so flawlessly integrates
skillful acting, lush cinematography, and a wonderful story into a
satisfying, moving motion picture that will resonate in memory long
after the credits roll.  But it's not just an exercise in good film
making -- Hilary and Jackie has a beautiful emotional core that shows us
a fascinating relationship between two extremely interesting women.  
The first element that most moviegoers are likely to notice is the
scenery and cinematography.  The film was directed by Anand Tucker, a
man who clearly understands that the image on screen needs to be as
powerful as the contents of the story.  Along with David Johnson's
superb cinematography, Tucker has made a film of immense visual wealth. 
The colors are vibrant and vigorous; later in the film, when Hilary is
living in the countryside, the way Johnson photographs the huge,
sprawling fields and rolling hills of wildflowers is truly
breathtaking.  Also notable are the scenes in which Jackie performs the
cello -- the passion that emanates through the instrument bursts out of
the screen, making every such scene an exciting, visceral experience.
Of course, much of the excitement comes from Emily Watson's
performance.  Here is a woman who has made three films, and in those
three films has proven a range of acting that most experienced actresses
will never show.  Her first starring role, in Breaking the Waves, earned
her an Oscar nomination, and I sincerely hope that she earns the same
honor for Hilary and Jackie.  I don't know if Watson can really play the
cello, but she does a perfect job of pretending in the scenes that
require her to perform.  But what I really admire about Watson -- and
about the entire film, for that matter -- is her emotional honesty.  I
got lost in her performance, lost in the fact that I was watching
someone act.  
Rachel Griffiths shows just as much skill as Watson does, even though
she doesn't have quite as much material to work with.  The film is based
on the book A Genius in the Family, written by Hilary and Piers du Pre
(it's all based on a true story, just in case you didn't know); the
picture could have easily focused on Jackie, and made the relationship a
side note in the story.  I'm glad that screenwriter Frank Cottrell Boyce
chose not to do this, though, since the relationship between Jackie and
Hilary is what makes the film so fascinating:  even through all the
competition, the two women never stop loving each other.  It's one of
the most layered, moving relationships to emerge from any film this
year.  In a year in which so many films have regurgitated themes and
images that we've all seen countless times before, the people behind
Hilary and Jackie have brought us a visually and emotionally profound
film -- a piece of cinematic art that I will never forget.

Title
Review for Two Girls and a Guy (1997)
Director:  James Toback
Cast:  Robert Downey Jr., Heather Graham, Natasha Gregson Wagner
Screenplay:  James Toback
Producers:  Chris Hanley, Edward R. Pressman
Runtime:  84 min.
US Distribution:  20th Century Fox/Fox Searchlight
Rated R:  strong sex scene, strong language and sexual dialogue,
violence
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
Two Girls and a Guy is most easily summed up with the five words of its
title.  It's about two girls, Carla (Heather Graham) and Lou (Natasha
Gregson Wagner), and a guy, Blake (Robert Downey Jr.).  The two girls
meet outside of Blake's apartment building, at which point they realize
that they're waiting for the same guy.  It turns out that they're both
his girlfriends, and that he's been lying to them for the past ten
months.  They break into Blake's apartment, and have a lively
conversation about their mutual boyfriend.
Through about fifteen minutes of constant dialogue, they learn that
he's said the same things to both of them, word for word.  (My favorite
line is, "You own my [penis].  It's attached to me, but you own it."). 
Soon, Blake returns home, and his girlfriends hide out for several
minutes as he calls his mother, and then goes to the mirror and sings a
few tunes for himself.  At this point, Carla makes herself seen, and
they have a long conversation in which she toys with him and tries to
get him to admit his guilt.  Finally, Lou emerges from the closet, and
they engage in a big, hostile argument.
Written and directed by James Toback, Two Girls and a Guy is a static
picture that takes place almost entirely inside Blake's apartment, with
almost no lapses in time or jumps in action.  There are a lot of very
funny scenes, but there are also a lot of strange moments that feature
inconsistent tones and weird story developments (there isn't much of a
story, but it does develop a little bit).  Too much of the film feels
staged (the picture probably would have worked better as a play) and
doesn't quite strike me as realistic.  It's never a boring picture, but
there are almost as many flaws as there are laughs.  
Take, for instance, Toback's direction.  Since there isn't a lot of
movement (although the apartment is enormous and very interesting to
look at), there isn't much room for cinematography or intricate
camerawork.  And there really shouldn't be a lot of camerawork, but
Toback tries to do the pretentious artistic thing, which results in
really strange camera angles, random zoom-ins and zoom-outs, lots of
focus shifts (the person speaking is out of focus), and other such
pointless tricks.  It certainly doesn't help the film, and really just
calls attention away from the dialogue.
A lot of the dialogue is funny, and a lot of the segments work well as
stand-alone pieces (the film is episodic and can be watched in portions
without seeing the entire thing).  My favorite scene has Blake cornered
in his bathroom as Carla explains that she's been with four other men,
and Lou tells him that she's been with three women.  It's funny, and
works on the right kind of humor.  Most of the scenes that work don't
feel forced, and they are funny because of their realism.
But there are a lot of things here that simply feel strange.  The
entire subplot with Blake's mother is very odd, and never feels quite
right (even the end is completely ambiguous, and neither of the two
possibilities for what actually happened seem very plausible).  Halfway
through the film, Carla and Blake engage in a gratuitous marathon of
mutual masturbation and oral sex, and the reasons for this are not
apparent.  Blake also fakes a suicide at one point just to "prove a
point" as he says; but, the scene is strange and just wouldn't be
feasible in real life.
All of the acting is entertaining.  Downey is, of course, funny, and
seems allowed to roam free and do whatever he wants here (and he does
one hell of a Hamlet, I might add).  Graham is wonderful and beautiful,
and she just makes me want to look at her forever.  Wagner, an actress
I've not seen before, is also adequately spunky and is right for the
role.  It seems that a lot of the film is improvisation, and I think the
three performers have done a good job of staying with their characters
and making the film fun to watch.
Two Girls and a Guy is a reasonably interesting picture, but it has the
feel of a film that was thrown together on a whim, one that needed more
input from other sources.  I'm not sure if this kind of material is
right for film on its own, mostly because Toback doesn't utilize the
advantages that film has over other mediums.  And he's a talented
writer, but someone else should have been involved to mediate the scenes
that are peripheral and just plain strange.  I'm not sure if I liked Two
Girls and a Guy, but at least it kept me interested.

Title
Review for Siege, The (1998)
Director:  Edward Zwick
Cast:  Denzel Washington, Annette Benning, Bruce Willis, Tony Shalhoub,
Sami Bouajila, Ahmed Ben Larby
Screenplay:  Lawrence Wright, Menno Meyjes, Edward Zwick
Producers:  Lynda Obst, Edward Zwick
Runtime:  118 min.
US Distribution:  20th Century Fox
Rated R:  violence, language, nudity
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
>From the ashes of jingoistic American action movies rises The Siege, a
film bold enough to admit that we've got a few problems of our own. 
Director/co-writer Edward Zwick has created a suspense film that
illustrates almost exactly what a suspense film should be:  The Siege
doesn't skimp on story in favor of spectacle, and it doesn't let us down
with the spectacle, either.  It tells the story of a malevolent
terrorist attack on New York City, and is successful not simply because
of good production values and great performances, but because the story
is pointed and inherently frightening.
The film centers around Tony Hubbard (Denzel Washington), an FBI agent
who becomes aware of terrorist activity in New York when a paint bomb
explodes on a city bus one day.  This turns out to be a precursor to a
real bomb, which ends up killing about fifty people.  With pseudo-help
from CIA agent Elise Kraft (Annette Benning) and his partner (Tony
Shalhoub), Hubbard discovers that several Arab terrorist cells are
operating in New York, and their attacks become more and more vicious as
the film progresses.
In steps the military, headed by General Devereaux (Bruce Willis).  The
US Government, despite Devereaux's warning, orders that martial law be
declared on the city, and that every man of Middle Eastern descent be
held and questioned until the terrorists are found.  As expected, chaos
erupts, and the plot thickens -- Hubbard doesn't believe that martial
law is the right way to go about solving the problem, and the military
subsequently finds him -- along with the terrorists -- a threat to the
good of the nation.
That's a lot of plot, even for a two-hour movie.  One of The Siege's
greatest strengths is its economical use of time and story -- Zwick (who
previously directed Washington in Glory and Courage Under Fire) keeps
the film at a breakneck pace, but never so fast that you get confused. 
It's a sharply-made film, and always suspenseful (the bus scene, even
though it's in the preview, is very well-done).  There are some truly
harrowing images; when the military rounds up all the Arab men in the
second half, one can't help but be reminded of the Japanese
concentration camps in the US during World War II.  Even more disturbing
is the way this all looks so much like the Nazi's method for rounding up
the Jews.
Because Zwick and his writers created such a subtle and intelligent
script, the disquieting nature of this prominent theme is only obvious
when you really think about it.  The Siege is extremely bold in its
themes; it reminds us of the principles on which this country was
founded, and also reminds us that we are just as capable of the horrors
that some of the most loathed groups in world history have committed. 
That's not a wishy-washy statement for some summer-blockbuster.  What
makes the film thematically successful is Zwick's subtlety and approach
-- only in the end does he come right out and tell us how crazy all of
this is.  Until then, you might actually think that martial law is a
good solution to the problem.
The Siege is packed full of superb performances, and at the top of the
list is Washington.  Although his character could have been
better-developed (is he married?  does he have kids?), Washington is
such a magnetic and powerful actor that he forces us to care just
because he's so good.  Benning is also surprisingly strong, and
thankfully her role is not a typical Token Female role.  Some have
criticized Willis' performance, but I found it brilliantly subdued --
you never get the feeling that he's enjoying what he does, but you
understand his patriotism.
But that's where the film falters.  In the last thirty minutes, it
becomes clear that Zwick was reaching for ways to keep his characters
involved in the story.  In reality, this story would focus on many
different people, but, as a film, we need focus on one or two
characters.  What begins as a riveting, realistic picture sadly
regresses into silliness, because Hubbard's involvement becomes
impossible to believe, especially when the military finds him as a
threat.  The character dynamics also become annoyingly simple, as
Devereaux is reduced to a demon and Hubbard turns into a preacher.  
The Siege is too smart to resort to shoot-outs and personal vendettas. 
As good as most of the film is, the last fifteen minutes are all wrong. 
It's so refreshing to sit through a film that takes an unflinching look
at our own values as a country, but Zwick should have let the subtlety
of the first half resonate in the second half.  Nonetheless, I highly
recommend The Siege, because it seems Americans have become dumbed-down
in movies that tell us how great we have it.  And while I admit that we
do have it pretty good, I think it's a smart that we take a look at
ourselves every once in a while, just to keep from forgetting that we,
too, are capable of evil.

Title
Review for Eve's Bayou (1997)
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        Eve's Bayou is not a confusing film, but it is a deeply complex one.  
First-time writer/director Kasi Lemmons tells the story of a well-to-do
African American family in Louisiana.  The film opens with a short
narration from the main character, Eve:  she reflects back to the summer
of 1962 during which, she states calmly, she killed her father.  Eve
(Jurnee Smollett) is ten years old in 1962.   She has a sister, Cisely
(Meagan Good), a brother, Poe (Smollett).  Her father, Louis (Samuel L.
Jackson) is a local doctor, and her mother, Roz (Lynn Whitfield),
apparently likes to spend his money.
        It's difficult, if not impossible, to classify a film like this.  Most
of it works like a family drama, but it often shifts almost completely
into a supernatural thriller.   There are supporting characters that are
frequently unnerving.  Mozelle Batiste (Debbi Morgan), for instance, is
Eve's aunt and Louis' brother.  She is described by her family as mildly
insane, and her profession deals with psychic counseling and sometimes
even voodoo magic.  Although she isn't presented as a threatening
character, there is something about her presence that makes the audience
and the characters onscreen somewhat wary.
        In fact, most of the characters have this dubious quality that makes us
skeptical of their goodness.  Louis, throughout most of the film, is the
prime suspect for causing a general uneasiness among the family.  Early
on, Eve accidentally witnesses a moment of infidelity between Louis and
a family friend, Matty Mereaux.  From this point on, each time Louis
smiles and tries to console his family, we observe him through squinted
eyes, wondering what he has planned on the backburner.
        Looking back on what I've written thus far, it almost seems that I'm
describing the plot of a thriller starring a bunch of one-note
characters.  This couldn't be further from the truth, for this is one of
the most colorful groups of characters to grace the screen in a long
while.  The performances, too, are of pure skill and only help the ease
with which the audience can absorb the film.  Jurnee Smollett, in the
lead role as the young Eve, turns in an excellent performance.  Her
naivete and innocence is so clearly conveyed that, regardless of any
immature or downright mean actions she might commit, she is always a
sympathetic character.  
        Possibly even more layered is Meagan Good, who, as the 14 year-old
Cisely, is often disturbing in her role.  Both Lynn Whitfield and Samuel
L. Jackson are extremely effective as the parents, and even though they
aren't the main characters, their performances and the skillful
narrative allow us to understand them in all of their complexity without
a lot of expositional dialogue.  
        With a film like this, it is difficult to explain the setup without
giving away crucial turns in the story.  One of the fundamental elements
that I liked so much about it is the way Lemmons slowly weaves her
story--the smooth, calculated manor in which she allows the audience to
understand the same things that Eve, in her delicate innocence, strives
to understand herself.  There are times when Eve sees things that she
shouldn't see and, in that effect, she does not understand them.  The
audience, too, does not quite grasp everything in chronological order. 
This storytelling technique is extremely effective.
        It is clear that Lemmons worked hard on this film.  Much of the imagery
and the set locations are breathtaking, and often shocking in the
context of the film.  Eve's Bayou is a probing and disturbing
picture--it provides a dramatic story that is both unique and
involving.  It's the kind of film so multi-dimensional that one can
watch it three or four times and still come out of each viewing having
noticed something new in the story.  If Kasi Lemmons is just getting
warmed up, then I'm already preparing myself for her next film.

Title
Review for Object of My Affection, The (1998)
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
There are good things to be said about The Object of My Affection, and
I almost chose to focus on those rather than the negatives.  But, it's a
romantic comedy, and behind the girl-falls-in-love-with-gay-guy gimmick,
it's an often shallow film with bursts of greatness.  I knew there was a
problem when the ending became predictable after the first ten minutes;
it didn't help that nearly every scene left me emotionally unmoved.  Add
to this some truly shameless and trite moments, and you have yet another
well-acted romantic comedy that could have been much better with a
sharper script.
Jennifer Anniston leads the cast as Nina Borowski, a New York social
worker.  Early in the film, she meets George Hanson (Paul Rudd) a gay
elementary school teacher.  Because he's gay, he's not a threat, and
therefore it's okay for him to move in with her when he breaks up with
his long-time partner, Joley (Tim Daly).  Nina's boyfriend, Vince (John
Pankow), is an obnoxious "male" character, and apparently has no problem
with George's homosexuality, or the fact that he lives with Nina.
Well, Nina gets pregnant.  I thought this was going to be a minor plot
disrupter, but it wasn't:  nearly two thirds of this film has something
to do with Nina's pregnancy.  This is not good, really, because, like so
many scenes and devices in this film, it takes our attention away from
the characters and needlessly forces us think about what the characters
may or may not do.  Nina, by this point, is falling in love with George,
and she asks him to father the child with her.
We get the feeling that he kind of wants to do it, but he seems
unsure.  It's about this time when George meets Rodney Fraser (Nigel
Hawthorne), a theater critic who is also gay.  Rodney lives with a young
actor named Paul; George and Paul immediately find interest in one
another, and Rodney is left somewhat behind.  There are many subplots in
this film (one of them involving Nina's step-sister Constance, and her
husband, played by Alan Alda), but this is the only one of significant
potency.  Rodney is a fascinating character, and he gives Nina some
insights that are both moving and thought-provoking.  The revelations
that arise from this scene provide the film with its conclusion.
The one element of The Object of My Affection that is uniformly
impressive is the acting:  Jennifer Anniston is luminous and talented,
and proves versatility with this role.  Paul Rudd also has several
shining moments here, and manages to keep up with his character, who
switches personalities so frequently that it's difficult to tell who he
is by the final scene.  Tim Daly is convincing as George's ex-lover, and
Pankow does the obligatory macho-stuff as I'm sure he was instructed.  
Hawthorne, as I said, overpowers all of these performers in his few
scenes, though; this isn't necessarily a compliment, for I would have
liked to see much more of his character.
What displeases me about this film is the way in which writer Wendy
Wasserstein seems to have tried to keep the homosexuality from being a
gimmick; in doing this, there are plenty of "realistic" scenes of men
kissing men (you won't be complaining about In & Out after seeing this
film) and the only time anyone speaks lowly of homosexuals is when we're
supposed to dislike the character.  My least favorite scene in the film
is when Nina tells Vince that she wants George to father the child. 
Now, I have moral problems with this scene:  this is Vince's child
we're talking about.  He has the right to be its father.  Nina's
response to Vince in this scene is cold and heartless.  On a
less-obvious level, I dislike this scene because Vince starts rambling
off anti-homosexual remarks.  Wasserstein clearly does this so the
audience will dislike him even more, but in a film where all the
characters accept homosexuality without even the slightest flinch, this
device is false and intrusive.
So many scenes have this quality:  they're here to serve the story, and
not the characters.  The big plot-hook here is that Nina asks George to
be the father of her child, and that he falls in love with another man
without telling her.  This kind of plotting might have worked, if I had
felt that director Nicholas Hytner was as interested in the characters
as in the plot.  Alas, I do not, because characters here often have to
do things that don't fit their personalities just so other things can
eventually happen.  
This is one of those films hell-bent on getting to the happy,
"unpredictable" conclusion, regardless of how it must contort the
characters in the process.  And, ironically, the final scenes of The
Object of My Affection are of the least satisfying in the film. 
Everything works out so well for all the characters that I wondered why
I was concerned to begin with.  This isn't a bad film, mind you--there
are good scenes here (everything with Hawthorne, for instance), and the
acting makes the picture worth enduring.  But it's a staged and
predictable film, and just isn't what I was hoping to see.

Title
Review for Deep Rising (1998)
Director: Stephen Sommers
Cast: Treat Williams, Famke Janssen, Anthony Heald, Kevin J. O'Connor,
Djimon Hounsou
Rated R: Language, violence
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    When I first saw the trailer for Deep Rising, I rolled my eyes
because I could see, just from the quick scenes depicted in the preview,
that the film would be a genuinely thorough Alien rip-off with some
nifty special effects. I expected a boring, ho-hum film showcasing bad
acting and silly characters who go into contrived and non-scary
situations only to serve as cannon fodder to a giant tentacled monster.
    But it only took me two minutes to realize that writer/director
Stephen Sommers knows exactly what he's doing. Here is a film that
consciously rips off most of its ancestors (from Alien all the way up to
recent siblings like Anaconda); what makes it such a blast, why I
enjoyed every bit of it, is the simple fact that it makes fun of itself
and its own genre. The acting is great, the characters are interesting
(better than cannon fodder), the humor is fresh and funnier than in most
comedies, the violence is ridiculously graphic and gory, and the film is
just plain fun.
    Treat Williams plays John Finnegan, a boat-operator who, in the
beginning of the film, is taking a group of shady individuals (led by
Wes Studi) to do something that he knows nothing about (his business
motto is "If the cash is there, we do not care"). When John's engine man
Joey (Kevin J. O'Connor) goes snooping around and finds a bunch of
missiles, the bad guys make it clear that they are actually en route to
sink a cruise ship. As it turns out, the owner of the cruise ship, Nigel
Carlton (Anthony Heald), isn't making enough money, so they're going to
loot the ship and sink it so he can live off the insurance.
    Sounds easy enough, until some kind of enormous mutant
creature--with seemingly endless numbers of tentacles all of infinite
length--attacks the cruise ship and destroys everyone on board. At this
point, it is up to our heroes to save the day, not only against the
human bad guys, but from the water bad guys as well.
    Sure, we've seen all this before. You'll find very few of the scare
tactics in this film new. Some of the scenes will even remind you of
films you might have just seen (the jet ski sequences are just like the
ones in Hard Rain). This isn't to say that the film is totally useless
as a horror flick--Sommers dumps the violence and gore on the audience.
The action, too, is really exciting. Scenes towards the end of the film
in which the tentacles come racing down corridors at high speeds are
just a few of the numerous fun-filled moments that Deep Rising has to
offer. Nor does the film feel low-budget and campy--the creature, though
clearly digital, looks professional; and the cruise liner, shot only at
dark and in the rain (not every film can look like Titanic) is at least
convincing for the few seconds that we get to see it. Overall, the
visual presentation of Deep Rising is pretty standard, but good
nonetheless.
    But that's not why I like this movie. The heart of my enjoyment lies
in the characters, who are surprisingly well-drawn and interesting.
Williams is terrific in the main role; he has a kind of passive
aggressive attitude towards everything, but he's so likable and
appealing that I was rooting for him from the start. O'Connor, however,
has all the funniest lines in the film. (He turns to someone, wheezing,
and says, "Can you, like, *get* asthma?") Not only is he funny, but he's
well-written as a character, which is unheard of in a film like this.
    The bad guys too, though there are a few too many (most of them
truly are cannon fodder), are all at least given some sort of identity,
whether it be different accents or sexual habits. Several of the actors
stand out among the crowd, including Anthony Heald, Wes Studi, Famke
Janssen (who plays an interesting pick-pocket thief), and Djimon Hounsou
(who some viewers might remember as Cinque in Amistad).
    I just love totally silly movies like this. Sommers is a sharp
director--he wanted to make a creature flick, but instead of trying to
go serious and disturbing, he made this hilarious and wild film that
looks at itself and laughs. I couldn't have imagined laughing at a film
in which I see a room full of thousands of mutilated humans, corridors
splattered with guts and blood and skin, and live people with only
half-heads screaming post-mortem, but now I've seen one. Deep Rising
isn't for the faint of heart, but it is for those who are tired of the
same old horror film garbage.

Title
Review for Blade (1998)
Director:  Stephen Norrington
Cast:  Wesley Snipes, Stephen Dorff, Kris Kristofferson, N'Bushe Wright,
Donal Logue, Udo Kier
Screenplay:  David S. Goyer
Producers:  Robert Engelman, Peter Frankfurt
Runtime:  120 min.
US Distribution:  New Line Cinema
Rated R:  violence, language
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
I never really read comic books when I was a kid.  I liked the
Transformers comics, and a few years ago I tried with futility to
collect some of the numerous Aliens series.  Other than that, my
experience is limited to glancing about the comic store once or twice a
year.  Some of the art pleased my inexperienced eyes, and from time to
time, I actually found the stories interesting.  The plots were never
coherent -- no, they jumped from scene to scene worse than a badly
edited Warner Bros. movie.  My overall impression had me dismissing
comic books as pornography for adolescents -- the only acceptable way to
indulge in violence and sex without the need of a fake ID.
In the last few years, we've had a deluge of films based on comic
books.  Blade is the newest one, and while it is easily one of the
best-looking films of 1998, it features common problems of the genre. 
It's certainly more satisfying than the dull experience of Spawn, and
infinitely more enjoyable than the laughable Batman & Robin.  The
presence of Wesley Snipes also elevates the film's odd charm.  But there
just isn't any depth -- there are many scenes of attempted depth, but
they're mostly just endless shots of a brooding Blade, staring with
numbing sincerity into darkness.  A couple of lines of convincing
dialogue would have helped out immensely.
Still, it deals with vampires, and is proficient in its us of
exploitative violence and gore.  Snipes plays the deeply disturbed
Blade, a human-looking monster, known in the vampire culture (it is
widely accepted now that vampires do, in fact, exist) as the Day Walker
because -- you guessed it -- he can walk during the day.  In fact, he's
an all-around great guy:  he has all of the vampire's strength, and none
of their weaknesses, aside from The Thirst (he looks so pleased,
immersed in wonderment, as he injects that human blood into his jugular
vein . . .).  Blade, however, hates vampires, because they killed his
mother and made him what he is today.
And that, my friends, is a bad-ass mo' fo!  A butt-kicking,
vampire-slaying, sword-wielding maniac!  Yes, Blade is very good with
his weapons and appendages, and seems rather adept at killing vampires
quickly and with as many guns as possible.  The story comes in when he
meets Deacon Frost (a pallid and unshaven Stephen Dorff), a youngish
vampire who wants to revive the Blood God and take over the human race. 
It's strange how the words "Blood God" don't sound particularly funny in
the film, but strike me as loudly amusing in text-form.  Anyway, it's up
to our main man Blade to stop this incessant vampire madness.
Well, it's the end of the summer, and my tolerance for big-budget
action has reached its yearly low (especially after last week's
un-Avenged tragedy).  It's a marvel that I enjoyed Blade as much as I
did, for it really is the essence of mindless big-budget action:  it's
well-choreographed, sharply directed (by Stephen Norrington), and
quickly edited.  It's also like the upper-echelon of action movies in
it's mock-depth approach, in which case it's clear that the screenwriter
(David S. Goyer, in this case) wanted to inject depth but was only
partially successful.  The result is gory action intertwined with
silent, motionless scenes of brooding.  If only we knew what Blade was
thinking.
But I did enjoy myself, even while admitting that I was indulging in
pornography.  The action is top-notch -- Blade finds many new and
interesting ways to dispatch of his foes.  There are also some funny
running jokes, one of which includes a vampire (Donal Logue) who keeps
getting his hands cut off.  The blood scenes are eclectic and exciting,
particularly the opening scene in a vile vampire nightclub.  Blade also
has a lot more personality than most of the action films to come out
this year, thanks to the always-appealing Snipes and his co-star, the
sometimes-appealing Dorff.  For the record, I also liked N'Bushe Wright
in the token female role, and Kris Kristofferson in the token sidekick
role.
And I suppose that, like all films, this one has to pander to a certain
audience.  Norrington is a skilled choreographer, and a visual stylist,
but he doesn't know much about characters.  I like that depth was
attempted, but it's an unsuccessful attempt:  it takes more than long
shots of nothing to convey a thought or an emotion.  And while the
beginnings of interesting themes are certainly present, none are
developed, and all are abandoned in favor of wholesale slice-and-dice. 
Don't get me wrong -- Blade is a good time at the movies, and easily the
best comic-turned-film I've witnessed.  It's a step in the right
direction, but someone needs to learn that action and depth can both be
important in the one movie.

Title
Review for South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut (1999)
South Park: Bigger, Longer, & Uncut (1999)
A Capsule Review by Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director:  Trey Parker
Cast: Trey Parker, Matt Stone, Mike Judge, Eric Idle, Isaac Hayes,
Minnie Driver, George Clooney
Screenplay: Trey Parker, Matt Stone, Pam Brady
Producers: Trey Parker, Matt Stone
Runtime: 80 min.
US Distribution: Warner Bros./Paramount
Rated R: strong language, violence
Copyright 1999 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
        I expected South Park:  Bigger, Longer, & Uncut to be offensive,
raunchy, and extremely funny, but I didn't expect it to be as
intelligently satirical as it is.  I can honestly say that no movie has
ever made me laugh harder than this one.  While walking out of the
theater, my friend, who is a South Park fan, told me that I probably got
more out of it not being familiar with the series (I've only seen one
episode).  Perhaps that's true; I was certainly laughing louder than
anyone in the audience.  And often I couldn't believe what I was
laughing at.
        The story has our four young heroes learning an assortment of
expletives from a Canadian movie; naturally, this leads to a heated
anti-Canadian climate, and a vicious war against them into which Satan
intervenes.  Created almost entirely by comic geniuses Trey Parker and
Matt Stone, the film attacks everything it can, including the MPAA, the
U.S. Military, social intolerance, small-town mentality, and Bill
Gates.  South Park overflows with profanities used in ways most of us
have probably never heard.  
        The film is so biting, so amazingly funny (I could *not* stop laughing
after the general shoots Bill Gates), that it comes as an immense
disappointment that the last twenty minutes are so bland.  Parker and
Stone focus too much on a strange homosexual relationship between Saddam
Hussein and Satan, and don't find the funniest way to end their film. 
But it's still a quick 80-minutes -- 80 of the funniest and most
culturally in-tune minutes I've ever sat through.  

Title
Review for Knock Off (1998)
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
Dear God, this is a fantastically bad film!  Regardless of what I say
about Knock Off, you can't grasp its awfulness from my words.  You have
to see it and experience it for yourself.  Here's the kicker, though --
I suggest that you do so.  Yes, this is a bad film -- easily one of the
most incompetent films of the year -- but it has a certain misguided
charm that makes it a unique kind of disaster to endure.  In fact, I
enjoyed myself for most of its brief running time, despite the dreadful
acting and a completely incomprehensible story.  
Don't get me wrong:  I'm not excusing Knock Off.  It reaches an
unacceptable level of badness; it's so incoherent that I wonder if it
was hacked up worse than The Avengers was.  It also features some truly
terrible performances from Lela Rochon, Michael Wong, Paul Sorvino, and
-- of course -- Jean-Claude Van Damme.  It does, however, have the
entertaining presence of Rob Schneider, and the excessively inventive
and pretentious direction of Tsui Hark.  As I watched it, I occasionally
wondered if it was aware of its own awfulness.  Now, in retrospect, it
seems clear that it wasn't, but it's still a fascinating kind of mess.
I don't like writing plot descriptions (it is, by far, the most boring
part of writing a review), but, in this case, I'm off the hook:  there
is no way I could write an accurate synopsis for Knock Off.  For the
sake of comparison, I had no trouble understanding The Usual Suspects
during my first viewing.  I paid closer attention to Knock Off, and the
only thing I am able to say about it is that Van Damme plays a dude
named Ray, and is accused by the CIA (I think) of selling knock off
products (knock off products are, of course, products that look like
name-brand materials but are generic and cheap).
I don't know what any of this has to do with martial arts, but there
are lots of martial arts in the film.  Ray is good at martial arts, so
when he has to beat up bad guys, there's no problem.  Rob Schneider
plays his sidekick, although I had no idea who he really was by the end
of the film.  Lela Rochon is just some woman who accuses them of stuff,
while Paul Sorvino is both the good guy and the bad guy at once!  In
fact, every character goes through so many shifts from good to bad that
the end provides absolutely no insight into what any of them really do. 
In that order, Knock Off is completely incoherent and makes absolutely
no sense.
But what a strange mess it is.  It was written by Stephen E. De Souza,
who also wrote Die Hard and 48 Hours.  Can this be the same man?  I
don't see how, unless, of course, huge chunks of the film have been
removed for the sake of running time.  Knock Off seems to have an
interesting premise (as far as action films go), but there's no
semblance here.  For instance, Van Damme is introduced, and then seconds
later he's running a chariot race through the streets of Hong Kong. 
Why?  Who knows.  What are the implications of this?  I have no idea.
Most action films abandon depth in favor of action, and this is
normally a problem.  Knock Off, however, is the first film that I would
have preferred to see with all of the talky sequences cut.  The acting
is embarrassingly bad:  Rochon, in particular, delivers each of her
lines with stiff and talentless insincerity.  Sorvino, in addition,
deserves better than this.  Van Damme is bad, but he's charming in that
bad way, and so I can't say that he's hard to watch (although I rarely
understood what he was saying).  The only exception is Rob Schneider,
who is actually quite funny a lot of the time.
Tsui utilizes so many tricks that he makes John Woo look tame by
comparison.  They're all pointless gimmicks though, such as shots of the
inner-workings of a knock off running shoe.  But his action scenes are
never boring:  one particular piece inside of a fruit factory (a fruit
factory?) is well-choreographed.  Lots of the scenes are pitched well to
comedy, such as our heroes' first encounter with the Rochon character. 
But did Tsui know that his film is beyond ludicrous?  I hope he did, for
the alternative is a frightening thought.
Knock Off has the feel of a truly terrible exercise in camp mania.  If
it were boring, I'd give it zero stars.  But it's not boring:  it's loud
and excessive and completely incoherent.  It's also funny, even when it
isn't meaning to be funny.  A bad film that succeeds as entertainment
doesn't deserve to be fully lambasted.  I recognize Knock Off for its
irrefutable badness, but I can't deny it's zany, useless charm.  Oh, I
know, they're just action scenes looking desperately for a real story,
but they're fun action scenes amongst a crowd of laughably inane
concepts.  It's fun to admire the awfulness of a film like this, but
that doesn't excuse the fact that it is, indeed, awful.

Title
Review for Pleasantville (1998)
Director:  Gary Ross
Cast:  Tobey Maguire, Jeff Daniels, Joan Allen, William H. Macy, J.T.
Walsh, Reese Witherspoon, Don Knotts
Screenplay:  Gary Ross
Producers:  Robert John Degus, Jon Kilik, Gary Ross, Steven Soderbergh
Runtime:  116 min.
US Distribution:  New Line Cinema
Rated PG-13:  thematic elements, language
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
While watching Gary Ross' Pleasantville, I realized how cynical films
have become.  Pleasantville, as its title implies, is not at all
cynical:  in fact, I'd say its most notable virtue is its bright
optimism for human life.  It's a visually impressive film, and one of
the only pictures of the year to use special effects to convey a story
rather than to blind or assault the senses of audience members.  Written
with insight and acted with care, Pleasantville is one of 1998s most
ambitious pictures.  
But, as much as I admire it, it's a seriously flawed picture.  I was
reminded of my recent experience with What Dreams May Come, which is a
visually astounding and ambitious film, as well:  both pictures are
boundless in their ideas, but both fail to assemble the ideas coherently
and make their themes clear.  Pleasantville begins like it really knows
what its about, but by the end, it seems self-important and simplistic
in its claims.  Comparisons to The Truman Show are inevitable, but
Pleasantville lacks the poignancy and bite of Truman.  
It also requires a lot of suspension of disbelief, but I was willing to
humor Ross.  The film's hero is a high-school nerd named David (Tobey
Maguire), a kid obsessed with a TV show of the 50s called
Pleasantville.  The show is, of course, fictional, but it captures the
feel of those TV shows perfectly:  dad comes home every night at the
same time, shouts, "Honey, I'm home!" and his wife has dinner ready for
him.  The kids love their parents.  The balance is there.  Everything is
perfect.  And, through a series of highly unlikely events (I won't
bother explaining, because it's just so strange), David, and his sister
Jennifer (Reese Witherspoon) end up inside the show -- inside
Pleasantville.  It's a culture shock, especially to Jennifer, who has
the reputation of "school slut."
After realizing they're in black and white ("We're supposed to be in
color!" Jennifer shouts), they first meet their parents, George (William
H. Macy) and Betty (Joan Allen), and are forced to eat a mountainous
breakfast of pancakes, eggs, and ham steak.  It's a good thing David is
a pro with Pleasantville-trivia, otherwise he wouldn't know who their
friends are, what the neighbors names are, and what is supposed to
happen in each episode.  It's only when they start messing with the
equilibrium that things go awry:  everything begins when Jennifer has
ravenous sex with a basketball jock.  From there, real human emotions
begin to shine through the perfect facade of the show -- rage, passion,
and love emerge, and with these emotions, color.
Technically, the film is fantastic.  Ross, who previously wrote the
scripts for Big and Dave, is an intelligent writer and a gifted artist. 
The look of the film -- beginning with the production design and
concluding with the remarkable contrasts between black & white and color
-- is inventive and a reward for the eyes.  The world of Pleasantville
is complete, and the image never fails to convince.  It's also a
well-written picture in its plot details and characterization; the main
characters are developed fully, and even the secondary characters are
given enough depth to make them interesting.
Of course, it helps that Ross has such a talented cast to work with. 
Maguire makes a good hero; he's sincere, and he's likable in this role. 
Witherspoon nails the high school slut image with perfection.  Macy is
charming as the father, layering a character who could have been very
one-dimensional (the final scene in the courtroom is moving only because
of him).  Allen is powerful as Betty; her development from housewife to
the independent woman is one of the more affecting of the film's
stories.  Jeff Daniels, playing a soda shop owner who discovers that he
loves to paint, also gives a fine performance.
There's really only one problem with Pleasantville, and it's a broad
problem that affects nearly every aspect of the picture:  it really
doesn't know what it's about.  It's theme is simple enough -- don't hold
in your passions, and your life will be better.  But Ross' metaphors
aren't solid; as much as I like the color idea, it really doesn't make a
lot of sense:  why certain people "get their color" and why others don't
is never made perfectly clear.  And then there are little details that
irritated me (how do the residents know the colors by name if they've
never seen them?).
Blazing with optimism, the film nearly blinds itself in the final
hour.  The first half, which focuses on the kids' clash with their new
surroundings, is often hilarious (the basketball scene is simply
ingenious).  But when feelings of racism arise, and people are
discriminated against for being "colored," the film extends beyond the
level of seriousness that its premise permits.  Let's face it: 
Pleasantville is a fantasy that revolves around a lot of things that
could never happen.  And while it's fine to do fantasy and have serious
themes, Ross takes his material far too seriously in the final half
hour.  Then there's the courtroom scene, which features the late J.T.
Walsh as the Rush Limbaugh-type mayor persecuting David for bringing
color to their serene world.  This scene is totally unnecessary, and
simply wipes away any subtlety that the film had managed to gather until
that point.
And there's one last detail:  the world of Pleasantville has never
really existed.  People have never been as naive or inexperienced as
they are in this film.  I like the theme -- I think it's a good idea to
embrace your passions.  But, when you think about the film as a whole --
the color stuff, the race issues, even the vague poke at the television
industry -- it seems the picture doesn't really know what it's saying,
and covers it up with simplistic claims like "be true to yourself."  
But I can't ignore Pleasantville's strength:  it would be a crime to
shun a feel-good movie as ambitious as this one.  The flaws are there,
and they're significant, but they don't erase the heart and hopefulness
of Ross' picture.  Finally, a film that says there might be something
worth living for.   

Title
Review for Enemy of the State (1998)
Director:  Tony Scott
Cast:  Will Smith, Gene Hackman, Jon Voight, Jack Black, Jake Busey,
Gabriel Byrne, Scott Caan, Loren Dean
Screenplay:  David Marconi, Aaron Sorkin, Henry Bean, Tony Gilroy
Producers:  Jerry Bruckheimer
Runtime: 128 min. 
US Distribution:  Touchstone
Rated R:  language, violence
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
Producer Jerry Bruckheimer employs a lot of big-name directors to make
his films, but all of his movies have a similar feel:  they're all
fast-paced, featuring quick-cuts and lots of close-ups.  The last few,
including Armageddon, Con Air, and The Rock, are all huge, loud, and
enormously expensive films that not only do their job as action
pictures, but manage to have a little bit of substance behind the
flash.  And though Bruckheimer is obviously a man who wants to make
money, it's refreshing to see a producer at least marginally interested
in putting out quality entertainment for audiences.
Directed by Tony Scott, Enemy of the State is a fast-paced action film
that has all of the elements I described above:  true, it is primarily
an action film, but it's not excessively violent, and it actually has
scenes that develop the characters.  By the end, you don't feel like
you've watched a two-hour chase sequence featuring cardboard cutouts. 
In fact, Enemy of the State is one of the more plausible action films to
come around in a while, for it adds an element that we are all familiar
with -- fear of our government.  
Lawyer Robert Dean (Will Smith) didn't have any particular fear of the
government.  However, one day, as he's shopping for his wife (Regina
King), he's confronted by an old friend of his (Jason Lee) who has just
been chased by a bunch of NSA officials.  Just before getting killed,
Dean's friend sticks a digital video into Dean's shopping bags (while
Dean isn't looking).  Dean, unaware that he is the possessor of a video
that features the murder of a high-powered political official, is
suddenly being targeted by NSA officials as a conspirator.
It's your typical wrong-man plot, with a few interesting twists and a
lot of good acting.  For a lot of the film, Dean has no idea that he
did, in fact, have what the NSA wanted.  Everyone thinks he's playing
dumb, when, in reality, he just has no idea what's going on.  It turns
out that the politician who gets killed in the video is opposed to a
national security bill that will limit the privacy of Americans;
interestingly enough, Enemy of the State does a good job bringing out
this theme of paranoia, and ends up one of the more thoughtful action
films to come along this year.  
I've always thought Scott was a good director, and here he shows a lot
of style and a real flair for fast-paced action.  There are a lot of
technical details in the film, and a lot of shots of satellites hovering
above the earth; and while much of the information reeks of BS, an
acceptable amount of it is believable.  The overhead shots of a chase
sequence that takes place on the roof of an apartment building are
spectacular; Scott uses a lot of strange, off-putting camera angles, and
the result is a swift movie that almost never slows down.
The acting is terrific; Will Smith is a very good performer, and makes
a great everyman in this role.  He's likable and funny, and screams
lines like, "I don't know what you're talking about!" with ease.  Also
great is Gene Hackman, who plays an ex-NSA member who ends up helping
Dean.  King, as the wife, is pretty darn good, as is Lisa Bonet as an
ex-lover of Dean's (both women have surprisingly good roles for an
action film).  Jon Voight, as the evil politician behind everything,
sneers very well, but manages to add a level of depth vacant from most
action film bad guys.  There are a lot of good actors in small roles,
including Jason Robards, Gabriel Byrne, and Stuart Wilson.
Enemy of the State is several steps above standard action fare, because
of top-rate work in both production and acting.  It's not a perfect
action movie; there might be one chase too many, and there aren't as
many laughs as I was expecting from a film starring Will Smith.  In
addition, the final shootout doesn't live up to the rest of the film. 
But these are minor issues; this picture succeeds not only because of
Scott's tight, take-no-prisoners direction, but because of a smart
script that has both characters and theme.  I was entertained by Enemy
of the State, but I was also prompted to consider its claims:  how much
control does the government actually have over us?  It's nice to know
that a big producer like Jerry Bruckheimer has learned that it's
possible to make a lot of money with a movie of high quality; let's just
hope that he continues to provide first-rate entertainment like this.

Title
Review for Ever After (1998)
Director:  Andy Tennant
Cast:  Drew Barrymore, Anjelica Huston, Dougray Scott, Patrick Godfrey,
Megan Dodds, Melanie Lynskey
Screenplay:  Susannah Grant, Andy Tennant, Rick Parks
Producers:  Mireille Soria, Tracey Trench
Runtime:  120 min.
US Distribution:  20th Century Fox
Rated PG-13:  mild violence and profanity 
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
While watching Ever After, I realized that the only rendition of the
classic tale of Cinderella I had seen is Disney's animated version.  I
became aware of this about halfway into the film, when I noted that it
was going to be hard for the director, Andy Tennant, and his writers to
include fairy godmothers, talking mice, and carriages that turn into
pumpkins after midnight.  Like most children's' stories, I have no
affinity for this particular fairy tale, but Ever After is a
delightfully entertaining re-interpretation of the story.
Drew Barrymore takes center stage in this version, cast as the young
Danielle.  After the untimely death of her father (she's only eight when
he dies), Danielle falls under orders of her stepmother, Rodmilla (a
very wicked Anjelica Huston), and stepsisters (Megan Dodds and Melanie
Lynskey).  Danielle is, of course, a very strong girl because she was
raised from an early age by her father.  Rodmilla sees this as an
advantage, and puts Danielle to hard labor for ten years.  When Danielle
reaches the ripe age of eighteen, she's a confident and hard-working
young woman, in addition to being fantastically attractive.
So, when she meets the Prince Henry (Dougray Scott), heir to the French
throne, he's instantly enthralled with her intelligence (she likes to
read) and passion (she's a socialist).  But, feeling that her status is
not good enough for him, she spins a lie in which she pretends to be a
rich Baroness whenever he's around.  What she doesn't realize is that
Henry is looking for his bride, and that her stepsister, Marguerite
(Dodds), is successfully attempting to win the right to be his wife.
It takes a lot of talent to wring interest out of a story told so many
times, and Tennant proves that he's up to the task.  Visually, the film
is impressive, with nice cinematography, and fantastic sets and
costumes.  I never got the feeling that I was watching something
artificial, or that any of it took place on a sound stage.  Some of the
scenes are truly fantastic, such as the infamous ball.  It's refreshing
to see a Hollywood period piece that actually pays attention to details
(although all the actors have British accents, despite the fact that
they're living in France).  
Tennant is also a gifted storyteller, and he makes this clear in the
passion with which this story is told.  True, some of the scenes are
nearly overdone, but Tennant is a master at payoffs -- there are
numerous segments that thrilled me, and had the audience around me
cheering with excitement.  There won't be an indifferent mind in the
house when Danielle finally has her way with Marguerite, or when Tennant
shows us the best way to take revenge of a wicked stepmother.  And the
film never regresses into banality or stupidity -- Ever After is a fairy
tale, but it's an imaginative and well-executed fairy tale.
Barrymore is luminous in the lead role.  It's nice to see a child actor
that actually made it through the teenage years; Barrymore, in addition,
was one of the few child actors who had talent.  Here, she perfects a
British accent (but shouldn't it have been a French accent?), while
injecting Danielle with multiple layers of intelligence and strength. 
She is the heart of this film, and manages to elevate the already-high
quality of the overall package.  The supporting roles are colorful,
particularly from Huston.  She was clearly born to play this role; her
eyes seethe wickedness even when she isn't speaking.  Scott is also very
good (and very funny) as the spoiled prince.  Dodds, as the bitchy
stepsister, is perfect, while Lynskey (who was fantastic in Heavenly
Creatures) is likable as the good stepsister.
The previews for Ever After didn't look promising; I expected a
thoughtless and dry interpretation of the story.  Instead, I got this
film, which is energetic and charming -- this is Hollywood storytelling
at it's finest.  In addition to crafting a great picture all-around,
Tennant has discovered the best possible way to avoid the magic spells
and talking animals that most people will expect from the story.  He
deserves double bonus points for that.

Title
Review for Mummy, The (1999)
Copyright 1999 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Sometime around 1100 BC, an Egyptian guy named Imhotep had an affair
with the Pharaoh's wife, killed the Pharaoh, and then was subjected to
horrible torture and an eternal curse.  Several thousand years later, in
the 1920s, an American explorer and a British librarian go looking for
treasure, but end up finding Imhotep.  Imhotep is still alive, but now
he's a mummy, and he's very mad.  He proceeds to unleash the 10 plagues
of Egypt on the people around him, while simultaneously sucking mortals
dry so he can get his skin back (after all, it's been three thousand
years, and most of his skin has decomposed).  
Anyone who takes Stephen Sommers' The Mummy seriously is wasting his or
her time.  This is not a serious film.  It's a two-hour joke.  It's also
relentlessly funny and entertaining as heck.  Purists will agree that
The Mummy is not as good as Sommers' previous film, the woefully
underrated (but similarly hilarious) Deep Rising, but there's still fun
to be had here.  You see, Stephen Sommers is a man who understands his
genre and knows that the only way to truly avoid criticism is to
criticize your own movie.  So many horror films go for poker-faced
stiffness and end up completely absurd (Virus, for instance, would have
been ten times better with Sommers at the helm).  The Mummy is a film
bursting at the seams with logical inconsistencies and senseless plot
developments.  It also features gleeful use of anachronistic dialogue
("This country is really messed up!" would not have been a common phrase
in 1926, even for an American treasure hunter).  But I can't avoid
admiration of a film in which a CGI mummy explodes into a fearful cloud
of dust after being hissed at by a fluffy white cat.
Speaking of dust, The Mummy is the sandiest movie I've ever seen. 
There is so much dirt and sand and dust here that I felt like I needed
to shake out my shoes when the picture was finished.  In fact, one of
the neatest effects in the movie features a wall of dust that turns into
Imhotep's face and swallows an airplane.  The characters are constantly
covered in sand, they're always sneezing, and the Mummy himself bursts
into dust whenever he can.
The Mummy is a loose remake of the 1932 film of the same name.  I can
recommend this film in good conscience only because it is so acutely
aware of its own badness.  The cast, too, is in on the joke, which helps
a lot.  Brendan Fraser, an actor I admire for his range, is quite funny
as Rick O'Connell, the surly American treasure hunter; he goes for the
throat with the macho-man attitude and hits the right note for the
role.  Rachel Weisz, playing the British librarian Evelyn, is very
appealing and shows splendid comic timing (she's also a Kate Winslet
look- and sound-alike, which probably is no accident).  John Hannah is
on hand as Jonathan, Evelyn's wife, and has some of the funnier lines in
the film.  Kevin J. O'Connor, who stood out in Deep Rising, has a fine
supporting role as Beni, the cowardly Egyptian guide.
There are parts in The Mummy that I found immensely funny.  The hissing
cat is one such moment.  Sommers makes the most of every cliche he can;
after a mysterious brush of wind passes by our heroes for about the
fifth time, Rick says, "That happens a lot around here."  The film is
adequate as an action picture; I liked a lot of the special effects,
including the sand wall and the walking corpses, and the finale features
some truly amazing swordplay between Rick and a horde of CGI skeletons. 
On the whole, however, the film is more effective as a comedy.  That, I
believe, will be its box office downfall.  The Mummy had a good opening
weekend, but the picture was marketed as a serious action-horror film. 
Fans going in expecting to see serious action will be disappointed.  I
wasn't disappointed; I got what I expected after learning that Stephen
Sommers is responsible for the movie.  And though I believe that The
Mummy could have been even funnier and a lot more thrilling, it's a
commendable effort from a man who clearly would rather make a horror
picture that prompts laughter rather than screams.

Title
Review for Avengers, The (1998)
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
My opinion on a film can be easily swayed by the presence of actors I
love.  I love Ralph Fiennes.  I love Uma Thurman.  I love Sean Connery. 
Hell, I'm even a big fan of Jim Broadbent and Fiona Shaw.  I saw the
fantastic preview for The Avengers nearly eight months ago, and I've
been eagerly awaiting the film ever since.  A few months into the
summer, however,  I noticed that its release date had been changed a few
times, and that it had ended up in the mid-August dumping ground.  Then,
in this final week before its official release, I learned that it was
not to be screened for critics.  And that the actors had not been
plugging the film on late night programs.  And that it was directed by
the same man who brought us the remake of Diabolique.
My expectations fell to pieces when I learned all of these things.  The
film I saw today didn't even meet those expectations.  This is a lousy,
incoherent mess.  I would slam it harder, if it weren't for the nifty
sets and the mere presence of all these fine, lovable actors.  But sets
are ultimately empty, and the performances are completely uninspired. 
That's the main problem with The Avengers:  for all it's hip-hop flash
and tidal waves, none of it feels the least bit energetic or inspired. 
It's like a chore, a bland exercise in superhero film making.  It also
feels like its been cut to pieces, clocking in at 90 minutes and
forgetting to close some of its own subplots.  This is just plain
depressing.
The Avengers is a film version of the popular 60s television show. 
Frequent readers of mine will not be surprised to learn that I've never
watched an episode.  I wasn't alive then.  I don't even watch television
now.  I'm very sorry that I don't have this perspective, but, judging
from the reviews I've already read, knowing the TV show just makes
matters worse.  I didn't know and love John Steed and Emma Peel, and
therefore I was not as upset to see how these Actors I Love have managed
to thrash their roles.  
I also doubt that familiarity with the series would allow me to
understand more clearly the chain of events that do take place in this
film.  Based on what the film told me, I gather that Steed (Fiennes) is
some kind of British super guy (somewhat like James Bond), and that Dr.
Peel (Thurman) is just a really smart doctor, who also happens to know a
lot about weather and about beating people up while limited by tight
leather suits.  They are to work together, under Mother's orders (Mother
is played by jolly Jim Broadbent, while his co-conspirator, Father, is
played by the equally-talented Fiona Shaw).  
It seems that there is a man out there controlling the weather.  His
name is De Wynter (Connery).  He is a crazy Scottish guy.  Our heroes
had better stop him, or else . . . the weather will keep getting colder
until they "have to go to hell to warm up" (one of the film's few funny
lines).  Along the way there is subplot after subplot, hinged sloppily
together by scenes that go nowhere, feel perfunctory, and ultimately
make no sense.  
For example, our heroes are eventually attacked by a swarm of giant
mechanical insects with machineguns attached to their torsos.  Now,
killer bugs don't really go with the weather-controlling theme of the
film.  The purpose of the bugs, other than to annihilate our heroes, is
never established.  They're never even directly connected to De Wynter
(they're controlled by his crazy henchman, played by Eddie Izzard).  The
special effects aren't bad, but they're loud, obnoxious, and intrusive. 
Like so many scenes in the film, it seems present only to keep your
attention from waning.
And I guarantee you, it will wane.  I stopped thinking about the story
when I realized it didn't do any good to think.  The Avengers has
clearly been chopped up and re-assembled so many times that even the
people involved couldn't tell us what happens.  There are several scenes
in the preview that didn't make the final cut.  In addition, many of the
sequences have irritating, grainy film quality, which makes it feel
low-budget (the last scene is particularly bad).  The scenes that don't
feature action should be electric, thanks to our wonderful cast.  They
aren't.  The action scenes should be electric, because this is an action
film.  They aren't, either.  
And what about this wasted cast?  Oh, it makes me weep with
disappointment.  We're talking Ralph Fiennes here, one of the best
actors working today, one of the best actors *ever*.  I love the guy. 
I've loved all his films, until this one.  He seems like he wants to
understand the film, but he's as lost as we are.  And Thurman, in all of
her spectacular beauty and talent, can't manage to look at home here. 
(I don't blame her completely, for there is a strange subplot involving
her evil twin that is never explained in any way, and it can't be easy
to deal with such terrible screenwriting.)  Connery, however, seems the
most out of it, totally lacking any kind of focus, or interest, for that
matter.  
Who is to blame?  Is it the screenwriter, Don MacPherson?  Perhaps,
although I can see a shell of a story here that could have been a good
superhero movie had it been handled right.  Is it the actors?  For God's
sake, no -- these people clearly lost interest when they saw the
inevitable path of destruction on which this film was travelling.  I
blame director Jeremiah Chechik, who shouldn't have been given the task
to begin with.  His best film, Benny & Joon, is quirky in the same way
that this one was supposed to be, but here it mostly seems like a lot of
failed attempts at wit and humor.  Add to that a lack of experience in
big-budget action, and you have the worst choice for director this side
of James Ivory.
If The Avengers has a saving grace, it's the set design.  The sets (by
Stuart Craig) are big, colorful, and often pleasing to look at.  I like
the final set-piece, on De Wynter's island, even if none of it makes a
bit of sense.  I admired the overhead view of the stairs, showing Dr.
Peel running around in circles and never getting anywhere.  I also
enjoyed Michael Kamen's music score, particularly in the opening
credits.  But this stuff is routine -- good sets and music are nice, but
there's a lot more that needs to be here.  Inspiration, for instance,
would have been really nice.  Maybe a little bit of cohesion in the
story.  Or a sense of purpose.  Most of all, though, I would have liked
to see these actors relish in their roles.  Damn this movie for not
giving them the chance.

Title
Review for Corruptor, The (1999)
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
The Corruptor is a big silly mess of an action movie, complete with
pointless plot turns and gratuitous violence.  It's not abhorrent, or
even blatantly unlikable, but it doesn't make a shred of sense.  And
whose idea was it to have the director of Glengarry Glen Ross direct an
action film?  James Foley knows a lot about characters and acting, and
those are the strengths of The Corruptor.  But the quiet scenes clash
with the ludicrous action nonsense, and the result is less like a movie
and more like a derailed train.
At least we have Chow Yun-Fat in the lead role.  Chow plays Nick Chen,
a Chinatown cop.  He's a good cop, as the first few scenes establish,
and he's very familiar with Chinatown.  That's probably why the
powers-that-be decide to team him up with a rookie named Danny Wallace
(Mark Wahlberg).  Nick and Danny begin by stepping on each other's toes,
but finally end up liking each other once they both get a chance to save
the other one's life.  
What happens after that is kind of a mystery to me.  I'm fairly certain
that the villains are all part of the Fukienese Dragons, led by a young
Chinese psycho named Bobby Vu (Byron Mann).  I'm also pretty sure that
Nick is on the payroll of Henry Lee (Ric Young), a gangster dealing in
prostitutes and other neat stuff.  I'm not quite sure why Henry Lee
decides to employ Danny, although this makes for some ridiculous (albeit
unpredictable) plot twists along the way.  There's also an interesting
subplot revolving around Danny's father (Brian Cox), but it doesn't have
much to do with the main story.
One of the problems, as I said, is that the movie doesn't make any
sense.  I don't blame this entirely on Foley, because he's obviously a
good director.  I'm more inclined to point my finger at Robert Pucci's
script, which doesn't seem to be in tune to the way normal people act. 
One scene early on had me particularly annoyed:  Nick confronts his boss
because he's angry about his new white partner.  He's shouting and
pointing his finger and stepping on the furniture, and I was thinking
that I would have fired him if he had done that to me.  (In addition,
the film takes a bite into race-related issues, and never develops them
at all.)
There are a lot of scenes like this one, and none of them are very
coherent.  There's also a considerable language barrier, given that Chow
and some of the other actors have thick Chinese accents.  The plot
itself never straightens out.  I'm not sure who or what the Fukienese
Dragons are, or why Henry Lee is associated with them, or what they do
as a group.  The Corruptor is an action movie, and so all these weird
plot developments are decorated with loud and violent action sequences. 
The sequences aren't bad, but they're not new; how many car chases
through Chinatown have you seen?  On that note, how many Chinatown cop
movies have you seen?  One too many, I'd imagine.
Foley's strength is clearly in characterization, and he does a pretty
good job here.  The scenes between Nick and Danny are very good, and I
actually got a feel for their characters; a bond forms between them that
holds parts of the film together.  Chow and Wahlberg are both good
actors; Chow is a pro, and can do this kind of stuff in his sleep. 
Wahlberg seems less at home in this atmosphere, but he's still fun to
watch.  I also liked the subplot involving Danny's father; Brian Cox's
performance is powerful, and his character makes a compelling moral
compass for Danny.  
But the film ultimately fails, mostly at the hands of insane
incoherence and overly-familiar action scenes.  A complicated plot can
be successful, but the story needs to make sense when it's over.  The
Corruptor never manages to make any sense -- it just keeps spinning out
of control until, finally, there's nothing left to hold on to.

Title
Review for Midsummer Night's Dream, A (1999)
Director: Michael Hoffman
Cast: Kevin Kline, Michelle Pfeiffer, Rupert Everett, Stanley Tucci,
Calista Flockhart, Anna Friel, Dominic West, Christian Bale
Screenplay: Michael Hoffman
Producers: Michael Hoffman, Leslie Urdang
Runtime: 
US Distribution: 20th Century Fox
Rated PG-13: sensuality, nudity
Copyright 1999 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
I've always been sort of a purist when it comes to Shakespeare.  I
think it is possible to update his plays and place them in a period of
time in which they were not intended to be set.  But this is not an easy
thing to do.  Those who have seen William Shakespeare's Romeo + Juliet
have experienced the ultimate failure in an update of a Shakespeare
play.  Michael Hoffman's A Midsummer Night's Dream is much better than
that other movie, and I was thisclose to giving it a favorable review. 
And while I have nice things to say about it, the film just doesn't work
the way it should.  The first reason for this, perhaps, is that it's set
at the turn of the 19th century for no reason whatsoever.  It's also an
artistically confusing film:  why do all the sets look so obviously
fake?  Why do the actors feature an array of non-matching accents?  Why
do so many of the scenes occur in the exact same spot of woods?  These
are questions I had when I should have been concentrating on
Shakespeare's brilliantly-conceived story.
But I have to give Hoffman credit for following the play so closely. 
>From what I could tell, no scenes have been removed, and only parts of
speeches have been trimmed down.  Other than that, Hoffman has done the
source material justice with his script.  The story is a familiar one: 
The four lovers, Demetrius (Christian Bale), Lysander (Dominic West),
Helena (Calista Flockhart), and Hermia (Anna Friel), are manipulated
relentlessly by Puck (Stanley Tucci) and Oberon, the Fairy King (I stand
by my belief that Rupert Everett has this role as part of a Hollywood
in-joke).  Meanwhile, the lovable lout Bottom (Kevin Kline) and his
partners in stupidity work to put together a lame stage version of
Pyramus and Thisbe.  The basic set-up of the film lends itself to a
series of entertaining and/or tedious scenes in which lovers run around
and shout at each other in a forest near Athens.
The film is a mixed bag of scenes that are notably over-the-top and
others that are strangely perfunctory.  The best scene in the film is
the last one, in which the six lower classmen get to perform their play
before the aristocracy.  Here, Kevin Kline shows off his
well-established comic brilliance.  But Hoffman's direction of the scene
is really what carries it, as the players make desperate attempts to
impersonate walls, moons, and lions.  The other high points of the film
lie mostly in a few key performances.  Calista Flockhart is quite funny
as the love-starved and ravished Helena; even though Flockhart doesn't
attempt a British accent, she enunciates properly and does a good job
with her lines.  Everett takes an interesting angle on Oberon, playing
him as stone-faced and extremely pensive.  And Stanley Tucci makes a
perfectly indifferent Puck, roaming around the forest and making people
fall in love with each other just because it's amusing.
Many scenes are great, and they add up to a lot, but there are too many
failed moments to ignore.  Michelle Pfeiffer annoyed me, playing Queen
Titania as some sort of breathless, shiny-eyed nymph; I disliked most of
her scenes, and particularly the tedious ones in which she falls for
Bottom following his transformation into an ass.  David Strathairn
entirely misses the point of the paradoxical Theseus, and delivers his
lines with a cold, inappropriate American accent.  Hoffman also missed
the boat with Bottom and his crew; they're not nearly silly or stupid
enough, and scenes that are hilarious in the text come across as
detached and obligatory here.  Shakespeare makes explicit their misusage
of words and their inability to understand the point of drama, but here
Hoffman seems to blow right past all the jokes.
In general, I don't understand why the movie looks so flashy and fake. 
The forest of Arden looks particularly set-like, and pointless special
effects (like a CGI vine wrapping around Bottom's feet) call too much
attention to themselves.  I realize that live theater does not allow for
fancy special effects and sets, but films do, and a film version of a
play should not be made to look fake.  And then there's the needless
time period-change, which bothers me every time a director attempts it: 
people didn't speak like this at the turn of the 19th century. 
Hoffman's A Midsummer Night's Dream works on many levels -- nothing
could be as bad as that other movie -- but it doesn't go far enough with
some themes, and takes others way too far.  I think it all boils down to
a general lack of consistency -- what was Hoffman's vision?  What's with
the fake sets and the half-hearted "update?"  There are big laughs to be
had in this film, but Hoffman's puzzling artistic choices keep it from
being the really good update of a Shakespeare play that it might have
been.

Title
Review for Great Expectations (1998)
Director: Alfonso Cuaron
Cast: Ethan Hawke, Gwyneth Paltrow, Hank Azaria, Chris Cooper, Anne
Bancroft, Robert De Niro
Rated R: Language, sexuality
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    This is one of those extremely rare cases in which I have actually
read the source text from which a film is based. Dickens' Great
Expectations was one of the books that I decided might be worth my time
in high school (though I was wary after David Copperfield). I was
pleasantly surprised by the novel, which I found to be an entertaining
and very insightful look into the growth of one young boy named Pip.
    The film version, for all who have not seen the preview, is a
modernization of the story. Finn is the name of the character, and he is
valiantly played by Ethan Hawke. The film opens in Florida and we are
introduced to Finn (as a child, played by Jeremy James Kissner) in the
famous scene with the escaped convict, played by Robert De Niro. Finn
brings the convict food out of the goodness of his heart, but the
convict is captured anyway. Later, we meet Finn's stepfather, Joe (Chris
Cooper); Finn helps Joe with his day-to-day labor, and it becomes clear
that, despite their lower-class living, they are at least somewhat
content with their lives.
    One day, Finn gets a call from the richest woman in Florida, Mrs.
Dinsmore (Ms. Havisham in the book); she wants Finn to come and
entertain her with his artistic talents. When he arrives at her home, he
finds an eccentric, possibly psychotic, woman (Anne Bancroft) who lives
in a great big, run-down house with her niece, Estella. The film takes
off from there, going through the many love battles between Estella and
Finn; Finn later ends up in New York as a successful artist, still
trying to win Estella's love.
    What I found most fascinating about the film is how close director
Alfonso Cuaron came to creating the same images that I pictured as I
read the book. Given that the book is from a different time period, I
find this amazing. The cinematography and production design are truly
striking, most notably in the scenes depicting Mrs. Dinsmore's lavishly
decadent home. The courtyard in front of the house, ornamented with
overgrown trees and vines; the rooms indoors, devoid of furniture but
full of empty space--the locations in this film feel detached from time,
as if we could look back on them in ten or thirty or one hundred years
and they will all be the same.
    I also think Hawke is the perfect choice to play Finn. Hawke has the
kind of strength that this character needs, and he is capable of letting
the audience know that a lot of what he does is just for show, that he
isn't as strong and sure of himself as he seems. Ironically, this
performance is not as powerful as I was expecting. The scenes in which
he is drawing Estella are very well-done; sometimes, however, when he
gets into situations in which he has to speak softly and be subtle, he
drops the ball and makes some lines sound silly.
    Gwyneth Paltrow plays Estella as an adult, and she does a great job
in the role (though I pictured the character to look entirely
different). I could see how some may say that she's one-dimensional, and
often purely cruel, but Paltrow conveys just the right amount of inner
torture, and it becomes clear that what she does to Finn is not out of
spite, but out of habit. Supporting performances from Anne Bancroft,
Chris Cooper, Hank Azaria, and Robert De Niro are all unique and
colorful, and add a lot of life to the film.
    Like all films, this one is not perfect. I wouldn't say that it
doesn't live up to the book, because I think in many ways it does. What
the film does that doesn't feel quite right is that it centers far too
much on the relationship between the characters and not enough on just
what Finn is doing and thinking in his life. It gets almost repetitive
at times, and I found myself saying, "Okay, so he's going to get screwed
again here," and I nearly became detached from the story a couple times.
    There are some truly brilliant scenes, though. My favorite in the
film is probably the one in which Finn storms into a restaurant,
approaches Estella, and says, "Would you like to dance?" with her
fiancée sitting right there. After dancing for a few seconds, he takes
her outside in the rain and they share a moment of passion--followed by
sex, of course.
    Great Expectations is thick on atmosphere and character, and in the
end I found it to be an effective film. Unlike the cinematic tragedy of
William Shakespeare's Romeo + Juliet, Cuaron has successfully updated a
classic tale, and, despite a few flaws in content and story
concentration, the result is an intelligent, insightful picture that
both fans of the book and those not familiar with it can enjoy.

Title
Review for Ronin (1998)
Director:  John Frankenheimer
Cast:  Robert De Niro, Jean Reno, Jonathan Pryce, Natascha McElhone,
Stellan Skarsgard, Skipp Suddeth, Sean Bean
Screenplay:  J.D. Zeik, Richard Weisz 
Producers:  Frank Mancuso jr.
Runtime:  118 min.
US Distribution:  MGM/United Artists
Rated R:  strong violence, language
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
In recent years, the kingdom of the action film has gone awry.  I'll
admit up front that it's a dubious category to begin with, because, if
you think about it, action films are little more than stylized and
widely-accepted pornography.  I don't look down upon them as a whole,
for there are many that are quite good.  But it seems that most action
films that arise these days are either big, loud, and stupid (The
Avengers), small, timid, and stupid (Mercury Rising), or just plain
stupid (Godzilla).  Here, at last, is a film that doesn't quite fit into
any of these categories.
John Frankenheimer's Ronin (which, despite what the credits say, was
written mostly by David Mamet) is an action film that seems to aspire to
realism and anti-silliness.  It is highly stylized, with some of the
best camera work and car chases I've seen this year, but it's also about
characters and emotions, with Mamet's cynical edge shining through
almost every moment of dialogue.  The film is exciting and always
enjoyable, but it's also thoughtful in a way few action films are (or
even try to be).  Films like this remind me that even pornography can
occasionally pass for art.  
However, the most interesting thing in Ronin is its complete lack of
any story.  It's just about a bunch of international crooks trying to
get their hands on a metal case.  The title of the film refers to a
group of samurai who have lost their master, and roam the countryside
searching for mercenary work; the characters in this film behave much
the same way.  The main character is Sam (Robert De Niro), an American. 
He's a sharp guy, and keeps most of his buddies alive (ah, I love the
jingoistic themes in American action films).  Among his accomplices are
Vincent (Jean Reno), a French guy, Gregor (Stellan Skarsgard) a Russian
guy, and Deirdre (Natascha McElhone), an Irish woman.  
Deirdre, as it turns out, is the one leading the charade, and her boss,
Seamus (Jonathan Pryce), is the one who wants the metal case.  What's in
the case?  Hell if I know.  The metal case is nothing more than a red
herring, and because every single review I've read of Ronin mentions the
fact that we don't get to find out what's in the case, the question
never once surfaced in my mind as I viewed the film.  To be honest, I
don't care what's in the case.  If you think about it, there's probably
nothing in the case, for an empty prop is easier to carry around than
one full of gold or drugs or whatever it could be in the context of the
story.
I've read reviews that discuss Ronin as a "confusing" picture, but
there's no reason to discuss it on a level of coherence or sensibility. 
As I said, the plot is pure McGuffin, and the only thing that will
linger in the memory are the characters and the individual action
scenes.  Frankenheimer is an experienced, skillful director, and Ronin
proves that he hasn't lost anything since he made The Manchurian
Candidate nearly forty years ago.  All the action sequences here -- from
the roaring car chases all the way through the shootouts on
claustrophobic Paris streets -- are fresh and original, and never reek
of derivation or obligatory boredom.  The camerawork in the quiet scenes
is even more noticeably sharp; the best scene in the film has Sam,
wounded with a bullet in the gut, guiding Vincent through the process of
removing the slug with a scalpel and a pair of scissors.  
Frankenheimer's visual style is unique and convincing, so much so that
every scene in the film rises far above the typical perfunctory
execution of most action films.  
On top of all this, Ronin has characters.  Sam is an interesting one,
and De Niro is terrific in the role (though he could play this guy in
his sleep).  What motivates him to do what he does is left largely to
the imagination, but a potent romantic subplot with Deirdre is all we
need for full characterization.  In the female role, the wondrous
McElhone (The Truman Show) is vigorous and engaging.  Reno creates a
pleasant, sympathetic character, while both Skarsgard and Pryce turn in
memorable performances as truly chilling individuals.  What makes all
these people interesting, however, are the dynamics between them -- the
characterization resonates beyond the action film backdrop.
I suppose that real-life action sequences rarely happen in real life. 
Even the ones that I'd call "realistic" are pretty scarce in the real
world.  I've been around twenty years, and I've never seen anything that
might work as a thrilling sequence in an action film.  Ronin, however,
makes itself believable by making the characters shady and interesting,
and by having the action take place in a different country, so the
victims of American pop-culture (such as myself) can observe these
things and say, "Wow, that really can happen in Europe!"  Frankenheimer
and Mamet have created a classic action film here, one that will be
remembered because it's so much less silly than its brethren.  

Title
Review for Apostle, The (1997)
Director:  Robert Duvall
Written by:  Robert Duvall
Producers:  Rob Carliner, Steven Brown (co-producer), Robert Duvall
(executive), Ed Johnston (associate)
Cast:  Robert duvall, Farrah Fawcett, Miranda Richardson, Todd Allen,
John Beasley, June Carter Cash, Walter Goggins, Billy Joe Shaver, Billy
Bob Thornton
Runtime:  148 min.
Production Company:  October Films
Rated PG-13:  Violence, thematic elements
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        If I ever again sit through a film about religion, I will compare it to
Robert Duvall's The Apostle.  The chances are, however, that it will not
even come close to the pure emotional power and honesty of this film. 
Duvall, who has spent years making this wonderful film, deserves every
bit of recognition he is now getting for it.   Whatever wait we had to
endure as the film slowly made its way into theaters, it is now clear
that it was worth it.  
        I knew from the first scene that The Apostle is a special film.  It is
at this moment that we are introduced to Euliss "Sonny" Dewey (Duvall),
a Texas preacher.  In this opening moment, he stops at a roadside car
wreck and sneaks out to a crashed car in which a mortally wounded man
and his supposedly-dead wife lay.   Within seconds, he has the young man
opening his heart to Jesus, and it becomes clear that the fear of death
has been wiped away in his acceptance.  Scene after scene feels just
like this one--this is a film of rare honesty.     
        Sonny, as everyone calls him, is well-liked in his community and
church.  At the time of the film, he has just lost the love of his wife,
Jessie (Farrah Fawcett), to a young preacher named Horace (Todd Allen). 
Not long after this, he loses the right to preach in his own church. 
One day, while under the influence of alcohol, he goes to his son's
baseball game and nails Horace with a baseball bat, putting the man in a
coma.   So, he flees Texas and heads to Louisiana, where he goes as "the
Apostle E.F."  With the help of local radio station owner Elmo (Rick
Dial) and retired preacher Brother Blackwell (John Beasley), Sonny
slowly establishes himself in the community by creating his own church.  
        There are so many things that I love about this film, but perhaps the
most important is its spiritual focus.  This is not a film about
accepting religion and doing good things to go to Heaven.  In fact, the
word "religion" is said only once in the film, and it's not in religious
context.  Sonny wants to tell people that Jesus loves them, and that
loving Jesus will make them happy.  He wants people to know that we are
to treat the Lord with respect, but still have a real relationship with
him.  
        My favorite scene in the film is at the height of Sonny's troubles in
Texas:  he is up in the attic of his mother's house, shouting at God: 
"I love you God, but I'm pissed at you!"  Then, when the phone rings,
his mother answers it to find an angry neighbor complaining about all
the noise.  Silently, she hangs up the phone and allows her son to carry
on.  This scene, like so many in the film, are both moving and subtle at
the same time, and they all point to one thing--these characters are
real.
        Sonny is one of my all-time favorite characters.  I like the guy so
much because he knows what he is, and he is not perfect.  He drinks and
commits violence and accepts that of himself; ultimately, he willingly
pays the price for his actions.   There's something so true about this
man--he is a man of God, and yet he still asks a beautiful woman, Toosie
(Miranda Richardson, doing one of the best Southern accents I've ever
heard--especially from a British actress) on a date.  During the date,
he acts just like anyone else would, and at the end of the date, he has
the same desires that the rest of us do.  And he's such a charismatic
man--the audience with whom I saw this film was swept away with Sonny's
sermons.
        Robert Duvall is this film; he is this character.  I am so pleased that
he has been nominated for Best Actor, for I can not think of a more
deserving man in 1997 for the honor.  Everything that I described above
is conveyed so clearly by Duvall, and I, for one, have never seen a
performance so energetic from a 67 year-old man before.   Each time he
opens his mouth, I forget that this is an actor trying to convince me.
        Not only is Duvall's on-screen talent fully recognized here, but his
work as writer/director couldn't be more effective.  I continually felt
absorbed in the film, never once having the urge to look at my watch or
anywhere else away from the screen.   Even though there isn't a
cut-and-dry story, the events that unfold and ultimately lead to an
astonishingly moving and memorable sermon held my interest at full-force
for the entire running time.  And there are subtly poignant moments
scattered about the film--Sonny befriends a young mechanic named Sam
(Walter Goggins), and the conclusion to this friendship is very
powerful.  And Billy Bob Thornton plays a trouble-making racist who
wants to bulldoze the church, though Sonny talks him down in a moment
that is extremely moving.  
        The Apostle is about an eccentric, maybe even crazed, individual who
thrives on doing things that many moviegoers might find "abnormal" and
"strange."  I think the catch is that Duvall wants us to think that
Sonny is over-the-top:  this adds not only to the sheer entertainment
that the film provides, but to the realism of his character.  Sonny,
while understanding his own sins, tries to atone for them by helping
others.  Everything in this film--from the colorful supporting
characters to the emotionally-extreme scenes throughout--has all the
spontaneity of real life.  Duvall has crafted one of the very best films
of 1997 here, a movie that I will think about and love for as long as I
love movies.  

Title
Review for Suicide Kings (1997)
Director:  Peter O'Fallon
Cast:  Christopher Walken, Denis Leary, Jay Mohr, Henry Thomas, Sean
Patrick Flanery, Jeremy Sisto, Johnny Galecki, Laura Harris
Screenplay:  Josh McKinney, Gina Goldman, Wayne Rice
Producers:  Wayne Rice, Morrie Eisenman
Runtime:  107 min.
US Distribution:  Live
Rated R:  profanity, nudity, drug use, violence
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
Suicide Kings is an entertaining, gritty crime movie about a bunch of
rich kids who kidnap a powerful mobster.  It features a lot of colorful
characters, buckets of expletives, pointless scenes that are included
strictly for entertainment value, and numerous moments of intense
graphic violence.  It's not profound or deep, or even that original, but
director Peter O'Fallon and his talented cast force the standard
material into a sly and elusively clever film that will placate even the
most picky Quentin Tarantino fans.
The film centers around four guys somewhere in their twenties:  Brett
(Jay Mohr), Avery (Henry Thomas), T.K. (Jeremy Sisto), and Max (Sean
Patrick Flanery).  We learn that Avery's sister, Lisa (Laura Harris),
has been kidnapped, and that the kidnappers are demanding two million
dollars.  Their plan is to kidnap Charlie Bennett (Christopher Walken),
and get the money that way.  They hold Charlie hostage in the home of
their friend Ira (Johnny Galecki), whose parents are out of town; Ira
gets very upset because everyone is drinking his parents' booze and
dropping priceless antiques on the floor.
What makes a film like this good are the characters and the acting. 
Walken is, of course, fantastically fun to watch as the mob guy who has
softened a bit in his later years.  Walken is a veteran actor who can
get away with playing himself, but he also manages to alter little
aspects of his personality each time to make all of his performances
subtly different.  Also great is Denis Leary, who is another actor who
usually plays himself.  Here, he's a superviolent hitman for Charlie;
he's the kind of guy who will shoot two thugs without flinching, but
decides on a whim to hand five hundred dollars to a homeless guy who
tries to wash the windows of his car.
I was also impressed with all of the younger actors.  Jay Mohr is doing
an excellent job of proving his worth as an actor, for I can't think of
a young performer who has more flair and presence as this guy.  Henry
Thomas (yes, the same Henry Thomas from E.T.) is quiet and brooding, and
handles a lot of the scenes here very well.   Sean Patrick Flanery
(Powder) is adequately interesting, as is Jeremy Sisto (who was great as
the psycho in Hideaway).  The one exception is Johnny Galecki; it's not
completely his fault, for I'm sure Ira is supposed to be an irritating
character.  But he's also supposed to be funny, and I didn't find him
particularly funny.  That's okay -- there are plenty of other characters
to divert my attention.  Not all of these characters are totally
developed, but there are a lot of them and they're interesting enough
that a little bit of missed development is hardly noticeable.
The film, because of the sharp dialogue and O'Fallon's eclectic
direction, moves swiftly and easily to its conclusion; the pace is
certain and the story never feels forced.  It seems to me that films
like this should be more common, but they aren't -- not good ones, at
least.  Certainly Suicide Kings is not as original or ingeniously
conceived as a film like Pulp Fiction, but there is enough talent at
work here to make it a ridiculously entertaining two hours.

Title
Review for Paulie (1998)
It's sickening, really, how adorable the parrot Paulie is in this
film.  I find the relentlessly cute images of the green, talky bird
vivid in my memory (well, it's only been a couple of days since I saw
it).  I had no intentions of seeing Paulie; I didn't even know it
existed until just a few days ago.  Going into the theater, I had no
idea what it was about, but I felt a little out of place with the
hundreds of children and parents around me.  Early into the picture, I
found out that it's about a talking parrot named Paulie, who is adopted
by a little girl named Marie.
Well, Paulie starts to talk to Marie, who has a speech problem
herself.  When her parents think that Paulie is stifling her (she isn't
making any other friends), they pawn the poor bird and move to Los
Angeles.  Paulie is adopted by a lady named Ivy (Gena Rowlands), who
vows to help Paulie find Marie.  Paulie's adventure takes him many
places and puts him in several unusual situations, until, finally, he is
discovered by scientists who find his speech capabilities amazing (who
wouldn't?).  
When Paulie refuses to cooperate, he is caged up and locked in the
basement of the university, where he is found by a friendly Russian
janitor named Misha (Tony Shalhoub).  Just to be fair to the film, I
should note that it's actually told in flashback:  the film opens with
Misha finding Paulie; Paulie then explains his sorted past to the
janitor.  I just thought you should know that.
Most of the characters in the film don't find it very strange that the
bird speaks perfect English, and that it can apparently comprehend
everything with human-like capabilities.  Only the scientists are truly
amazed, and even they do very little about it (and end up banishing the
bird to a basement, where it talks and talks forever, all night long,
and all day . . . every day . . .).  What I thought interesting is that,
as a viewer, I didn't even realize the abnormality of the situation
until almost an hour into the film.  Suddenly, for no particular reason,
I said to myself, "Birds don't talk to people like this."  I give the
makers credit for sufficiently pulling my attention away from the
gimmick.
Of course, what makes Paulie such a severely enjoyable film is the bird
himself.  The special effects, to begin with, are seamless, and provide
a perfect illusion of a speaking bird (no explanation of how a bird
forms words without lips is given, but I'll overlook that).  The bird
ranks right up there with Babe in the cuteness factor; in the scenes
early on, when Marie places a sorcerer's hat on Paulie's head, or when
Paulie evades the vicious cat while spitting off some truly funny quips,
the bird is so incessantly lovable that I couldn't help but smile
through the entire film.  
What I really like, though, is Paulie's personality; this is due, in
part, to Jay Mohr's exceptional voice work, and also to Laurie Craig's
thoughtful script.  The bird is funny, and nice, and therefore works
perfectly as a main character for a feature-length film.  The fine
supporting work by Gena Rowlands, Tony Shalhoub, and Cheech Marin give
Paulie a boost in its high-quality atmosphere.  
Most amazing, however, is that parents are going to be equally
enthralled in Paulie as their kids.  From start to finish, this film
provides lively entertainment, in addition a few good kid-oriented
lessons.  But don't see it for the lessons--see it for this bird, this
talking parrot that is quite possibly the cutest thing I have ever seen
in my entire life, ever.

Title
Review for Dangerous Beauty (1998)
Director:  Marshall Herskovitz
Cast:  Catherine McCormack, Rufus Sewell, Jacqueline Bisset, Oliver
Platt, Moira Kelly, Fred Ward
Screenplay:  Jeannine Dominy
Producers:  Sarah Caplan, Marshall Herskovitz, Arnon Milchan
Runtime:  111 min.
US Distribution:  Warner Bros.
Rated R:  Sex, nudity, language
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        Time and time again, we see period films that revolve around the
primitive idea of arranged or forced marriages.  We learn about and feel
sympathy for the peasant boy who can't marry the rich heiress, whom he
loves, because of his lower placement in the caste system (such as in
the excellent Washington Square); and, sometimes, it's the woman unable
to marry a man of higher class.  This situation is familiar, and often
works as a plot device, but there has to be a spin somewhere.  Dangerous
Beauty, which tells the story of a young woman in 1500s Venice, is a
film that begins with this premise.  What makes the movie interesting is
her method of avoiding the problem:  she becomes a prostitute.
        Of course, she's not an average prostitute:  she's a courtesan--an
educated, intelligent, and undeniably sexy woman who makes men feel
important in numerous ways, and gets paid for it.  The woman's name is
Veronica Franco (Catherine McCormack), and, upon falling in love with a
young senator named Marco Venier (Rufus Sewell), is made a courtesan by
her mother (Jacqueline Bisset).  Becoming a courtesan doesn't change
Veronica's social class, but, interestingly, it makes an affair with
Marco easier, despite his marriage to a cold and quiet woman.
        Conflict arises mainly towards the end, when the Holy Inquisition
assumes control of Venice during a plague which kills thousands of
people.  Believed to be spreading the disease through witchcraft,
Veronica is put on trial for her apparent crimes against God.
        Dangerous Beauty is a lot of things:  it's a love story about two
well-developed and well-acted characters; it's a period film rich in
detail and atmosphere; and it's a political statement of the status of
women in the 1500s.  All of these elements are ultimately successful in
various ways, and this is due, in part, to the steady direction by
Marshall Herskovitz, and the sharp script by Jeannine Dominy (adapted
from the factual novel The Honest Courtesan by Margaret Rosenthal). 
It's remarkable, really, that the film manages to develop each of these
elements while still proving lively entertainment.
        It's liveliness often springs from McCormack's energetic and convincing
performance.  Last seen (and underused) in Braveheart, McCormack
effortlessly proves herself as a leading actress, and I find it a marvel
that this huge, sumptuous role was not given to an actress who has
"proven" herself (not just in talent, but in box-office draw, for I am
speaking of a Warner Bros. film here).  McCormack, aside from radiating
a physical beauty that does, in fact, feel dangerous (in a good way),
she wistfully slides through this film, never hitting a foul note.  Her
performance is both strong and subtle, and developed fully.  We get a
feel for her innocence when she is a maid in the beginning of the film,
but we can also see her strength in her eyes.  Later, as in the
satisfying conclusion, she need not raise her voice to prove her power: 
her calculated words are enough.
        Matching McCormack's talent is Rufus Sewell (Dark City, Hamlet), an
intense actor who gives this rich senator life and verve.  Sewell, like
McCormack, attests with this role his versatility and vigor, and shows
once again that he is capable of holding an entire film with his
presence.  The scenes between the two leads--particularly the love
scenes--are electric:  their dialogue flows smoothly, and they
compliment each other physically.  Also good are the supporting
performers, including Jacqueline Bisset and Oliver Platt.  
        The tone of Dangerous Beauty is complete, and always pleasing.  The
primary colors used are gold and light browns, and each scene seems to
be shot with filters that soften the image.  The sets and costumes, too,
are exceptional and noticeable, and all of this creates a film that
never falters with its mood.  The uniqueness of Venice is done justice
here.
        Perhaps most interesting (and unexpected) about the film is the
statement it successfully conveys.  Here is a woman who finds her own
salvation in going against the typical route of women (which, normally,
leads to being a housewife and a mother to many children).  She doesn't
just reject this monotony, however--she spits in its face by becoming
something that most "ladies" find degrading and limiting.  Veronica
loves what she does, and is happy because of it.  This is not a feminist
film, mind you--there is no male-bashing here.  What there is, however,
is a detailed illustration of how much men desire women, and to what
lengths they will go to have what they need.  
        Like all films, Dangerous Beauty isn't perfect.  It is fairly
predictable in its plotting, and the climax, though satisfying, falls
prey to some seriously heavy-handed emotions.  But these are minor
quibbles:  Dangerous Beauty is engrossing from start to finish.  I
admire films that are complete in their endeavors, and a film that
successfully develops multiple themes while actually making us care
about the characters will forever be welcome.  Dangerous Beauty also
supplies a little history lesson about the importance of courtesans and
the role of women in this society.  And while I am often skeptical about
history lessons learned in films, it's nice to know that a film can, on
occasion, provide more than simple entertainment.

Title
Review for Sweet Hereafter, The (1997)
Director:  Atom Egoyan
Cast:  Ian Holm, Sarah Polley, Maury Chaykin, Gabrielle Rose, Peter
Donaldson, Bruce Greenwood
Screenplay:  Atom Egoyan
Producers:  Atom Egoyan, Camelia Frieberg
Runtime:  110 min.
US Distribution:  Fine Line Features
Rated R:  Language, nudity, adult themes
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
There are good films that I can just sit through and enjoy on a mild
level, slightly removed from the action on screen and never quite
investing myself fully in the picture.  And there are films like Atom
Egoyan's The Sweet Hereafter that remind me of how powerful, how deeply
complex and moving films can be.  Egoyan's picture is a brilliant,
masterful work of cinematic art on absolutely every level.  It encased
me from the opening shot and had me enticed until the last, defining
moment. 
Ian Holm leads the talented cast as Mitchell Stephens, a lawyer who
goes to a small town in Canada where a tragic bus accident has just
killed over twenty children.  The story is non-linear in execution, and
each scene jumps back and forth in time, through various moments before
and after the accident.  Stephens, in what is basically the present-time
of the film, is trying to assemble various members of the community to
form a law suit.  He convinces many of them that the accident was not
actually an "accident," and that someone needs to pay for the tragedy.
Stephens is the main character, but the various other characters make
up the small-town community that is central to the story.  The Sweet
Hereafter frequently shifts back in time to Nicole Burnell (Sarah
Polley), a young woman who is well-liked by the community, and by her
father Sam (Tom McCamus), who is a musician and very proud of his
musical daughter.  Later in the film there are scenes that take place
after the accident, in which we see that Nicole, because of the
accident, has lost the use of her legs.
I can't simply state the plot synopsis of this film, because it's not
about getting from point A to point B, and what the characters do to get
to these moments.  This is a film about the chore of surviving a
harrowing experience, about what it's like to live longer than your
children.  We get the feeling that this community was stable and happy
before the accident, but the good will of the citizens disintegrates
rapidly as Stephens' efforts actually end up separating the community
even more.  
The characters depicted here are realistic, completely fleshed-out, and
excellently portrayed by the cast.  Ian Holm, one of my favorite actors,
is astonishing here.  It is so nice to see him in his first leading role
of his 40-plus year career as a stage and screen actor.  He emits so
much emotion without speaking--his acting is more in his physical
movements than in his voice.  At various points throughout the film, his
daughter, a homeless junkie living on the streets, calls him on his cell
phone as he is interviewing people in the town.  The look on his
face--the way we can see him imploding as he listens to the accusatory
words of his daughter--is something that few actors can pull off.
Sarah Polley is subtle and direct as Nicole.  Her transition from
before the accident to afterwards is just a slight change, but still we
detect a world of difference in her personality.  Bruce Greenwood, who
plays a man who loses two children in the accident, is also very good. 
He tries to start a minor uprising against Stephens; he feels that the
issue should just be left alone.
The narrative structure of The Sweet Hereafter is amazing, and perhaps
what I admire most about it.  Egoyan's screenplay is based on the novel
by Russell Banks, and this seems like the kind of non-linear story that,
on paper, might seem impossible to film.  Not unlike Anthony Minghella's
work on The English Patient, Egoyan manages to tell this story
completely detached from any comprehensible chronology without making it
the slightest bit confusing.  But what is different about this film is
that understanding the timeline isn't important while watching the film.
The altered chronology is not a pointless gimmick:  it serves to make
the story more clear and immersive.  Egoyan does not begin or end the
film with the bus crash (which is a truly disturbing moment when we
finally get to see it), because the film is mostly about the change in
the society--what the accident does to the community.  Stephens, at one
crucial moment, admits why the case is so important to him (doubling as
an explanation to the audience as to why he is the main character): 
"We've all lost our children," he says.  Simple, direct, and true.
And that is exactly what The Sweet Hereafter is.  There is not even a
hint of manipulative sentimentality in Egoyan's film.  Swelling,
saddening music is common in films that deal with tragedies, but here
the score (by Mychael Danna) is not overpowering and adds just enough
color in each scene to match cinematographer Paul Sarossy's breathtaking
imagery.  This film is not about how awful a tragedy like this can be,
but how torturous surviving it can be.  In all of its simplicity, in the
realistic and sympathetic way Egoyan observes these unfortunate men in
women, The Sweet Hereafter is a moving, disturbing picture on levels
that most films don't even touch.  

Title
Review for Fast, Cheap & Out of Control (1997)
Director: Errol Morris
Cast: Dave Hoover, George Mendonca, Ray Mendez, Rodney Brooks
Rated PG: Minor thematic elements
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    I had no idea what to expect from Fast, Cheap & Out of Control. I
saw it simply because it was there. I knew ahead of time that it is a
documentary, and that it was directed by Errol Morris, but I couldn't
have even guessed about its content. And how pleasantly surprised I am!
Not only is the film fascinating and deeply informative (albeit centered
primarily around less-than-conversational topics), but Morris probes
seriously into some deep issues. The result is an enchanting, lively
film that anyone can watch and enjoy, and still learn something in the
process.
    The film is about four individuals who initially seem to have
nothing in common. Dave Hoover is a wild animal trainer for a circus. He
speaks at great lengths about the perils and rewards involved in
attempting to manipulate a lion. George Mendonca is a topiary
gardener--he shapes plantlife to look like animals. Ray Mendez is an
expert on the hideous mole-rat. And Rodney Brooks is a robot scientist
concerned with re-creating the way certain animals and insects move
about the earth.
    Visually, the film is striking. The cinematography, by Robert
Richardson (who commonly works on Oliver Stone films), is full of truly
absorbing images. Often times, throughout the film's amazingly brief
80-minute running time, the audience is given an image that is almost
shocking in nature--Mendonca standing on a ladder, for instance,
trimming one of his animals in the darkened rain. What goes along
perfectly with this is the music by Caleb Sampson. The soundtrack
continually pulses throughout the film with a lively, energetic feeling
that drives the film at a brisk pace. Even if you aren't interested in
the subject material, the film would be a feast for the eyes.
    Fortunately, Morris has gone to great lengths to make sure that
there's no way you can't be interested in the subject matter. Not only
are the four professions described in the film fascinating on their own,
but their relation to each other is the central meaning that Morris
manages to convey. He says something profound about life an existence
here, and it doesn't feel overwrought and pretentious--it's a
level-headed, public oriented message. In concept, it's almost so
obvious that I was surprised I had never thought of it before.
    Take Brooks, for example, whose comments on robots taking over human
life in the future are truly alarming. Here is a guy making machines
that imitate insect life almost perfectly. Before watching this film, I
had no idea that robot technology was already so advanced. Mix this with
the musings of Mendonca, who explains why the modern electric shears are
totally useless for what he does--he requires detail, and so only
old-fashioned hand shears can do the work appropriately. Meanwhile,
Mendez is totally fascinated with the way his mole-rats roll in their
feces to identify one another. And Hoover modestly explains that, if the
lion were to understand its power, that the human taunting it would
never stand a chance.
    But what do these guys have to do with one another? Well, that's why
you need to see the film. I think to truly understand and gather
everything that Morris has packed into this movie, one needs to see it
more than once. This is the way all documentaries should be--interesting
and entertaining on the surface, but also containing underlying themes
that aren't apparent just from idly watching. Fast, Cheap & Out of
Control didn't change my life, but it did change the way that I look at
this genre. It also gave me something to think about, and that alone is
worth something these days.

Title
Review for Karakter (1997)
Director:  Mike van Diem
Cast:  Fedja Van Huet, Jan Decleir, Betty Schuurman, Victor Low, Tamar
van den Dop, Hans Kesting, Lou Landre
Screenplay:  Mike van Diem, Laurens Geels, Ruud van Megen
Producers:  Laurens Geels
Runtime:  120 min.
US Distribution:  Sony Pictures Classics
Rated R:  violence
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
Many films feature strange and convoluted family relations, but few
show them with the emotional strength and visual presentation of Mike
van Diem's Character.  This is the first picture I've seen of the five
that were nominated for Academy Award for Best Foreign Language Film
this year; I can't say that this one is better than the others, but I am
certainly not disappointed with its winning of the award.  This is a
strong, bold film, powered by superb central performances from Fedja Van
Huet and Jan Decleir, and by some of the most striking imagery to come
out of any film in the last year.
Character, which takes place in the Netherlands around the 1930s,
revolves around young Katadreuffe (Van Huet), a young man who, at the
beginning of the picture, is seen confronting an aging man who has
apparently worked against him his entire life.  The story then jumps
ahead of time; the older man is dead, and Katadreuffe is being
interrogated by police officers.  The young man then tells his story,
beginning with his birth.  It turns out that the older man, Dreverhaven
(Decleir), is Katadreuffe's father.  Katadreuffe goes on to explain his
life story to the police officers.  
He speaks of his mother, Joba (Betty Schuurman), with whom he did not
get along.  He explains his failed efforts to begin his own business,
and his love for reading the few books he had at his disposal.  When he
is old enough, he goes to work at a law firm, and a lawyer named De
Gankelaar (Victor Low) takes Katadreuffe under his wing.  Katadreuffe is
forced to borrow a large sum of money at one point, and it turns out
that the bank from which he takes the loan is his father's bank.  From
that point on, the two men clash with animosity, and Katadreuffe does
everything that he can to beat his father.
Character tells a deep and immersive story of a complex father/son
relationship, but, on the surface, it's a fascinating and absorbing
film, always interesting to look at and effective as entertainment.  Van
Diem, who also co-wrote, does a fantastic job with direction, and keeps
the pacing swift and smooth throughout the picture.  The production
design, by Rikke Jelier, is interestingly colorless and fantastically
dark; the city streets and building interiors have such an authentic
feel to them that I never once questioned the on-screen image.  Rogier
Stoffers' cinematography is agitated and fascinating to watch; also
splendid is the heavy musical score by Paleis van Boem, full of thick
stringed instruments that fit the mood of the film perfectly.
The acting from the two leading men is superb.  Van Huet is a striking
presence, and plays this character with depth and complexity.  
Katadreuffe is an interesting person to begin with -- dignified,
determined, and extremely intelligent.  Van Huet conveys all of this and
more, layering the performance in brilliant subtleties and nuances
(watch how his demeanor changes in numerous ways depending on his
situation).  Decleir is equally good, but in different ways.  I
sometimes criticize a film for having a one-note villain (I shouldn't
refer to this man as a "villain," actually), but there's more to this
performance than is outwardly noticeable.  He seems like a bad man, but
what he actually does for his son warrants much consideration.  
There is so much to admire about the smooth and complete way that Van
Diem has brought this subject to the screen.  The film relies a lot on
plot and story, but without bogging down the characters in contrivances
and Things that Make you Think Twice.  I like how the story is
character-driven, but still features many interesting turns throughout. 
And, even though the film is inherently sad and has several tragic
moments, Van Diem never sentimentalizes the material.
But there's something profound at the center of Character.  The title
itself explains a lot of what the film is about -- are Dreverhaven's
intentions deeper than they first appear?  I think that they are. 
Viewers must remember that this is a man who has tried hard to be an
influence in his son's life.  He is a stern man -- perhaps he's just
plain mean -- but Van Diem is too smart to make this a character whose
intentions are clear.  Character is a film that never goes beyond its
boundaries -- it's a slick, entertaining, and honest picture about a
relationship so strange that it actually qualifies as realistic.  

Title
Review for Yatgo ho yan (1997)
Director:  Sammo Hung
Cast:  Jackie Chan, Richard Norton, Miki Lee, Karen McLymont, Gabrielle
Fitzpatrick, Vince Poletto
Screenplay:  Fibe Ma, Edward Tang
Producers:  Leonard Ho
Runtime:  94 min.
US Distribution:  New Line Cinema
Rated PG-13:  action violence, minor sensuality and drug use
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        I'll sleep soundly under the assumption that most people reading this
review won't be too upset if I fail to criticize Mr. Nice Guy because of
it's hackneyed, overdone story, or because of the lack of convincing
acting, or because the entire film is a shameless excuse to show Jackie
Chan do a lot of really nifty stunts.
        Besides, to criticize the film on these points would be meaningless,
because I imagine the makers of Mr. Nice Guy knew exactly what they were
doing.   I haven't seen a lot of Jackie Chan flicks, but it's clear to
just about everyone that his films are goofy on purpose.  A deep story
and complex characters would probably take away from the entertaining
and often hilarious action spectacle that Chan never fails to deliver.
        But, since this is a review, I have to summarize the plot, despite its
unimportance.  Chan plays Jackie (I'm sure it's a coincidence that his
character has the same first name), a cop-turned-chef.  One day, he runs
into a woman named Diana (Gabrielle Fitzpatrick), who is being chased by
a bunch of guys that Jackie needs to beat up really fast.  
        Soon, Diana's struggle becomes clear:  she is in possession of a video
tape that will incriminate local drug dealer Giancarlo (Richard Norton),
so they want it back.  When Diana gets Jackie tangled in the situation,
he finds himself constantly beating the hell out of multitudes of Aryans
in sharp black suits. It probably won't win the Oscar for Best Original
Screenplay next year, but the story serves the purpose film nicely.
        Jackie Chan films are lots of fun, and that's because of Chan himself.
  He has such an energetic and likable screen presence that he not only
demands attention, but he makes us laugh.  It's such a rare combination
talents that he has: he's so physically skilled, and yet in such good
humor about himself and his films.   And he's not a bad actor:  most
martial artists are either deadpan and boring (Steven Segal), or just
not very talented (Jean Claude Van Damme).  Chan's martial arts displays
in his films never fail to amaze me.
        But even Chan could be defeated by an unoriginal and boring script and
execution.  Thankfully, director Sammo Hung (who has a very funny cameo
in the film as a nosy biker) has created a group of action sequences
that are thrilling and visually impressive.  The best in the film takes
place in a factory (or so it's called), which is composed of a lot of
concrete corridors and many blue doors.  And the finale, involving a
dump truck and a big house, is a lot of fun.  
        The performances fit the mood of the film.  Norton does a good job
hamming it up as the Bad Guy, always sneering and uttering his words in
some strange accent.  And Jackie's group of helpers, including his
adorable girlfriend Miki (Miki Lee), are a colorful bunch.  I can't
imagine that fans of Chan will be disappointed in this film.  I've never
been a huge fan of his, but the pleasant mood and sheer entertainment
value of Mr. Nice Guy has ensured that I will make it a point to see all
his films in the future.

Title
Review for Wild Wild West (1999)
Director: Barry Sonnenfeld
Cast: Will Smith, Kevin Kline, Kenneth Branagh, Salma Hayek, M. Emmet
Walsh, Ted Levine, Frederique Van Der Wal
Screenplay: Brent Maddock, Jeffrey Price, Peter S. Seaman, S.S. Wilson
Producers: Jon Peters, Barry Sonnenfeld
Runtime: 115 min.
US Distribution: Warner Bros.
Rated R: Action violence, sex references
Copyright 1999 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
        Just as you might expect from any movie starring Will Smith and
released the 4th of July weekend, Barry Sonnenfeld's Wild Wild West will
remind you of how much money can be spent on a motion picture.  You can
feel the dollars that went into this movie.  It's one of those
ludicrously expensive films that makes you wonder just how much money
there really is in the world.  It's a massively unrestrained production,
bursting with computer-generated special effects in nearly every scene. 
The film is so obviously overpriced that I couldn't help but consider
the various costs of things, such as how much money it takes to
digitally remove Kenneth Branagh's legs from every scene he's in.  
And boy, I wish I could say I hated every minute of it.  The fact is, I
enjoyed this silly movie for almost every second I sat watching it, even
though the special effects are given more consideration than the
characters, even though it's astonishing to think of the financial
aspects behind the picture.  What makes Wild Wild West a likable
disaster of a summer blockbuster is Sonnenfeld's out-of-whack sense of
humor, and three goofy performances by three fine actors.  It's the
textbook definition of a guilty pleasure -- I hated myself for not
despising it.
The film is the latest chapter in a long line of Hollywood television
series remakes.  Will Smith stars as the gun-toting Jim West, assigned
by president Ulysses Grant to track down and destroy the renegade
General McGrath (Ted Levine).  West is teamed up with Artemus Gordon
(Kevin Kline), a gadget-happy U.S. Marshal who produces machines that
could not possibly have existed at any time in the 1800s.  Further
developments uncover the fact that the true villain is a legless
Suthun'er named Arliss Loveless (Branagh, decked out in a wacky beard
and long, jet-black hair).  Salma Hayek is also on board as the
necessary love interest, the twist being that both heroes are interested
in her love.
Wild Wild West suffers from the typical symptoms of Summer Blockbuster
Syndrome (SBS), including high-energy incoherence, intrusively
overproduced sets and special effects, a distinct lack in true story
development, and cartoonish characterizations.  Barry Sonnenfeld is one
of those directors I can't handle in large doses; he seems to operate in
a self-destructive manner, creating scenes and sequences so over-the-top
that it's easier to laugh at their sheer absurdity than it is to laugh
at the jokes he sprinkles about them.  Consider, for instance, the scene
in which West and Gordon first witness Loveless' giant mechanical
spider.  It's an amazing special effect, and really quite extraordinary
to witness on screen, but it's such an insane image that I could only
wonder what kind of mind would have thought to create it.
If that makes Wild Wild West a bad movie, at least it's an entertaining
bad movie.  Some critics have stated that Smith and Kline have no
chemistry, but I disagree.  Both actors have proven themselves as
effective comedians in previous films, and they don't botch the job
here.  Smith has kind of a dumfounded gaze on his face the whole way
through the film; this may be from a lack of compelling dialogue, or
perhaps he felt despair under the realization that a giant mechanical
spider is ultimately going to be more memorable than his performance. 
Nonetheless, he has an undeniably likable presence.  The same goes for
Kline, who works with Smith smoothly.  Kline is a more experienced comic
actor, and it shows -- he manages to get into his role a little better,
and actually makes Gordon a semi-credible character.
Branagh is absolutely perfect as the villain, and I think he hits the
note that Sonnenfeld was shooting for.  His performance is so absurd, so
far over the edge of sanity, that it's utterly impossible to take him
even the slightest bit seriously (not to mention the fact that your
attention will be focused on how they were able to digitally remove his
legs).  The scenes with Branagh ultimately work the best, and remind us
of the intended tone for the rest of the film.  There is a brain in Wild
Wild West -- it's not a stupid movie -- but it's not a very
well-adjusted picture, and often feels like it belongs in the cinematic
equivalent of a psychiatric ward.
And then there's the money issue, and the idea that not making this
film might have covered food bills for the entire populations of six or
seven third-world countries.  Even though the production design is very
fancy, and even though the special effects have a kind of imposing
realism about them, I couldn't help but feel bad for indulging in a film
as blatantly overpriced as this one.  I mean, we're talking a lot of
bucks here.  Barry Sonnenfeld has created what might go down as the
perfect illustration of a summer blockbuster -- a giant, insane,
two-million-bucks-a-minute extravaganza of tongue-in-cheek nonsense,
starring Will Smith, coming to a theater near you this 4th of July.
Psychosis Rating:  6/10

Title
Review for Rushmore (1998)
Director:   Wes Anderson
Cast:  Jason Schwartzman, Bill Murray, Olivia Williams, Seymour Cassel,
Brian Cox, Mason Gamble, Sara Tanaka, Stephen McCole
Screenplay:  Wes Anderson, Owen Wilson
Producers:  Barry Mendell, Paul Schiff
Runtime:   93 min.
US Distribution: Buena Vista
Rated R:  language, brief nudity
Copyright 1999 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Rushmore is one of the most brilliantly funny and moving films I've
seen in years, and easily one of the best pictures of 1998.  Directed by
Wes Anderson, and written by Anderson and Owen Wilson, Rushmore shows
the trials and tribulations of young Max Fischer, including his love for
an older woman (Olivia Williams) and his childish sparring with a
millionaire (Bill Murray).  There isn't a failed comic moment to be
found in Rushmore, but it works ultimately because the characters are so
real and likable.  Schwartzman, Murray, and Williams all shine in their
roles, and you're certain to leave the theater smiling.

Title
Review for Perfect Murder, A (1998)
Director:  Andrew Davis
Cast:  Michael Douglas, Gwyneth Paltrow, Viggo Mortensen
Screenplay:  Patrick Smith Kelly
Producers:  Anne Kopelson, Arnold Kopelson, Peter MacGregor-Scott,
Christopher Mankiewicz
Runtime:  107 min.
US Distribution:  Universal/Warner Bros.
Rated R:  Violence, language, sex
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
I find that the presence of Michael Douglas in a film will make that
particular film seem smarter.  There's something about the 
condescending way he delivers dialogue that instantly inflates the
intelligence level of the film.  Of course, this heightened intelligence
may an illusion, such as in A Perfect Murder, but the point is that
Douglas fools you through the duration of the film's running time.  (The
one exception to the Douglas Rule is, of course, the unwatchable The
Ghost and the Darkness, in which he acts very silly.) 
A Perfect Murder is the new film from director Andrew Davis, who also
brought us The Fugitive.  He also brought us Chain Reaction, which, many
will agree, is not as good as The Fugitive.  I think Davis is getting
better at what he does, and A Perfect Murder should prove to most people
that he has a lot of style and knows how to handle suspense pretty
well.  The problem here is with Patrick Smith Kelly's script, which
relies far too heavily on a convoluted and contrived plot, and not
enough on characterization or anything that seems even remotely
plausible.
Douglas plays a rich guy named Steven Taylor.  Gwyneth Paltrow plays
his wife, Emily; and Viggo Mortensen plays her lover, David Shaw.  Now,
if you've seen the previews, you should be aware that this is a film
that banks on plot twists.  The first twist is early, and it's bad form
for me to tell it to you simply on the basis of plot synopsis.  I'll
just say that Steven becomes aware of his wife's infidelity, and he
develops a plan to eradicate her in an easy and fashionable manor.  Oh
hell, he plans a perfect murder.
The film is always fun to watch, and it certainly never gets boring. 
Davis, along with cinematographer Dariusz Wolski and production designer
Philip Rosenberg, has created an atmospheric and extremely rich setting
for the characters to roam through.  The film isn't overflowing with
style, but it has just the right amount to keep you interested without
making you horribly aware of the nifty camera angles.  
A Perfect Murder is based on the play Dial M for Murder, which was made
into a terrific film by Hitchcock in 1954.  It's important to remember
that A Perfect Murder is not a remake of Hitchcock's film, nor is it
derivative of it in any way.  I was glad to see that Davis didn't try to
imitate Hitchcock, although most of what I liked most about Dial M for
Murder is not present in Davis' film.  A Perfect Murder falls back on
mindless action and unlikely plot developments, whereas Hitchcock's film
was intriguing and always believable.  
Of course, that isn't Davis' fault.  I do admire Kelly for trying to
make a very complicated story and still tie all the loose ends together,
but the story simply falls apart when you think about it.  Characters
are forced to do things that they wouldn't do.  Lives hang in the
balance of chance meetings and unlikely coincidences.  People believe
things they shouldn't, and say things that incriminate them, and make up
elaborate and perfect lies in half seconds.  The funny thing is, Davis
weaves the material so seamlessly that the Swiss-cheese-ness of Kelly's
script is only blatantly noticeable on afterthought.
The acting is good, although one of the major problems with the film is
that there really aren't any sympathetic characters.  Douglas plays
nearly the same role that won him the Oscar for Wall Street, although
his performance here suggests more depth in his character and maybe even
a little bit of a conscience (gasp!); eventually, however, he does
things that only hateful sub-humans would do.  Mortensen proves his
versatility again (you might not even recognize him as Demi Moore's
nemesis in G.I. Jane), and does some interesting things with his
character.  Paltrow is also good, but she's the character we're supposed
to root for, and yet there's nothing much to like about her.
Oh, I'm just quibbling.  I liked watching this movie.  It's fun, and
even surprising in a lot of parts.  It could have been better though,
and more realistic, but Andrew Davis at least has shown me that he can
carry his talent beyond The Fugitive.  And as for Douglas, Hollywood
should keep casting him as smart characters in silly movies, because he
sure is good at pulling a messy script together and making it seem smart
. . . even if it is just an illusion.

Title
Review for Krippendorf's Tribe (1998)
Director:  Todd Holland
Cast:  Richard Dreyfuss, Jenna Elfman, Lily Tomlin, Rachel Winfree
Screenplay:  Charlie Peters
Producers:  
Runtime:  100 min.
US Distribution:  Touchstone Pictures
Rated PG-13:  Language, implied sex, adult themes 
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
I can imagine how good Krippendorf's Tribe must have looked on paper. 
It does not surprise me in the least that a group of extremely talented
actors, led by the great Richard Dreyfuss and a good director (Todd
Holland), all wanted to make this film.  In fact, it is only the
expertise by which this excruciatingly bad script has been executed that
keeps me from suggesting that you stay as far away from Krippendorf's
Tribe as possible.  In retrospect, I can imagine how bad this film could
have been.  I shudder at the possibilities of awfulness had it starred
an actor less able than Dreyfuss.
Dreyfuss plays James Krippendorf, an anthropologist who is granted
$100,000 by his university to find an undiscovered tribe in New Guinea. 
Halfway into his two-year expedition, his wife (apparently) dies.  I say
apparently because when or how she dies is never truly established. 
Later, we find out that much of the grant money was spent on big-screen
TVs and other such pleasures.  So, when Krippendorf finds out what
happens to professors who do not use their grant money wisely, he
decides to construct an elaborate lie.  
He makes his own tribe, using his three children as actors in a video. 
He simply makes up certain incredible facts about this tribe (which he
calls the Shelmickedmu).  Audiences at Krippendorf's lectures are amazed
by his findings that the Shelmickedmu practice circumcision.  And proof
that the typical family unit is led by a single father is truly amazing
to the anthropological community.  Like all films like this, the lie
becomes more and more complex, and the suspense is generated with us
wondering at what point it is all going to fall out from under our hero. 
Dreyfuss is a funny, talented man, and he is funny in this film.  He
has lots of positive energy and, unlike most comical actors, really
manages to play people like this realistically.  This film also requires
a lot of physical humor that I've never seen Dreyfuss perform, and he
does a great job.  Jenna Elfman, who plays Veronica Mecilli, a scientist
who wants in on Krippendorf's work, is also very funny and appealing
here.  And the kid actors are great, as well.
But we're talking about the script from hell.  This is one of those
stories that requires such extreme suspension of disbelief that they
might as well have established that the story just takes place in an
alternate universe where things like this can happen.  But the
ridiculousness of the story is not really what is so bad about it.  All
the cliches and the irritating plot devices could have easily been
overcome by Dreyfuss and crew.  No, the script is plagued with so many
clueless stereotypes and mean-spirited characters that I was in
disbelief as I watched.  Furthermore, the manor in which all of this
material is covered up is truly shameless.  
Take, for instance, the scene in which Krippendorf gets Veronica drunk
so he can tape them having sex.  They get all decked out in the tribe
getup, complete with paint to darken their skin.  Krippendorf does this
because he needs footage of the mating rituals of his tribe.  Now, I saw
this scene coming from a mile away, but I said to myself, "No, that
would be far too tasteless.  There's no way they'll do that...Oh God!" 
They did do it.  It's there.  I was almost more appalled by the fact
that this didn't bother the other audience members with whom I saw this
film.  I found it deplorable.  And when Krippendorf is forced to admit
that he did it, he simply apologizes without the slightest hint of
conviction in his voice.  
The film is filled with scenes like these.  They not only insult the
audience, but they insult the types of people that the film portrays. 
It would take some truly professional work to create videos convincing
enough to fool an entire community of scientists, yet Krippendorf does
it easily in an afternoon.  And watching Dreyfuss stumble over a
completely unprepared speech is funny and entertaining, but I think that
most members of the on-screen audience would be able to see that he is
making everything up as he goes.  If I were an anthropologist, this film
would insult me immensely.  
Moving right along, the film plays off every stereotype our culture has
ever learned regarding African tribes.  Sure, Dreyfuss dressing up like
a chief is really funny, and it allows for some entertaining scenes, but
the heart of this material is deeply clueless as to the themes and
thoughts that it provokes.  
It is because of Dreyfuss as an actor that I was able to watch this
film.  His character here is not a good subject for a film because he is
a shameless liar, and never once does he show any kind of penance for
what he does.  I suppose it was interesting to see the formula defied in
this case, but for the purposes of good taste, I would have expected
something.  No, this man sets a terrible example for his kids and
colleagues, and the writer of the film (Charlie Peters) didn't include a
single scene in which Krippendorf takes his kids aside and tells them
that what he is doing is very bad.  In fact, it's his eldest daughter
that frequently tells him that he is doing the wrong thing, and he
continually shrugs off her warnings.
I suppose it's important to admit that this is a funny film.  Dreyfuss
and Elfman, and many of the contrived and insulting scenes, add up to a
picture that is anything but boring.  And if you're less serious than I,
you probably will enjoy it.  I, however, can't get past these elements. 
Krippendorf's Tribe is being marketed as a family comedy, but this is
the kind of film that teaches the kids of our society faulty lessons
that they shouldn't be learning.  With a little more insight into its
story and themes, this could have been a good movie.

Title
Review for Ringmaster (1998)
Director:  Neil Abramson
Cast:  John Capodice, Michael Dudikoff, Molly Hagan, Jaime Pressly,
Wendy Raquel Robinson, Jerry Springer, Michael Jai White
Screenplay:  John Bernstein
Producers:  Gary W. Goldstein, Steven Stabler
Runtime:  90 min.
US Distribution:  Artisan
Rated R:  sexual content, language
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
I've watched The Jerry Springer Show on only a few occasions, and each
time I lasted for about ten minutes before I was forced to change the
channel.  I find the show sickening and depressing.  I wonder what kind
of people would display themselves in such a degrading fashion just for
a chance to be on television.  I went to see Ringmaster because I
thought that it might answer my questions; I hoped that, just maybe, it
would give a little insight into the individuals willing to make fools
of themselves on a national program.
Ringmaster did not answer my questions.  The only insight I got was
into Jerry Springer, who seems like a nice guy at first, until it
becomes clear that the film is just a big whack at self-promotion.  The
picture doesn't seem like entertainment so much as a message in the form
of a film:  Springer, in the climax, adds a personal observation, in
which he states that the poor have just as much of a right to make fools
of themselves as the rich.  I have some arguments with this, but I'll
get to those later -- let's talk about the film first.
It revolves around two groups of people destined to appear on the Jerry
show.  The first group features a young woman named Connie (Molly
Hagan), whose 19 year-old daughter Angel (Jaime Pressly) and husband,
Rusty (Michael Dudikoff), are having sex (their segment is entitled,
"You Did What With Your Stepdaddy?").  To get back at her daughter,
Connie performs fellatio on Angel's fiancée, Willie (Ashley Holbrook). 
This is when Connie calls the Jerry show to see about appearing.
The second group features Demond (Michael Jai White), who cheats on his
annoying girlfriend, Starletta (Wendy Raquel Robinson).  Of course, he
doesn't just pick anyone to cheat with:  he gets it on with Starletta's
best friends.  So, Starletta calls the Jerry show and they fly to LA. 
While they're there, Demond hooks up with Angel and Connie, and a big,
silly mess accumulates, ending in a violent and disgusting episode of
the Jerry show.  
The one thing I really have to give credit for is the acting.  I
haven't seen most of these actors in other films, but they are all very
believable here.  Hagan and Pressly, in particular, both perfectly
embrace the image we now label as "trailer trash."  White is also pretty
good (much better than he was in Spawn), as is Robinson, even if she is
really annoying.  The interesting thing about all of these characters is
how they kind of grow on you by the end; even though they seem hateful
at first, you can't help but empathize with them a little.
But that doesn't change the purpose of the film, which is to 1) inflate
Jerry Springer's ego, and 2) promote his television show.  In his
"personal observation" that I mentioned before, Springer actually
expects us to believe that he's exploiting these people because it's the
morally right thing to do.  Forget the fact that he makes gobs of money,
and that the people who appear on these shows are mostly just interested
in the chance to fly to LA and star in their own fifteen minutes of a
television show.  No, Jerry apparently thinks that his show is a good
thing.
Well, I think that it is not.  I'm trying to think of an instance in
which rich people commonly make fools of themselves; he might be
referring the Oscars, or other talk shows that feature celebrities
talking about their drug addictions and other problems.  The difference
is that these celebrities are aware of what they're doing -- it's a
performance for them.  The people on The Jerry Springer Show don't
realize what they're doing (according to this film), and Springer merely
exploits them for money.  "This is a slice of American life," he shouts
at a disgruntled audience member, "and if you don't like it, then bite
something else!"
If this is what most Americans' life is like, then I'm truly
embarrassed.  I'm not embarrassed because there are poor people, but
because, for some reason, being poor is associated with having no pride
or self-worth.  I wonder how the audiences overseas will feel if
Ringmaster gets distribution there -- will it change their opinions of
Americans?   Ringmaster might have been an interesting film had it been
honest about its subject matter:  alas, it is not honest, and the result
is a picture that will disgust and depress you.  Jerry Springer should
be ashamed of himself.  

Title
Review for American Werewolf in Paris, An (1997)
Director: Anthony Waller
Cast: Tom Everett Scott, Julie Delpy, Vince Veluf, Phil Buckman, Julie
Bowen, Pierre Cosso
Rated R: Violence, gore, nudity
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    Here's a note for any film maker intending to include a scene in
which characters bungee jump from the Eiffel Tower: the tower itself is
not composed of straight, vertical lines. The support beams curve away
from the center closer to the bottom, so anything that falls off the top
is likely to smash into the side of the tower no later than halfway
through the fall. So, in effect, people bungee jumping from the top will
not reach the ground until they collide with many steel girders,
bouncing their way down, down, down, until they reach the bottom as a
dead lump.
    The characters in An American Werewolf in Paris didn't have this
problem--they found an alternate version of the Eiffel Tower, which
represents more closely the Washington Monument, so they were not only
able to avoid hitting the side of the tower, but to clear every bit of
the building itself and land safely in the grass clearing hundreds of
feet away. I bet that Andy (Tom Everett Scott) didn't realize how his
life would change when he selflessly leaped from the top of the tower in
order to save a beautiful girl (Julie Delpy) attempting suicide. Of
course he saves her, in a stunt that makes every Schwarzenegger film
look realistic, and sets her on the ground, only to collide with a
girder on the way up (I suppose some points may be given for
understanding that there are, in fact, girders on the Eiffel Tower).
    The girl's name is Serafine, and she is a werewolf. Andy and his
friends find this out the hard way. When Andy becomes a werewolf
himself, he uncovers a plot in which a group of nihilistic werewolves
trap unknowing Americans and kill them. Their ultimate goal is to turn
the entire world into werewolves; Andy, with the help of Serafine, must
stop him at all costs! But only after he comes to terms with the fact
that he is a werewolf, and that the woman he loves is also a werewolf.
    Most horror films set up rules and guidelines by which the
characters act and ultimately destroy the evil bad guys. There are no
such rules in this film. I was under the impression that only silver
bullets could kill werewolves, but here they seem rather weak (many of
them die by multiple gunshots from a standard hand gun). Aside from the
concept not following what I know about werewolves, nothing else in the
film seems to be guided by any laws or rules.
    Take, for example, the Eiffel Tower bungee-jumping scene, which is
later upstaged by a Statue of Liberty bungee-jumping scene. There are
also tasteless moments in which Andy talks to ghosts. (These ghosts are
unique--they are the victims of werewolves, complete with the original
bloody wounds; they are damned to walk the earth until the werewolves
that have taken their lives die.) The entire idea behind the ghosts is
unfounded and absolutely pointless. The film also includes those
irritatingly dumb scenes in which Andy's friends try and get him ready
for a big date with Serafine by telling him what to wear and what to
say.
    All of this adds up to one big problem: in a film that lacks even a
hint of realism, it is impossible to care, or even get excited, about
the characters and the situation. There was not a doubt in my mind that
everything would be okay, not because it's a typical horror film and
everything is always okay, but because I knew the characters could just
cast an "Everything is Okay!" spell and everything would be okay. A
situation that appears to be certain death provides an escape when the
floor falls out from underneath a character for no particular reason.
Don't ask why Serafine loses all self-control when she turns into a
werewolf, and why the other werewolves seem completely aware of
themselves and others. Certainly don't question the pseudo-science in
which the bad werewolves synthesize a drug which can induce the werewolf
effects at any time during the day (which has a laughable, "scientific"
explanation having something to do with the moon cycles).
    As bad as this film is, I have to admit that it's not without guilty
pleasures. Director Anthony Waller should get someone to give him a real
script, because he could probably do some interesting things. And the
acting is rather entertaining, especially from Scott. There are also a
few really funny moments, and I actually liked the CG werewolves (they
don't look too cartoony). If you love werewolf or horror films, then you
might like this silly film. I'm not a big fan of either one, but I can't
say I wasted my money here. It's a bad film, yes, but it's charming in a
tasteless, lawless manor. I didn't like it, but I sat through it, and I
can't say I was disappointed. I got what I expected after seeing the
preview.

Title
Review for Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)
Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)
Director: Jay Roach
Cast: Mike Myers, Heather Graham, Michael York, Robert Wagner, Seth
Green, Mindy Sterling, Verne Troyer, Kristen Johnston, Rob Lowe
Screenplay: Michael McCullers, Mike Myers
Producers: John S. Lyons, Demi Moore, Mike Myers, Jennifer Todd,
Suzanne Todd
Runtime: 95 min.
US Distribution: New Line Cinema
Rated PG-13: sexual innuendo, crude humor
Copyright 1999 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
I am a fan of the original Austin Powers, and I'm also a fan of Mike
Myers.  I don't know much about him, but he seems like a really
down-to-earth guy, one of those comedians who doesn't find it necessary
to make a fool of himself every time he appears before a live studio
audience.  I'm glad to see that he's finally found his crowd-pleasing
niche; though most of his films have found their audiences on video,
Austin Powers:  The Spy Who Shagged Me is likely to be the first massive
box office success of Myers' career (with the exception of Wayne's
World, which doesn't count for various reasons).  
I liked AP2, but not as much as I liked the original.  My reasons for
this should not come as a surprise:  too many elements are rehashed or
expanded from the first film, there are sizeable gaps in the laugh-flow,
and there is way too much toilet humor.  The story is goofy and dopey
enough to carry itself through the slow sections, and so I never found
myself completely bored.  There are also some brilliant casting choices,
a few truly hilarious subplots, and the gleeful use of sexual vulgarity
and phallic symbols.  I recommend the film, but I miss the
excrement-free environment and hokey originality of the first movie. 
However, I think I like the story behind this one better.  It has a
kind of insane genius about it that makes it entertaining even when
there aren't many laughs.  Myers also does the right thing by giving Dr.
Evil what seems like more screen time than Austin himself.  (That also
makes me wonder if the series shouldn't be named after the villain.) 
The basic structure revolves around Dr. Evil -- he goes back in time to
steal Austin's mojo.  After drinking the mojo, Dr. Evil becomes much
more hip, and even has a one night stand with Frau Farbissina (Mindy
Sterling).  Austin, meanwhile, works to recover his mojo with the help
of Felicity Shagwell (the luminous Heather Graham, looking happy to be
in an Austin Powers movie).  Little does he know that Dr. Evil has new
evil cohorts:  Fat Bastard (an unrecognizable Myers in an enormous
prosthetic suit), and Mini-Me (Verne Troyer), a robot version of Dr.
Evil, one-eighth his size.
AP2 is a rare example of a comedy that uses subplots in the right way. 
Just before things get dull, the scene switches to any one of the three
or four subplots, and audience interest in the film is held through the
end.  The best subplot is certainly the relationship between Dr. Evil
and Mini-Me; Troyer is absolutely wonderful as the mute little monster,
and Dr. Evil's love for his diminutive pet is actually kind of touching
in a sarcastic sort of way.  This also adds a new dimension to Dr.
Evil's biological son, Scott Evil (Seth Green).  Green is a very funny
young actor, and the rivalry between him and Mini-Me is quite
effective.  Mindy Sterling, reprising her role from the first film as
the crazy German lady, thankfully is given more screen time here.  And
Rob Lowe does a perfect imitation of Robert Wager, playing the young
version of Number Two.  
There's no doubt that AP2 shines in several scenes with inspired
brilliance.  The two best sequences really can't be described in words,
but those who have seen the film will remember the way various people
all over the world describe Dr. Evil's phallic space ship as it blasts
off.  And Myers' love for these characters and this series keeps the
film from ever feeling perfunctory or dull.  But some scenes go way too
far:  everything with Fat Bastard, for instance, is not funny, and
simply disgusting (laughing and cringing are two separate reactions
altogether).  
I had the distinct sense of deja vu all through AP2, as if Myers had
been afraid to explore new territory.  I can't say I blame him; it would
have been a mistake to seriously change the look and feel of this
sequel.  But it lacks the discovery and newness of the first film, and
so it comes off almost as outtakes from the original, rather than a new
movie altogether.  Don't get me wrong:  Myers has made a funny picture. 
And, seeing as how a third installment in this series is inevitable, I
have high hopes that Myers will find an all new angle on his series and
exploit it into oblivion.

Title
Review for Star Trek: Insurrection (1998)
Director:   Jonathan Frakes
Cast:  Patrick Stewart, Jonathan Frakes, Brent Spiner, LeVar Burton,
Michael Dorn, Gates McFadden, Marina Sirtis, F. Murray Abraham
Screenplay:  Rick Berman, Michael Piller
Producers:  Rick Berman
Runtime:   
US Distribution: Paramount
Rated PG:  action violence, mild language
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
One can not observe a Star Trek movie and expect to see serious science
fiction. The purpose of Star Trek is to provide flashy, innocent fun.
Sometimes the stories are compelling. Sometimes they're not. But, with
the exception of the first film in the series (which provides little
more than endless shots of amazed faces), I've never been bored by any
of the Enterprise's numerous missions. 
Star Trek: Insurrection is no exception. The film has gotten some
negative reviews (a friend of mine actually thinks it's the worst in the
series), but I'm not really sure why. It's an exciting, often hilarious
movie that engaged me and left me ready for the next Star Trek film.
Some say it's a bit too light, and more of a long episode than a film.
Others say the special effects are cheesy and that it's boring. I simply
enjoyed the film.
Insurrection, which is the second film to feature strictly the Next
Generation cast, introduces us to a race of people called the Ba'ku; the
Ba'ku are very old (most of them are about three hundred years old), but
they actually appear younger with age due to strange radiation in the
rings of their planet. Of course, these peaceful people can't horde this
fountain of youth all for themselves  leave it up to their archenemies,
the Son'a, led by Ru'afo (F. Murray Abraham), to mess everything up.
The Son'a, who are horribly disfigured and rely on daily reconstructive
surgery to be aesthetically acceptable, strike a deal with the
Federation to move the Ba'ku elsewhere and exploit the secret to keep
their race from dying. That's when Captain Picard (Patrick Stewart)
steps in: he realizes that moving the Ba'ku would kill them (it also
helps that he falls in love with a Ba'ku woman (Donna Murphy)). So, with
his trusty crew, Picard defies the federation to keep the Ba'ku in their
natural habitat.
When dealing with a series with as much history as this, it's not
entirely necessary to re-introduce your characters with each episode.
This is why I believe non-fans have a hard time getting into Star Trek;
in order to enjoy it, one has to understand how to approach it.
Insurrection, however, does a surprisingly good job of us new aspects of
the characters. Stewart is bold as always, a magnetic screen presence
and perfectly capable of holding an entire film together. Jonathan
Frakes, who also directed, is funny as Commander Riker; a subplot with
Data (Brent Spiner) discovering his lost childhood is fairly
interesting; and Abraham makes a perfect Star Trek villain, overacting
like crazy.
Frakes showed similar aptitude for direction in First Contact;
Insurrection is an exciting film, with some really attractive special
effects and a lot of good action. This is apparently the first Star Trek
film to utilize computer animation, and the result is very pleasing to
the eye: particularly in the climactic scenes, in which the Son'a employ
a giant space ship to suck up the rings of the Ba'ku planet, the special
effects have a clean, impressively sharp look. 
If I have any complaint about the film, it's that it tries to take a
moral stance when it's not very appropriate to do so. I don't think it's
that big of a deal that the Federation wanted to move 600 Ba'ku in order
to save the lives of thousands. Better yet, why couldn't they have
co-existed? Insurrection feels a little to light to spring these kinds
of big moral questions on the audience. With it's inherent camp factor,
the Star Trek series doesn't seem well-equipped to deal with issues like
this. I prefer to just enjoy the spectacle.

Title
Review for Slums of Beverly Hills (1998)
Director:  Tamara Jenkins
Cast:  Natasha Lyonne, Alan Arkin, Marisa Tomei, Eli Marienthal, David
Krumholtz, Kevin Corrigan
Screenplay:  Tamara Jenkins
Producers:  Michael Nozik, Stan Wlodkowski
Runtime:  91 min.
US Distribution:  Fox Searchlight (20th Century Fox)
Rated R:  strong sexual situations, nudity, language, drug content
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
Slums of Beverly Hills is, among other things, a quirky coming-of-age
tale about 14 year-old Vivian Abramowitz (Natasha Lyonne). 
Writer/director Tamara Jenkins diagrams a few months in the life of
young Vivian and her very-Jewish family -- her father, Murray (Alan
Arkin), and her brothers (Eli Marienthal and David Krumholtz).  They're
a group of nomads (as they like to put it) who move around Beverly Hills
from one cheap apartment complex to the next.  Murray's reason for doing
this is so that his kids can still go to the good schools, even though
they are, in fact, living in the slums of Beverly Hills.  
There are a lot of complications that arise; the most prominent,
perhaps, are the sexual developments that Vivian must endure.  At the
age of 14, she's irregularly large-breasted (I believe the common term
is "stacked," although it doesn't sound quite right in formal writing). 
She hates her breasts, even though they're perfect.  She also fumbles
about with the drug-dealing neighbor, Eliot (Kevin Corrigan).  The other
major subplot involves Murray's niece, Rita (Marisa Tomei), who comes to
live with the fam because she doesn't like her father.  Rita is a flake,
and also addicted to drugs, so, though she does bond with Vivian, she
also brings chaos to the household.
There's a lot going on in Jenkins' feature debut, and while it's a
likable and often hilarious film, it suffers from massive tonal
problems, and contains material that doesn't seem appropriate in a film
that is, at the core, pretty light-hearted.  There are some great scenes
with a vibrator, but there are some not-so-great scenes that involve
dialogue spoken entirely in Gibberish (the film introduces Gibberish as
a language all its own).  Jenkins also felt the need to slap us across
the face with her themes, which makes me wonder how confident she is in
her audience.  Jenkins is clearly a gifted writer and director; she just
needs to work on consistency.
The nice thing about Slums of Beverly Hills is that it's really funny. 
There are scenes that are immensely satisfying, such as the one I
mentioned above.  As I said, it involves a vibrator, but not in the
sense you might be thinking.  Much of the dialogue is razor sharp and
oozing with cynicism.  Many of the exchanges between the young,
sexually-active children are hilarious, including one meeting between
Vivian and Eliot:  "Do you want to touch my breasts?" she asks.  Without
flinching, without even smiling, he replies, "okay."  
The acting is very good, particularly from Lyonne.  She hits all the
right notes for this performance, giving Vivian equal portions of
bitchiness and likability.  Lyonne is an incredibly talented actress,
and her capacity for big, deep roles is apparent here:  she does so much
for this character that I felt like she was a real person by the end of
the film.  Arkin is also terrific; on the surface, it looks a lot like
most of his other performances, but he effectively conveys the
desperation of a poor man who has to look dignified to his children. 
The other notable performance is from Tomei, who is wonderful here. 
She's such a beautiful, energetic actress; unfortunately, all of her
dramatic scenes here are flaunted by Jenkins' errors in tone.
The worst scene takes place in a bathroom, just before Rita is to
present herself to her father.  It's basically a fight sequence between
Rita and Vivian, but they're talking in Gibberish.  The scene should be
leaning towards the serious side, but the Gibberish makes it impossible
to simply pay attention to what they're saying, let alone be moved by
the words.  Overall, the film is realistic, but scenes like this (and
there are a few) are surrealistic, and don't belong here.  The other
very bad scene involves a brief display of inappropriate conduct (that's
inappropriate in the Bill Clinton sense) between Murray and Rita.  The
scene not only has no relevance, but it blemishes our opinion of Murray,
which isn't necessary -- he's flawed enough as it is.  
I did like Slums of Beverly Hills, but my final impression is too mixed
to give it a strictly positive review.  Jenkins knows how to write
comedy, and her story is very insightful into the growing process of
girls.  Despite it's flaws, this film is worth seeing; I imagine,
however, that Jenkins will have cleaned up her act by the time her next
film roles around.  There's too much talent here to dismiss.

Title
Review for Wild Things (1998)
Director:  John McNaughton
Cast:  Kevin Bacon, Matt Dillon, Neve Campbell, Theresa Russell, Denise
Richards, Daphne Rubin-Vega
Screenplay:  Kem Nunn, Stephen Peters
Producers:  Steven A. Jones, Rodney M. Liber
Runtime:  
US Distribution:  Columbia/Sony Pictures/Mandalay
Rated R:  Strong sexuality, nudity, language, violence
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        I have a soft spot in my heart for pure, amoral sleaze.  I liked
Showgirls (there, I said it).  I typically enjoy myself when sitting
through that Eszterhaz, sex-filled cinematic tabloid-ish trash.  Wild
Things is the best sleazy film I've ever seen.  It's filled with great
performances, graphic sex, three-way sex, rape charges, double-crosses,
plot twists, genitalia of all genders, graphic violence, death, witty
humor, and, best of all, Denise Richards.
        Criticizing this film for being disgusting, raucous, and just plain
wrong is as fundamentally pointless as criticizing Citizen Kane for
being disturbing, or Titanic for being lofty and epic.  Wild Things is a
film that succeeds in its endeavors, but I don't just admire it for
this--I admire it for being so entertaining and such a fun time at the
movies.  I must admit up-front, however, that I am directly in the
center of the age group to which this film has been engineered to
appeal.  I imagine that this shows.
        It's hard to give a plot summary without giving away pieces that
shouldn't be known.  I thought I had the whole thing worked out from the
trailer, but I was wrong; there are a lot of turns here.  I'll just say
that the film takes place in Blue Bay, a rich little town in Florida. 
In Blue Bay lives Sam Lombardo (Matt Dillon), a teacher who is accused
of rape by two of his students, Kelly Van Ryan (Denise Richards), and
Suzie Toller (Neve Campbell).  Kelly's mother, Sandra (Theresa Russell),
immediately presses charges.  
        All of this happens fairly early in the film.  And right up until this
point, I had the whole film predicted.  I was wrong, though, and every
time I was proven wrong, I was shocked.  Wild Things isn't even remotely
plausible, but it is so fun to see where the story takes us that the
implausibility of every scene is meaningless, and often invited, just
for kicks.    
        I remember first seeing the preview for Wild Things before The
Replacement Killers.  I'd give the preview four stars.  It made me want
to see the movie so much that I've been waiting for it anxiously ever
since.  Over the past few weeks though, I started to realize that there
was no way the film could live up to the preview (see Independence Day);
thankfully, I was proven wrong.  The preview for this film is one that
needs to be studied by marketing analysts of every distribution
company:  not only does it make us want to see the film, but it doesn't
give away any of the secrets.
        But I'm not here to talk about the preview.  I'm here to talk about
Denise Richards.  Now, I found her mildly interesting in Starship
Troopers, but in Wild Things she appeals to such a base instinct that
every scene she's in demands attention in a way that almost no other
performer can.  Of course, this might have something to do with her
oceanic eyes...and flawless body...but I thought she did a great job
acting, too (stop laughing).  No, Richards is truly a find--she is
talented, and always convincing in this film.  This mixed in with her
insane physical appeal makes her a vital asset to any film she may grace
in the future.  
        The other actors are good, too.  Dillon is as suave as ever (it's nice
to see him bouncing back from Albino Alligator and In & Out).  Bacon
does a good job acting all determined and stuff as a sex crimes
officer.  Neve Campbell gives the most layered performance of all of
them, though I won't pretend that any of these characters are deep and
complex.  For a plot like this to work, all of these people have to be
insane and basically contrived.  
        That's okay, because director John McNaughton knows that he's making a
self-consciously wicked film.  Each scene--even the three-way sex
scene--is observed with hilarity by McNaughton, and the result is a
sleaze-fest that's too smart to resist.  There isn't an inconsistent
moment in Wild Things:  every bit of it is alluring garbage, so trashy
it's funny, and so entertaining it's painful.  I loved it.

Title
Review for Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas (1998)
Director:  Terry Gilliam
Cast:  Johnny Depp, Benicio Del Toro, Ray Cooper, Wal G. Ludwig, Ellen
Barkin, Gary Busey, Cameron Diaz, Flea, Mark Harmon, Katherine Helmond,
Lyle Lovett, Tobey Maguire, Christina Ricci, Harry Dean Stanton, Tim
Thomerson, James Woods
Screenplay:  Terry Gilliam, Tony Grisoni
Producers:  Patrick Cassavetti, Laila Nabulsi
Runtime:  
US Distribution:  Universal
Rated R:  language, drug use
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
A man wakes up in a hotel suite.  He's disoriented from the remnants of
five or six clashing narcotics still sweeping about his body.  He finds
a flashlight taped to his face, and a strange electrical apparatus
mounted to his torso.  He doesn't remember his last conscious moment, or
his last thought, or what he's doing, or why he's there.  He gets off
the bed and finds that he must wade through dirty brown water as deep as
his knees, in which floats vomit and other solidified unpleasantries. 
As he, confused, moves slowly around the suite, memories of rape and
regurgitation flood his mind, and he finds that the only way to feel
better is to do more drugs.
If the above description sounds displeasing to you, welcome to the
human race.  Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas, Terry Gilliam's adaptation
of the famous Hunter S. Thompson novel, is perhaps the most viscerally
revolting picture I've ever seen.  It's often a funny movie, and is
enhanced by some terrific acting from Johnny Depp and Benicio Del Toro,
but the film is too real for its own good.  It's a painful and
difficult-to-sit-through exercise in excess.
Many critics would chose to address the similarities between Thompson's
novel and Gilliam's film, but I haven't read the book.  I haven't read
it because I was born many years after the sixties were over, and
because I don't find drugs particularly interesting by themselves.  I
love Gilliam as a film maker though; he is a visual genius, a visionary
in every possible way.  Both Brazil and The Fisher King are wonderful,
intelligent, and moving films.  Fear and Loathing has his style, and is
perfectly conceived in its visual presentation (it's apparently as
faithful an adaptation of the novel as possible).  But he seems to go
off the deep end with style, so much that the film loses all of its
humor by the end and becomes essentially a chore to endure.
There is, in fact, a story here, but I don't know that I could
successfully convey it to you.  It centers around Duke (Depp) and Gonzo
(Del Toro), a couple of guys who do a lot of drugs and specialize in
trashing hotel suites in Las Vegas.  There are a many cameos, and a few
subplots, such as one involving a perverted police officer (Gary
Busey).  There's one about a deprived waitress (Ellen Barkin) in an
all-night diner, and another about a pre-teen artistic religious freak
(Christina Ricci) who primarily creates portraits of Barbara Streisand. 
If there's one thing I can say about the turn of events, it's that
nothing is predictable.
The film begins on a high note, with Duke and Gonzo raging down the
desert highway, thrashed on cocaine, alcohol, and who knows what else
(and they top it off with inhalation of ether).  They think they see
bats, and they try to kill them.  They pick up a hitchhiker, who gets
very scared.  Later, they drop acid, and when they finally reach Vegas,
the strange patterns in the carpeting and wallpaper flows in that way
that people who have done acid might recognize.  Gilliam's presentation
of the material is energetic and never boring, and in these opening
scenes lively and funny.  The way the floor moves in acid-induced
strangeness is particularly interesting, as are all the lizards that
Duke thinks he sees in the cocktail lounge.  Depp, with this role, adds
yet another performance to his list of performances that are vastly
different from one another; here, you can barely tell it's him.  Del
Toro is also good, in a frightening and disgusting sort of way.
But the film is too much by the end.  I'm sure Thompson's novel dabbles
in wretched excess, but Gilliam's film seems excessive for the sake of
being excessive.  We get three (yes, three) close-up shots of people
vomiting their guts out.  What Duke and Gonzo do to their hotel rooms is
so awful, and it just makes me want to look away.  I think that
implications of what the 60s did to drug use still shine through very
clearly, but the film is so sickening and distracting that any kind of
theme simply drowns in the dirty brown water.

Title
Review for Edtv (1999)
Director:   Ron Howard
Cast:  Matthew McConaughey, Jenna Elfman, Ellen DeGeneres, Woody
Harrelson, Martin Landau, Sally Kirkland, Rob Reiner, Dennis Hopper,
Elizabeth Hurley
Screenplay:  Lowell Ganz, Babaloo Mandel
Producers:  Brian Grazer, Ron Howard
Runtime:  123 min. 
US Distribution: Universal
Rated PG-13:  sex, partial nudity, language
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
EDtv is a satire so bland and toothless that I had trouble figuring out
the target of its criticism.  It's not a bad film -- it's elevated by a
few excellent performances, and there are several funny moments.  But
EDtv wants to be a satire at the core, and it just isn't effective.  And
with The Truman Show still strong in our memories, it's hard to imagine
another film on the same subject that measures up in any way.  Perhaps I
would have been easier on EDtv had it come out before Truman, but it
didn't, and I won't.
Ron Howard has made some good movies, and I can see how he thought this
one was going to be something special.  The film begins with Rob Reiner
as the president of a cable TV station; we see him telling a group of
reporters that they're planning a new kind of television show -- "True
TV."  He brings in the programming director, Cynthia Topping (Ellen
DeGeneres), to give the details of the show:  they're going to have
cameras on some average guy, twenty four hours a day, seven days a
week.  Uncut.  Unscripted.  Commercial-free.  And they think everyone
will watch.
The lucky man is Ed Pekurny, played by the affable Matthew
McConaughey.  Ed is a video store clerk of moderate intelligence, but
he's a pretty nice guy overall.  His family is more colorful than he is,
though:  his mother (Sally Kirkland) is an unstable, superficial woman
who somehow manages to be likable.  Her husband, Al (Martin Landau), is
Ed's stepfather, and he's bound to a wheelchair.  Ed's brother is Ray
(Woody Harrelson), a hot-blooded moron.  Ray is dating Shari (Jenna
Elfman); Ray isn't very nice to her, and so Shari and Ed end up getting
together.  
One of the several conflicts is pretty obvious without even seeing the
film -- Ed is first going to soak up the fame, just before realizing
that he hates it and wants his private life back.  There's going to be a
big problem with Shari.  And, naturally, the Evil Corporation won't let
him out of the show due to some ridiculous fine print on a contract he
signed.  If EDtv had defied my expectations by creating a more
interesting conflict, it would have been a better film.  But the overall
story is tedious and unimpressive, and so the individual moments that
work are forced to stand alone.
Here's a note to all film makers planning to make a film that satirizes
the television industry:  we know that the media intrudes on our private
lives.  We know that they're all just a bunch of money-grubbing jerks. 
We know that Fame is a double-edged sword.  If you're going to make a
movie that tries to tell us these things, you need to be vicious (see
Network) or artistically sublime (see The Truman Show).  Howard seems
way too concerned with the human story to actually put any bite into the
satire, and so the film's focus is skewed.  The human story is too goofy
to be truly engaging, and the Rob Reiner character is too unbelievably
mean to avoid looking like a cartoon (thus thwarting the satire).
But the film is not without its pleasures, most of them lying in the
performances .  Ellen DeGeneres is a wonderful comedic presence, and
squeezes laughs out of every scene (especially the one in which she
resigns from the station).  Jenna Elfman is utterly believable and
sympathetic as Shari, and I just want to hug her whenever she's on
screen.   Landau is also wonderful as the stepfather Al, and Kirkland
does a good job by his side.  And McConaughey, while he's no Harrison
Ford, makes a good, amiable protagonist.  
But EDtv ultimately whimpers to a close.  One of the film's themes, I
think, is that our lives are all worthy of soap opera-status.  But the
story in EDtv is too goofy and complex to take seriously, even though
it's clear that Howard wants us to take it seriously by the end.  And
the satire doesn't work because it never reaches an acceptable level of
bitterness.  In the end, EDtv is just another mediocre swing at
greatness.  You might find it enjoyable while it's running, but a week
later you probably won't even remember its name, let alone the target of
its ridicule.  

Title
Review for Lethal Weapon 4 (1998)
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
I try not to go into films with extreme expectations in either
direction, but when it comes to a series that, in my opinion, has
outstayed its welcome, I can't help but be skeptical.  Such was the case
with Lethal Weapon 4, the previews for which all made the film look like
a big joke of a movie.  Before seeing it, the biggest surprise I got was
finding out that it's actually rated R, and that the producers hadn't
wimped out and gone for the PG-13 rating to make the audience wider.  
I love the first two films, because they center around the characters
and their realistic struggles.  Sure, they're funny movies, and quirky a
lot of the time, but they're also gritty in such a way that sets them
apart from other buddy-cop movies.  Lethal Weapon 3 is a bore, a
formulaic and mediocre action film in every way.  I figured the fourth
film would be even worse, going strictly for laughs without presenting
its story with any degree of seriousness.  And I was right -- Lethal
Weapon 4 does go mostly for laughs, and doesn't take its own story
seriously.  And, oddly enough, it works.  It's not risky, nor is it near
the quality of the first two films, but it's fun and effective as
entertainment.  It also expands on the characters in a surprisingly full
way, and any sequel that does this has my respect.
As the posters all say, "The gang's all here!"  This, of course, refers
to Riggs (Mel Gibson) and Murtaugh (Danny Glover).  It also refers to
the large assemblage of supporting characters, including Leo Getz (Joe
Pesci), Lorna (Rene Russo), and now Detective Butters (Chris Rock). 
Five protagonists is a bit steep for any film, even a two-hour-plus
action movie (especially a two-hour-plus action movie), but, thankfully,
Lethal Weapon 4 doesn't regress to Batman & Robin status -- none of the
characters are pointless or underused.
The story, however, is a little on the weak side.  Well, it's actually
about as weak as any story I've heard this year.  It centers around some
bad Chinese men (led by a very bad man played by Jet Li), who attempt to
counterfeit a large sum of money to bring a few Chinese diplomats
(perhaps they are diplomats...the film never quite explains their
significance) into America, where, according to Li's character, laws can
be avoided using money.  What I've described takes place only in the
final hour of the film; the first hour is spent in limbo, where we see
our heroes delivering some truly well-written dialogue.    
In any event, director Richard Donner is clearly more interested in the
subplots, probably because the subplots are far more interesting.  All
the female characters begin the film pregnant; Riggs' struggles come
when he realizes that Lorna wants to marry him.  Meanwhile, Murtaugh's
daughter is pregnant and married to Butters, but they've kept these
rather large secrets from her father.  Then there's Leo, who is, once
again, present for no discernable reason except to profusely utilize the
f-word and extract large bouts of laughter from the audience.
I don't often enjoy films when it's obvious that basically no thought
was put into the story.  This is a film that doesn't rely on plotting or
pacing, but on dialogue and individual episodes.  The film is so
successful as a comedy that I'm strangely dictated to ignore the serious
shortcomings in the story and simply enjoy it for the masterful and
fluid way in which it's been presented.  The action is nothing
particularly new, but it holds with the standards of the series.  There
is, however, a truly excellent finale which takes place on a dock in the
rain at night.  And I liked the scene that had Riggs surfing the street
on a wooden table.  
It's odd, really, that the film entirely forfeits a chance at a story,
and still manages character development.  It's nice to see that the
characters who've been brought back are the same, and fleshed out a
little bit more (even Riggs and Murtaugh).  It's also nice to see a
colorful supporting cast put to good use -- Rock is terrific and
hilarious as Murtaugh's new son-in-law, while Joe Pesci has removed
himself from my Most Hated Actors list by delivering a strangely
affecting and truly funny performance.  Li makes an effective and
sometimes-sympathetic villain.  And, of course, Gibson and Glover
maintain their undeniable chemistry which has made the series so popular
over the last decade.
Some people think that sheer entertainment value isn't enough to make a
film worth watching.  I think that it is, and when a film is as
skillfully assembled as Lethal Weapon 4, there's no reason to trash it
just because the story is absurd.  Sure, a better story would have made
a better movie, and I didn't always get the feeling that the people
involved were interested in making a good movie.  But that's irrelevant
-- I laughed, and the full theater of people with whom I watched this
film laughed, too.  I also cared about the characters, and felt good
when Riggs sees his newborn daughter for the first time.  Oh, who needs
a story, anyway?  

Title
Review for Big Lebowski, The (1998)
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        The Coen brothers are strange.  If their films reflect their
personalities in any way, I probably wouldn't be terribly interested in
meeting them, not because I wouldn't like them, but because I would fear
them.  That's okay--chances have it I'll never meet them.  I'll continue
to watch their films, though, and probably continue to enjoy them.  
        The Big Lebowski fits nicely into that Coen style, a mold in which they
amalgamate original humor with violence and high numbers of expletives. 
At the same time, the film is essentially pointless.  I find this to be
a strong point.  It's occasionally nice to see a movie that doesn't
force feed a Deep Meaning, but simply forces viewers to pay attention
because it's jam-packed with pop-culture references and bowling jokes. 
Wait, now that I think about it, The Big Lebowski features a deeply
complex bowling motif.
        Jeff Bridges stars as a man named Jeff Lebowski, but he goes as The
Dude.  The Dude is an unemployed loser (for lack of a more concise
word).  He does bowl, though, and presumably he is very good.  He bowls
with his friends, Walter (John Goodman) and Donny (Steve Buscemi).  The
first scene of the film places the Dude in a situation in which he is
roughed up by a couple of thugs looking for a man named Lebowski.  The
Dude quickly explains that they have the wrong man, but it's too late: 
they have already urinated on his Oriental rug.  
        Irate (or, as irate as the Dude can get), he heads to meet this
Lebowski (the Big Lebowski, played by David Huddleston).  The Dude
demands that his carpet is replaced.  And...
        Wow, I could just go on and on.  The story unravels so quickly, and
there are so many developments that I don't know where to stop summing
it up and end the paragraph with "It goes on from there."  It's all
about the consequences the Dude faces just because he wanted his rug
replaced. 
        It's entertaining and engaging all the way through because there are a
lot of well-drawn characters.  The Dude, for instance, played with
wonderful indifference by Bridges, is easily the most interesting
washout I've ever seen.  He always has a dumbfounded look on his
dim-witted face, even when he gets splashed with paint and toilet
water.  I don't think he utters more than one or two original thoughts
in the entire film; most of his dialogue is in reflection of the ongoing
destruction of his car.
        John Goodman, in just over two months, has now appeared in four films
this year.  Miraculously, I'm not sick of him yet--I suppose this
proves, to some extent, that he can change enough from film to film that
I don't grow tired of his antics.  He utilizes the f-word very well
here, and seems perfectly fit to play a Vietnam vet who ain't afraid of
nothin'.  Julianne Moore, who needs to be in every film, is wonderful
here as the Big Lebowski's somehow-British feminist daughter, Maude.  We
get the feeling she adopted the British accent because she thought it
was cool, and wanted to project the coolness in her voice.
        And there is the usual array of colorful cameo characters.  John
Turturro is disturbingly amusing as a purple-clad pederastic (is that a
word?) bowling freak named Jesus (that's Gee-zus, not Hey-soos).  David
Thewlis has a juicy two-line cameo as a girly friend of Maude's.  Steve
Buscemi gets cursed at a lot by Goodman.  And Sam Elliott shows up a
couple of times to brief us on the state of the characters, and to
provide a few closing thoughts.
        Coen films work because, even at their most ridiculous moments, they
still convey hints of realism.  I never doubted that any of the
ludicrous things happening on screen could actually happen in real
life.  I didn't care much for the excessively-strange dream sequences,
but in a film this over-the-top, I can accept it to go a little further
over the top.  The Big Lebowski is a funny, entertaining movie.  And,
like I said, it has no point.  What makes a pointless Coen film
different from the average pointless film, however, is that the chances
are you'll remember the Coen film for quite a while, even if it is just
to figure out what that damn bowling metaphor means.

Title
Review for Affliction (1997)
Director:   Paul Schrader
Cast:  Nick Nolte, Sissy Spacek, James Coburn, Willem Dafoe, Mary Beth
Hurt, Jim True, Holmes Osborne
Screenplay:  Paul Schrader (book by Russell Banks)
Producers:  Linda Reisman
Runtime:   113 min.
US Distribution: Lions Gate Filims Inc.
Rated R:  Violence, language
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Affliction is based on a novel by Russell Banks, and has been adapted
for the screen and directed by Paul Schrader.  The film features
brilliant performances from Nick Nolte and James Coburn, but it suffers
from the inescapable burden of voice-over narration.  This is some of
the worst narration I've ever encountered -- it's ham-handed,
condescending, theme-spewing nonsense, provided by a peripheral
character as if he's the center of the film.  The film didn't engage me 
properly, and this is why.
After all, Nolte's performance has finally proven to me that he's a
good actor, not just an annoying bundle of machismo (which is what I
thought of him until very recently).  He plays Wade Whitehouse, a
small-town rent-a-cop employed by the city.  We follow him through his
trifling, pathetic life.  His ex-wife (Mary Beth Hurt) thinks he's a
wreck, and they have a daughter whom he only sees on the weekends.  And
he's romantically involved with Margie Fogg (Sissy Spacek), a local
woman who sees something in him that no one else does.  
On the first day of deer hunting season, a rich member of the community
ends up dead; the only witness is Jack Hewitt (Jim True), Wade's partner
and friend.  Jack says that it was an accident, that the man was clumsy
and shot himself.  Wade doesn't quite believe him, and begins to
construct an insane plot in which his boss, Gordon (Holmes Osborne), has
sold out to a big corporation in order to take over the town.  Woven
through all this is character background on Wade -- his alcoholic father
(James Coburn), and his abusive behavior towards Wade and his brother,
Rolfe (Willem Dafoe).
Affliction is certainly not a bad film, even though there were points
during which I was so frustrated that I wanted to walk out of the
theater.  It does, after all, feature two of the best performances of
the year.  Schrader also makes some interesting artistic choices; the
film has a cold, ominous tone.  We get the feeling that the characters
are always on the edge of their feelings, as if the slightest change
might destroy their lives.  There are many wonderful shots throughout
the picture, such as a pair of headlights moving slowly through the
white landscape of early-evening.  
But Schrader is also responsible for the film's overall failure.  It
seems that one of the main problems with adapting a novel into a film is
that so much information must be converted from exposition.  Atom
Egoyan, who adapted Banks' The Sweet Hereafter, managed to get all the
important information from the book onto the screen without resorting to
flashbacks and voice-overs.  Schrader, however, has taken the easy way
out.  Instead of letting us imagine the horror Wade and Rolfe go through
with their father, he shows it to us in grainy, manipulative
flashbacks.  Whose flashbacks are they?  Well, we assume they're Wade's,
although they play more like a horrific home video with no real
point-of-view.
This brings me to the film's central flaw, which is Rolfe's voice-over
narration.  The narration opens and closes the film, and can be heard in
various parts throughout.  In the opening shots, Rolfe explains to us
what's going to happen to Wade.  In the concluding sequences, he tells
us what's wrong with Wade.  He spells out to us the theme -- the way a
father's abuse can ruin a child -- so explicitly that I almost wondered
why Schrader had bothered making the film at all.  On one level, it's
interesting to see the way Rolfe denies the fact that he, too, was
"afflicted by that man's violence" (as he puts it), but the mere
presence of the narration is both insulting and frustrating.  I'd
imagine that Banks framed the novel this way, but it seems clear that
Schrader should have changed this in the interest of cinema.
Thankfully, Nolte and Coburn are present to hold the picture together. 
We get a sense of Wade's desperation, and we realize his desire to
actually be someone -- to have a purpose in his life.  Nolte subtly
conveys the developments through skillful acting, making me wish
Schrader had just trusted us to get what we need from his performance. 
Coburn is also fascinating as the abusive father, especially in his last
scene, when it seems that the entire purpose of his life was to turn
Wade into a mean son of a bitch.  
But I was sidetracked, even with the power of these two performances. 
I didn't sympathize with the characters the way I should have, mostly
because of Schrader's ill-advised and baffling direction.  Affliction is
a story about Wade, a pathetic man who lies to himself.  It's not a
story about Rolfe, Wade's sound-minded brother, who gazes on the
situation without the objectivity he thinks he has.  I don't know why
Schrader chose to frame the picture through Rolfe's eyes, but, in doing
so, he has wronged a perfectly good story, and a couple of perfect
performances.

Title
Review for Jackie Brown (1997)
Director: Quentin Tarantino
Cast: Pam Grier, Samuel L. Jackson, Robert Forster, Bridget Fonda,
Michael Keaton, Robert De Niro, Chris Tucker
Rated R: Profanity, sex, drugs, violence
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    Only Quentin Tarantino can make violence, drugs, lust, and bad
people this appealing. There's something so witty and downright fun
about these evil people and the horrible things they do. They way they
talk to each other in profanity-laden inner-city dialect, the way they
can't even manage a sentence without some kind of mind-altering chemical
running through their veins, the way murder and sex are used as
thoughtless tools--these elements, though completely unpleasant in
theory, always manage to make themselves likable in a film by Tarantino.
Jackie Brown obviously is no exception to this observation. It's a two
and a half our character study on a bunch of people that, for the most
part, are rather despicable.
    First, there's Ordell, a drug-pushing criminal who kills people in
his sleep. Played by Samuel L. Jackson with that kind of volatile
hilarity that only Jackson can manage successfully, we laugh at Ordell
even though he's a psychopathic monster. Every bit of concern and
consideration he shows is ultimately for his own good--he cares for no
one.
    Ordell's partner in crime is Louis (Robert De Niro). Louis is slow,
probably because he takes in more marijuana smoke than air. Louis is
also a murderous psycho, but only out of instinct. The flashes of
violence he shows are clearly beyond his control, although he can't
express this disability of his because he has basically no control over
the English language.
    Ordell's "surfer girl" is Melanie (Bridget Fonda) whose existence is
limited mostly to smoking, watching TV, and having sex with whomever is
nearby. She also likes to make people mad by patronizing them, and she
has no loyalty to anyone.
    There are some nice people, though. Pam Grier plays the title
character, a luckless flight attendant who gets nailed by a couple of
cops (Michael Keaton and Michael Bowen) with $50,000 in her bag. She has
the money because she's a carrier for Ordell; she makes very little
money as a flight attendant, but Ordell pays her well. The cops try to
cut her a deal, but she resists. Ordell, of course, thinks she's going
to rat him out, so he tries to kill her and fails.
    From this point on, the characters engage in a twisted sort of tag,
in which everyone is out to get a certain sum of money from Ordell.
Jackie enlists the help of the other nice character in the film, Max
Cherry (Robert Forster, in the film's best performance), who is Ordell's
bail bondsman and an ex-cop, and they manage to play everyone else.
    This film is so entertaining and energetic that I found myself
completely submerged in its reality through the entire running time. The
characters all have such strong chemistry among one another that
watching them interact in this conniving, back-stabbing manor is
embarrassingly fun. The relationship between Max and Jackie is
especially well-done, and surprisingly moving towards the end.
Tarantino's characterizations are right on, and he never misses a beat
with his calculated direction.
    I've heard some people say this film is boring; others talk about
the fact that it centers around immorality and that none of the
characters have any redeeming qualities. If you find this film dull and
overlong, then there's not much I can say--you must have some kind of
resistance to well-written and fleshed-out characters. If you don't like
these people and despise their actions, then that's even more of a
reason to see this film. In the last ten minutes, Tarantino makes it
perfectly clear that he doesn't condone the actions of these people. I
felt pretty safe in his hands knowing that the people in the film that I
liked would come out of the situation unscathed.

Title
Review for Instinct (1999)
Director: Jon Turtletaub
Cast: Anthony Hopkins, Cuba Gooding Jr., Donald Sutherland, Maura
Tierney, George Dzundza
Screenplay: Gerald Di Pego (based on the novel by Daniel Quinn)
Producers: Barbara Boyle, Michael Taylor
Runtime: 
US Distribution: Buena Vista Pictures
Rated R: Violence
Copyright 1999 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
You know, I never really wondered what the Tarzan films would have been
like had Tarzan been an old man.  While watching Instinct, I couldn't
help but acknowledge the way the film carelessly rehashes the
well-explored themes of those earlier movies.  Even beside the Tarzan
comparison, Instinct just isn't a very good film.  It's painfully
idealistic, manipulative, and silly.  I didn't hate it --  it's simply
impossible for me to hate any film starring Anthony Hopkins;
furthermore, most of the acting is quite good.  But I can recognize
Instinct for what it is beyond my subjective admiration for the actors
involved.  I can also recognize reasons for wanting to make Instinct,
and it's pretty clear that this could have been a good film with a
massive script overhaul and a director less interested in imitating
movies like Patch Adams.  
Things start off in the predictable way, as director Jon Turtletaub
introduces us to our hero, Theo Caulder (Cuba Gooding, Jr.), an
ambitious, young psychiatrist under the supervision of an experienced,
old psychiatrist (Donald Sutherland).  Caulder soon finds himself
involved in the case of his life, the one he thinks will make him
famous.  The subject is Ethan Powell (Hopkins), an anthropologist who
has been living among gorillas in Africa for the past two years.  Powell
has been charged with the brutal murders of several men in Africa, and
it's now Caulder's job to find out of he's mentally competent enough to
stand trial.  Through a series of short sessions, Caulder tries to put
together the complex psyche of Powell.  
Even though it really is an old man version of Tarzan, much of this
central idea is rather interesting.  As I said, Hopkins is captivating
for every second he's on screen; he has a way of convincing us that he's
not acting, that he's actually a man who has just spent two years of his
life living with a family of wild gorillas.  The character himself isn't
very interesting -- he's just an anthropologist who really likes
gorillas -- but Hopkins makes him interesting with subtleties both in
speech and action.  Gooding Jr. does strong work opposite Hopkins,
playing Caulder as an intelligent and flawed individual.  The
screenplay, written by Gerald Di Pego and "suggested by" a novel by
Daniel Quinn, gives us no background information on Caulder, but that
seems to be the point (he has no time for friends because he's obsessed
with his work).  Nonetheless, these two actors are essentially the
entire list of things that are good about Instinct.
Unfortunately, filmmaking this inept can mangle the effect of even the
best acting.  Turtletaub and Di Pego are both guilty of Instinct's
artistic failure, for they work together to make the dumbest, most
cliche-ridden environment in which their characters are to live, and
they do so by means of brainless subplots.  First, we have the prison
warden subplot.  The prison warden is evil and wants to stop Caulder's
progress at any cost; if this means taking Caulder off the Powell case,
then that's fine.  There's also the prison guard subplot.  The prison
guard is played by John Ashton; the prison guard seems to enjoy
mercilessly beating upon the psychotics under his supervision, and he's
instrumental in helping the story along to its obvious conclusion.  Then
there's the daughter subplot, in which Maura Tierney (playing the
daughter) must look very upset a lot of the time; after all, she is the
daughter of a deranged man.
If some of this stuff sounds familiar, that's because they're all
devices that have been used and reused in countless other films.  The
evil doctor in Patch Adams is not unlike the evil warden here.  The
offensive caricatures of mental patients lack the depth that the similar
portrayals in One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest had.  Ashton's evil prison
guard pales in comparison to Clancy Brown's in The Shawshank
Redemption.  Hopkins' performance will undoubtedly remind audiences of
his turn in The Silence of the Lambs.  And then there's the whole Tarzan
thing, which is more than a little bit obvious through the entire
film.    
Perhaps what irritates me most about Instinct is the half-hearted
attempt at philosophical depth.  The message Powell brings back from the
wild is not a subtle one:  he thinks that humans are "takers," that they
expand and kill and that we should all just live like gorillas.  I can
sympathize with that, but only when it's in a compelling film.  This is
the kind of stupid movie -- just like Patch Adams -- in which a big
group of characters (psychotic inmates, in this case) rise against the
evil forces oppressing them by tearing up playing cards.  What does any
of this have to do with a man who has just spent two years of his life
with gorillas?  If all the subplots of Instinct had been left on the
cutting room floor, we would have had a thirty-minute movie far superior
to the two-hour one that I watched today.  If the central idea had been
developed beyond the Old Man Tarzan premise, then we would really have
had something interesting -- a movie that doesn't rely on the strength
of its actors.

Title
Review for Men with Guns (1997/II)
Director:  John Sayles
Cast:  Federico Luppi, Damian Delgado, Dan Rivera Gonzalez, Tania Cruz,
Damian Alcazar, Mandy Patinkin, Kathryn Grody
Screenplay:  John Sayles
Producers:  R. Paul Miller, Maggie Renzi
Runtime:  127 min.
US Distribution:  Sony Pictures Classics
Rated R:  language, violence
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
John Sayles' Men With Guns is a film that has received immense critical
acclaim, and, having finally seen it, I think I understand why.  Sayles
is a unique film maker:  he writes, directs, and edits all of his films
outside of any studio system, beyond distribution rights and the usual
Hollywood bureaucracy.  When I watch his films (the most recent being
Lone Star, which I loved), I get the feeling that I'm seeing his exact
vision, the way he wants it presented.  I imagine him as an independent
James Cameron (although the glaring difference in budget needs between
the two men is striking).
Sayles tackles "issues" in his films.  He doesn't just tell stories--he
has far-reaching themes and agendas.  Men With Guns centers around Dr.
Fuentes (Federico Luppi), an older gentleman unhappy with his life.  He
decides to take a vacation to see former students who are helping the
sick in impoverished villages in the countryside.  Not long into his
journey, he runs into one of his students.  This young man was a very
promising doctor when Fuentes knew him, but now he's selling illegal
drugs and merchandise to get by.  
Fuentes is alarmed by this encounter, and he expedites his quest to
find the rest of his students.  He journeys further into the country,
and meets travelling companions in a few places.  He finds a young boy
(Dan Rivera Gonzalez) whose parents have apparently been killed by
guerillas.  It's about this time that the big picture of the situation
becomes clearer:  the men with guns described in the title are two
distinct groups of people--the military and the guerillas.
With each village that Fuentes visits, he finds that his students have
been executed in torturous ways.  Some of them were executed by the
military for helping the guerillas; some were killed for the opposite. 
The point is that these men with guns roam the countryside and brandish
their power on the unarmed masses, who are all so frightened that they
don't speak to strangers, regardless of how non-threatening the
strangers appear.  Also during his journey, Fuentes encounters a couple
of American tourists (Mandy Patinkin and Kathryn Grody) who are
oblivious to the truly awful things going on around them.
Sayles does an incredible job of developing the several characters that
he introduces in his film.  Fuentes, played with conviction and grace by
Luppi, is a fascinating person--he's a man who has recently lost his
wife, and is now seeking absolution in finding his students, to see how
they are making their lives important.  Fuentes also meets a former army
soldier (Damian Delgado), who is now a frail, paranoid man without
pride.  One of the most poignant subplots involves a former priest
(Damian Alcazar) who has lost his faith.
The framework of the story is direct, very well-organized, and simple
to follow.  Much of the scenery is lush with a rich emerald green
overtone, and the film is always appeasing to the eye.  Sayles' dialogue
(in Spanish with English subtitles) is sharp, and often subtly funny. 
I'd also like to point out that this is an American film--recent
American films about foreign cultures (Kundun, for example) have the
characters speaking English, which greatly takes away from the
authenticity of the film.  It's nice to see that Sayles was willing to
sacrifice a lot of box office attention to make his film as realistic as
possible.
Sayles is not a director who bogs down his audience in sentimentality. 
Although the themes and issues in Men With Guns are heavy, and often
very sad, Sayles completely avoids the usual treatment of sappy music
and elaborate camera work to heighten the emotions.  The result is not
dryness, but material that is more thought-provoking than emotional. 
The issues here, centering a great deal around oppression and mindless
war-mentality, seem, at first glance, only relevant to the country in
which the film takes place (which is an unnamed Central American
country).  
But this is a film, I imagine, that gathers strength the more times you
see it.  It takes multiple viewings to understand the full significance
of the story in relation to the setting.  As I watched Men With Guns, I
was always interested, but I never found myself wrapped up in the
story.  I was only marginally moved by the conclusion, and only one or
two scenes throughout truly grabbed me.  I wanted to be more exhilarated
when the film was over, but I almost felt indifferent.
The reason for this is simple:  there is so much going on in Men With
Guns.  There are many round characters, a developed story, and themes so
powerful they almost outshine the rest of the film.  I think I was too
caught up in my thoughts to be moved by the story, which is why I
believe that a second and third viewing of the film is necessary to
truly understand everything that Sayles is doing.  I admire this film,
and appreciate it for its intelligence and completeness in its
exploration of its themes.  John Sayles is a poetic film maker, and,
like most poems, this film needs to be experienced more than once.

Title
Review for Soldier (1998)
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
>From the director of Event Horizon comes Soldier, a bland and
uninspired action film, flowing with richly-textured cliches and a
soothingly sensual story with almost no originality whatsoever.  Paul
Anderson, whose last film is far superior to this one, unfortunately
forgot that action films need innovation to survive.  But Soldier,
penned by Blade Runner writer David Webb Peoples, merely begins with an
interesting idea and regresses quickly into a competently-made bore.  
Not even a mute Kurt Russell can inspire a glimpse life in the film.
The best moments are early on, when we meet our hero, Todd, as a young
boy.  He and other young males are forced to go through military
training that begins at birth and ends in the late teen years.  The
training is harsh and grueling, and enforces simple rules like "mercy is
for the weak."  The military breeds the boys to be emotionless killing
machines; this is one of the interesting ideas in the film, for most
movies about amoral monsters take the morally easy route by making the
monsters not quite human in some way (The Terminator comes to mind).  
That's about as far as the originality goes, for Todd (played by Russell
as an adult) and his fellow soldiers are soon replaced by bigger and
faster superhuman soldiers, genetically engineered by Colonel Mekum
(Jason Isaacs).  
Thought to be dead, Todd is dumped on the garbage planet of Arcadia
(you know it's bad when the planets have Star Wars-like themes); while
there, he meets a peaceful band of garbage people, the most prominent
members being Mace (Sean Pertwee), his beautiful wife Sandra (Connie
Neilsen), and their mute son.  Lucky for the film, the military decides
to test their new soldiers on Arcadia, assuming that no one lives there
(and certainly having no idea that Todd is still alive).  Todd,
naturally, becomes the only force capable of standing up against the
superhuman maniacs.  And he bonds with the mute kid.
And, unfortunately, there's not much else to say about it.  Soldier
isn't downright awful; Anderson, though clearly not at his best, is
incapable of making an ugly picture.  The special effects are good, and
the sets are nice (much of the garbage planet is convincingly done). 
The digital effects are also swell, and the action sequences are pretty
square.  The problem is that you, I, and everyone else has seen all of
this before.  Stuff explodes.  People die.  The hero wins.  I mean, come
on -- familiarity is okay, but Soldier is so familiar that it really
just strikes us as boring.
If there's anything interesting aside from the setup, it's the acting. 
Russell is always a watchable performer, and he plays Todd the way Todd
needs to be played -- silently, and with no emotion.  It's hard to say
whether or not Russell took the role seriously, because there isn't
enough characterization to show a significant change in whatever small
personality he has.  Backup performances from Neilsen and Pertwee both
exceed the quality of the material, while Jason Isaacs is mildly amusing
in his dreadfully cliched role (as the head military guy who refuses to
listen to reason).  
If I sound lost for words, that's because I am:  Soldier is a standard
action picture.  It's too loud to be considered serious science fiction
(everything in the film explodes at some point), and since Anderson
relies on hollow shots of Todd crying or Todd staring to convey depth, I
wouldn't be surprised to find that Peoples' script was a little more
thought-provoking than the film.  It's not a loathsome movie -- there's
nothing morally objectionable in its content (except, maybe, that the
film is action pornography that pretends to have depth, but that's an
entirely different subject).  It's likely that most will describe
Soldier as "just another action film," and, with that in mind, you can
decide for yourself whether or not it's worth your time.

Title
Review for Thin Red Line, The (1998)
Director: Terrence Malick
Cast: Sean Penn, Adrien Brody, James Caviezel, Ben Chaplin, George
Clooney, John Cusack, Woody Harrelson, Elias Koteas, Jared Leto, John C.
Reilly, Nick Nolty, John Travolta, Bill Pullman, Paul Gleason
Screenplay: Terrence Malick
Producers: Robert Michael Geisler, Grant Hill, John Roberdeau
Runtime: 170 min.
US Distribution: 20th Century Fox
Rated R: violence, language
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Before going to see The Thin Red Line, I had heard that the film was
nothing but a visually impressive look into Terrence Malick's own ego. 
I heard that it was bloated, impenetrable, and thematically weak.   I
didn't hear that it was a bad movie -- no, I simply had heard that it
wasn't going to be as good as I hoped it would be.  Times like this
remind me of why I shouldn't listen to word of mouth.
You see, The Thin Red Line is a wonderful film.  It's at once the most
visually stunning picture of 1998 and the most thematically layered. 
Malick's loose interpretation of the James Jones novel is also a hugely
ambitious picture --  it brings us a frightening, surrealistic vision of
war.  It shows us the way World War II affected individual soldiers.  It
shows us the way war destroys nature and the physical world.  Malick
does all of this in one, three-hour package that can not possibly be
fully understood with just one viewing.
One problem I heard is that the film doesn't have much of a narrative. 
This is true, though I don't think it's a problem.  The picture centers
around a group of soldiers and their advance on Guadalcanal.  As the
film opens, we meet Private Witt (James Caviezel), living among a group
of peaceful natives.  The first twenty minutes of the film are slow and
pensive -- Malick is clearly focusing on the simple lifestyle of the
natives, the way they happily live in and among nature.  One of the best
shots in the film occurs early on:  after several minutes of the serene,
colorful images, an American ship emerges in the distance.  It's a
jostling image, and one that strikes us simply because technology, when
compared to nature, is ugly.
The next act of the picture has the soldiers advancing on Guadalcanal. 
They land on the island with no casualties, but they soon find Japanese
resistance on the rolling hills inland.  Lt. Col. Gordon Tall (Nick
Nolte) is in charge of the operation.   Beneath him is Captain James
Staros (Elias Koteas); Tall wants the men to charge straight up the
hill, but Staros has a problem sending his men in to die.  There are
many soldiers in these scenes, but only a few get notable screen time: 
Private Witt, with his constant introspections about the meaning of
life, and Private Bell (Ben Chaplin), who can not stop thinking about
his wife (Miranda Otto) back home.
Malick's most apparent success is in the battle scenes.  They are truly
frightening, and flawlessly photographed.  For several minutes, Malick
focuses on the lush, verdant hills, covered in tall grass, intertwined
with the gales that slide through the rolls.  Then, without warning,
bombs explode, defacing the stunning image.   The soldiers run through
the landscape like ants, getting picked off by by Japanese soldiers,
invisible in the mountainsides.  Hans Zimmer's musical score pounds
mercilessly in the background.  Malick is unflinching here -- people die
instantly, without big, Hollywood death scenes.  Characters that he
introduces to us suddenly lose their life, and Malick doesn't
apologize.  He perfectly captures the unrelenting chaos of war.
But the war scenes are not all that Malick does perfectly.  The slow,
contemplative character moments are equally powerful.  The film has a
lot of voice-over narration; we can't always tell who's talking, and
that's a sobering statement on Malick's part -- he seems to suggest that
none of these soldiers have any life beyond war.  Frequent shots of the
serenity of nature provide jostling evidence that Malick finds humanity
and war a cancerous force on earth.
The Thin Red Line is also a showcase for the actors involved.  I
normally find Nick Nolte repulsive, but he is the shining performance
here.  There is so much in his character -- from the reasons he wants
the soldiers to head right into death, all the way down to the
disappointment he has in his son -- and Nolte handles all of these
layers with ease.  Caviezel is also wonderful; I've never seen him in
anything else, but I found his character the most interesting.  Chaplin
(Washington Square) is another standout; watch carefully the scene in
which he reads the letter from his wife.   Both Koteas and Penn have
significant roles, and both handle the burden effortlessly.  There are
also interesting cameos from John Cusack, John Travolta, and George
Clooney.
Until now, I've resisted mentioning Saving Private Ryan.  And while I
appreciate the reviews that have not made a comparison between the two
films, I'd like to address it here.  Saving Private Ryan was a film that
affected me initially, and gradually lost its power as I thought about
the numerous contrivances in the story.  Frankly, The Thin Red Line
makes Spielberg's film look like a cartoon.  Malick's picture is far
superior in every way -- he doesn't apologize for war the way Spielberg
does.  He avoids every kind of Hollywood cliche (including the hideous
bookends that Spielberg couldn't resist using).   Saving Private Ryan,
by comparison, looks like it was shot on a soundstage.  The Thin Red
Line never feels that way.  I'm not saying that Spielberg's film is bad
-- no, I think it has a lot to offer.  But Malick's film is more
satisfying in each aspect.
However, I will admit that Saving Private Ryan is easier to approach. 
I don't think The Thin Red Line is for everyone (there were, after all,
numerous walk-outs during my screening).  It's long.  It's slow.  It's
extremely pensive.  But it's also a profound film, both thematically and
visually.  It takes energy to watch it, and it will drain you.  It might
even make you feel dehumanized.  But I don't think anyone can ignore the
power that Malick harnesses here.  I've never seen a better war film
than The Thin Red Line, and, for some reason, I don't think I ever will.

Title
Review for Dirty Work (1998)
Director:  Bob Saget
Cast:  Norm Macdonald, Chevy Chase, Artie Lange, Christopher McDonald,
Traylor Howard, Don Rickles, Jack Warden
Screenplay:  Norm Macdonald, Frank Sebastiano, Fred Wolf
Producers:  Robert Simonds
Runtime:  80 min.
US Distribution:  MGM
Rated PG-13:  crude sexual humor, language
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
When one goes into a "Saturday Night Live" spin-off movie starring Norm
Macdonald, one should not have high expectations.  I didn't have high
expectations, although the trailers for Dirty Work made me laugh hard
enough to want to see the movie.  Dirty Work is profoundly dumb,
centering around a ludicrous premise and going way over the line with
it.  It's also amazingly funny, filled to the brim with jokes that
actually work and scenes that are unusually hilarious.  Although it's
clear that absolutely no thought was put into the script, it's nice to
sit through a comedy that actually induces laughter.
Macdonald stars as Mitch Weaver, a loser.  He fills his life with odd
jobs, such as delivering pizza.  The film opens as he gets fired from
his job for delivering a pizza two minutes late.  We then see that his
girlfriend kicks him out (even though he offers "dirty sex" to make up
for losing his job).  Soon we meet his best friend, Sam (Artie Lange). 
They've been best friends for their entire lives (the film opens with a
funny introduction showing their childhood).
Jack Warden plays Sam's father; in a really silly subplot, it turns out
that he's also Mitch's father.  I have no idea what the point of this
is, but it's present in the film and highly stressed throughout.  The
title of the film comes in when Mitch realizes that he can make a lot of
money by charging people to take revenge on their nemesis.  In the
required Villain role, Christopher McDonald (who is now one of my
favorite silly-movie bad guys) has fun hamming it up.  
Macdonald co-wrote the film, along with Frank Sebastiano and Fred Wolf,
and though he doesn't know the first thing about intelligent
storytelling, there's something in the dialogue and his execution of the
lines that makes this film hysterically fun.  He always seems to be on
the verge of laughter (I don't really think he can act), but this only
adds to the odd dynamics of the film.  In fact, every time he opens his
mouth, it's funny -- you should laugh excessively at the scene in which
he shouts, "Who's that dude?" 
He also has a strange fixation with prostitutes.  The film doesn't go
for ten minutes at a time without mentioning prostitutes or brining them
on screen.  By the end of the film, he's enlisted so many prostitutes
that he can refer to his "loyal army of prostitutes."  Just hearing
Macdonald refer to such things is funny, but I'm not sure why.  I think
it's just the way he says it, because, if I referred to my loyal army of
prostitutes, I don't imagine that it would make people laugh.  One of
the funniest scenes in the film has Mitch using a live commercial to
advertise his business; this segment involves a lot of dead prostitutes
in the trunks of new cars.
Like all stupid-but-funny films, it has scenes and subplots that just
don't work.  Warden is disappointing; most of the scenes with him fall
flat (although the picture in the locket is pretty good).  He tries
really hard to be funny, but his lines just aren't that good, and he's a
little too over-the-top to be light and fluffy the way Macdonald is. 
Lange is also pretty funny, though overall I doubt he's much of an
actor.  And the story is totally ridiculous -- how did they even come up
with it?  I certainly have no idea, but I'd be the first to agree that
they took the premise as far as it could possibly go, and then further
than that.
Dirty Work is stupid and funny.  If you want to laugh and not think,
then go see it.  I don't see how you couldn't enjoy it if you like Norm
Macdonald, and especially if you think prostitutes are inherently
funny.  I liked it while noting its enormous flaws, and it passes
swiftly enough that you might not even notice that it's a full-length
film.  No matter how you look at it, though, I'm just glad that I was
able to laugh at all.  An unfunny comedy is unacceptable, and Dirty Work
is, at least, a good time.

Title
Review for General's Daughter, The (1999)
Director: Simon West
Cast: John Travolta, Madeleine Stowe, James Cromwell, Timothy Hutton,
Clarence Williams III, James Woods, Rick Dial, Leslie Stefanson
Screenplay: Christopher Bertolini, William Goldman (based on a novel by
Nelson DeMille)
Producers: Mace Neufeld
Runtime: 120 min.
US Distribution: Paramount Pictures
Rated R: Graphic sexual violence, nudity, language
Copyright 1999 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
The General's Daughter is a heartless, absurd film, a movie so
hopelessly dedicated to its inane plot that it forgets entirely about
its own characters.  Director Simon West treats issues like rape and
sexual fetish with ham-handed obscenity, creating a film that banks
almost entirely on exploitation and offensive pseudo-depth.  What's
worse is that the movie is haphazardly glued together by two characters
who are neither interesting nor sympathetic -- the ridiculous story
requires them to do unbelievable things in the interest of reaching a
dark conclusion in a sudden rain storm.
John Travolta finds himself in the middle of the mess, playing Warrant
Officer Paul Brenner; Brenner is assigned to find the murderer and rape
of Captain Elizabeth Campbell (Leslie Stefanson), daughter of General
Joe Campbell (James Cromwell).  Brenner is teamed up with ex-spouse
Sarah Sunderland (Madeline Stowe), and they check out all the suspects
on the base, including Elizabeth's mentor, Colonel Moore (James Woods). 
Soon, it becomes apparent that Elizabeth was into kinky sexual stuff,
but the question comes down to why -- and, of course, who.  
Ebert's Law of the Economy of Characters can be applied here; one
interesting thing I noted is that not only are all the characters
suspects at some point (including the two protagonists), but almost all
of them end up directly intertwined with the story.  Perhaps I should
have issued a spoiler alert before mentioning that, but it's painfully
obvious from the beginning that everyone in the film is hiding
something.  On a story level, The General's Daughter is ineptly
constructed.  The film, adapted by Christopher Bertolini and William
Goldman from Nelson DeMille's novel (which was apparently based on a
true story), plods along to its conclusion, filling in the blanks with
stale, unrealistic dialogue and "shocking" plot developments.
Having not read the novel, it's difficult to determine if these
problems are the fault of the adapters or the original author, but I
suppose they all are guilty to some degree.  Scene after scene stumbles
with pointless insincerity; minutes after finding the dead young woman,
Brenner and Sunderland engage in sarcastic dialogue, which includes
endless strings of forced lines.  (Sunderland actually asks Brenner,
"Why was she killed?" to which I would have answered, "If I knew, then
the movie would already be over.")  Only after we've spent twenty
minutes or so with these characters do we learn that they have a sordid
history together; this angle, though apparently present to develop their
characters, is never explored.
Not that it really matters, since the characters consistently do
ludicrous things for no other reason than to drive the plot.  In one
scene, Sunderland is attacked by a man in a mask.  She sees one of his
rings, and she and Brenner find the man later that day based on the
ring.  Instead of questioning him like as they would a real suspect,
they take him to Brenner's houseboat, beat him up, and pour hot coffee
in his lap.  This scene really pushed me over the edge, not because it's
gratuitous and mean-spirited, but because it illustrates the film's
complete disregard for the characters and the audience.  It was
impossible for me to feel anything for these people beyond this scene,
mostly because nothing they do comes as a surprise.  I realized that
these constructs on screen aren't actually characters, but devices
present only to serve the story.
This would have been bad enough without the West's need to hose his
movie down in tasteless images of rape and sexual misconduct. 
Compelling films about sexual crimes don't spend a lot of time on rape
flashbacks, and they certainly don't show as much skin and sweat as a
typical pornographic picture.  These scenes are not the least bit
powerful; on the contrary, they're intended simply to provide the
audience with the necessary resentment for the villain, whomever that
may turn out to be.  In addition, the movie treats sexual fetishes --
and sadomasochism in particular -- as if it's a perversion of everything
we know to be pure.  This standpoint is certainly allowed, but only in
accompaniment with well-developed themes to back it up.  As it is, the
film forgets that a lot of people have sexual fetishes, and that putting
on a pair of handcuffs does not make a person insane.
Perhaps the only positive elements in The General's Daughter are a
couple of the performances.  James Woods has a few terrific scenes, and
plays his role with sharp, witty subtlety.  I also liked James Cromwell,
mostly because he comes across as slightly sympathetic despite the
obvious intent of West to make him villainous.  Nonetheless, these
performances are undermined entirely by the dreary, obligatory
atmosphere and the senseless neglect of characterization.  The General's
Daughter is the worst kind of Hollywood film -- it pretends to have a
soul, to be of strict moral code, when in fact it has nothing more than
a group of cardboard cut-outs force-feeding the audience a toxic
landfill of plot contrivances and one-sided moral judgments.  

Title
Review for Pi (1998)
Director:  Darren Aronofsky
Cast:  Sean Gullette, Mark Margolis, Ben Shenkman, Pamela Hart
Screenplay:  Darren Aronofsky
Producers:  Eric Watson
Runtime:  84 min.
US Distribution:  Artisan Films
Rated R:  violence, language, disturbing images
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
When I was in high school, I was a math nerd.  I wasn't as bad as the
real Math Nerds, but I was close enough.  I sat quietly in calculus and
got As (though only once did I earn the highest score on an exam).  I
really liked math, and I was good at it.  I thought of things in terms
of math, in terms of equations and numbers, and my thought process was
logical and straightforward.  I was also a pretty boring person back
then.  I am, however, overstating the importance of math in my life,
because now, in my third year of college, I'm an English major. 
But I still gaze upon math with a certain level of affectionate
remembrance.  Perhaps that is why I greatly admire Pi, Darren
Aronofsky's visually masterful tribute to math nerds.  This is an
engaging, profound film -- it strings us along in a whirl of
mathematical madness, and then concludes with a fascinating hypothesis
about the nature of the universe around us.  It's a film that feels new
and original, a thriller that doesn't have gun shots or car chases, and
a suspense piece that never regresses into inanity or stupidity.  
The main character is an odd, introverted math nerd named Max Cohen
(Sean Gullette).  He works on finding patterns in the stock market. 
Over time, however, the numbers get to him, and he becomes obsessed with
finding a pattern that connects all the contents of the universe.  His
journey begins one night when his computer spits out a 216-digit number,
and then crashes.  Max, distraught from losing all of his work, falls
into depression, and periodically goes into seizures during which he has
to take pills and give himself injections.
It turns out that there are many people after this 216-digit number,
and they're all trying to get Max to give it to them.  A group of Jews
(led by a numerologist played by Ben Shenkman) need to find a word for
God that is 216 letters longs.  And a crazy lady (Pamela Hart) wants the
number to understand the stock market more clearly.  Max needs to
confide in his former math professor (Mark Margolis), but his professor
just tries to deter him from his path because he knows what lies at the
end of it.  
There's not a moment in Pi that isn't fascinating in its bizarre,
surreal way.  Aronofsky's visual style is shockingly straightforward;
the film was shot in grainy black and white, with blaring contrasts, and
the result is a stark picture that always drips with desperation. The
sets are small and claustrophobic, and often too dark to see clearly. 
This is not a flaw, but an appropriate stylistic choice -- Aronofsky
succeeds in making Max's world unique and horrifying, and he does this
to prove his point.  
The story is fantastic and original; I've never seen a film about math,
and it's not likely that I will see another one any time soon. 
Aronofsky takes the story in the right direction, by searching for the
connection between math and nature.  He also does his story a great
service by developing the main character, and by finding an actor as
capable as Sean Gullette.  Gullette makes up for inexperience with
determination and energy, and delivers one of the most inspired
performances I've seen this year.  It can't be easy to play a character
so detached from what we all know is reality.
Pi revolves around mathematical concepts, but don't let that keep you
from seeing the film.  It doesn't pander to math nerds -- it makes its
points clearly without going overboard with terms and concepts.  
The film was made with just $60,000, but it never seems low-budget.  In
fact, by comparing it to a $115 million creatively bankrupt film like
Godzilla, Pi proves that a good script should cost a lot more than
special effects.  Perhaps, with a larger budget, Pi would not have been
as good -- I can see how this story could have been ruined by special
effects.  Instead, we have an idea-driven science fiction film, one that
is both unique and well-developed.  I shouldn't tell you why the film is
so satisfying at the end, but I will say one thing:  understanding
Aronofsky's theme takes nothing more than a brief shot of our heroic
math nerd calmly looking into the clear sky.   

Title
Review for Alien: Resurrection (1997)
Director: Jean-Pierre Jeunet
Cast: Sigourney Weaver, Winona Ryder, Ron Perlman, Dominique Pinon,
Michael Wincott, Dan Hedaya, J.E. Freeman, Brad Dourif, Raymond Cruz,
Kim Flowers, Gary Dourdan, Leland Orser
Rated R: Strong graphic violence, language
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    This is rumor control, here are the facts: Alien Resurrection is the
crowning achievement of the Alien saga.
    I am, of course, a fan of this series. And those of you not familiar
with my writing might think that I'm just one of those guys who loves
every film like this. I don't. None of them are this good. I have been
an Alien fan since I could think, and Alien Resurrection is everything I
could have hoped for, wished for, and wanted in a sequel to my favorite
films of all time. I'm biased, yes, but think of that for a moment--with
films of such high stature to which this film had to measure up, my
expectations were higher than any expectations than I've ever had of
anything, ever. Alien Resurrection met them.
    Sigourney Weaver returns, but this time she's not exactly the same
person: 200 years have passed since the events of Alien 3 took place.
Using a blood sample found on Fiorina 161 (the location of the third
film), rogue military scientists clone Lt. Ellen Ripley. Because she was
infected with the queen alien in the third film, her blood is now part
Alien--and so is she. The Ripley specimen they grow is in the same state
as she was just before she died--hosting the queen Alien embryo. The
scientists remove the creature and sew Ripley up.
    A group of space smugglers then show up with highly-secretive cargo,
for which the scientists pay a lot of money. The band is an interesting
group of characters (uniformly well-acted by the cast). My favorites
were the hot-head Johner (Ron Perlman in a strong performance), the
paraplegic technician Vreiss (Dominique Pinon, who is regrettably
underused), and the hard-edged killer of the group, Christie (Gary
Dourdan, in what will hopefully lead to more performances). I found
these characters every bit as interesting and fleshed-out as the
characters from the previous films. They're real characters that we care
about--well-written and human. The two main doctors are great, as well,
with a searing, evil performance from J.E. Freeman as Dr. Wren, and a
wacky bang-up job done by Brad Dourif as Dr. Gediman.
    Their cargo is a group of cryotubes containing living people, ripe
for Alien breeding--the scientists, of course, want to make more. And,
naturally, things don't go as planned--the Aliens escape.
    No, this is not a remake of the first two films. I've heard that
already. It is not. That is why it is so very good. Writer Joss Wheldon
knew what he was doing--he took elements from the first films and
modified them, toyed with them, and made them new. Director Jean-Pierre
Jeunet and cinematographer Darius Khondji then turned these elements
into a package so intense, so visceral, so emotionally and physically
draining, that I was and still am beside myself with joy for their
success. It does require more suspension of disbelief than the other
films, but the more I think about it, the more it makes sense (really).
    Jeunet's direction is splendid, and completely appropriate to take
the series in a new direction. Much like his work on his previous
(brilliant) films Delicatessen and The City of Lost Children, he uses a
lot of close-ups of faces making strange, almost comical, expressions.
Much of the film is humorous in that subtle, French way. There is a
great deal of intricate camerawork that goes into each scene, bringing
the film to life in a unique way that was not done by either James
Cameron or Ridley Scott (though it was touched upon by David Fincher).
Jeunet's intense, very European attack on the film makes it almost look
like a high-budget art-house film (an oxymoron?). What works with this
is Khondji's cinematography, who did similar miracles in Fincher's
Seven. This is a dark film, with breathtaking set pieces and locations,
but it's not dreary and depressing like it could have easily been: the
film has a kind of luminous quality, an obvious lively significance that
keeps it from being "just another sequel."
    As a thriller/action piece, the film is more than adequate. The film
does not base its suspense on scenes in which characters walk quietly
down hallways, looking around, hoping not to run into an Alien, but
having that happen anyway. Pierre and Wheldon both knew that this
approach has truly been done to death. No, now we have precarious and
intense underwater sequences (truly one of the most well-made and
suspenseful moments I've ever witnessed on the screen). We have
completely original moments of Alien self-sacrifice for the good of the
species. The Aliens are more intelligent than they have been in the
past. The film does not, by any means, bank on our fear of what the
creature looks like--we know what it looks like. It's no secret. They
don't just jump out of nowhere for cheap thrills. They're active and
intelligent, and that is more frightening than what they look like. The
Aliens have as much screen time as the humans in this film, and that is
the way it should be. The film goes beyond all three of its predecessors
in examining the Aliens as a hostile species.
    What I was really afraid of is that the film wouldn't delve into the
human aspect of the series, namely Ripley. I had nothing to fear. This
film is about Ripley, and even though the movie-making surrounding the
themes is close to perfect, the themes themselves resonate and truly
have a more potent meaning than anything depicted or explained in the
other films of the series. It has taken the series to a new, almost
unfathomable level--Ripley is now what she hates more than anything.
Even more ironic is her attitude towards the creatures, as if the death
and destruction around her is funny. Weaver is at her all-time best in
this film, a pillar of strength despite all that she has gone through.
In the climactic scenes, a new type of Alien is born, and this is
shocking on both a visual and mental level. The images of this film have
stuck in my mind, and the meaning they carry is just as strong. The
connection between Ripley and the Alien is so fully explored and probed
that it satisfies everything I've ever wanted to know about the species
and Ripley herself.
    So what is this "meaning" to which I keep referring? I'm sure you're
dying to know. Is it that overdone statement, "Cloning is bad!"?
Somewhat. There is certainly a great deal of negative energy guided
towards the scientific aspects of the film. But this film really has the
most significance in its own context: it has expanded beyond the limits
by which the series was originally bound. Certainly there is a very
definitive statement that can be pasted onto what we're doing in
present-day scientific research (though I won't elaborate in the
interest of surprise). One extremely powerful scene in the film has
Ripley meeting one of her defective siblings--when you see that moment,
you'll understand what is behind this movie.
    If you want to see Alien Resurrection, and you plan on reading the
reviews, I suggest you be certain that they're fans of the series
writing them. I don't mean this to sound elitist, but in a way it is:
this morning I read Roger Ebert's review of the film, and only one thing
was clear from it--he had no interest in seeing it in the first place.
It is not fair to rate or review a film from this standpoint. I detested
every word of Ebert's review--not because he didn't like the film, but
because of his lack of explanation, and the obvious fact that he really
didn't think about the film at all as he watched it. There is so much
here as far as human themes go, and the fact that he denounced the film
because it was "just an Alien sequel" is upsetting. The most irritating
statement he makes is a comparison between this and The Lost World. He
said, "that film opened five months ago. Are you still thinking about
it?" and his implication is obviously that no one will think about Alien
Resurrection past the film's end. To him, this is artless, mindless,
money-making slop. I'm just sorry that he missed the point so entirely
that he couldn't even gather enjoyment from the sheer skill with which
it was made.
    In any event, Alien Resurrection has a lot of action, and a lot of
humor, and a lot of very strange material that was, until now, alien to
the Alien series. The link between Ripley and the Aliens is truly
profound, and ultimately very moving. This film will not disappoint if
one just thinks about what it is saying for a moment--there is something
here so much deeper than the thrilling gore and action on the outside
(which, incidentally, is strikingly entertaining). I waited in
anticipation for Alien Resurrection for one and a half years, and I love
every bit of it, not just because of what I described, but because of
what it is on a more obvious level: a perfect sequel to the greatest
saga of all time.

Title
Review for Disturbing Behavior (1998)
Director:  David Nutter
Cast:  Jimmy Marsden, Katie Holmes, Nick Stahl, Chad E. Donella, Bruce
Greenwood, William Sadler
Screenplay:  Scott Rosenberg
Producers:  Armyan Bernstein, Jonathan Shestack
Runtime:  83 min.
US Distribution:  MGM
Rated R:  violence, sex, profanity
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
Sometimes, when I decide to write a short story or a poem, I think of a
title first, and then think of a subject to go with it.  It seems that
the makers of Disturbing Behavior had a similar train of thought when it
came to the title sequence.  I wouldn't be surprised if a couple of guys
got together and created the opening credits, and then someone saw it
and made up a story to go along with it.  The title sequence is so good,
so ominous and original, that it had me engrossed before the picture
even began.
Of course, my attention dwindled shortly into the film.  Disturbing
Behavior, like so many thrillers, starts off interesting and ends up
laughably ridiculous.  It's a teen horror film with no interesting
violence or sex.  It's a suspense film with no suspense.  It's an Evil
Small Town story with no story to speak of.  It's a disaster, a listless
and uninspired disaster, that just barely misses one-stardom because of
a few good sequences, a mercifully short running time, and one terrific
set of opening credits.  
Our main man is a fellow named Steve Clark, blandly played by Jimmy
Marsden.  He moves to a small town with his family after, tragically,
his brother shoots himself.  Steve is very upset about the untimely
death of his brother; we learn this through strange home-video like
nightmares that he has occasionally.  The big trial for Steve is, of
course, to fit in at school and make new friends.  Marsden looks like
your stereotypical jock down to the last detail, so he seems a poor
casting choice for a social reject.  
As a social reject, he falls in with some pretentious dope-smoking
philosophers, Gavin (Nick Stahl) and Rachel (Katie Holmes).  Gavin
informs Steve that the local group of jocks, known as the Blue
Ribboners, are actually a bunch of zombies, assimilating new members
into their group, while sporadically killing innocent people.  So, it's
up to our group of mismatched protagonists to 1) solve the mystery, and
2) do something about it.  By the end of it all, something has happened
and things have been explained, but the film still doesn't make any
sense.
Disturbing Behavior was written by Scott Rosenberg.  I've seen his name
around recently (he was one of the toucher-uppers on the Armageddon
script), and I imagine that, for the most part, he knows what he's doing
when it comes to screenwriting.  He did, however, have a complete lapse
in judgement when he got the idea for this film, and then decided to
actually take the time to write it out.  Evil Small Town films are
pretty common (the last one, Phantoms, is also a dismal failure), but it
takes a lot of skill to make the formula work.  Rosenberg's script is a
complete mess, lacking in even the most basic attempts at
characterization. 
And it makes no sense, nor is their any purpose when things are finally
"explained."  There is supposed to be an element of surprise when we see
what is happening to the jocks, but the film never explains exactly what
*is* happening.  They get strapped to chairs, a microchip is inserted
into their eyes, and -- poof -- they become sex-crazed, superviolent,
machine-like creatures.  The doctor responsible for all this, Dr.
Caldicott (Bruce Greenwood), must be pretty nuts for thinking that this
kind of behavior is a step up from the way high school jocks actually
behave (or, perhaps, this is the only realistic element in the film).
Much of the writing is simply bad, and Rosenberg has no intuition when
it comes to the way high school kids act.  In one terrible scene, Gavin
explains to Steve all of the high school cliques, while pointing them
out in the cafeteria.  Up front, I should say that, in four years of
high school, I did not eat in the cafeteria even once.  That aside, the
various social groups he points out are general, uninteresting, and
poorly-shown.  For instance, he points to the "nerds," who are all
wearing glasses and playing with their laptops.  It's such an obvious
cliche that I can't believe Rosenberg even bothered.  Most of the
dialogue is forced (no one says, "Bite me!" anymore), and none of the
scenes have any degree of wit.
This picture is not inspired, and most scenes flop from one to the
other, with no sense of momentum or energy.  The blame for this can be
placed on director David Nutter, who apparently likes his films dry. 
Horror films should at least exploit violence, but this one is
shockingly timid.  There are a few good scenes, though, such as an
interesting trip through an insane asylum (this is, however, the most
forced scene in the film, for how our heroes get there or why they
bother are things we never learn).  I also liked the school janitor
character, played by William Sadler.  He has a few lines that are
surprisingly thought-provoking.
The acting is largely a waste of talent.  Marsden is, as I said, bland
(thought not particularly bad).  Bruce Greenwood is shamelessly wasted. 
Stahl and Holmes both show they have talent, but the direction isn't
good enough to hone in on their skills (Stahl's performance seems more
like a parody of high school potheads).  None of these characters expand
beyond their one dimension, and, frankly, watching cardboard cut-outs of
human beings run down hallways while screaming just isn't all that
cool.  
Disturbing Behavior is a wreck of a film, and it started out a wreck
before shooting even began.  I'm surprised there were producers who read
this script and thought that it would make a good film, or that it would
make a lot of money at the box office.  It's not boring, or even
blatantly awful, but it's an uninspired lump of a film.  It sure starts
off nicely, but the regression into total absurdity is so consistent
that the very last scene is outright laughable.  So, if you go to see
this film, take my advice:  appreciate the credit sequence, and pray it
never ends.

Title
Review for Playing by Heart (1998)
Director:   Willard Carroll
Cast:  Gillian Anderson, Angelina Jolie, Madeleine Stowe, Anthony
Edwards, Ryan Phillippe, Gena Rowlands, Sean Connery, Dennis Quaid,
Ellen Burstyn, Jay Mohr, Jon Stewart, Patricia Clarkson, Nastassja
Kinski
Screenplay:  Willard Carroll
Producers:  Willard Carroll, Meg Liberman, Thomas L. Wilhite
Runtime:   121 min.
US Distribution: Miramax
Rated R:  language
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Angelina Jolie plays the most interesting character in Playing by
Heart, a young woman named Joan.  In the first scene of the film, she
says, "Talking about love is like dancing about architecture."  The
title of this film was, in fact, Dancing about Architecture.  I can't
imagine why anyone wanted to change it, for the previous title is far
more interesting and memorable than the current one.  In addition, the
first and last scenes require the original title to make sense.  But the
quote still sums up the film effectively:  Playing by Heart is a story
about a bunch of people who really aren't good at talking about love.  
Writer/director Willard Carroll has created a nice romantic comedy
here; he uses the standard Robert Altman approach, which consists of
attacking the audience with as many scenarios as it can handle, until
the very end, at which point he tells us how they're all related and why
any of it is relevant.  As with most films of numerous narratives, not
every story in Playing by Heart is successful.  But the film as a whole
is frequently both funny and moving; it's also an insightful look into
the dreaded world of dating.
The film focuses on a few romantic relationships, and a couple of
non-romantic relationships.  Joan -- the character I mentioned above --
is a talkative club-hopper who becomes interested in a reclusive,
blue-haired lad named Keenan (Ryan Phillippe).  Meredith (Gillian
Anderson) is a timid stage director who has turned herself off to dating
altogether, until she meets Trent (Jon Stewart), who is hell-bent on
getting her to like him.  Then there's Gracie (Madeline Stowe), a
married woman who retreats to a hotel with Roger (Anthony Edwards) a few
times a week, obsessed with the idea of having a purely sexual
relationship without any of the baggage that a normal relationship
entails.  
Other subplots involve an older woman, Mildred (Ellen Burstyn), who
goes to visit her dying son, Mark (Jay Mohr).  There's also Hugh (Dennis
Quaid), who is seen in various bars, picking up on both men and women,
telling them all kinds of stories about his wife and children.  The
central relationship of Playing by Heart has Sean Connery and Gena
Rowlands playing Paul and Hannah, an older couple approaching their 40th
anniversary.  Hannah discovers a picture of a woman Paul knew
twenty-five years prior, and many arguments ensue.  
I have a common problem with all films like this:  I tend to prefer
focused stories, and just when I'm getting drawn into a scenario, the
narrative shifts to another one and I have to recalibrate my attention. 
There is certainly enough material in each individual story to warrant
separate films, but Carroll is clearly interested in the way they
complement one another.  At first I was skeptical -- the stories didn't
seem like they needed each other.  By the end, though, I understood why
Carroll chose the stories he did.  And while no film can truly explicate
the ludicrous complications that love brings upon us, Playing by Heart
does an admirable job trying.  
Playing by Heart is an atmospheric film; Carroll and cinematographer
Vilmos Zsigmond did a great job filling the picture with lush moods and
velvet tones.  Trent's postmodern house -- which looks to be composed
almost entirely of 90-degree angles and black wood -- is a fascinating
location.  Thanks to production designer Missy Stewart, all the sets are
fascinatingly attractive, and well-photographed by Zsigmond.  John
Barry's musical score is also appropriate, though it does tend to get a
little heavy-handed in the later scenes.
What really makes Playing by Heart a memorable film are the
performances.  Angelina Jolie steals every scene she has, injecting such
indefatigable spunk and intelligence that I was electrified whenever she
appeared on screen.  Ryan Phillippe, with his unimpeachable monotony, is
appropriately dry here, and is surprisingly not buried by Jolie's work. 
Connery and Rowlands are both pros, and handle their roles accordingly. 
Also notable is the Anderson/Stewart pairing; Anderson is an immensely
likable actress, and has proven that she has range beyond her stoic
"X-Files" iciness.  Jay Mohr is affecting as the dying AIDS patient, and
Burstyn is very good as the mother.
Even though I often felt jostled with the transitions between stories
(Carroll really doesn't try to make the transitions smooth), I can't say
I wasn't involved in most of the stories.  There are a couple that
didn't quite work for me, though.  Even though I liked Connery and
Rowlands, I didn't always believe what they were saying -- I had trouble
believing that they loved each other.  I was also confounded by the Hugh
scenario -- Quaid doesn't seem to know exactly what he's doing, and the
situation is just too complicated for this kind of movie.  But perhaps
even these elements are intentional.  The one thing Playing by Heart
does extremely well is to show us how love is always both disastrously
complicated and inexplicably wonderful.  It sounds like a trite and
overplayed theme, but there's still some life to be found in it.

Title
Review for Black Dog (1998)
Director:  Kevin Hooks
Cast:  Patrick Swayze, Randy Travis, Meat Loaf, Gabriel Casseus, Brian
Vincent, Brenda Strong
Screenplay:  William Mickelberry, Dan Vining, Scott Sturgeon
Producers:  Raffaella De Laurentiis, Mark W. Koch
Runtime:  
US Distribution:  Universal
Rated PG-13:  violence, language
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        If you've seen the trailers for Black Dog, you probably know why I
wasn't expecting a very good film.  The picture wasn't screened for
critics, and that's never a good sign--if the studio doesn't believe in
the quality of the film, why even bother making it in the first place? 
In any event, the film has a silly title, and the hook is that it's a
loud action film with trucks and Patrick Swayze.  Need I say more?
        Well, in fact, I do, because here we have a surprising anomaly:  the
film isn't too bad.  Oh sure, it's just an action film, and it's pretty
mindless, and suffers greatly from wretched excess.  However, it's
well-crafted and exciting, thanks to director Kevin Hooks, and it has a
surprisingly clever script and some decent acting.  It's not that hard
to make a good action film, but seeing as how the formula is repeatedly
botched (Hard Rain, The Peacemaker, and Firestorm all come to mind),
it's nice to see one that has no pretensions about what it is (a
mindless action flick about trucks).
        Swayze plays Jack Crews, a man who's just been released from a prison
sentence which he served for vehicular manslaughter.  When we meet him,
he's working on the underside of a car, and he's summoned by his boss
(Graham Beckel).  His boss knows that Jack used to be a great truck
driver, and that going to prison made him lose his license; regardless,
he wants Jack to drive a truck full of merchandise from here to there,
and he offers Jack a lot of money.
        Jack takes the job because he and his wife are broke, and he doesn't
want to lose the house for which he's spent so much of his life saving. 
He finds out really quick that he's hauling a truckload of illegal
weapons, and that Meat Loaf wants to hijack the truck.  Simultaneously,
a couple of FBI agents (Charles Dutton and Stephen Tobolowski) are
trailing the weapons and know all about Jack's financial situation.
        I'm not sure who thought up this film, but it's been written by three
people.  I don't know why it needed three people to write it, but, as
action film scripts go, this is a pretty good one.  Swayze has a certain
amount of grit and realism as Jack, and there's enough character in
there that we can actually root for him and care about his family.  The
supporting performances are colorful, particularly from Randy Travis
(who just seems to be along for the ride), and Dutton and Tobolowski,
who have some pretty clever scenes as the constantly-arguing officials.
        Easily the best elements of Black Dog are the action sequences, which
are genuinely exciting and well-directed by Kevin Hooks.  One scene in
particular--which features four big rigs fighting their way down a
mountain pass--is terrific and unrelenting in its approach.  Mix in
George S. Clinton's pounding score and you have a film that will not
fail to keep you interested.
        Oh sure, it suffers from extreme excess (literally everything in this
film explodes at some point), and implausibility (the deal Jack strikes
up with the agents is very convenient) and a few cliches (the bad guy
who has to die twice).  But it's a fun movie.  It held my attention all
the way through the last unneeded action sequence (which, happily, ends
in a violent death).  Black Dog isn't the cream of the action film crop,
but it's refreshing to see a dumb movie that recognizes its own
stupidity and flaunts it as shamelessly as this.

Title
Review for In Dreams (1999)
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
The worst way to begin a year is with a massive disappointment.  And
yet, DreamWorks has delivered what will likely be one of the most
disappointing films of 1999.  Here we have In Dreams, a thriller
directed by the immensely talented Neil Jordan (The Crying Game, Mona
Lisa).  It has an extremely able cast, led by Annette Bening and
supported by Aidan Quin, Robert Downey Jr., and Stephen Rea.  It also
has my favorite cinematographer, Darius Khondji (Seven, Alien
Resurrection), and one of my favorite music composers, Elliott
Goldenthal.  And, it's been brought to us by DreamWorks, who have
promised to bring out only quality entertainment.
I had forgotten that DreamWorks' first picture was The Peacemaker. 
They are capable of making lousy films, but In Dreams isn't lousy as
much as it's plainly mediocre.  And it's such a shame:  not only is
there limitless talent involved, but the film is actually quite good for
well over an hour.  It's a dark, intelligent film that seems to explore
its possibilities; but, in the final forty-five minutes, it becomes
implausible, silly, and almost unwatchably bad at times.  The conclusion
is moderately satisfying, but nothing can overcome the sloppy way it
reaches its resolution.  
Benning and Quinn play Claire and Paul Cooper; Claire is a woman who
has "dreams" when she's wide awake -- dreams that seem to show her past
events.  Usually, these events are intertwined with crimes:  in the
beginning of the film, she sees a young girl being led through an orchid
by an ill-adjusted man, and she thinks the girl has been kidnapped in
real life.  When her own daughter gets kidnapped, Claire realizes that
the visions she has are actually visions of the future.
When the fate of her daughter is discovered, Claire loses her mind. 
She can't control the dreams, and it becomes clear that she has some
kind of connection with the ill-adjusted man (who turns out later to be
Robert Downey Jr.).  A psychiatrist, Dr. Silverman (Stephen Rae), tries
to evaluate her dreams, but no one really believes her.  Eventually,
after multiple suicide attempts, Claire is committed to a mental
institution.  And, as luck would have it, she's placed in the exact same
room in which her psychotic male counterpart had lived during the early
years of his life.
It really does sound like a silly story.  Credit Jordan for making it
seem so disturbing and intriguing for the first two-thirds of it.  The
background story for In Dreams revolves around a town that had been
flooded twenty years before the events in the film take place; the early
scenes, which explore the deep blue streets of the underwater town, are
extremely eerie.  Khondji and Jordan work well together to create a
dark, silvery-blue mood throughout the film.  There isn't a shot in the
picture that doesn't look great -- the various settings (the Coopers'
old house, the mental institution, etc.) are all very well photographed.
In addition, Annette Bening is exceptional in the lead role.  She
carries the film effortlessly, giving depth and personality to a
character who might not have been very interesting on paper.  Bening
does a fantastic job of showing us Claire's descent into madness; it
never seems overwrought or phony, and it's so believable that in one
particular scene (in which she's trying to convince Dr. Silverman that
her husband is going to be murdered) I became visibly agitated due to
the effectiveness of her performance.  Most of the supporting
performances are less than noteworthy -- Quinn is reliable, as always,
but Rae seems present only because Jordan always has him present.  
The only other performance worth mentioning is that of Robert Downey
Jr., and he is one of the reasons the film becomes so bad towards the
end.  Now, I do realize that it was up to Jordan to make sure that
Downey Jr. didn't overact, but both men are responsible for the
laughable absurdities that take place on screen in the final act of In
Dreams.  I was willing to overlook the fact that Claire seems to
overcome her insanity to turn into a pseudo-action hero.  I was willing
to overlook the ridiculous way in which some of the characters act to
serve the plot.  But I can not overlook Downey Jr.'s performance, and
the purely cliched mess of a character that he plays.
Hasn't the I'm-psycho-because-my-mother-made-me-do-it motif been done
before?  And why is it that all psycho killers have to have problems
with their genders?  Do they all speak like five-year-olds trapped in
thirty-year-old bodies?  In its final thirty minutes, In Dreams explores
nothing but a truckload of cliches; I was too distracted to even immerse
myself in the brilliant image on screen.  It's so profoundly dumb that
it essentially ruins what came before.  At the core, In Dreams is just
another mediocre thriller.  But it could have been something unusually
good:  the people involved are good at what they do, and the first hour
is proof of that.  But what happened with this sloppy conclusion?  I
would rather have never seen the end.

Title
Review for Mighty Joe Young (1998)
Director: Ron Underwood
Cast: Bill Paxton, Charlize Theron, David Paymer, Regina King, Naveen
Andrews
Screenplay: Mark Rosenthal, Lawrence Konner
Producers: Ted Hartley, Tom Jacobson
Runtime: 
US Distribution: Walt Disney Productions
Rated PG: action violence, mild language
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Mighty Joe Young blunders about for nearly twenty minutes before we
actually get to see a great big gorilla.  His entrance, however, is a
grand one:  out from the trees he leaps, gargantuan and imposing,
sporting hands big enough to crush a Volkswagen bug, and a pair of feet
much larger than any pro basketball player will ever have.  Joe bellows
at the poachers before him, angry that they would like to kill him and
sell him for millions of dollars.  During this scene, I turned to my
friend and said, "Wow.  That's some ape."
Joe is quite a gorilla -- a big, digital gorilla.  He runs around the
fields, chasing cars and people.  He picks things up and stares at them
pensively.  He breaks things on accident, because he's just too big to
avoid clumsiness.  Joe, as a special effect, is an image that might hold
your interest for five minutes.  As a character, he doesn't quite
register.  And the story he's been put in is as limp as they come.  The
words "Family Entertainment" have never been a stamp of quality, but
Might Joe Young is just a silly special effects movie pretending to have
a heart.
The picture is a remake of the 1949 film.  It's mostly just about the
big gorilla, but, strictly as a formality, the movie also has a few
human characters.  The main one is Jill Young (poor Charlize Theron,
forced to waste her talent), a lover of gorillas.  As a child, she
witnessed a group of poachers murder her mother; now, she lives in the
jungle to protect the wildlife.  Specifically, she's out to protect Joe,
a giant gorilla who has been her friend since her childhood.  
Soon, zoologist Gregg O'Hara (Bill Paxton) discovers Joe; he quickly
realizes that poachers want to get Joe and sell him to a big game hunter
named Strasser (Rade Sherbedgia), who just happens to be the same guy
who killed Jill's mother.  So, in an effort to save Joe, Jill and Gregg
take the big gorilla to a preserve, where it is instantly clear that he
is not safe from poachers.  In addition, the space is way too small for
him (after all, he is a really big gorilla).  And, to add to the
complications, Strasser shows up under a benevolent pretext (he tells
Jill that he has a preserve big enough for Joe), and Joe recognizes
Strasser as the guy who killed Jill's mother.
Jill, of course, doesn't recognize Strasser, even though he did kill
her mother.  This is just one of the many examples of stupidity in
Mighty Joe Young, a film that fulfills every stereotype that comes with
a Special Effects Film.  The movie isn't really offensive -- it has some
competent actors, a few nifty sets, and a lot of scenes with a big,
digitized gorilla.  But the story is really dumb, there aren't any
characters, and the film isn't satisfying on any level beyond its
visuals.
The movie also has bad dialogue.  If a critic says that a film has bad
dialogue, it's only fair to quote some of it, but most of the words
spoken in this picture are phrases like "Joe isn't happy!" and "Joe
isn't safe here!"  "We need to get Joe out of here!"  "Joe is way too
big for that cage!"  I don't know if these phrases are word for word,
but they're close.  As I said, the characters here are only present as a
formality:  they do little more than state the obvious (of *course* Joe
is too big for that cage).  Paxton and Theron are talented performers
who deserve to work on a script that provides characters for them. 
Sadly, Mighty Joe Young wastes them both.
There are a few clever moments (although none of them are surfacing in
my memory at the moment), and, as I said, the digital effects held my
attention for at least five minutes.  It's certainly not a bad film for
kids; I doubt Joe will give them nightmares.  But adults in the audience
aren't likely to find much of anything interesting about the big
gorilla.  A big gorilla is only interesting for a little while; after
that, something needs to be done with the big gorilla.  Nobody ever
figures out what to do with the big gorilla.

Title
Review for Firestorm (1998)
Director: Dean Semler
Cast: Howie Long, Scott Glenn, William Forsythe, Suzy Amis,
Rated R: Language, violence
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    Clocking in at just under 90 minutes, I find it simply astonishing
that the makers of Firestorm were able to rip off every single action
film ever created, using not only the same situations, but the same
dialogue, stock-characters, and plot devices. There isn't a unique
breath in the lungs of this film; every second is regurgitated directly
from classic action films like Die Hard, although most of the material
is stuff that we continue to see in second-rate action flicks. It is
commendable, really, the level of unoriginality in Firestorm, for it
must have taken a lot of time and hard work to ensure that every element
of the film is the result of cinematic plagiarism.
    Firestorm stars Howie Long. People who follow films and not sports
(like me) will remember him as one of the bad guys in Broken Arrow; the
rest of you are supposed to know him from football. I don't have any
qualms against the guy; he's not a terrible actor (though he could use a
few lessons on how to sound more natural when speaking dialogue), and he
manages to command a reasonable screen presence (he is, after all, an
enormous individual). He seems pretty nice, too.
    But he can't pick a script if his life depended on it. Broken Arrow
was one thing, but Firestorm...such a pity. His character's name is
Jesse Graves. In a pointless message preceding the film, we are
explained that out of the thousands of firefighters in the country,
there are only 400 who are qualified "smokejumpers." Smokejumpers, as
the name implies, jump out of airplanes, directly into the fires to stop
them from the inside. I didn't understand why the film needed to tell us
this in advance, because the conflicts in the film have nothing to do
with this profession, and the fact that Jesse is a smokejumper only
comes into play once during the film.
    Like all dumb action movies, the story is silly and simple, but
irritating to explain. The evil bad guy Randy Earl Shaye (William
Forsythe) arranges for a forest fire to be set so that he gets put on a
crew to go and put out of the fire. He enlists the help of several other
prisoners. Of course, his efforts to escape are initially successful,
but as soon as they randomly run into the military-trained bird watcher
woman (Suzy Amis), things go awry. That's when the smokejumping part
comes in, because Jesse sees the bad guys, dressed up like Canadian
firefighters (complete with accents and all!), and parachutes down to
them. Soon he finds out they're not who they say they are.
    Directed by Dean Semler, Firestorm doesn't look too bad. Some of the
cinematography is nice, and one of the action sequences (a fight in a
burning trading post) is exciting. Unfortunately, the script is so
detestable that nothing in this film is ultimately enjoyable.
    Let's start with the Shaye character. He is simply a collaboration
of every bad guy you've ever seen. Forsythe plays him with a ridiculous
amount of meanness, which helps to show that his actions are pointless
and absurd. For instance, he kills off his helpers one-by-one as they're
escaping through the forest. This takes almost the entire film, but
there's no reason for any of it. He doesn't need their help; it would
seem infinitely more logical if he just lined them up and shot them.
Instead, he pushes them off cliffs, traps them in burning buildings, and
all of this while the other guys aren't looking. Forsythe sneers and
hisses his way through the movie, pretending sometimes to be nice to the
female hostage, but usually just acting like a licentious pig.
    To avoid making this too long, here's the short version of the
characters that this film contains: the bad guy who won't die (got to
kill him twice!); the strong female character who is completely
extraneous to the story; the good bad guy who stands up for the hostages
but is ultimately killed by the bad bad guy; the good guy who turns out
to have helped the bad guy; and the invincible, good-hearted,
bullet-dodging good guy. The film also features gratuitous violence,
excessive special effects, implausible action sequences (how much can
you really do running around in a forest?), and by-the-book meter and
pacing.
    Hopefully, you haven't gotten the idea that I recommend this film.
Go to the video store and rent The Rock or something. Ignore this film
unless you're crazy about Howie Long. Then, maybe you might enjoy it. As
I said, I don't watch football. I follow movies, and I've seen enough of
them to know that this one stinks.

Title
Review for Hope Floats (1998)
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
The best scene in Hope Floats is the first one, and I somehow knew that
the rest of the film wouldn't live up to this scene even as I was
watching it.  We are introduced to Birdee Pruitt (Sandra Bullock), who
is on a talk show thinking that she's getting a free makeover with her
best friend.  What Birdee actually learns on national television is that
her best friend is having an affair with her husband.  This is a funny
scene, but it's also moving, and director Forest Whitaker does something
that is not easily done -- he makes the character sympathetic before we
know her.
It's also an interesting and unusual way to begin a really sentimental
and formulaic bundle of schtick.  After this beginning (which,
unfortunately, belongs in a different film), Bridee leaves her husband
and takes their daughter, Bernice (Mae Whitman), with her.  She goes to
stay with her mother, Ramona (Gena Rowlands), in Smithville, Texas. 
There, she drowns in her own self pity.  She was once the most admired
girl in the town (she was prom queen for three out of the four years of
high school), but now that her peers have seen her emotionally
disemboweled on a scummy talk show, she's little more than a town joke.
I'm sure that screenwriter Steven Rogers thought it necessary to add a
love interest to this mix of ideas, so he did that.  We learn of the
existence of Justin Matisse (Harry Connick, Jr.), who, of course, has
always had a crush on Birdee (but he detests the word "crush" and
insists that it's only used in high school).  Most of the conflict
arises through the mother-daughter relationships, for young Bernice is
not happy with her mother, and wants to believe that her father is going
to come and save her from this awful little hick town.
I don't typically like movies like these because they only have one
agenda -- to make you cry.  I didn't cry at any point during Hope
Floats, and I don't think I was more than a little bit moved by any of
the scenes.  There's a very significant problem in this, though, because
the audience is supposed to care when good and bad things happen to
characters in films.  It's not really that the characters don't have
enough development (because they do).  I think the main problem is that
every situation here is something that we've all seen in so many
formulaic dramas just like this one.
Take, for instance, everything that has to do with Bernice.  The child
is upset because she needs to be upset because it works for the story. 
But the film never gives her much of a reason to be upset, and any child
that age could probably understand the fact that her father was the one
doing the bad stuff in the relationship.  And if she has a deep,
inexplicable resentment for her mother (which seems to be the only
possibility that the film allows), then the entire story should be
dedicated to that theme.  In the end, though, the situation is concluded
with an easy and unconvincing talk between Birdee and Bernice.
I know, I know, this is a "chick flick," right?  It's supposed to be a
little predictable, and just pretty safe all around, right?  Well, why
does it have to be?  Why can't a film be engineered to appeal to people
wanting lighter films and still surprise you with a few interesting
turns in story and characterization?  You can still have the obligatory
happy ending and not make everything work out so perfectly well at the
end.  The biggest problem I have with movies like this is that the only
reason things happen and characters exist is to get the story from point
A to point B (I would elaborate on one particularly annoying element,
but that would take the surprise out of it). 
Still, Hope Floats isn't unbearable or even that difficult to sit
through -- the actors all make the film watchable.  Bullock is, in my
humble opinion, a fantastic actress with a lot of strength.  She holds
this film together beyond Whitaker's sappy, heavy-handed direction, and
keeps my interest in her strong.  Also good is Connick, who gives a nice
low-tone performance here.  Rowlands is a pro, and handles this part
like a pro.  I didn't much care for young Mae Whitman, but that's mostly
because the screenplay makes her such an annoying child.  I did,
however, greatly enjoy Cameron Finley, who plays the oddly eccentric
young nephew of Birdee.
There are good things to be said about this film, but for the most part
it doesn't have the sweeping emotional resonance that dramas need in
order to be successful and moving.  The pieces are in place for a good
story, but Hope Floats instead relies on the good old formula, and the
result is a picture that will show you a lot of things that you've
probably seen a few times before. 

Title
Review for Deep Impact (1998)
Director:  Mimi Leder
Cast:  Robert Duvall, Tea Leoni, Elijah Wood, Vanessa Redgrave,
Maximilian Schell, Morgan Freeman, Leelee Sobieski, James Cromwell
Screenplay:  Michael Tolkin, Bruce Joel Rubin
Producers:  David Brown, Richard D. Zanuck
Runtime:  115 min.
US Distribution:  Paramount/DreamWorks
Rated PG-13:  brief language, disaster violence
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
Deep Impact is a disaster film that tries to do too much in the two
hours it has.  I noted about thirty minutes into it that the film would
have to clear three hours in order to develop all the subplots into
meaningful stories.  And, as I expected, the film instead relies on
numerous manipulative "heartfelt" scenes in which characters hug each
other, say goodbye, and cry profusely.  I'm not above all that -- some
of the character-driven moments in this film actually work.
But I want a disaster film!  Deep Impact is, as you all should know,
about a big comet careening towards Earth, and what we do to try and
stop it.  The film builds up steadily to its climax, parts of which you
can catch on the trailers and TV spots (you get to see giant tidal waves
destroy buildings and offshore oil rigs, among other interesting
sights).  But, that's two or three minutes of payoff for a long film
about people who cry more than anything else.  Most upsetting is that
the disaster doesn't look nearly as convincing or incredible as I was
hoping.  In trying to do everything (characters and disasters), Deep
Impact somehow misses on both counts, thus proving that you do need
three hours (Titanic) to develop characters and throw them in a disaster
like this.
I really don't want to synopsize the plot.  I don't feel like it right
now, and it probably doesn't matter too much because all that you need
to know is that there's a comet, and that it could wipe out all life on
earth.  I will brief you on the characters, though.  First, there's
Jenny Lerner (Tea Leoni), a reporter who is essentially the first to
hear of the "biggest story in history."  Her subplot includes her mother
(Vanessa Redgrave) and her father (Maximilian Schell) who are divorced;
she's angry with her father because he's married a younger woman and is
ignoring his ex-wife.  All three actors are very good in their roles,
although Leoni seems unable to smile and Schell seems unable to do
anything but smile.
Then there's young Leo Biederman (Elijah Wood) who, one year prior to
most of the events in the film, discovers the comet in his astronomy
class.  He's in love with Sarah Hotchner (Leelee Sobieski, who is a
Helen Hunt lookalike in every possible way).  Both kids have entire
families, the members of which are all given considerable screen time in
this film.  Wood is a strong actor, and he pulls off all of his scenes
with ease; newcomer Sobieski is also good.
There are many veterans in smaller roles.  Morgan Freeman plays the
president in that solid Morgan Freeman way.  James Cromwell has one
(yes, one) scene as the Secretary of State.  Robert Duvall plays
astronaut Spurgeon Tanner, the leader of the mission to destroy the
comet.  The mission utilizes the largest spaceship ever created, the
Messiah.  The plan is to fly up to the comet and plan nuclear devices in
it, hopefully diverting its path.  This is the first measure they take,
and happens about an hour into the film.  I hope you don't expect it to
succeed.  If it did, then we wouldn't get to see the comet flying
through the atmosphere and crashing into the Atlantic Ocean.
The film isn't what I'd call realistic.  The astronauts pilot the
Messiah right into the tail of the comet and try really hard to avoid
the house-sized chunks of ice breaking flying towards them at thousands
of miles per hour.  How the Messiah gets going that fast, or how it
catches up to the comet in a few seconds, are details that we never
learn, and, because of this, the pacing feels strange and rushed through
this section.  The subplot does provide for a well-made scene during
which the astronauts walk around on the icy surface of the comet.
I've heard that Spielberg hand-picked director Mimi Leder for this
project (her debut film was last year's The Peacemaker, which, in my
humble opinion, is not a quality action film, but not really because of
her).  I think she's a pretty good director, and a lot of the scenes
here are handled well (my favorite scene has Leoni and Schell standing
on a beach, awaiting impact).  Often, though, she's countered by the
script, which just isn't all that sharp.  Most of the subplots are so
gooey they ooze from one to the next, and they just keep coming . . .
even when you expect the disaster to finally arrive, you get more and
more "touching" scenes featuring teary-eyed people.
And I wouldn't mind, because, as I said, a lot of these scenes work
(try something a thousand times it's bound to come out right once or
twice).  But when the comet finally does hit, it just didn't grab me the
way I wanted to be grabbed.  It's nice-looking, true, and some of the
images are striking.  But many of the special effects look fuzzy (like
the water rushing over mountain tops), and the disaster overall isn't
gripping enough to warrant this much buildup.  
Deep Impact is an event movie, but it doesn't seem like it wants to
be.  It wants to be a self-conscious event movie with real characters
and situations to care about.  But there isn't enough real development
of the characters or enough horrific disaster footage to make the entire
package altogether smooth.  It's a moderately fun film as summer flicks
go, but it had potential to be a truly moving and frightening film. 
It's a little of both, but not quite enough of either.

Title
Review for Mercury Rising (1998)
Director:  Harold Becker
Cast:  Bruce Willis, Alec Baldwin, Miko Hughes, Chi McBride, Kim Dickens
Screenplay:  Lawrence Konner, Mark Rosenthal
Producers:  Brian Grazer, Karen Kehela
Runtime:  108 min.
US Distribution:  Universal
Rated R:  language, violence
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        I just don't understand why Bruce Willis lends his talents to films as
bland and uninspired as Mercury Rising.  It seems like every film he
does is just another action film, designed to fade from memory almost
immediately after viewing.  I, for one, think he's a terrific actor (see
Mortal Thoughts if you don't believe me).  And he can do a great job,
even in generic, formulaic action films like this one.  But action films
as great as Die Hard come around about once a decade, and so my advice
to Mr. Willis is as follows:  move into another genre (and do it
fast!).  
        In Mercury Rising, he plays Art Jeffries, a lonely FBI agent who
normally works undercover, but is forced into more menial jobs such as
wire tapping after the introductory-action sequence ends in the needless
death of five militia men.  Skip ahead a few days, and we meet young
Simon (Miko Hughes), an autistic boy who cracks a government supercode
hidden in a puzzle magazine.  The head of the operation that uses this
special code is a man named Kudrow (Alec Baldwin), and he tries to have
Simon and his family executed.  Naturally, the parents bite it early,
but Simon lives long enough for Jeffries to find him and take care of
him.
        Mercury Rising is straight formula, played with poker-face stiffness by
director Harold Becker.  It has all the familiar scenes, such as the
intro scene that proves our hero is really committed to his job, and the
windy climax at the top of a building, where the lives of three or four
individuals are dangling off the edge.  There's barely an original
moment in this film:  everything from the setup to the conclusion is
predictable and stale, and is made watchable only by the performers.
        Willis, as I stated, is a great actor, and he's good here.  I liked the
fact that he isn't just another burn-out cop, but that he is actually a
pretty level-headed individual.  Some of the scenes are fuelled by
Willis' charismatic performance, such as the opening scene (which is
actually very intense, despite its predictable outcome and purpose). 
Miko Hughes also does a pretty good job of playing the autistic kid,
although I would have preferred that the autism been given more thought
and not just been used as a plot hook.  Baldwin is good as the bad guy,
but like all action-film bad guys, he's not very human, and present just
to serve the story.   
        Some of the stuff in this film is downright absurd.  There's a subplot
involving a woman, Stacey (Kim Dickens), who Jeffries literally meets on
the street somewhere.  He asks her to take care of Simon for a few
minutes, and she agrees.  Later, he shows up at her house and demands
more babysitting.  The plausibility problems with this situation could
have been instantly solved by making Stacey a woman that Jeffries knew
beforehand.  And everything about the government code is silly:  the
technicians explain why they placed the code in the puzzle book, but it
still doesn't make much sense.  And what does the code do, anyway? 
Well, we're told that it protects the identities of important
individuals, but how or why is never explained.  
        And I might have been able to overlook these things, had the story been
more original.  But it's not.  Mercury Rising fits the far-too-familiar
action film template down to the last detail, and the result is an
uninspired, forgettable movie that, in the end, is only worth watching
for Bruce Willis' unwavering conviction for his roles.  This is just
another entry in a big pile of films that he's too good to be in.

Title
Review for Lost in Space (1998)
Director:  Stephen Hopkins
Cast:  William Hurt, Gary Oldman, Heather Graham, Mimi Rogers, Matt
LeBlanc, Lacey Chabert, Jack Johnson
Screenplay:  Akiva Goldsman
Producers:  Akiva Goldsman, Stephen Hopkins, Mark W. Koch
Runtime:  
US Distribution:  New Line Cinema
Rated PG-13:  sci-fi violence
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        If you're going to make a film that has absolutely nothing of interest
aside from its special effects, you might consider making the special
effects good.  Lost in Space, the new spin-off of the old TV series,
does not abide by this seemingly-obvious bit of logic, and the result is
a film that has a silly story complimented by unimpressive visual
effects and sets.  I can watch and enjoy a film that is mostly style and
little substance (Starship Troopers, for example), but the style has to
be stylish, not dull and rehashed like the "style" in Lost in Space.  
        Lost in Space isn't blatantly awful, but it comes dangerously close to
being so.  There are too many characters (none of whom have any
noticeable personality), the story is too thin (and disintegrates in to
incoherence by the final scene), the interesting elements are all lifted
from other films, and, like I said, the special effects aren't special. 
It's like trying to make a cake out of nothing but water and flour. 
You'll end up with something, but it won't taste good.  
        We are introduced to one of the several main characters in an
introductory space-battle that is disturbingly close to the battle
scenes in the Star Wars trilogy.  The hero is Major Don West (Matt
LeBlanc), and he's your typical hard-edged pilot.  He's recruited to
escort the Robinsons (a really smart family-of-five) into the depths of
space so that they can find a new place for humans to live, because the
Earth can only support human life for twenty more years.  
        The Robinsons are led by John (William Hurt) and Maureen (Mimi
Rogers).  The children are Judy (Heather Graham), Penny (Lacey Chabert),
and Will (Jack Johnson).  Also onboard is Dr. Smith (Gary Oldman), who
tries to sabotage the mission, but fails, and gets caught.  Well, he
only fails partially:  he triggers a series of light shows that result
in the Robinson's ship careening into the unknown corners of uncharted
space.  Finally, about forty-five minutes into the film, they are
actually lost, as the title rightfully implies.  
        After this, the story of Lost in Space is muddled, at best.  They end
up at some lost ship (which reminded me of Event Horizon, though I know
that film is too recent for Lost in Space to have ripped it off), and
they have to fight off these metal spiders that have nothing to do with
anything.  Later, they crash on this planet in a stunt that reminded me
a lot of Star Trek:  Generations, and they uncover a time-travel plot by
a character whose identity must be hidden for the sake of shock.  Anyone
seen any of this before?  
        What a tiresome journey it is getting to the end of this film.  I knew
I was in trouble when the opening battle looked significantly worse than
anything in any of the three Star Wars films (those films are twenty
years younger than this one!).  After that, the best special effects are
cartoony:  they are pleasing to the eye, but they look fake.  Unlike the
digital bugs in Starship Troopers or the dinosaurs in Spielberg's Park
movies, nothing here inspires us with awe and wonder.  It all looks
distractingly digital, and it just doesn't mesh with the live-action
performers.
        Speaking of live action, I've never seen a group of such talented
individuals go to waste like this.  Gary Oldman is good (I hear he
recreates the character from the television series perfectly), and Matt
LeBlanc is sometimes amusing, but the rest of these actors are bland. 
The biggest disappointment is Heather Graham, who was wonderful in
Boogie Nights; she isn't really given anything to work with, and, in
turn, doesn't end up doing anything.  William Hurt and Mimi Rogers spew
their lines like actors getting paid to spew lines.  The other two kids,
Chabert and Johnson, do their best, but are not very memorable.  I don't
blame any of these performers:  the script simply gives them nothing to
work with.
        I really expected to enjoy this film.  I don't understand how or why
Lost in Space came out so dull and familiar.  There are a few pleasures,
though:  the last-minute escape in the final scene is fun, and some of
the sequences are exciting despite their ultimate uselessness in
relation to the story.  And the actors, despite their lack of fire, are
pleasant to watch.  But Lost in Space is little more than a bundle of
missed opportunities replaced by scenes we've all seen hundreds of
times.  But hope is not lost:  if this becomes a series, just remember
what Star Trek II managed to do.

Title
Review for Wedding Singer, The (1998)
Director: Frank Coraci
Cast: Adam Sandler, Drew Barrymore, Christine Taylor, Matthew Glave,
Allen Covert, Angela Featherstone, Steve Buscemi
Rated PG-13: Language, adult themes
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    I think that any competent member of the human race who's ever seen
a movie--any movie--could probably predict just about every turn in The
Wedding Singer. Even though I try very hard to not predict films as I'm
watching them (especially not romantic comedies), the plot of this
particular film just advanced before me seconds, and sometimes minutes,
before I actually saw it happen on screen. But I don't care. Not even a
little. My reasons for this are simple: 1) Adam Sandler is great. 2)
Drew Barrymore is great. 3) The movie is so funny. There are parts that
left me gasping for air because I was laughing so hard. I haven't
laughed this hard in a movie since Austin Powers.
    Sandler plays Robby Hart, a wedding singer who once had dreams of
being in a rock band and writing his own music. In the opening scenes,
he seems like a happy-go-lucky wedding singer, at least partially
enjoying his profession and doing a rather good job of talking down a
really drunk individual (Steve Buscemi) who decides that his brother's
wedding is a good place to tell the whole world that his life, up to
that point, was utter pointlessness.
    A week later, at his own wedding, he is left standing at the altar
by his ex-fiancée, Linda (Angela Featherstone). With his life in
complete disarray, he meets Julia (Barrymore), a waitress. She is
engaged to Glenn (Matthew Glave), and is to marry him in about three
months. Julia and Robby become good friends when she enlists him to help
with the wedding plans. Soon (and predictably) it becomes pretty clear
that Glenn is a jerk, and that Robby and Julia really love each other.
    Oh sure, it's trite. And if anyone making this film expected us to,
like, feel suspense or something while watching The Wedding Singer, then
they truly underestimated their audience. What makes the story bearable,
aside from the terrific costumes and 80s music, are the performances.
Barrymore is simply adorable here (I've never seen her look so close to
the way she did in ET). Not only is she pleasant to look at, but her
acting job here really is a good one--and it doesn't hurt that the
character is likable and adequately well-written. And the Jerk, played
in full-force by Graves, is just as despicable as any villain in any
romantic comedy I've ever     seen.
    Naturally, the true star here is Sandler. I think the guy is
flat-out hilarious. He can say something that just isn't funny, and his
delivery makes me laugh. His comedic performance here equals that of
Happy Gilmore, but in this film he goes much further and proves to me
that he can, indeed, hold his own as a leading man in a romantic comedy.
Whereas his roles in his previous films kind of had Sandler playing
Sandler, The Wedding Singer gives him a character that, for the first
time, he actually has to fit into. As far as I'm concerned he succeeded,
and this film is testimony that he does, in fact, have some range in his
talents.
    And the movie is just so funny. Perhaps the best moment is when he
sings a song for Julia that he claims is a little uneven because he
began writing it while in a good mood and finished it after his fiancée
abandoned him. This is the part that literally had me groping for a
breath of air. And while the film, like all romantic comedies, takes a
hiatus from laughs towards the end because the plot has to finish up,
there are more than enough truly hilarious moments in the first hour
that make up for any slumps in progress during the second half.
    My formal complaints for The Wedding Singer aren't very important.
The film is predicable, but who cares? The characters are extremely
likable, the movie is ridiculously funny, and the experience is simply
enjoyable. In addition to this, I can't imagine anyone seeing the
preview and not wanting to see the film. In that order, I conclude that
it is pointless for me to even have written this review. I just want
everyone to know that I laughed. A lot.

Title
Review for Holy Man (1998)
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
Holy Man prompts me to ask the question, "Do shopping networks
broadcast live?"  The film, which stars Eddie Murphy as a strange and
spiritual individual, hinges entirely on the assumption (or is it a
fact?) that shopping networks broadcast everything live.  If this is a
fallacy, then nothing in this film is even remotely possible, for every
plot development lies on the shoulders of scenes that have Eddie Murphy
spewing "insightful" nonsense on a live shopping network.  If the
network didn't broadcast live, then the producers could have edited out
everything he says, or kicked him off, and he would've been nothing more
than a crazy Peter Finch-wannabe who likes talking into the camera. 
You may be wondering why I'm asking such a silly question.  It's
because this is such a silly film.  Holy Man a movie that wants to be
deep and satirical, but is neither one.  It's unintentionally ironic,
though, which is a quality that's fun to mock.  What really bothers me,
aside from the dumb script, is that Holy Man doesn't really know what
it's about  -- it's a satire that unconsciously satirizes itself.  So,
due to inept production values, the film's appeal rests on the appeal of
the three lead actors:  Murphy, Jeff Goldblum, and Kelly Preston.  They
carry it to a point, but they can't hide the fact that the film just
isn't well-conceived.  
Goldblum actually has the main role as Ricky Hayman, a producer of the
shopping network.  The film begins with Ricky's career in trouble --
sales have been going down, and the boss, McBainbridge (Robert Loggia),
is breathing down his neck to do something, and quick!  McBainbridge
brings in Kate Newell (Kelly Preston), who has some bright ideas about
where they should take the image of the network.  Just when things start
going really bad for Ricky, he meets an odd, serene individual named G
(Murphy).  Kate is instantly entranced with G, but Ricky finds him
annoying.
At this point, I figured the film would be pretty straightforward: 
they put G on air, ratings soar, conflicts arise, happy ending, blah
blah blah.  I was right, but only partially so:  everything happens as I
said, but there are about forty-five minutes of down time in the middle,
featuring scenes in which G stumbles onto the live shopping network sets
and speaks to the salespeople who are trying to sell laundry detergent
balls and chainsaws.  Then, of course, Ricky has to struggle to get him
off the stage so he doesn't make a fool of himself.  It's only after
this happens for half the film that the ratings and sales finally
increase, and then we're allowed to watch the plot trudge through all
the bland banalities of the Happy Family Film formula.
It's not really an awful film, but it reminds me that Hollywood, for
the most part, can't articulate a theme in even the most pathetically
misguided way.  It also reminds me that talented actors are often forced
to take certain roles to keep their careers alive.  Now, I probably
would have really disliked this film if it weren't for Goldblum -- the
guy is very funny, even when his lines aren't that good.  He's a
commanding screen presence, but he's also a good actor; he wrings at
least a little bit of feeling out of the obligatory "touching" scenes
towards the end.  Preston is also appealing, but, expectedly, the token
female role in this particular film isn't exactly fleshed-out.  Loggia
is good but annoying, while Jon Cryer, as Ricky's assistant, is
surprisingly funny.
That leaves us with Murphy, who has clearly made this movie because it
has some kind of message.  What, exactly, is that message?  Well, he
spends most of the film delivering trite, underdeveloped sentences like,
"Don't rely on material goods for happiness!" and "Admire the beauty of
grass!"  (By the way, I read somewhere that grass is one of the most
unnatural environments; it can not exist freely in nature, and is
basically nothing more than controlled weeds.  This makes me wonder how
"in touch" G really is with his surroundings.)  When G gets on TV, he
urges people *not* to buy things, and this leads to two things:  1) 
massive increase in sales, and 2) a nationwide G-craze.  The film
therefore implies that everyone watches shopping networks, which is also
a pretty silly thing to say.
Hey, satire is a great thing.  Failed satire, however, is pitiful. 
Holy Man is just another Hollywood movie, made specifically to rake in
cash with its big-name stars.  The fact that Hollywood tries to satirize
an industry that closely resembles itself is pretty odd, especially when
it fails to realize the irony in doing so.  There's a big difference
between a film like this and one like The Truman Show (which, by the
way, succeeds), because Holy Man isn't bold or biting -- it fits a
formula down to the last detail.  A formula film that says, "Don't fall
prey to consumerism!" is, in effect, saying, "Don't watch the film
you're watching!"  For a film that wants to make money, I fail to see
the logic in all of this.
On top of everything, the story is just so bland.  And, if you want to
know the history behind G -- his name, religion, why the hell he acts
the way he does -- you won't find it here.  Holy Man provides absolutely
no insight into its namesake, which creates a big problem when the
producers are expecting audiences to understand this man and believe
what he says.  This simply adds to the dominating flimsiness of the
film's claims.
It's not all bad though; aside from the amusing acting, there are some
pretty funny scenes (the two ladies with the laundry detergent balls is
pretty good).  Director Stephen Herek, although relentlessly
heavy-handed (his tactics worked better in Mr. Holland's Opus) at least
keeps the film interesting to look at.  It also got me to ask some
pretty challenging questions about the shopping network industry (do
they really broadcast live?).  Overall, I'm left as a fantastically
confused viewer:  didn't anyone notice that Holy Man is a self-defeating
endeavor?  A film that really wants to take a shot at satire should
first take a good look at itself, just to make certain that it's not at
the butt of its own joke.  

Title
Review for Faculty, The (1998)
Director: Robert Rodriguez
Cast: Elijah Wood, Piper Laurie, Christopher McDonald, Bebe Neuwirth,
Robert Patrick, Usher Raymond
Screenplay: George Huang, Kevin Williamson
Producers: Elizabeth Avellan, Robert Rodriguez, Bill Scott
Runtime: 100 min.
US Distribution: Miramax/Dimension
Rated R: violence, language
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
In The Faculty, little slimy aliens take over an entire school.  They
start with the football coach (Robert Patrick), and move their way
through the principal (Bebe Neuwirth), some of the teachers (Piper
Laurie, Daniel Von Bargen, Famke Janssen, Salma Hayek), and then move on
to the students.  So, naturally, it falls into the hands of our
protagonists to stop the alien invasion:  computer-nerd Casey (Elijah
Wood), tomboy Stokely (Clea DuVall), cool drug-dealing Zeke (Josh
Hartnett), football kid Stan (Shawn Hatosy), superficial cheerleader
Delilah (Jordana Brewster), and innocent Souther girl Marybeth (Laura
Harris).  Along the way, there are plenty of violent deaths and a whole
lot of movie references.  
I like writer Kevin Williamson's self-conscious horror films better
than most horror films.  They certainly overpower the numbing badness of
recent horror junk like I Still Know What You Did Last Summer (although,
oddly enough, Williamson did write the original Summer flick) and
Disturbing Behavior.  He's clearly a man who has seen a lot of movies,
judging from the constant barrage of movie references through all of the
films that he's written (the Scream movies are basically 90-minute
movies references, actually).  The Faculty is sufficiently aware of its
own silliness to pass the time pleasantly.  It rather reminded me of
Deep Rising, which was similar in it's sci-fi/horror/comedy approach.
Some are calling The Faculty a science-fiction thriller, but it really
isn't.  I don't even think it attempts to be.  All of the science (the
silly explanations about how the aliens survive, for instance) is
intentionally dumb, and never tries to be serious (unlike Phantoms,
which came out earlier this year and takes itself entirely seriously). 
The Faculty is strictly a horror film, with some comedy thrown in for
good measure.  And it's not a great movie, but it's inoffensive and it
has some fun scenes.  Directed by Robert Rodriguez with the same kind of
visual flair that he's shown in previous films (even the terrible From
Dusk Till Dawn), The Faculty has the look and feel of an efficient
thriller, even though it is mostly played for laughs.  The giant digital
slugs that appear later in the film are nicely done, and most of the
violence dances skillfully between disgusting and funny.  
And funny it is; Williamson's dialogue is sharp, and I found myself
laughing often (Stokely's constant insults are very amusing).  The movie
is not played for scares very often; there are some exciting sequences
(the first scene, with Bebe Neuwirth running away from Robert Patrick,
is well-done), but mostly it's just for fun.  The actors are appealing,
especially young Elijah Wood (I'm glad he hasn't met the fate of other
child actors), and the film is just a lot of fun.  I think it might lift
from one too many horror films (The Thing, especially); Williamson still
hasn't proved to me that he can come up with something really original,
but the way he keeps reshaping the stuff we've seen is good enough for
now.

Title
Review for Rounders (1998)
Director:  John Dahl
Cast:  Matt Damon, Edward Norton, John Turturro, Gretchen Mol, Famke
Janssen, John Malkovich, Martin Landau, Michael Rispoli
Screenplay:  David Levien, Brian Koppelman
Producers:  Ted Demme, Joel Stillerman
Runtime:  115
US Distribution:  Miramax
Rated R:  language, sex, drug use
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
Rounders, if you haven't heard, is a film about people who play poker
for a living.  It involves a lot of illegal gambling, and much of it
takes place in casinos.  As we were driving out of the theater, my
friend noted that it was impressive that director John Dahl managed to
make a film about gambling interesting to people who live in a gambling
town.  I've lived in Reno my entire life, and one of the misconceptions
most people have is that casinos are everywhere, and that locals know
everything there is to know about gambling.  Apparently, my friend has
this opinion as well.
The fact is, most locals I know spend less than two dollars per year
gambling.  I, myself, have spent 55 cents over the course of my entire
life.  Nobody knows anything about gambling.  It's a mystery unless you
*work* in a casino.  That's why gambling is so fascinating to everyone,
including Renoites.  Sure, we ignore it for the most part, but that
doesn't mean we don't find it interesting.  As I understand it, most
people find gambling immensely interesting.  That's probably why
Rounders is likely to be a big hit -- it successfully delves into things
that most of us have never seen.  It also makes gambling seem hugely
appealing, a trait no gambling film I've ever watched has had.
Of course, it's more specific than "gambling" -- it takes us deep into
the world of professional poker, where people bet their entire life
savings on one hand.  It tells the story of true card sharks -- the
poker professionals who don't rely on luck, but on skill -- knowing what
cards everyone has, and knowing how to read body language.  The film
stars the ultra-popular Matt Damon as Mike McDermott, a law school
student who, at the beginning of the film, loses everything he has in
one poker game; his opponent is a crazy Russian known as KGB (John
Malkovitch).
He vows never to go back to the game.  He gets a "real" job driving a
truck, and moves in with his girlfriend, Jo (Gretchen Mol).  Everything
is going great until Mike's best friend, Worm (Edward Norton), is
released from jail.  Worm is, of course, a pro poker player, not to
mention an incredibly pushy guy:  he drags Mike back into the poker
underworld, and soon Mike has dropped everything, including school and
his girlfriend.  Then, predictably, Mike is put into a position in which
he must vouch for Worm -- it's then up to him to pay for all of Worm's
debts.
Okay, so a lot of this sounds pretty familiar.  Rounders is a smooth,
likable movie, but it is dreadfully predictable (and often strangely
contrived).  Of course Mike is going to get back into poker.  Of course
Worm is going to get himself into trouble.  Of course Mike's going to
end up "vouching for the wrong guy" (who, incidentally, is his best
friend).  And, of course, there is going to be one final showdown with
KGB.  I could see the gears turning in David Levien's and Brian
Koppelman's script as they force the events to end up just as they
began.  Interestingly, the predictability didn't bother me as I watched
the film.  Dahl (The Last Seduction, Unforgettable) does such a sharp
job directing that I can't imagine not falling prey to its charming
qualities.
It's probably the way he films the scenes, and the way he uses his
actors.  Dahl doesn't use a lot of camera tricks, but his camera is
always moving, panning and circling around the numerous poker tables. 
The film is ridiculously entertaining, and many of the scenes provide
solid belly laughs:  my favorite scene has all of the film's main
characters (all of whom are poker pros) sitting at a table in the Taj
Mahal, waiting for tourists to come up and waste their money.  It's such
a well-done scene; the reactions of the numerous neophytes losing their
cash is particularly good.
The screenplay is good in its details, and provides a lot of strong
characters for a magical cast.  Damon, unlike many of his peers, is
actually a gifted actor -- he handles the emotional ups and downs with
ease.  (My only concern is that after this film and his last two, Good
Will Hunting and The Rainmaker, he's going to be typecast as the
know-it-all with an attitude.)  Norton, on the other hand, turns in a
performance vastly different from all of his previous (does this guy
have range or what?).  He's a strong screen presence, and great fun to
watch.  John Malkovitch has a lot of fun with his role, and though his
Russian accent isn't perfect, it's interesting to see Malkovitch without
that strange voice of his.  Supporting performances from Famke Janssen,
John Turturro, and particularly Martin Landau (as Mike's professor) are
all very good.
I didn't much like the film's end, because none of the subplots end
with satisfaction.  The girlfriend subplot whimpers to a close, and the
relationship between Mike and Worm -- which is the film's central
conflict -- also concludes anticlimactically.  Overall, though, I didn't
mind the flaws:  Rounders is an absorbing and amusing picture to sit
through.  And, as my friend pointed out, it will even interest the 1
million people who live in cities with gambling.  John Dahl and his
array of actors have managed to take us all somewhere that we haven't
been before by explaining the way poker really works.  It just makes me
want to go out and blow thirty thousand dollars.

Title
Review for Fallen (1998)
Director: Gregory Hoblit
Cast: Denzel Washington, Donald Sutherland, John Goodman, Embeth
Davidtz, Elias Koteas, James Gandolfini
Rated R: violence, language
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    I've got to give the makers of Fallen credit for trying something
high-minded and going through with it for the most part. The film is
composed of appealing ideas and characters, and often times it even
works, but after hearing about this story, I would have handled the
execution completely differently. This could have been a deeply
disturbing film, moving and profound on multiple levels. Too bad,
because it waters down its own dark themes, and shifts with unnatural
tonal changes. The result is an original, well-acted film that tiptoes
around greatness and ends up falling far short of the mark.
    Denzel Washington stars as John Hobbes, the New York detective who
narrates the story. In the beginning, we find that he has just put away
serial killer Edgar Reese (Elias Koteas in a brief but energetic
performance). It doesn't take long for Hobbes to find out that the
spirit of the killer is being passed around from body to body by means
of touch--in one frantic sequence, he watches on the street as each
passerby stares him in the eye with a demonic grin. He enlists the help
of theologian Gretta Milano (Embeth Davidtz); as it turns out, her
father went through the exact same situation that Hobbes is going
through at the time of the film.
    Fallen is a strange case. I immediately knew there was something
wrong when the lively '60s tune Time is on My Side (I think that's what
it's called...) began blaring during the credits. Credits, for me, set
the tone of the film, and this is not what I'd expect from a film called
Fallen about serial killers and spirits gone awry. This isn't a severe
misstep, however--the narration is a far bigger problem. Washington is a
terrific actor, and this is a great performance, but his voice is just
not good for narration. He sounds too happy, too nice for it to be a
foreboding element. It's not really comical, but with his voice in there
all along, there isn't really any doubt that he's going to be okay. In
that case, a central element of suspense in the film is lost.
    This leads right into another striking problem with the film--it
isn't scary enough. This is a story that sent a tingle down my spine
when I saw the preview. The ideas here have so much promise--just the
thought of a killer who can pass from person to person so easily is
utterly unnerving. The execution, though, could have been so much more
eerie. It's creepy just in nature, but it could have been downright out
of control. The director, Gregory Hoblit, is not entirely to blame for
this: I think the fatal error here is the fact that the audience knows
what's going on far too early--this is dramatic irony at its most
extreme. We get to find out what's going on just from seeing the
trailer, but Hobbes doesn't get in on the secret until halfway through
the film.
    With the central idea behind the film let out so early, it's truly
hard to be afraid of it. Another big mistake is the usage of
first-person from the eyes of the spirit. There is something about
seeing what it sees that totally eliminates all suspense from the
situation. There is one truly breathtaking moment, involving the
basement of a lonely cabin and a lot of spider webs, but most of the
film lacks this kind of intense uncertainty.
    Still, there is a lot to like about this film. The performances, for
one, are all great. Washington is always convincing as the cop who is
seemingly at the center of this supernatural joke. John Goodman, who
plays Hobbes' partner, manages to create an interesting character in the
limited screen time he's given, and Donald Sutherland is good as always
as Hobbes' boss. I also liked Davidtz--she displayed the same kind of
strength that she did as Helen Hirsch in Schindler's List.
    It's a decent film, but you'll know when you watch it that it's been
tested and toned down from what it was originally supposed to be. The
ending, too, feels like a major cheat. The ideas behind this film are
superb--highly imaginative and ultimately convincing. As far as the
execution is from what I wanted, the film still engaged me. I liked the
characters enough, and the situation is extremely interesting.
    It's pretty rare that films take on this religious, demonic tone.
Last year I went into The Devil's Advocate not expecting much, and I got
a forceful, extremely moving and often disturbing picture. Fallen
promises as much but didn't deliver--this film should have been directed
by David Fincher. Had it been darker and more ominous, Fallen would have
been a truly great film. It takes the easier path, though, and ends up
just making you wish that someone in the production had thought that we
could have handled something more hard-hitting.

Title
Review for Six Days Seven Nights (1998)
Director:  Ivan Reitman
Cast:  Harrison Ford, Anne Heche, David Schwimmer, Jacqueline Obradors,
Temuera Morrison, Danny Trejo
Screenplay:  Michael Browning
Producers:  Roger Birnbaum, Wallis Nicita, Ivan Reitman
Runtime:  
US Distribution:  Hollywood Pictures
Rated PG-13:  language, adult themes
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
Movies like Six Days, Seven Nights make me mad because talented people
like Harrison Ford, Anne Heche, and Ivan Reitman put a lot of hard work
in to a script worth about ten cents.  The script was written by Michael
Browning, and he decided that, instead of thinking up new ideas, he'd
rehash a lot of cliches, omit even the slightest bit of character
development, and then throw in drug-dealing pirates to provide for a few
high-level action sequences and explosions.  There are good scripts out
there that high-profile actors can make (see The Truman Show, for
instance).  Six Days, Seven Nights is simply a waste.
Let's see . . . we have to get Harrison Ford and Anne Heche alone on an
island.  So, how do we do that?  Well, we'll make her a feisty magazine
editor, and we'll make him a crusty old pilot.  But wait, she has to
have a fiancée; that can be David Schwimmer.  But wait, if she has a
fiancée, how will she and Harrison Ford crash on the island alone?  I
know!  They'll get to their vacation spot, and then she'll get called
back!  Yessssss!  So, they'll crash on the island, and that will be
funny for about five minutes.  Shucks.
Oh, I've got it!  We'll throw in a distracting subplot in which her
fiancée has sex with a really attractive woman who acts like a bimbo,
and then he can feel guilty.  Then, when Anne Heche kisses Harrison Ford
(they have to kiss, because otherwise nobody will want to see the
movie), it will be a vindicated action, because her fiancée will already
have cheated on her!  Then, for no obvious reason, they'll accidentally
run into pirates who try to kill them.  Oh, yes!  I feel so good about
this story.  Instead of using characterization to propel the events, it
will be completely random, and yet totally predictable!  Imagine that.
Don't get me wrong -- Six Days, Seven Nights is not a boring picture;
Ford and Heche both do a great job.  The sparks fly between them, and so
most of Browning's inane dialogue is drowned out by the actors' sheer
force of talent.   Almost every scene between them has energy that the
performers bring to the screen, and I found myself laughing pretty
hard.  Schwimmer is also funny, and manages to milk all of his scenes
for whatever he can get.  And Reitman, who has made some good films, at
least tries to make things exciting.  Even though the pirate subplot is
profoundly dumb, I was prepared to be pleasantly sidetracked by the
action sequences.
It's just when I start to think about the story that my contempt for
this film surfaces.  The picture feels like it's been hacked to pieces
-- I wouldn't be surprised if five or six inept subplots have been
edited out completely.  The ones that are here are as bad as they come
(I think I let out a very audible groan when they get the first glimpse
of the pirate ships), and I'd just like to shake the producers by the
shoulders and scream, "Why did you pick this awful script!?"  
The film is outright stupid, but some of the elements are subtly
horrifying.  For instance, take the subplot in which the Schwimmer
character has sex with the bimbo, and then feels really guilty.  This is
a serious problem in real life, but Six Days, Seven Nights reduces any
chance of complexity to a weak plot device:  his actions are what makes
it okay for Heche to kiss Ford.  In a script that lacks even a glimpse
of intelligent subtlety, I find it odd that such a strangely insulting
device ended up in the story.
This is summer movie season, but that doesn't mean our movies have to
be dumb.  1998 so far has been one of the worst years in recent memory
for summer blockbusters.  When I was in line for Six Days, Seven Nights,
I heard the woman in front of me ask for "two tickets to that new
Harrison Ford movie."   Why didn't she know the name of the film?  I
suppose she just didn't care.   What bothers me even more is that the
people who make these big-budget pictures don't realize that their films
are becoming parodies of themselves.  Good actors should sign to good
scripts, and if Hollywood insists on making flicks to rake in cash, they
least they could do is assume that we'd like to spend our money on a
story worth more than ten cents.

Title
Review for Small Soldiers (1998)
Director:  Joe Dante
Cast:  David Cross, Jay Mohr, Alexandra Wilson, Denis Leary, Gregory
Smith, Kevin Dunn, Frank Langella, Tommy Lee Jones
Screenplay:  Ted Elliott, Zak Penn, Adam Rifkin, Terry Rossio, Gavin
Scott
Producers:  Michael Finnell, Colin Wilson
Runtime:  110 min.
US Distribution:  DreamWorks/Universal
Rated PG-13:  violence, language
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
When I first saw the trailers for Small Soldiers a few months back, I
didn't understand the appeal.  Now that I've seen it, I still don't
understand.  I think this film is being aimed towards children, but I
can't imagine why:  sure, it's about kids and stuff, but it's also about
numbing action and violence.  It features long, seemingly endless scenes
featuring human-like toys being maimed and mutilated, crushed and
flattened, eviscerated and dissected.  In addition, the film attempts to
satirize the military, our culture's obsession with violence, and the
world of advertising.
That's a little too much for what is essentially and overlong and
ridiculously violent kiddie movie.  There are scenes in Small Soldiers
that truly horrified me, and if I had kids, I would not have wanted them
to watch this film.  I can't be too hard on it, because it does, in
fact, try to harness a little bit of intelligence and wit into its story
(see Doctor Dolittle for a film that isn't so bold).  And it's made with
great technical competency by director Joe Dante and crew.  But the
intelligence is misguided, and the special effects are hollow -- Small
Soldiers is just a mean-spirited little movie.
There are a lot of characters, and a lot of subplots.  The film opens
with a couple of company men (David Cross and Jay Mohr) making a sales
pitch to the president (Denis Leary) of a company called Globotech. 
They decide to create war toys that actually talk and fight back.  In
one of the film's many attempts at satire, Leary's character goes on a
tantrum in which he states his desire for toys to actually do what they
can do in the commercials.  It's funny, but never followed through with
any degree of completeness.  The toys are called the Commando Elite, and
are fitted with special chips created for military intelligence.
Cut ahead three months time, and we meet Alan (Gregory Smith), our
hero.  His dad (Kevin Dunn) owns a toy store, and Alan stocks the store
full of Commando Elite toys, despite his father's rule against war
toys.  Naturally, the toys escape, but it turns out that the American
Commandos, led by Chip Hazard (voiced by Tommy Lee Jones), are the
villains, and are hell-bent on destroying the Gorgonites (whose leader
is voiced by Frank Langella), who are peaceful, nature-loving beings. 
What ensues are a series of technically superb and horrifyingly violence
action sequences.
As I said, I can respect the entire package to an extent, for it does
have traces of intelligence.  I like the satire involving the nature of
the war toys, and the speech Chip gives to his troops against the
backdrop of an American flag.  And I like the anti-tech themes running
throughout the film, and how Alan's father is violently opposed to tech
stuff, while their neighbor, Phil (Phil Hartman), is cutting down trees
to get clear reception with his satellite dish.  
It's enough to make me utterly confused as to the film's intentions.  I
was instantly reminded of Starship Troopers, which is another film that
satirizes its subject while banking on the very principles it attacks. 
The difference is that Starship Troopers always has that comical edge,
and is aimed primarily at adults and teens old enough to understand the
material.  Small Soldiers is PG-13, and I warn all parents to take that
rating seriously -- there are scenes and images in this film that just
aren't appropriate for younger kids.
The scene that bothered me most has the Commandos stealing a bunch of
Barbie dolls and bringing them to life to create a surplus of troops. 
What results are armies of female toys which end up horribly disfigured
(the film has a strange fixation with some of the themes explored in
Shelley's Frankenstein).  They stalk their opponents and swarm like
cockroaches, uttering valley girl lines like "It's a bad hair day" and
"I broke a nail."  Later, most of them are viciously destroyed by a
lawnmower-wielding young girl.  None of this is pleasant, and it's stuff
I'd expect to see in a horror film.  The absence of human blood fails to
keep the material from being harrowing.
Small Soldiers is always impressive to look at, and Joe Dante
(Gremlins) has explored this material before (actually, Gremlins is a
similar film in many ways).  Stan Winston and Industrial Light and Magic
are responsible for the effects, and the image brought to screen is
convincing and impressive.  But I wasn't thinking about those things --
I was thinking about the blatant hypocrisy in every scene.  How can an
anti-war movie utilize such extreme violence and expect to show it to
the youngsters in our society?  Isn't this the kind of stuff that makes
kids think that violence is a great solution for their problems?  The
producers of Small Soldiers should worry about instigating another
tragedy in an elementary school yard.  

Title
Review for Vita č bella, La (1997)
Director:   Roberto Benigni
Cast:  Roberto Benigni, Nicoletta Braschi, Giorgio Cantarini, Giustino
Durano, Serio Bini Bustric, Marisa Paredes, Horst Bucholz
Screenplay:  Vincenzo Cerami, Roberto Benigni
Producers:  Gianluigi Braschi, Elda Ferri
Runtime:   114 min.
US Distribution: Miramax
Rated PG-13:  holocaust-related thematic elements
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Roberto Benigni won big this year at the Oscars, snagging up both Best
Foreign Film and Best Actor for Life is Beautiful.  The film is actually
two pictures in one:  the first is about Guido Orefice (Benigni), and
his efforts to woo a young woman (played by Benigni's real-life wife,
Nicoletta Braschi).  This portion of the film is wonderfully funny and
unrelenting slapstick comedy.  But the slapstick tone is not even
marginally appropriate for a Holocaust setting, and so any attempt at
humor ends up failing (except for one superb moment in which Guido
intentionally screws up in translating orders from a German soldier). 
Overall, Life is Beautiful is an ambitious and heartfelt artistic
failure.

Title
Review for Can't Hardly Wait (1998)
Director:  Harry Elfont, Deborah Kaplan
Cast:  Ethan Embry, Jennifer Love Hewitt, Peter Facinelli, Charlie
Korsmo Seth Green, Jerry O'Connell, Melissa Joan Hart
Screenplay:  Deborah Kaplan, Harry Elfont
Producers:  Jenno Topping
Runtime:  100 min.
US Distribution:  Columbia/Sony Pictures Entertainment
Rated PG-13:  teen drinking, sex, language
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
I think I'm just barely too young to have been part of that 80s series
of Movies for Rebellious Teenagers.  I've seen The Breakfast Club, and I
think it's a pretty good film.  I've seen only parts of some of the
other noteable ones (like Say Anything and Fast Times at Ridgemont
High), so whatever cliches exist in this genre are likely to have passed
me up if they were present in Can't Hardly Wait.  I thoroughly enjoyed
myself through this film, for not only is it a smart and funny movie,
but it captures the essence of high school perfectly.
I've read a lot of reviews for Can't Hardly Wait before writing my own
(typically I don't like to do this, but, because I've procrastinated so
much, it was unavoidable).  Most of the critics are saying the same
things, complaining about stereotype characters and standard situations,
et cetera.  It seems pretty clear to me that Deborah Kaplan and Harry
Elfont, who co-wrote and co-directed, were very conscious of the angle
they took.  High school was little more than stereotype characters and
standard situations, and Can't Hardly Wait does a great job of making
fun of every degree of the caste.
It's the night of graduation, and there's a big party.  The film
doesn't follow a strict narrative or plotting, but does a good job of
introducing some fun characters and giving them high-school-ish things
to do.  The most central character is Preston (Ethan Embry), the typical
nice guy (and smart guy -- we immediately learn that he's off to
Dartmouth in the fall).  His subplot revolves around his love for Amanda
(Jennifer Love Hewitt), who has just been dumped by her four-year jock
boyfriend, Mike (Peter Facinelli).  
Preston is friends with Denise (Lauren Ambrose), a cynical misanthrope
(are all misanthropes cynical?), who gets trapped in the bathroom with
Kenny (Seth Green).  Kenny is a white guy who pretends that a) he's
black, and b) he's a slick ladies man.  Denise shows him that he's
neither one.  Then there's William (Charlie Korsmo), the genius nerd who
finally gets drunk and finds that the ladies are more attracted to
intelligence than he had initially thought.  
Can't Hardly Wait flows nicely through the twenty-four hours in which
it takes place (beginning with graduation and ending with a nice scene
in a train station).  Kaplan and Elfont have constructed the film
intelligently, and put some familiar tricks to good use (I liked the way
Preston's letter gets into Amanda's hands).  They also keep the popular
music raging throughout the picture; even though this dates the film
severely, it certainly will bring back not-so-distant memories for
anyone in my generation.  
I also liked the actors and their characters.  Are they really
stereotypes?  Well, I suppose.  A few critics agree that the only
interesting character is Denise, but since I know so many people like
her, I found her no more interesting than anyone else.  I could enjoy
myself watching Jennifer Love Hewitt scrape paint off a wall, so her
acting ability is negligible for me (although I do think she's a
talented actress).  Embry is endearing with his puppy dog eyes (and he
could win a Matthew McConaughey look-alike contest).  I also enjoyed
Facinelli's over-the-top imitation of the Head Jock.  I hate jocks, and
he does a great job making fun of them (and he could win a Tom Cruise
look-alike contest).
If I have any complaints, it's that the movie kind of lags through the
middle.  The pace is swift, but it gets a bit repetitive at times.  But
on the whole, Can't Hardly Wait is a funny and intelligent film about
the late teenage years.  High school, which, for this reviewer, ended
just two short years ago, was nothing more than a bunch of stereotypical
people searching for themselves.  There's no doubt in my mind that
Kaplan and Elfont had this fact in mind as they made their film -- Can't
Hardly Wait is a movie that any kid who grew up in the 90s will
appreciate.  

Title
Review for Velvet Goldmine (1998)
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
I don't mind being confused by a movie.  Every once in a while, it's
fun to watch a confounding film and be forced to put the pieces together
at the end.  It's not fun, however, when the pieces don't fit together,
or when there simply aren't enough pieces.   Writer/director Todd
Haynes' Velvet Goldmine is a good example of a confusing movie that
doesn't give the viewer enough information to understand it completely. 
Perhaps I should see the film again -- there is a very good chance that
I missed something.
But it's not likely that I missed half the movie, even though I kind of
feel like I did.  Haynes' film, which partially revolves around a
British Glam rock star in the mid-70s, does a lot of things right --
mostly in production design and music -- but it's a hollow movie with no
emotional center, and almost no coherence whatsoever.  It's filled with
eclectic flashbacks and elaborate dream sequences, all of which begin
and end without the viewer knowing.   There's also very little dialogue,
and huge interludes of music without any speaking.  I'm sure someone
could make a case for this approach; it seems to me that Haynes was more
interested in capturing the look and feel of the Glam rock era rather
than telling a straightforward story about it.  The problem is that he
didn't give me a reason to care.
The film begins with a truly bizarre prologue, implying that Oscar
Wilde was a gift from aliens.  It then cuts to 1974, the year in which
Glam rock king Brian Slade (Jonathan Rhys-Meyers) fakes his own
assassination during one of his concerts.  In the audience stands Arthur
Stuart (Christian Bale), a big fan of Slade.   Ten years later, Arthur
is a journalist who is sent to find out what really happened to Brian
Slade.  He interviews many people, including Slade's wife, Mandy (Toni
Collette), former lover, Curt Wild (Ewan McGregor), and first manager
(Michael Feast).  Later, we learn that Slade was a major influence on
Arthur's life.
When the film was over, I felt like I had been sitting for days.   The
film isn't boring, but it's a chore to sit through because it's so
confusing.   You're always trying to figure out what time period your
in, or what characters you're supposed to be watching, or if the scene
is a dream sequence.  I think there's a way to evoke the Glam rock era
without perplexing viewers; I wish Haynes had tried to figure out how. 
I've got to give him credit, though:  the movie is visually and aurally
immersive.  The sets art big and colorful, the music is very loud, and
it's hard to pull your eyes away from the screen.  Haynes (whose last
feature, Safe, is far more subdued than this) has a good sense of mood,
but fails to tell a compelling story about real people.  And, as I said,
I'm pretty sure he meant to take this approach.   
It's not that there aren't any characters -- in fact, some of them are
interesting.   Rhys-Meyers is perfect as Slade, the effeminate rocker
whose face is barely visible through the makeup.  The main problem with
Slade as a character is that he's just a symbol in the film, and Haynes
never makes him into a believable human being.   McGregor is good, but
his psychotic character is not very pleasant.  Collette has a nice role,
but she's on hand mostly has a plot device.  The only actor who rises
above the material is Bale, but even Arthur's connection with Slade --
which is where the emotional grounding is supposed to come from -- isn't
well-developed.  None of this is helped by the fact that the characters
really don't talk to each other -- what little dialogue there is falls
prey to the stupefying visuals, and so the story can't emerge from the
rubble.
And so what we're left with is a flashy, vapid movie that makes no
sense.  Velvet Goldmine is an interesting film to a degree -- Haynes'
visual presentation is enough to keep anyone watching.  It's just that,
with iconic characters and an incoherent narrative, the film fails to
draw in its audience.  I don't think Velvet Goldmine needed to be a
mess, even though Haynes clearly wanted it messy.  It wouldn't have
taken much to straighten this film out -- get rid of the framing device,
make the flashbacks more obvious, and maybe add a little dialogue.   I
have no moral problem with a confusing film like this, but Haynes should
have given us enough information to figure it out.  

Title
Review for Election (1999)
Director: Alexander Payne
Cast: Matthew Broderick, Reese Witherspoon, Chris Klein, Jessica
Campbell, Mark Harelik, Phil reeves, Molly Hagan
Screenplay: Alexander Payne, Jim Taylor
Producers: Albert Berger, David Gale, Keith Samples, Ron Yerxa
Runtime: 103 min.
US Distribution: Paramount
Rated R: Sex, language, drug use
Copyright 1999 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
It's hard to imagine a better political satire than Election, Alexander
Payne's intelligent and genius follow-up to his 1996 film, Citizen
Ruth.  True, it's a story about a high school election, starring Reese
Witherspoon presidential candidate Tracy Flick, and Matthew Broderick as
Mr. McAllister, the teacher who hates her most.  But Election serves not
just as an acerbic attack on high school politics, but as an attack on
politics in general (now I know what Hillary Clinton was like in high
school).  The film features four dead-on performances; Broderick and
Witherspoon are both show masterful comic timing, but also give their
characters depth.  Chris Klein is wonderful as Paul Metzler, the big,
stupid, lovable jock oaf who runs against Tracy; Jessica Campbell is
also great as Paul's laconic, lesbian sister.  But what really makes
Election such a funny, touching, brilliant blast of a film is Payne's
direction:  he observes these people with such immaculate objectivity
and seething irony that you can't help but like them all, even with
their flaws.  In short, Election is what satire is all about.

Title
Review for Sliding Doors (1998)
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
Sliding Doors is a film that wants to be deep and profound, and often
it is.  Writer/director Peter Howitt observes the life of a woman named
Helen (Gwyneth Paltrow), and how it simultaneously progresses on two
different paths.  This is, of course, a gimmick, but it's a reasonably
well-developed gimmick in this case.  The premise, however, is stamped
onto the romantic comedy formula, and the result is a film that is
thought-provoking at times and irritatingly coy at others.  Paltrow is
fantastic in the main role, but the very-standard romantic comedy antics
often forced my attention away from the film.  
When the story introduces us to Helen, she has just been fired from her
job.  In the first scenario, she goes home on the subway and finds her
boyfriend Gerry (John Lynch) having athletic sex with his mistress
(Jeanne Tripplehorn).  She walks out on him and essentially starts a new
life, which entails meeting James (John Hannah), and getting a new
haircut.  In the second scenario, she misses the subway, gets mugged,
and then returns home just in time to have missed Gerry's mistress; she
continues on her life and Gerry continues to lie to her.  
Howitt develops both scenarios simultaneously, cutting back and forth
throughout the film.  At first, I thought this was a bad idea, but it
proves useful by the end of the film:  many of the things that happen to
Helen happen to both of her counterparts simultaneously, and it's
interesting to see the way their lives are parallel.  This is where the
interesting aspects of the film come in, for Howitt's ideas of fate and
destiny are executed in such a manner that you might find yourself
adopting some of the theories put forth in the film.  
There have been many other films that deal with destiny and similar
themes.  Krzysztof Kieslowski's Three Colors trilogy all deal
effectively with the ideas, but his The Double Life of Veronique is
devoted entirely to them.  I like that film more than this one because
it's about two women (both played by the luminous Irene Jacob) who live
parallel lives.  Sliding Doors, although it is interesting, is little
more than a thought-provoking fairy tale:  it's not realistic in the
sense that both Helens are actually alive at the same time (though I
imagine someone could make a case that they are).  
I wouldn't mind so much if Howitt's script had lived up to its
premise.  To begin, the characters are adequately interesting, but most
of them are intensely irritating.  Paltrow is wonderful (her British
inflection is absolutely perfect), and has a demanding presence that I
think will keep her in the industry for a long time.  Lynch, on the
other hand, has been saddled with a character so spineless and annoying
that I simply could not stand to watch him.  Hannah is also
frustratingly manic and jittery, but his character calls for it. 
Tripplehorn is attractive and demands attention, but she overacts here
and often times her character is so ridiculously mean that I couldn't
believe it.  
The situations Howitt provides are standard romantic comedy fare.  The
film wants to be realistic, but there are scenes that are laughable and
simply unrealistic:  when Gerry pulls the blinds to find his mistress
standing at the window, he gasps loudly and shuts the blinds.  Helen
turns around to see what he did, and he covers it up with an
unconvincing lie.  And one of the many climaxes features people pouring
out their hearts to one another in the middle of a rain storm at night. 
Sometimes scenes like these work, but all of the ones in this film feel
suspiciously present to evoke emotions that the film doesn't need to
make it's point.  Sliding Doors is certainly watchable, but Howitt
should have realized that a romantic comedy with an interesting gimmick
is still just a romantic comedy.

Title
Review for Borrowers, The (1997)
Director: Peter Hewitt
Written By: John Kamps, Gavin Scott
Produced By:  Tim Bevan, Eric Fellner, Rachel Talalay
Cast: John Goodman, Jim Broadbent, Mark Williams, Hugh Laurie, Bradley
Pierce, Flora Newbigin, Tom Felton
Runtime:  83 min.
Production Company: Polygram
Rated PG: mild peril, crude humor
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        I remember that when I saw Honey, I Shrunk the Kids at a much younger
age, I was less impressed with that film than I am with The Borrowers
now, in my twenties.  I never go into a kid-oriented film expecting
something as crafty and entertaining as this.  The special effects and
sets are all extremely good, and the characters played by couple of
great actors (John Goodman and Jim Broadbent) make this an all-around
pleasant experience.  
        The film is essentially about a family of small people, called
Borrowers.  At the head of the family is Pod Clock (Broadbent) and his
wife, Homily Clock (Celia Imrie).   They have two children, Arrietty
(Flora Newbigin) and Peagreen (Tom Felton).   They live in the nooks and
crannies of a house that belongs to the Lenders--a family of big, silly
beings (that's what the Borrowers call humans).  The Lenders have a son,
Pete (Bradley Pierce), who discovers the Borrowers and befriends them.  
When the Lenders are forced to move out of their house by the evil
businessman Oscious P. Potter (Goodman), the Borrowers learn that Potter
has actually stolen a will that will declare the Lenders as the rightful
owners of the house.  It is then up to little Arrietty and Peagreen to
get ahold of the will.  Potter, of course, finds out about the little
people and brings in an exterminator (Mark Williams), but they are no
match for the Borrowers.
        I suppose the success of this film owes a lot to the presence of John
Goodman.   Goodman, in all of his jolly hugeness, proves that he can
both be evil and funny at the same time.  He never goes into the
unwanted realm of overacting, either, so there aren't really any moments
in The Borrowers that are painful to watch.  And the great Jim Broadbent
is wonderfully entertaining as Pod Clock (I love that name), the British
ringleader of his family of small people.
        The film is filled with great sets and special effects.  Director Peter
Hewitt does a professional job of making everyday places--like the
kitchen, for instance--seem threateningly large.  The sets are extremely
detailed and authentic, and the film is surprisingly atmospheric.  The
special-effects, as well, are some of the best in recent memory:  the
integration of small and large people has never been done as smoothly as
this.  There are also some truly funny moments, most of them including
Goodman and a very strange police officer (played by Hugh Laurie).  
        The Borrowers is a fun, imaginative little film.  It's the kind of
movie that parents can enjoy at the same time as their kids.  It's also
that rare kind of film that will keep kids' attention despite the lack
of gratuitous violence and gore.   And, despite the fact that it is
intended for kids, I can recommend this film to anyone--I imagine it
will hold the attention of even the most skeptical teenagers.  

Title
Review for Entrapment (1999)
Director: Jon Amiel
Cast: Sean Connery, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Ving Rhames, Will Patton,
Maury Chaykin
Screenplay: Ronald Bass, William Broyles
Producers: Sean Connery, Michael Hertzberg, Rhonda Tollefson
Runtime: 112 min.
US Distribution: 20th Century Fox
Rated PG-13: violence, language
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Roger Ebert describes Entrapment as a "star vehicle," and he enjoyed it
on those terms.  I'm not letting it off that easily.  Here is a film
that not only ignores logic, characterization, and coherence, but spits
in the face of every known rule of physics.  It's also such a
superficial movie that the most notable element of the last scene is
that the characters' costumes are perfectly matched with the sets. 
Style over substance?  Definitely.  Should we care?  I sure did.  It's
not a loathsome film; on the contrary, it stars two people who are easy
on the eyes and light up the screen.  In fact, there are only two
reasons to see Entrapment:  1) the presence of Sean Connery and
Catherine Zeta-Jones, and 2) director Jon Amiel, who does what he can
with a script overdosed on cliches.
Even these three talents can't make sense of this inane screenplay,
which is credited to Ronald Bass and William Broyles; it's one of those
scripts that's far more interested in shocking us with ludicrous plot
twists than it is in actually telling a story about thieves.  The
framework for the film is pretty simple:  Gin Baker (Zeta-Jones) works
for an insurance company; she's assigned by her boss (Will Patton) to
make a deal with and ultimately betray Robert MacDugal (Connery), a
rich, big-time thief.  The usual assortment of plot devices can be
expected, including several double-crosses, a sordid love affair, a
sidekick subplot (starring Ving Rhames), and a lot of characters staring
pensively at the action-packed sight of a surveillance camera.
Entrapment fires cliches at its audience with mechanical rapidity; it's
likely that anyone keeping track will lose count well before the film is
over.  For instance, if Mac is such a sly, brilliant thief, why is it
that Gin is able to instantly pull up a file containing every crime he's
committed since his foray into the world of robbery?  Well, that's
probably because the screenplay wouldn't work very well if Gin doesn't
know what Mac looks like.  Another cliche is the Vanishing Character
Act.  The last scene (the one I mentioned above) has about four
Vanishing Character Acts, where characters vanish into thin air and then
appear seconds later in places they could not possibly have gotten in
such a short amount of time.  My personal favorite is the obligatory sex
with Sean Connery cliche.  Entrapment doesn't actually feature a heated
sex scene, but it's implied.  
Jon Amiel (Copycat) is a skilled director, and the heist scene in which
Gin and Mac steal the Chinese mask is sharply crafted, especially after
seeing the way they train for it.  Connery and Zeta-Jones don't do much
acting, but they have presence, so much that I was almost interested in
the love affair angle.  The supporting cast is nice, though Patton and
Rhames are both shamelessly wasted.  Entrapment is a pretty lousy movie
when all is considered, but it has its pluses.  It just would have been
nice if someone -- anyone -- had at least made an effort to tone down
the cliches and make sense of the story.  Stars can carry a movie only
so far before a little bit of coherence in the plot is necessary.

Title
Review for Wag the Dog (1997)
Director: Barry Levinson
Cast: Robert De Niro, Dustin Hoffman, Anne Heche, Woody Harrelson, Denis
Leary, Andrea Martin
Rated R: Language, adult themes
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    Wag the Dog is one of the smartest, most self-aware pictures of the
year. There isn't a chance it misses with it's witty satire of the
government and the Hollywood process. Each character seems to be an
exaggerated stereotype, whether it be a film producer, CIA agent, or a
White House official. Directed by Barry Levinson with poker-faced
dryness, Wag the Dog is a film that should be studied by anyone
interested in making a satire.
    But I didn't like it. It has almost nothing that I love to see in
films. And I'm torn here, because I realize that this is the point. It
is a satire--and a good one at that--but without a likable character in
site, without a drop of real human emotion, without a speck of good
nature or good intentions, I found it hard to sit through this film
without squirming. In fact, I didn't. I squirmed a lot. Maybe I should
recommend it based on this--clearly the point of this film is not just
to make fun of the government, but to make the public a little bit
worried about what's going on behind the scenes. The simple fact is that
I just didn't enjoy it.
    Robert De Niro stars as Conrad Brean, a guy who works for the
president (his exact job title is never disclosed); his efforts in this
film all point to one ultimate objective--reelect the president. This,
of course, means faking a war in Albania with the help of big-time film
producer Stanley Motss (Dustin Hoffman). They stage ten seconds of video
footage with a little girl holding a kitten, running through a war-torn
village. They hire a songwriter (Willie Nelson) to make a happy theme
song. Later, they even create a man who allegedly was left behind in
Albania. His name is Schumann (Woody Harrelson), and he is psychotic.
The public refers to him affectionately as "Old Shoe," but of course
they don't realize that he's spent the last twelve years in a military
prison for raping a nun.
    I never thought I'd see a film that actually surpasses the
implications of the word "scathing." This film is beyond scathing.
"Acidic" doesn't even do it justice--this is like 200 molar acidic
(which is so concentrated that the word "acidic" no longer has meaning).
If you dropped a reel of Wag the Dog on the ground, it would burn
through the floor and eventually end up at the center of the earth.
    Okay, so I'm going a little overboard. I did think a lot of this
film was very funny. The whole business involving Schumann was great,
especially the resolution to the situation. Just the thought of faking a
war seems ludicrous to me, and after much thought, this aspect is also
outright funny. Much of the film is funny in that delayed-laughter sort
of way, where it takes some thought to realize how silly the situation
is, and then you are permitted to laugh. This film also takes some bold
chances, with a fairly subtle message about the American public that
isn't exactly positive.
    It's just that I found it . . . lifeless. Sure, the comedy is
energetic. The sheer effort that went into making such a serious jab at
the reelection process is definitely complete. But for the most part, I
found it to be lethargic. Scenes fumble from one moment to the next,
without having any real obvious objective. For example, as they were
composing the phony video footage, I couldn't even guess where the story
was going to go from there. It didn't seem to have motivation; the
Schumann element came out of nowhere.
    In addition, I find it hard, if not impossible, to enjoy a film when
I dislike all of the characters, no matter how satirical they're
supposed to be. Films that I consider satires (or at least black
comedies) always have at least one character with whom audiences can
identify--Brazil, for example, features a main character with whom we
can all empathize. I realize that Wag the Dog is an entirely different
kind of film, but I think that if either Conrad or Stanley had been a
little bit more down-to-earth, I could have found something in this film
that might make me care. De Niro plays Conrad so subtly two-faced that
he almost seems nice sometimes (until you realize that he's about to
have you executed). Hoffman, on the other hand, plays an individual so
wrapped up in himself that reality is long gone, and he's become a rich,
pathetic man barely worth a second look. Even the supporting characters
played competently by Anne Heche, Woody Harrelson, Denis Leary, and
Willie Nelson lack anything even remotely appealing.
    And so, I am put in a strange position. Should I recommend this film
based on the fact that it clearly does what it has set out to do? I
suppose that's what I'm doing. I, however, like to see something with a
glimpse of good-heartedness in it. Even films as entirely negative and
dreary as Seven don't feel this cynical. Wag the Dog has a uniquely
wretched mood, an ineffable level of skepticism guided right towards the
government and the American public that it's wagging. I fear that if
they had done what I suggest and create characters or situations that
elicit an emotional response, then it would have lost much of the
desired potency. I'm more inclined to believe that a film like this
simply can not satisfy my tastes.

Title
Review for Jane Austen's Mafia! (1998)
Director:  Jim Abrahams
Cast:  Jay Mohr, Lloyd Bridges, Christina Applegate, Billy Burke,
Olympia Dukakis, Pamela Gidley
Screenplay:  Jim Abrahams, Greg Norberg, Michael McManus
Producers:  Bill Badalto
Runtime:  88 min.
US Distribution:  Buena Vista Pictures/Touchstone
Rated PG-13:  profanity, sex, flatulence, mock violence 
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        In my review of There's Something About Mary, I said something to the
effect of "laughter isn't everything."  I now need to make a brief
addendum to my postulate:  Laughter isn't everything, unless I'm
watching a Jim Abrahams film.  See, spoofs are easy with me.  I love
movies, and I love movies that make fun of movies that I love. 
Sometimes I'm the only one in the theater laughing.  Sometimes I laugh
so hard that I embarass myself because my laugh is so high-pitched in
comparison to my speaking voice (it cuts right through everyone else's
laughter).  Sometimes I laugh so much that my cheekbones are sore by the
end of the film.
        Abraham's latest film, Mafia!, induced this kind of hysteria upon me. 
It's gotten some mediocre reviews, but, hey, I'm the guy who laughs at
everything.  There may be a lot of jokes that flop in this film, but
there are far more that work, and I laughed so frequently that the
failed jokes usually occurred as I was recovering from the previous bout
of giddy madness.  I enjoy films like this because not one second of it
is serious or thought-provoking.  Most lighweight films that pose as
comedies try to do other things, like develop characters, shape stories,
and other such nonsense.  Mafia! has no pretentions about characters or
story, and it exists for no other reason than to make people laugh.  
        The film begins on the perfect high note, with a mockery of the opening
of Casino.  Our hero (Jay Mohr) is seen walking from a casino and
getting into his car, which subsequently explodes and sends him flying
through the air against a backdrop of flowing fire.  To describe the
story of Mafia! is absurd and pointless, but I will mention that it
basically follows the framework of the Godfather films, with a lot of
Casino references inserted throughout.  Along the way, the parodies seem
arbitrary, and rarely victimize mob films:  pictures like The English
Patient, Forrest Gump, and Jaws undergo severe and hilarious bashing.
        Movies like this rely on just a few things, but the most important
element is direction.  Abrahams has been down this path many times
before (Hot Shots!, Top Secret!, Airplane!, and any other film with an
exclamation point in the title), and so I hold most of the success of
Mafia! to his experience.  He takes just the right attitude in each
scene, and manages to wring at least a bit laughter out of even the most
oddly placed references (one inexplicable moment seems like it wants to
make fun of Titanic, but it never develops).  
        The actors are all energetic, which helps a lot with the tone of the
film.  Mohr (Suicide Kings, Paulie), who is quickly becoming one of my
favorite actors, is so good here.  He looks like he's having so much fun
that he's containing his laughter in every scene (watch his face in the
sequence by the swimming pool).  He's probably the only performer in the
cast who manages to urge laughter without the help of the material. 
Lloyd Bridges does a decent imitation of Brando's Godfather, while
Pamela Gidley is dead-on in a full-blown mockery of Sharon Stone.
        The hard thing about writing reviews for comedies is that I'm supposed
to give examples of things and be specific.  Unfortunately, I was so
constantly blindsided by laughter during Mafia! that I can't remember a
lot of what made me laugh.  But that's a good sign:  Mafia! is so funny
that I wasn't even given time to apply any of the scenes to memory.  I
laughed so hard that it shut off my brain.  I know that doesn't sound
particularly complimentary, but when watching a dumb comedy like this,
the first thing I want to do is shut off my brain.  Finally, a film that
does this for me. 

Title
Review for Orgazmo (1997)
Director:  Trey Parker
Cast:  Trey Parker, Dian Bachar, Robyn Lynne Raab, Michael Dean Jacobs,
Ron Jeremy, Andrew Kemler, Juli Ashton
Screenplay:  Trey Parker, 
Producers:  Fran Rubel Kuzui, Jason McHugh, Matt Stone
Runtime:  94 min.
US Distribution:  October
Rated NC-17:  language, sex-related themes
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
Orgazmo, a gleefully insulting and intentionally awful porn satire,
centers around an upstanding Mormon lad named Joe Young.  Created by and
starring Trey Parker, the film explains the unlikely events leading to
Joe's stardom in a pornographic film.  It all begins one day as he's
going door-do-door in Los Angeles; he knocks on a door and interrupts
progress on a porn flick.  After Joe beats up a bunch of henchmen (he
kicks butt for the Lord), the film's director, Maxxx Orbison (Michael
Dean Jacobs) decides that Joe is perfect for the starring role in his
film (which, incidentally, is also called Orgazmo). 
Because he needs money to marry his fiancée, Lisa (Robyn Lynn Raab),
Joe reluctantly accepts the job.  Orbison guarantees that Joe's
innocence is preserved by enlisting a "stunt cock" for the penetration
shots, and by allowing him to skimp on the expletives littered in the
dialogue.  Soon, however, it turns out that Orbison is into dirty work,
and all he wants is money.  With the help of his co-star and friend,
Choda Boy (Dian Bachar), Joe ultimately becomes a real superhero and
attempts to stop the evil doings of Orbison.
If you take Orgazmo seriously, you might think it's the worst film of
1998.  I've read reviews that describe it as poorly-made and
incompetent, but those critics are simply missing the point:  Orgazmo is
*intentionally* bad.  The wooden acting is there for a reason.  The
cheesy fight scenes serve a purpose.  The dialogue is laughable because
it needs to be.  Besides, the setup gives everything away -- does Parker
really expect us to take seriously the story of a Mormon porn star?  Of
course he doesn't, and that's why the film is often successful:  it is
so completely bad that we're *never* inclined to take it seriously.
For the first hour, Orgazmo is fresh and entertaining.  The way Parker
parodies pornographic films is skillfully done:  porn flicks are known
for their awful acting and pointless storylines, and Parker, going
over-the-top with awful acting and pointless storylines, manages to make
a lot of lively fun out of the satire.  The film opens with a brilliant
musical number (I'd repeat the lyrics, but this is a family-oriented
site).  Many of the sequences illicit big belly laughs -- the subplot
with a ghetto sushi-chef is terrific, and the scene in which an old lady
curses at the Mormons is hilarious.
Orgazmo is a lot smarter than it seems.  It makes a pretty bold attack
on the Mormon belief system; it also steers successfully away from
self-satire by avoiding exploitation of sex (all we get to see are a few
naked breasts and a plethora of dildos).  Most of the acting is
deviously clever; Parker is really funny (he even showed talent in
BASEketball) and perfect for the lead.  The other performances work
because the performers obviously know that they're overacting.  Bachar,
who was also in BASEketball, is great in a bad sort of way, while Raab,
as the fiancée, is perfectly perky.  The only performance that doesn't
work is Jacobs' Orbison; he's often difficult to watch, and he's not
very funny.
The problem with Orgazmo is that it recycles its own jokes in the final
half hour, and the result is a picture that overstays its welcome. 
Parker starts off with a lot of original ideas, but keeps giving them to
us as if they're new.  So, by the time Joe and Choda Boy are
infiltrating Orbison's fortress, the story is no longer funny and
strikes us mostly as really silly.  Even so, I enjoyed Orgazmo -- Parker
has proven to me that he has an innovative mind when it comes to
comedy.  Any film so cheerfully bad should be admired on some level, but
the humor in Orgazmo surpasses its own badness.

Title
Review for Kundun (1997)
Director: Martin Scorsese
Cast: Tenzin Thuthob Tsarong, Gyurme Tethong, Tulku Jamyang Kunga
Tenzin, Tenzin Yeshi Paichang, Tencho Gyalpa, Tsewang Migyur Khangsar,
Geshi Yeshi Gyatso
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    Martin Scorsese's Kundun is a visual wonder, striking in every
detail and accentuated by Philip Glass' masterful score. Scorsese tells
the story of the 14th Dalai Lama, beginning in 1939 when the young child
is just two years old. As the film progresses, we see him at ages 5, 10,
and then 16 and beyond; through most of the film, he is portrayed by
Tenzin Thuthob Tsarong. The conflicts later in the film involve the
Chinese government's attempts to get Tibet to be part of China, and the
Dalai Lama is finally forced to leave his people for India.
    A few months ago I was subjected to a film of almost the exact same
subject matter, Seven Years in Tibet. While that film was entertaining
but not very insightful, Kundun lacks substantial entertainment value,
and is only marginally more interesting as a biography of the Dalai
Lama. Entertainment value might seem like a trivial complaint in this
case, but regardless of content, a filmmaker's first goal should be to
capture its audience, and Scorsese has a hard time doing that for me in
Kundun.
    It's not that he flat-out failed, it's just that this subject does
not lend itself to easy audience involvement. The whole time I watched
Kundun, I felt utterly separated from what was happening on screen. The
Tibetans, as portrayed in this film, seem like docile, peace-oriented
separatists. I feel like the real Tibetans wouldn't want me watching
them. They are so set in their ways, so unwilling of change, that the
thought of an audience watching them to interpret their actions seems
ludicrous to me. I felt like they needed no vindication, no audience, no
telling of their story. So, I viewed Kundun almost entirely as a story
that is out of its league as a large-scale American film. Textbooks,
even novels, are more appropriate for this subject.
    I was, however, at least moderately concerned for the Dalai Lama.
Tsarong (with whom I am not familiar) does a pretty good job in the
role, though he lacks conviction and doesn't always seem natural. It
doesn't help that all the characters speak English. Just for realism's
sake, I would have preferred subtitles throughout the film--this might
have proved to distance the audience even further, but in this case I
would have gladly substituted authenticity for personalism.
    I wouldn't say Kundun is boring; in its best moments, it is truly
astonishing in visual power. The landscapes are all filmed in such a way
that orange and brown dirt looks colorful and enticing; there are some
unusual-yet-mesmerizing scenes later in the film that show close-ups of
sand paintings going through creation and destruction. As stated
earlier, Philip Glass' musical score is one of the better scores of
1997, mixing pleasant melodies with sharp, deep tonal shifts.
Atmosphere-wise, the film is virtually flawless.
    But this can't make up for the emotional limbo that Kundun provides
for its audience. I'm not exactly sure what could have cured this--more
insight into the Dalai Lama himself, possibly letting us into his head a
bit more rather than just showing us long shots of his unemotional face.
This being the second film in such a short period of time that has
failed to truly interest me in the Dalai Lama and the Tibetans, it makes
me wonder if we're really supposed to fully understand them. Their
religion and way of life seems off-limits to me, to such an extent that
I almost feel it's inappropriate to watch this film and develop and
opinion about them. But if that's not what I'm supposed to do, then what
is the point?

Title
Review for Bug's Life, A (1998)
Director:  John Lasseter, Andrew Stanton
Cast:  Dave Foley, Kevin Spacey, Julia Louis-Dreyfuss, David Hyde
Pierce, Madeline Kahn, Denis Leary
Screenplay:  Andrew Stanton, Donald McEnery, Bob Shaw
Producers: Darla K. Anderson, Kevin Reher
Runtime:   95 min.
US Distribution:  Disney/Buena Vista
Rated G
Once again, the battle is DreamWorks versus Disney:  earlier this year,
the mammoth companies fought to the death with their end-of-the-world
asteroid flicks, Deep Impact and Armageddon.  Here we are now, just a
few months later, and they're at it again with dueling bug movies, Antz
and A Bug's Life.  What I find so astonishing is that both pairs of
movies are so inherently similar in both story and execution.  I mean,
come on -- what were the chances of two studios both deciding to bring
out computer-animated films about bugs?   
As was the case with the meteor movies, Disney has come out on top: 
though Antz is a likable movie, A Bug's Life is far superior.  In fact,
this movie made me realize what was wrong with Antz:  I became immersed
in the world of A Bug's Life, while Antz just made me scrutinize
everything.  But it's not really fair to base an entire review on a
comparison.  A Bug's Life is a remarkable film in its own right, and
deserves to be seen apart from any other computer-animated film about
bugs.  In fact, it's one of the best films this year:  it's smart,
subtle, and funny, but it's also perfect family entertainment and
relentlessly entertaining.  I haven't had such a good time at the movies
in months.
It tells the story of an ant named Flick (voice by Dave Foley); he's a
nice guy, but he's also a troublemaker.  The ants spend all season
putting together the Offering, a big pile of food that they provide for
the grasshoppers.  Just before the grasshoppers come, Flick accidentally
knocks over the Offering, and ruins everything for the entire colony: 
the grasshopper's leader, Hopper (Kevin Spacey), is enraged, and tells
them that the ants need twice the food by the end of summer, or they're
all dead.  
Flick, feeling responsible for this, sets off to look for help -- he
realizes that the only way to be rid of the grasshoppers is to fight
them.  He heads to the city (the city being a house a few miles away),
where he finds a colorful bunch of circus bugs:  a ladybug (Denis Leary,
who is spectacular), a black widow (Bonnie Hunt), a caterpillar (Joe
Ranft), a butterfly (Madeline Kahn), a rhinoceros beetle (Michael
McShane), and a stick (David Hyde-Pierce, also giving a hilarious
performance).   Flick doesn't know they're actors, and they don't know
that Flick needs them to kill a bunch of grasshoppers, so they return to
the colony with Flick and find themselves in an unusual position.
The most obvious element of A Bug's Life is the quality of animation. 
Created by Pixar, the same people who brought us Toy Story, A Bug's Life
has some of the most amazing visuals I've ever seen.  The bugs seem to
inhabit a three-dimensional space, and occasionally there will be a shot
that is indistinguishable from live action.  This is a lush, colorful
world, full of life and imagination:  the way the animators insert the
things all of us see in our daily lives (matches, bottlecaps, tin cans,
etc.) and make them active objects in the bugs' world is innovative. 
The film is also mercilessly exciting, particularly in a superbly-staged
scene involving our heroes' escape from a bird (a little bird never
seemed so huge and threatening).  
But the makers of A Bug's Life know where the importance lies:  story
and characters.  Flick, with solid voice work from Foley, is a great guy
to lead the story.  But the real treat comes with the circus bugs;
they're such a likable group of characters -- the standouts are the
stick (Hyde-Pierce is so good), Francis the ladybug, and the big fat
caterpillar.  All of these bugs have more than a token personality,
which makes the suspenseful scenes work because we care about the bugs,
and it also keeps the tear-jerking scenes from seeming obligatory.  
In my review of Antz, I said that the film is a clever cop-out because
it presents a bunch of little humans reacting to an ant-like existence. 
In concept, A Bug's Life is basically the same movie, except that I was
never given enough time to find things that I didn't like about it. 
With such strong work in both animation and script, A Bug's Life is
nothing but a joy to sit through.  It really is too bad that it had to
come out so close to that other bug movie, but A Bug's Life is so good
that I'm sure it will find its audience.  After a slew of endlessly
violent and cynical movies, it's downright refreshing to sit through an
innocent picture like this and laugh without feeling guilty.  

Title
Review for Amistad (1997)
Director: Steven Spielberg
Cast: Morgan Freeman, Anthony Hopkins, Matthew McConaughey, Djimon
Hounsou, Nigel Hawthorne, David Paymer, Pete Posthelwaite, Stellan
Skarsgard, Anna Paquin
Rated R: Violence and brutality
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    Spielberg's Amistad begins with a spellbinding scene. On board the
Spanish slave ship Amistad, an African slave named Cinque (Djimon
Hounsou) escapes and frees all of his brothers, leading a violent mutiny
against the overseers on the ship. The opening shot is dark, and it
takes a few seconds to understand what we're looking at--the shot
changes from a close-up of a pair of straining eyes down to raw, bloody
fingers removing a nail from a piece of wood. The man pulls the nail out
after what we expect was an extremely long time, and looks at it in
wonder for only a second before standing to help his fellow captives.
The ensuing moments are violent and horrifying, as Cinque and the
others, enraged, murder the ship's crew.
    The slaves keep two of the seamen alive to navigate the ship; these
two men take the ship to America (the slaves thought they were going
home to Africa) and the entire group of slaves is arrested for murder.
Much of the film involves the trial, in which a young activist lawyer
(Matthew McConaughey) defends the group. Later in the film, he enlists
the help of John Quincy Adams (Anthony Hopkins).
    Amistad is the latest Important film this fall. The hype on this one
is intense, mostly because audiences are expecting a film with similar
impact of Schindler's List. Amistad, arguably in the same technical
realm as Schindler's List, never reaches the emotional level of the
latter. Of course, to base my criticism on a comparison between the two
is unfair: it is unlikely Spielberg intended to make something that
would be as powerful as Schindler's List. Amistad's subject matter is
one to which most individuals in this time period have very little
exposure, and is immediately limited because of this. Spielberg,
however, has done a spectacular job of recreating the values of the time
period and educating viewers as to what went on in the mid 1800s. His
work is so successful in this respect that I was truly moved by the end
of this film.
    As a whole, however, the film's progression and the script don't
quite live up to Spielberg's potential. My biggest problem is with the
length. Many of the scenes went for far too long; towards the end of the
film, Hopkins gives a speech to the US Supreme Court. The speech lasts
roughly 15 minutes, but it seems to go on forever. Hopkins' delivery is
nice, and the speech is well-written, but it meanders, and despite its
meaning, I was tempted to tune it out. Many of the scenes have this
quality, where the development isn't always apparent and the point of
each scene isn't totally obvious.
Scenes between McConaughey and Hounsou, which should be magical and
energetic, often come across as dull and obligatory. The performances
are all very good, but the characters don't feel like they're
interacting with one another--it seems like they're always talking to
the audience, almost knowing of the fact that they're in a film meant to
teach us something.
    Morgan Freeman, who is top-billed for some strange reason, is mostly
wasted in this role as anti-slavery activist Theodore Joadson. He has
almost no lines, and is given basically no time to create a character.
The prize of this film is newcomer Hounsou, who is charismatic and
powerful as the leader of the slaves. McConaughey is also good (and I
found it ironic that he actually toned down his Southern accent for this
role), and Hopkins gives an authentic portrayal of Adams (and he
maintains a better accent than he did in Nixon). Pete Posthelwaite,
another British actor covering up his accent, delivers a cold and
balanced performance as the prosecuting lawyer Holabird.
    Although Amistad has some significant problems with pacing and
character interaction, the mood is perfect. The experience wasn't always
engaging, but the parts that worked really worked. The best scene in the
film is a flashback to a horrible moment during which a group of slaves
are tied to a bundle of rocks and thrown off the ship because there
wasn't enough food. Spielberg doesn't pull any punches here; just as he
did in Schindler's List, he allows the material to speak for itself, and
the result is pure and painful to watch. Cinque's character, as well, is
an enticing individual, even though he doesn't speak a word of English.
His struggles are easily accessible to the audience, and understanding
him is almost too easy a task.
    I found great satisfaction from the last fifteen minutes of the
film; two of the scenes nearly brought me to tears. The way Spielberg
ends the film--almost as a hollow victory--seems so appropriate for the
subject of slavery. I went into Amistad not knowing much about what I
was going to see, and, despite its problems, I left the theater with
something new and tangible to think about.

Title
Review for Phantoms (1998)
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    When Jennifer and Lisa Pailey (Joanna Going and Rose McGowan) return
home to the quiet little town of Snowfield, Colorado, they find the maid
dead on the floor. This happens two minutes into the film. Scared, the
two women trek around town, finding that the streets are empty and the
air silent. Later, they find severed heads, and by this time it is
crystal clear that there is a problem. Luckily, they meet up with
Sheriff Bryce Hammond (Ben Affleck) and two of his underlings (one of
whom is Liev Schreiber, doing his best to act all nervous and crazy and
stuff).
    While searching through a hotel because of strange music emanating
through the building, they find a message written with lipstick on a
mirror (in a locked room with no windows, one of the characters notes).
The message refers to a certain Dr. Timothy Flyte. With no idea as to
what on earth is going on, Hammond calls for help, mentioning the
lipstick message in his call. The help shows up with Dr. Flyte (played
by Peter O'Toole) to solve the problem.
    See, it turns out that there is a big worm that looks like
solidified oil; conveniently, it thinks it's Satan. This is a Learning
Worm, so it is very smart. I'll leave the rest of the shocking plot
developments for you to discover for yourselves.
    Although I describe with utmost sarcasm the way Phantoms moves
along, I must admit that these silly little plot details are just about
the best thing about the film (aside from the cast). I think smart oil
is a unique idea for a bad guy, especially in a horror film.
Regrettably, the film is bad. It isn't scary, or suspenseful, or even
particularly well-crafted. The characters are stale and cardboard-like.
Like most of the films that enter this genre, this one has nothing new
to offer.
    The film begins on the wrong foot, jumping too quickly into action.
The two sisters, for example, are given one scene of dialogue before
they're confronted with the problem. I guess it's possible to be
concerned based solely on the fact that they are the good guys, but in a
perfect world I would like to have gotten to know them better before
seeing terrified looks on their faces. The same goes for Hammond,
although we at least learn a juicy bit of his history. The
actors--McGowan, Going, and Affleck--all do what they can with the lack
of depth, but they are defeated nonetheless.
    And it doesn't help that the characters are stupid. Towards the
beginning, they discover the body of a police officer, who has clearly
drawn his gun and fired off three rounds. Regardless of this fact, the
characters still consider the possibility that they are dealing with a
virus. Only O'Toole can project some kind of intelligence, although it
should come as no surprise that he is wasted in this role.
    Phantoms was directed by Joe Chappelle, who doesn't give off the
feeling that he wants to be making this film. Every moment is so
standard that I doubt any particular sequence will leave you feeling
like you've seen something all new and different. This is an alarming
thing to consider, especially when I realize that this is a horror film,
intended to scare and shock me. We've all seen films in which the evil
force can look human and fool our heroes. Here's yet another film that
uses this approach, and nothing new is done with the premise.
    If you just have to go out an see a horror film, then I suppose this
one isn't any worse than the other slop that's playing right now. I
suppose it's moderately fun on a really campy level, especially when we
get to see the big oil creature. When I watch a film like this, I just
have to wonder if it's really getting so hard to scare people. There
isn't a moment in this film that startled the audience with whom I saw
it. It simply fails in its prime directive.

Title
Review for Patch Adams (1998)
Director: Tom Shadyac
Cast: Robin Williams, Monica Potters, Philip Seymour Hoffman, Bob
Gunton, Daniel London, Peter Coyote
Screenplay: Steve Oedekerk
Producers: Mike Farrell, Barry Kemp, Marvin Minoff, Charles Newirth
Runtime: 115 min.
US Distribution: Universal
Rated PG-13: strong language, crude humor
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
There is a scene in Patch Adams in which Patch is in the center of a
courtroom, surrounded by people who are giving him a lively standing
ovation because of his strong-worded attack on a group of stoic doctors.
When I noticed that the audience with whom I saw this film was
reacting the same way, I realized that I was going to have a hard time
finding someone who agrees with me about the quality of the picture.
You see, Patch Adams revolted me beyond all boundaries. I hated this
movie for every second that I sat watching it, and I actively hate it
now, days later, with the simpering, superficial, nauseatingly
sentimental images forever plaguing my memories. I hate every element
of the film, beginning with Tom Shadyac's shameless direction, and all
the way up to the misguided and mishandled themes that the screenplay
wants so desperately to convey. The badness of Patch Adams is
stupefying. It's confounding. I can't believe a film can be this bad.
And yet, it's based on a real man who probably has a good point to
make.  In the film, Patch is played by the undefeatable and
indefatigable Robin Williams, in a performance of such insulting pathos
and sledgehammer sympathy that I wonder now if he is even human.  In the
beginning of the film, Patch commits himself to a mental institution
because he doesn't want to kill himself.  While there, he notices that
the doctors don't care about the patients, and that the best way to get
through to the patients is to treat them like human beings.
So, Patch goes on a crusade to be a great doctor who actually talks to
his patients.  He goes to medical school, where he meets Truman (Daniel
London) and convinces him that it's good to help people.  He also meets
Carin Fischer (Monica Potters), the anti-male med student who just wants
to go through the motions and be a successful doctor.  Naturally, the
dean of the medical school (Bob Gunton) hates Patch, and wants to thwart
his plans, even though Patch gets the highest scores on all of his
exams.  So Patch decides that he's going to build a free clinic in the
middle of nowhere to help people with any problem they may have.
And that, my friends, is the synopsis for what is easily the most
abhorrent picture of 1998.  On a superficial level, the film is not
particularly bad:  I wouldn't say the cinematography bothered me, and
most of the performances seem to be exactly what Shadyac was aiming for
(I actually liked Potter's performance, even if she is wasted).  But the
film fails fundamentally in execution.  Every scene swells with grand,
"emotional" music, played at maximum volume just to get us all to cry
real hard.  Take, for instance, the first scene, which shows Patch
sitting on a bus.  We don't know Patch yet, but there's sad music, and
it's supposed to make us really sad that he's sad.  Later on, Patch
makes a lot of progress:  he helps a dying patient (Peter Coyote) to
enjoy the last days of his life, and the music as Patch is pushing the
patient recklessly through the halls of the hospital is very lively. 
And when that patient finally dies (spoiler alert!), the music is very
very sad.
But the problem with all of this is that the music should not be the
center of the emotions.  Real drama is character-based.  You grow to
like someone, and then something bad happens, and you feel it.  We don't
ever grow to know the dying patient; he's simply a vehicle for Patch's
greatness.  Real drama doesn't seem forced, or present just to make the
audience cry.  That's why Patch Adams is not real drama.  It goes for
every cheap tear imaginable, wringing tired and overbearing
sentimentality out of every scene.  Even scenes that have very little
impact on the overall film are drowning in Marc Shaiman's sickening
musical score.
Sentimentality like this is indeed bad.  But it's not as bad as
half-baked, simplistic themes.  You see, Patch is a really great
student.  He aces his tests without studying, and does it so effectively
that people think he's cheating.  But Patch doesn't think that
memorizing facts is the way to become a good doctor.  "Why don't we see
patients until the third year?" he bursts out every three seconds. 
Well, Patch, that might have something to do with the fact that you need
to LEARN SOMETHING before you go treating patients.  Not everyone has
the capability of memorizing facts with no effort.  Most of us have to
study.  And a doctor who really wants to help, but doesn't know a toe
from a finger, probably won't be too successful in preventing death.
Oh wait, I almost forgot:  the point of doctors is not just to "prevent
death," but to "improve the quality of life!"  Yes!  That is true!  And
you can not do that without studying.  You can not do that without going
to medical school.  What Patch never seemed to understand was the
possibility that maybe, just maybe, it is a good idea to study first and
talk to patients later.  Follow the rules?  Bah!  Who needs the rules! 
Only uptight doctors follow the rules.  The real saviors are the ones
running around the hospitals with big red spheres on their faces and
sporting baggy yellow pants.  
And then there's the free clinic issue, which I find shockingly,
frighteningly idealistic.  A free clinic.  In the middle of the forest. 
Where patients can be taken to be helped.  For free.  How will patients
be transported to the free clinic?  Will it have an emergency room?  Or
is it just for mental patients?  And who, may I ask, will pay for it? 
The film does give some token attempts to question Patch's motives (I
think another character asks him how he's going to pay for it, in
addition to a little bit of meaningless blather about HMOs and medical
insurance), but they certainly don't explore or challenge Patch's ideas
to any meaningful extent.
Reader, please understand this:  I am not making any kind of judgment
on the real Patch Adams.  I know nothing about him.  If his beliefs
mirror those of this film character, then I might like to have an
intelligent discussion with him about them.  But regardless of what the
real Patch Adams believes, the themes put forth in this film are
simplistic and phony.  And in the last scene, the big, obligatory
courtroom scene that forced my lunch halfway up my esophagus, Patch does
a lot of shouting.  Actually, Robin Williams does a lot of shouting.  He
shouts a lot about helping people, and a lot of people cry because they
are moved by his words.  I won't tell you that you can't be moved by his
words, because I, too, was moved by his words.  I was moved in such a
profoundly negative way that I was reminded of how cheap and phony a
cinematic experience can be.  Patch Adams is the cheapest of them all.

Title
Review for Spanish Prisoner, The (1997)
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
David Mamet's The Spanish Prisoner is about a bunch of people who are
so smart and witty that it seems they are infallible in both speech and
action.  The film appears to take place in an alternate reality, in
which the people described above are strictly governed by laws that keep
them from going outside of Mamet's jigsaw plotting.  It's not what I'd
call a realistic film (the circumstances behind the events that unfold
are about as unlikely as, say, the secrets revealed in Fincher's The
Game), though I suppose it's not any less-realistic than any film of
this genre.  But Mamet's plot is so twisted, convoluted, and complex
that just about the only thing I could do during and after was
scrutinize it.
I don't mind too much.  You see, I respect any film that brandishes
intelligence as if it knows it's the only smart film out there.  Mamet
has created a situation that, I believe, could not happen outside a
movie set, but the story is so ingenious and compelling that I can't
help but admire it.  The film is also entertaining, which helps a lot,
and the acting is unique in that the actors clearly understand that they
are playing people who can not and never will exist in the real world.  
The main character is Joe Ross, played valiantly by the ever-solid
Campbell Scott.  The film begins with Joe on vacation in the Caribbean;
he's there for a business meeting, along with his friend and co-worker,
George Lang (Ricky Jay), and boss, Klein (Ben Gazzara).  He also meets
Susan Ricci (Rebecca Pidgeon), who turns out to be an underling in his
company; and Jimmy Dell (Steven Martin), who seems to be just a rich guy
spending time in the Caribbean.
I've given you the setup, but I don't know how to summarize the rest of
the plot without giving away things that you shouldn't know.  I went
into the film with no prior knowledge of it, except from what I got out
of the preview (which is very little -- some marketing execs should take
a look at the the trailer for this film and examine how it works), and I
found that the film was far different from what I expected.  The twists
are big an unpredictable, and placed in parts when you probably won't
expect a twist to occur.
A film like this basically comes down to a couple things -- acting and
plot.  As I said, Mamet's story is compelling and ingeniously
conceived.  Writers for big-budget Hollywood mysteries should take
lessons from this film, for this is the way to create a complex story
that seems at first glance to be so much more simple than it is, and
then fully explain every turn and make it as believable as possible. 
(The problem with writing a review of a film like this is that I have to
be vague and ambiguous while explaining these qualities, but I'm sure
you understand.)
The acting is interesting, so much that I often just wanted to see what
strange things the characters might do.  This is the kind of film where
every character speaks in riddles, enunciates each word perfectly, and
then predicts what the other characters are going to say.  The most
fascinating character is Susan, played by Pidgeon (an actress with whom
I'm not familiar).  She's an enticing woman, and has striking facial
features.  Her dialogue is the sharpest in the film, and her demeanor is
unlike most female characters in most films.  Also very interesting is
Steve Martin (who, I should point out, does not go for one single joke
throughout the film); he plays his character much like Pidgeon plays
hers -- straight-faced and alarmingly calm.
The Spanish Prisoner is not really a film to be taken seriously.  I
doubt that Mamet had any deeper intentions than what are obvious here;
it seems clear that he simply wanted to dazzle audiences with a plot so
complex and (ahem) contrived that they walk out of the theaters smiling
with disbelief.  As I said, not even for a glimpse of a second is this a
realistic picture.  But it succeeds so entirely in being an
unpredictable and compelling puzzle of a film that I can't imagine not
liking it just for this reason.

Title
Review for Ma vie en rose (1997)
Director:  Alain Berliner
Cast:  Michele Laroque, Jean-Philippe Ecoffey, Helene Vincent, Georges
Du Fresne, Daniel Hanssens, Laurence Bibot
Screenplay:  Alain Berliner, Chris van der Stappen
Producers:  Carole Scotta
Runtime:  88 min
US Distribution:  Sony Pictures Classics
Rated R:  brief strong language
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
Ma vie en rose (My Life in Pink) is a quaint, direct film that tells
the story of a nine year-old boy named Ludo (Georges Du Fresne) who
finds pleasure dressing up like a girl.  His parents, Pierre
(Jean-Philippe Ecoffey) and Hanna (Michele Laroque), discover this one
uncomfortable day when he emerges during a party dressed in his sister's
pink dress.  At first, they think it's just a phase.  But Ludo keeps
talking about it, and soon they have him seeing a child psychiatrist.  
Ludo, in his young age, doesn't understand the implications of the
things he does and says.  A neighborhood friend of his is also the son
of Pierre's boss; when Ludo tells his friend that he wants to marry him
someday, the neighborhood finds out and goes into social upheaval,
immediately assuming that Ludo's parents have raised him in some foul
manner.  The final straw occurs when Ludo--unbeknownst to
everyone--takes the part of Sleeping Beauty in the school play so he can
be kissed by Prince Charming.
Ma vie en rose was written and directed by Belgian filmmaker Alain
Berliner.  He has created a good film here:  it is successful because it
shows clearly the perspectives of both the children and the parents in
the story.  Berliner presents the material in such a way that it is
completely inoffensive from the beginning--even those who agree with the
ethics challenged in this film are not likely to be offended.  It's
positive, actually, that the subject matter is not off-putting, because
it makes the film more accessible, and allows us to focus on the
characters rather than a contrived plot (which, unfortunately, is what
most American films dealing with cross dressing offer).
A film like this relies heavily on the acting, and the central
performance from the young Georges Du Fresne is an excellent one; Ludo,
at the same time, is a fascinating character.  He knows so certainly
what is natural to him, what he wants, and yet, he's still willing to
try and be "manly" for the sake of his parents.  He attempts soccer, but
is ultimately beat up by the other boys on the team.  Ludo, at times
like these, fantasizes about living in a dream world with the his
favorite toys, flying through the blue sky over the pink houses he would
love to live in.
The acting by Ecoffey and Laroque is incredibly good, as are the
dialogue and interactions from Berliner's screenplay.  The fights and
arguments they have over Ludo's problem, and they way they go about
dealing with the situation, is intense and realistic; at the same time,
the characters are given full development.  Berliner's direction is
straightforward--there isn't a lot of intricate camera work, and much of
it appears to have been shot with a handheld to give many of the scenes
a visceral quality unusual to films of this kind.
Ma vie en rose is, perhaps, a little to light.  There are funny moments
here, and there should be; often, though, Berliner seems to avoid a
certain amount heaviness that might have been appropriate for such a
sobering subject matter.  But I can also see how this avoidance might
have a definite point--the film is not really about cross dressing, or
even what becomes of Ludo in the long run.  This is a film about
accepting diversity, and realizing the innate and different qualities
that some people have.  I hold that Berliner didn't quite tap into this
story's full potential, but the final product is still a film that
presents its themes in a way that even skeptics might embrace.

Title
Review for Titanic (1997)
Director: James Cameron
Cast: Leonardo DiCaprio, Kate Winslet, Billy Zane, Bill Paxton, Kathy
Bates
Rated PG-13: Language, disaster violence, nudity
I've been watching films for roughly half of my natural life. I would
like to think that I have seen a lot of them--more than most people.
Until this day, however, I have never seen anything like Titanic. This
film makes me want to invent new words just to describe it, because most
of what I've witnessed here is truly unfathomable. It is impossible to
speak of Titanic and not gush with excitement, but my words are not
hyperbolized--James Cameron's masterpiece is the very best film of 1997.
This picture is the closest I have ever seen to perfection, a love story
filled with real human emotions, and a disaster epic more real,
shocking, and intense than anything ever shown in film. I'm sure someone
at some point has made a checklist of everything that goes into a great
film. Every box would be checked for Titanic. This film fails in
absolutely nothing: the love story is one of the most moving I have ever
experienced. The disaster is flawlessly depicted on screen. The
integration of the two is not only smooth, but ultimately the central
meaning of the film.
And yet, at the core, the story is so brilliantly simple and direct:
Jack Dawson (Leonardo DiCaprio) is a drifter who wins a ticket for the
Titanic. On board, he meets Rose (Kate Winslet) who is engaged to a rich
man named Cal Hockley (Billy Zane). Rose is unhappy, both with her
engagement and with her new-found social climate. She and Jack fall in
love, and then the Titanic hits the iceberg. This story is actually in
the middle of another story, in which deep sea explorer Brock Lovett
(Bill Paxton) in modern times is searching the wreckage, looking for a
lost diamond. He finds a picture of a woman instead, and this woman
turns out to be Rose, who is now one-hundred one years old. She tells
the story of her experiences on the Titanic to Brock and his crew.
Titanic is what I'd call a religious experience. I didn't pull my eyes
away from the screen. I was mesmerized. Cameron spent years making this
film, and well over 200 million dollars, and every bit of his effort is
right there for audiences to feel and experience with wonder and
amazement. The list of positives could be endless.
At the top of this list is Kate Winslet. Now, most people would agree
that liking an actor or actress will enhance the viewing of the film in
which he or she stars. Kate Winslet is the most talented young actress
working in the business today. Her ability to convey emotion, especially
in this film, is unmatched by any other actress of her generation.
Watching her on screen, I feel the kind of strength and presence that I
see in powerful women like Sigourney Weaver and Linda Hamilton, but
Winslet has even more than these women do--a gleam in her eye, an edge
in her voice. There is something almost inexplicable about her presence
that makes her so supremely wonderful in any film that no film graced
with her performance could ever be bad. Titanic, which would have been
great without her, manages to exceed greatness because of her. And
though I hesitate to say it, I must admit that she is--without a
doubt--the most attractive woman I have ever seen. This obviously
doesn't hurt.
Even though the other actors pale in comparison to Winslet, they all
turn in superb, memorable performances. DiCaprio, as always, is great as
Jack. This is a more grown-up role than I'm used to seeing him in, and
so I was impressed with his progressive talents. He makes this strong
character believable and likable. One speech he gives while in the
presence of a group of rich individuals at a dinner is particularly
convincing, and he carries this kind of aura throughout the film without
fumbling it. I actually believed that Jack's strength is what gives Rose
such a powerful drive to live.
Billy Zane plays the evil, sneering Cal with that kind of evil, sneering
attitude that only Billy Zane can portray. Not unlike his portrayal of
the hopelessly psychotic antagonist in Dead Calm, Zane can be
particularly evil while still managing to convince us that there is
something human buried inside of him. He does everything for his own
good, but the reasons for this are evident from watching the film, and
he isn't a one-note bad guy intended simply to instigate an insurrection
from Rose. He is an unusually genuine antagonist, one that, although he
is bad, the audience can understand.
Cameron's script is astounding. Here we have a love story in which the
man teaches the woman how to live, but their situation is inherently
ironic given their placement on the doomed ocean liner. Without giving
away too much, I must mention the profound and brilliant metaphor that
Cameron has created here--the Titanic is the love between these two
people. The scale is so grand that the love story does not subside when
compared to the sinking of the ship; in fact, it actually outshines the
disaster in many ways. What I'm left with are, of course, the images of
the ship sinking, but what has left a more significant impact on me are
the implications given here by the two main components of this film and
the way they work with one another.
I imagine most of the box-office draw to this film will be from the
obvious fact that it's about a sinking ship. Although I hope most people
will get out of it what I have, there is no way disaster and action film
fans will be disappointed by Cameron's spectacle. He recreated the
disaster down to the last detail. A more convincing film could not have
been made had the sinking ship been filmed this year by a professional
camera crew. The line between models and digital is not noticeable, and
the shots of the vast ship travelling in the lonesome ocean are
breathtaking--the best special effects one could hope to see. When the
ship is sinking, there isn't a moment that doesn't scream pure realism.
Even the physics behind the water rushing down the corridors appears
real. Aside from all of this, Cameron has mastered the nearly-impossible
task of making the incident real-time in its execution. The ship sunk in
about an hour, and that's how long it takes on screen.
Cameron's heart and soul went into this film. I can see from the outcome
that it is exactly what he wanted--every shot, every word of dialogue,
ever nuance between the characters is intentional and meaningful. Films
as completely spectacular as Titanic come about once every few years,
but I doubt any of them had or will have the kind of hype that surrounds
this one. Titanic doesn't just live up to its hype: this film exceeds
everything I could have imagined it to be, and the result is something
that you must see for yourself to believe. And when the film is over, it
may take you a little while to return to reality, but you're just going
to want to get right back on that ship again, even though you know what
happens. But then again, that's the trick, isn't it?

Title
Review for Doctor Dolittle (1998)
Director:  Betty Thomas
Cast:  Eddie Murphy, Ossie Davis, Oliver Platt, Richard Schiff, Kristen
Wilson, Jeffrey Tambor, Kyla Pratt
Screenplay:  Nat Mauldin, Larry Levin
Producers:  John Davis, David T. Friendly, Joseph Singer
Runtime:  85 min.
US Distribution:  20th Century Fox
Rated PG-13:  crude humor, language
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        I almost began this review writing something like, "Pigeons defecating
on Oliver Platt's face is not a funny sight," but then I remembered that
there were, in fact, people in the theater laughing as this statement
becomes reality in the final moments of Doctor Dolittle.  I don't want
to sound condescending, because there are clearly people in the world
who will find this to be a good family film (Roger Ebert, for instance,
actually *liked* it).  I felt kind of the same way I did as I watched
Flubber, which is unbearable in many of the same ways.
        Doctor Dolittle is not a funny film.  It has entertaining moments, and
I might have chuckled once or twice, but mostly I was just bored.  It's
under 90 minutes, which I found to be a blessing, even though it feels a
little longer than Lawrence of Arabia (but without the excitement). 
It's a one-joke movie (talking animals!), in which the joke gets old
almost as it's told --  it's not cute, or fun, and it substitutes trite
sentimentality for Deep Themes and Messages.  The only thing I felt as I
walked out of the theater was the urge to vomit, and I'm not
exaggerating.
        Eddie Murphy, seemingly unmoved by the fact that his roles no longer
require his comic talents as an actor, plays John Dolittle.  It's
established that he could talk to animals as a child, but a nasty
preacher scared the talent out of him.  Now, as the preview shouts, "the
doctor is in!" (I don't know what that has to do with anything, but I
though it would make a nice quote).  His talent is back, and he finds
that animals are going to him with their problems.
        Some animals are easy to repair, like the owl with a stick in its
wing.  Then there are the harder ones, like the suicidal tiger (voice by
Albert Brooks).  It might be totally useless to bother with the
logistical errors of the film, but, frankly, they irritated me.  Now,
when was the last time you saw a tiger attempt suicide?  And by jumping
off a building?  Don't bother answering that, for I doubt many people
have.  The animals in this film don't act like animals -- they act like
people trapped in the bodies of animals.
        So, no one believes poor Dolittle, and he gets put in a mental
institution, because he's a danger to himself and to everyone around
him.  What I didn't understand is why Dolittle was also the only person
who could see the animal's lips moving.  I'll buy the fact that he's the
only one who can hear their voices, but their lips are clearly moving. 
Why can't anyone else see that?  The film is so poorly conceived that
even a minor problem like this is simply ignored, as if no one will
care.  I really hope someone else does.
        Now, like all stupid wannabe family films, I'll say that I would have
looked past all these problems had the film something to offer.  Paulie,
which was another talking animal thingy, was a nice film, with a little
wit and a lot more entertainment value (and I buy a talking parrot more
than anything presented in Doctor Dolittle).  This film, directed by
Betty Thomas, is boring.  The animals may have a few good lines, and
some of the special effects are easy on the eyes.  But, most obvious is
the lack of energy out of Murphy, and the general lack of intelligence
in the film.
        And, of course, it resorts to defecation for laughs.  Feces is never
funny, and especially when it's splashed on the face of an actor as
talented as Oliver Platt (who is shamelessly wasted here).  Why do
"family" films have to fall back on this kind of material?  Had the
talking animals bit been done more competently, then feces and
flatulence would not have been necessary.  Kids were laughing at the
things I thought were amusing here, so I'm going to hold with the belief
that feces is not necessary to entertain children.  You can call me
old-fashioned for thinking that kids deserve more than this.

Title
Review for Gods and Monsters (1998)
Director: Bill Condon
Cast: Ian McKellen, Brendan Fraser, Lynn Redgrave, Lolita Davidovich,
Kevin J. O'Connor
Screenplay: Bill Condon
Producers: Paul Colichman, Gregg Fienberg, Mark R. Harris
Runtime: 105 min.
US Distribution: Lions Gate Films
Rated R: homosexual themes, nudity, profanity
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
When Gods and Monsters ended, I was confused.  I wasn't confused by the
film, but by the fact that I was unmoved by a story that should be
moving, and by a performance that rates among the best of the year.  The
performance to which I refer comes courtesy of Ian McKellen, who plays
James Whale, the director famous for such films as Frankenstein, Bride
of Frankenstein, and Show Boat.  Apparently, he's also famous for being
a homosexual.  Written and directed by Bill Condon, Gods and Monsters is
a film with immense potential.
Unfortunately, it's also a conglomerate of missed opportunities.  Much
of the film is played for laughs, but not enough of it is taken
seriously to the point where we can identify with any of the
characters.  The moments that are serious are so straight-faced that
they seem to stick out, colliding with the playful tone that wants to
overtake the film.  McKellen's performance is a revelation -- it makes
the entire movie worth watching.  But it's one of those movies that
makes you wonder what it would have been without the masterful central
performance.  
Condon doesn't provide a very strong narrative; this seems to be his
intention, but the result is going to be a plot synopsis that doesn't
sound like much:  the film centers around the very-homosexual Whale in
his later years, living in a nice home with his housekeeper (Lynn
Redgrave), spying on young, muscular men who come to work on his house.  
The man who catches his eye is the very-heterosexual Clay Boone
(Brendan Fraser), a young go-nowhere type who finds Whale interesting
but not sexually desirable.  Whale wants to paint Clay's portrait, and,
because he's curious, Clay agrees.  From that point, the two men begin
an interesting platonic relationship.  Along the way, we see numerous
flashbacks to Whale's memories of World War I and to his days making
movies in Hollywood.  
The first thing I found disarming about Gods and Monsters is Condon's
use of flashbacks.  I find flashbacks distracting in general, although
they are sometimes appropriate when used in a non-intrusive manner.  The
problem with the flashbacks here is that they come at the worst time --
in one scene, Whale is telling Clay about the war as he paints his
portrait; McKellen's acting here is wonderful and intense.  But, just
when I was getting drawn into the moment, a flashback jostled me out of
it.  Most of the memories that are explained by flashbacks would have
been more effective as dialogue.  I did, however, like the scenes that
show Whale's passion as a director -- I think that side of him is
necessary.
What makes the entire film worth everyone's effort is McKellen's
performance.  There's something about watching a seasoned, experienced
actor play in a role that has so many levels as this one.  Whale is an
interesting character -- one of the more interesting layers is the
contrast between his service in the military and his active
homosexuality during that time.  McKellen nails the role without being
too flamboyant; you can see how much fun he's having in just about every
scene.  Of course, there are a few heavy moments -- the conclusion has
little space for laughs, but McKellen never lets us down.  I was also
impressed with Brendan Fraser, who is vastly suitable for this role; he
has that dumbfounded look to accompany the crew cut and perfectly square
body.
The real problem with the film is that it just isn't very engaging. 
The flashbacks are one problem, but it also doesn't give us a whole lot
to latch on to.  The performances are more enlightening than Condon's
script, which is based on the novel Father of Frankenstein by
Christopher Bram.  The ending, too, is anticlimactic;  I can not say why
without giving it away, but I can say that I wasn't sure what the
characters were supposed to have learned from their experiences.  What
Gods and Monsters comes down to is this:  there may be potential in the
story of the homosexual director James Whale, but Bill Condon's version
of it doesn't seem to find much of it.  But thanks to Ian McKellen, it's
still worth seeing.  Funny how that works.

Title
Review for Psycho (1998)
Director:   Gus Van Sant
Cast:  Vince Vaughn, Julianne Moore, Viggo Mortensen, William H. Macy,
Philip Baker Hall, Anne Heche, Rita Wilson, Robert Forster
Screenplay:  Joseph Stefano 
Producers:  Brian Grazer
Runtime:   
US Distribution: Universal
Rated R:  violence, sexuality, nudity
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
You know the story.  Marion Crane (Anne Heche, in this case) takes
$400,000 from her boss, skips town, and heads into the desert.  There,
she comes across the old Bates Motel, owned and run by Mr. Norman Bates
(Vince Vaughn).  If this story doesn't sound familiar to you, or if you
don't know what happens to Marion Crane at the Bates Motel, I suggest
you go out and rent a film called Psycho.  It was directed by Alfred
Hitchcock, and came out in 1960.  
Or, if you don't like black and white, you could go to the theater and
see Gus Van Sant's Psycho.  When my screening of Van Sant's version
ended, just a few hours ago, I felt that the most appropriate review
would be to write the word "Why?" five-thousand times.  Since then, I've
managed to isolate my befuddlement into coherence.  Hitchcock's Psycho
isn't a perfect film, but it's a good one, and has some genuine scares
and a few interesting characters.  It's only been thirty-eight years
since it came out; it's really not that dated, and is still effective by
many of today's slasher standards.  So why remake it?
I was hoping to get my answer.  I was looking forward to Van Sant's
take on the classic horror tale, mostly to understand why he felt the
need to do it.  But I didn't get my answer.  Van Sant's film is
basically a colorized mirror image of the original.  The dialogue is the
same.  The characters are the same.  The sets and locations are all the
same.  Every single camera angle is exactly the same.  With the
exception of one scene of implied masturbation, and perhaps a little
more blood, Gus Van Sant's Psycho is an exact recreation of Hitchcock's
original film.
So why on God's green earth was there a reason to make this film
*again*?  Well, I read that Van Sant was "paying homage" to Hitchcock. 
I can see it from that perspective.  The new film doesn't reek of
plagiarism as much as it screams, "I'm such a devoted fan!"  Van Sant is
a wonderful director (Good Will Hunting, To Die For, and My Own Private
Idaho are all exceptional films in different ways), and so I took this
remake seriously.  Why would a great director feel the need to remake a
film of another great director?  In addition, the original Psycho had
the element of shock -- in this new version, that aspect is lost
entirely.  As I said, if you don't know what happens to Marion in the
shower, you need to see the original first.
Before you flip out, understand that I don't mean Van Sant should have
tried to improve on Hitchcock's direction.  No, that would have been
silly.  The fact that Van Sant didn't experiment with different
techniques is a good thing.  But this story should have been updated;
the characters don't speak like people from the 90s -- particularly
Norman Bates.  The private investigator (played by a wonderful William
H. Macy) is a fun character, but do private investigators still act like
that?  Something tells me they don't.  There aren't any blatant
anachronisms, but the script hasn't been changed at all.
If anything, seeing this new version reminded me of what was wrong with
the original.  After Marion Crane dies, the focus shifts to two
uninteresting characters -- Marion's boyfriend, Sam (Viggo Mortensen)
and sister, Lila (Julianne Moore).  As they're trying to figure out what
happened to Marion, we're left wondering why they don't just tackle
Norman Bates and search through that big old house on the hill.  Perhaps
when the original came out it was shocking to see the main character die
half way through.  Moore and Mortensen are both adequate for their
roles, but the script just doesn't have much for them to do.
The film isn't bad or unpleasant; Heche and Vaughn both hit their roles
dead-on, and any scene featuring one or both of them is inescapably
entertaining.  In addition, the scenes that everybody will be watching
for -- particularly the dreaded Shower Scene -- have been done with
class; Van Sant, in a wise move, didn't exploit the violence or go
over-the-top with gore.  It's only slightly more graphic than the
original (though the sound effects are a lot harsher in this one).
Just about the only improvement is on the sound quality of the music
(the music, by the way, is excellent).  But I know the point was not to
improve on the original, but "to bring it to a new generation."  I'm not
sure why the New Generation can't go out and rent the original, but it
seems they're going to be disappointed with Psycho anyway.  The New
Generation wants movies like I Still Know What You Did Last Summer;
Psycho -- new or old -- just isn't gory enough for them.  
As for me, I wanted a better reason to sit through a replica of the
original.  Van Sant is a great director, but the one thing about
Hitchcock's Psycho was that it was really shocking.  The only way this
new version could have been shocking would have been to change it.  And,
of course it shouldn't have been changed, and so we enter a vicious
circle that didn't need to be entered in the first place.

Title
Review for Sphere (1998)
Director:  Barry Levinson
Written by:  Stephen Hauser, Paul Attanasio
Producers:  Michael Crichton, Barry Levinson
Cast:  Dustin Hoffman, Sharon Stone, Samuel L. Jackson, Peter Coyote,
Queen Latifah, Liev Schreiber, Marga Gomez
Runtime:  135 min.
Production Company:  Warner Bros.
Rated PG-13:  Language, intense scenes, sci-fi violence
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        As I wrote in my review for the egregiously underrated Event Horizon, I
hate being alone when it comes to opinions on films.  And here I am
again, in the position of having loved a film that most people--critics
and audiences--are likely to despise across the board.  I read reviews
of Sphere before seeing it, and I was expecting a bad film.  I read them
again afterwards, and now I simply disagree with every word.  This film
apparently struck me differently than it did everyone else--when they
said "boring," I was saying "captivating."  When they said "rushed," I
said "intense."  In fact, there's nothing I didn't like about Sphere:  
to me, this is everything that a big-budget thriller should
be--suspenseful, interesting, atmospheric, well-acted, and well-written.
        I saw Sphere with four friends.  Each one of them had read the Crichton
book, and I, obviously, had not (and still haven't, and probably never
will...).  My less-discerning friends thought the film was a good
translation of the book, and enjoyed both equally.  My opinion-heavy
friends, who loved the book, hated the movie.   In fact, one of my
friends even went so far as to describe Sphere as a bigger
disappointment than Congo.  I had to draw the line there.  
        Sphere opens with the gathering of four professionals--psychologist
Norman Goodman (Dustin Hoffman), mathematician Harry Adams (Samuel L.
Jackson), astrophysicist Ted Fielding (Liev Schreiber), and biologist
Beth Halperin (Sharon Stone).  They are gathered as a contact group for
a suspected alien spacecraft found 1000 feet below the surface of the
ocean.  When they go down to check out the enormous craft, they find
(you guessed it) a big golden ball!  Actually, it's more precise than
that--it's a perfect sphere.  As the characters try to figure out what
the sphere is, they apparently get on-line with an alien being called
Jerry...and all hell breaks loose.   The majority of the film is spent
in chaos.
        Well, let me get on with why I was fooled by this apparently-horrible
film.   First, I'm talking suspense.  I can't remember the last film I
saw that was this suspenseful.  Looking at my fingers now, I see that I
mindlessly chewed them to a pulp as I was watching.  Director Barry
Levinson does such an extremely good job of building suspense throughout
the film that, by the end, I felt totally exhilarated.   Some of the
scenes, such as an attack by a giant squid summoned by Jerry, are
chaotic without being incoherent, and the result is an array of
staggeringly claustrophobic action sequences taking place inside the
small underwater habitat.  
        Another common critical point with which I fundamentally disagree is
the suggestion of the character-less characters.  Now, keep in mind that
I went into Sphere expecting to dislike it.  I was looking for reasons
to dislike it, but I couldn't find a one.  This includes the
characters--the five main characters (the fifth being the military man
Barnes, played by Peter Coyote), by action film standards, are all
extremely well-written.  And it doesn't hurt that the film has a
God-granted cast to play the parts.  Hoffman is excellent in the main
role:  he is convincing as a psychologist (well, Hoffman is convincing
as anything), and in the scenes in which he begins to lose his mind, he
acts just the way I would expect a psychotic psychologist to act.  
        Sharon Stone is wonderful here--her character is fascinatingly
paranoid, and her condition is only accentuated by the effects of living
in an underwater habitat.  The relationship between Norman and Beth,
too, is well-developed (though I understand that this aspect is not in
the book) and by the end of the film, I was truly concerned for the
characters and wanted them to live.  Jackson, as the mathematician, is
also sharp in his role, and in later scenes he manages to be truly
terrifying just by smiling.  The supporting performances, particularly
from Schreiber, are good as well.
        Since I haven't read the book, I have no idea what magical words it
contains to warrant such an enormously negative response from fans of
it.  All I know is that films never follow the books closely, and that's
because there is a lot of information that can't possibly be naturally
stated in the film without bogging down the audience.  Sphere is already
long--well over two hours.  I don't know what could have been possibly
left out, because the themes and plot turns in this film are fascinating
and engrossing, and at the end of the film I had no
questions--everything was clear.  As far as I'm concerned, screenwriters
Stephan Hauser and Paul Attanasio have done a great job writing the
film.
        So, here I am again, alone in my opinion.  Perhaps it's a mistake to
form a review as a paranoid decree of possible misunderstanding.  That,
in effect, is what I am doing--if I were so sure that there is nothing
wrong with Sphere, I probably would not have mentioned the Other
Critics.  Maybe I'm so self-conscious of it because I continually like
films that are generally lambasted by everyone else.
          
        This time, however, I'm standing my ground.  I'm not changing my rating
or my review no matter how many negative views I read or hear about. 
You see, I simply can not understand why everyone hates Sphere.  I loved
every bit of it--I didn't want it to end.  For me, it did everything
right.  And I'll probably see it over and over again, and with each
viewing it is likely that my curiostiy as to what, exactly, makes this
such a bad film will inflate exponentially.  

Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
As a viewer who is intensely devoted to the sci-fi/action genre of
film, it's difficult for me to separate myself from the genre to write a
review from a purely objective standpoint.  It's also hard when the film
is as astonishingly good as The Matrix.  The problem in this case is
that the film, which has been written and directed by the Wachowski
brothers (Bound), is a marvel in just about every way a film like this
can be.  Where do I begin?  Do I start by praising the truly amazing
visual image that the Wachowskis have brought to the screen?  Should I
first mention the story, which pays homage to numerous other stories
while still managing to create its own world?  Do I rave about the
characters and the dialogue?  
A frequent complaint about films like this is that they're all vacuous
eye candy.  The Matrix is pretty, but it's not vacuous:  in addition to
having made one of the most visually stunning pictures of all time (yes,
of all time), the Wachowskis have created a story that matches those
visuals in every way.  It's not a lopsided production like so many
action thrillers tend to be.  No, The Matrix is a thriller with a heart,
a science fiction epic with real people and conflicts at the center of
it.  True, it has the feel and posture of a comic book, but that's not a
bad thing:  The Matrix takes a familiar formula and builds upon it,
resulting in an exhilarating and invigorating cinematic experience. 
It's also the first movie I've ever watched that made me want to fasten
an imaginary seatbelt.
Another problem with writing this review is that I really can't say
anything specific about the film.  Part of the experience comes from
seeing it with your own eyes.  I can't accurately convey what I've seen
in words.  So I'll begin with the premise:  Keanu Reeves plays Tom
Anderson, a computer programmer by day, and a computer hacker by night
(his hacker alias is Neo, and he's mostly referred to as such).  Towards
the opening of the film, Neo is contacted by a strange woman named
Trinity (Carrie-Anne Moss).  Trinity piques Neo's interest by mentioning
the Matrix.  "What is the Matrix?" he asks.  She says that the answer
lies with Morpheus (Laurence Fishburne).  Neo meets Morpheus, and the
journey into his question ensues.
All of this takes about twenty minutes.  The film goes on for two more
hours, but I can't tell you what happens.  All I can say is that when
Neo sees the Matrix, he vomits.  I can't even discuss the other
characters in the film and why they're significant, just because doing
so would give away crucial elements.  One of the things I liked most
about The Matrix is that, before seeing it, I thought I had it figured
out.  But the Wachowskis showed me things that I didn't imagine.  The
story has all the necessary elements for success.  Neo, for instance, is
a likable main character.  He has no personal history, but that's the
point of the film.  Reeves, though inappropriate in any production of
Shakespeare, is more than adequate here.  There's not a moment during
which he doesn't look woefully confused, and that's exactly what this
character needs.
The film is also saturated with colorful supporting characters. 
Fishburne and Moss make a strong pair of protagonists; Fishburne
effortlessly makes every word sound very important, while Moss is strong
as the female lead.  Character actor Joe Pantoliano has a juicy role as
Cipher, one of Morpheus' sidekicks.  Australian actor Hugo Weaving gives
a scene-stealing performance as Agent Smith, one of the antagonists
whose intentions are part of the big secret.  All of these great
characters are placed at the center of a familiar formula.  The
originality comes in the details, which the Wachowskis have worked out
with amazing precision:  I dare any viewer to find a significant plot
hole in The Matrix.  If you do, then you're too picky.  The film works
because the story will hold your interest into and beyond the action
scenes.
Honestly, though, you're going to be concentrating on those action
scenes when they're going.  I've never seen cinematography or special
effects like this; I've never seen such flawless use of slow-motion and
computer-generated images.  The Wachowskis have a better eye for a shot
than nearly any modern director I can think of.  Their crowning
achievement is in the last thirty minutes, and involves a helicopter and
a lot of bullets in slow-motion.  I'm going to go out on a limb here: 
this is the best action sequence ever committed to celluloid.  When it
was over, my heart was racing and I was short of breath.  And I'm not
exaggerating.  If The Matrix doesn't get your attention, then you need
your pulse checked.
The film isn't perfect; the main characters are often forced to kill a
lot of people, and I would have liked to see them address the moral
issues behind mass murder.  And some of the background information
reminded me a little too much of similar films.  I only mention these
things to prove that I am capable of looking at the film objectively. 
It's not likely that they'll hinder anyone's enjoyment of the picture.
So, here's a pop quiz for anyone planning to create an entry into the
sci-fi genre:  What's more important -- style or substance?  The
Wachowskis have created perhaps the best science fiction film of the
90s, and they did so by balancing style and substance.  Like all the
great films of the genre -- including Metropolis, 2001:  A Space
Odyssey, and The Terminator -- The Matrix will show you images you've
never seen before, and it will make you care by telling a good story. 
You don't have to be a sci-fi junkie to recognize the skill here.  The
Matrix is the kind of film that gives fans of the genre a burst of
hope:  there are still filmmakers out there who know how to use special
effects to tell a story.   

Title
Review for Halloween H20: Twenty Years Later (1998)
Director:  Steve Miner
Cast:  Jamie Lee Curtis, Adam Arkin, Josh Hartnett, Michelle Williams,
LL Cool J, Jodi Lyn O'Keefe, Adam Hann-Byrd, Nancy Stephens, Janet
Leigh, Chris Durand
Screenplay:  Robert Zappia, Matt Greenberg
Producers:  Paul Freeman
Runtime:  85 min.
US Distribution:  Dimension Films
Rated R:  Violence, gore, profanity, sex
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
There are many films that feature crazed individuals roaming around
neighborhoods, skewering Innocent Bystanders in the futile attempt to
get the one person who typically escapes.  These individuals are
intensely violent people, who show no remorse or feeling at any time
during any of these films.  Sometimes the films that revolve around
these people are good; often times they are lousy.  Any way you look at
it, I think the makers of these films have been focusing on the wrong
side of the story all these years.
Sure, knives plunging into teenagers' backs is interesting.  An ice
skate in the face will never fail to grab my attention.  I even like the
fracturing of ankles by means of dumbwaiters.  But, for all of the happy
joy that one may find in scenes like these, I doubt that any of them can
compare to what it would be like to understand the thought process of a
maniac like Michael Meyers.  He is, perhaps, one of the most interesting
characters in any film I've ever seen.  There is no character
development, of course (such a term can only be used mockingly in this
context), but he is certainly a prominent character in this film.  I
think a mock-biography on Michael Meyers would have been more
interesting than anything presented in Halloween:  H20.
Unfortunately, it seems that viewers are more content with the slasher
stuff.  I can identify with that; it's fun to escape into ultra-violence
like this every once in a while.  As a horror flick, H20 isn't too bad. 
It's fun, and even witty (gasp!) at times.  It's intelligently-crafted
by director Steven Miner, and well-acted by the wonderful Jamie Lee
Curtis.  There isn't a whole lot of new material presented in this
particular genre piece, but I was surprised with how much I enjoyed it.  
This is the seventh film in the Halloween series, the first of which
was made twenty years ago by a fellow named John Carpenter.  I tried so
hard to see that film before this one, but, alas, I was unsuccessful. 
I've seen the last five minutes of it, but I can't make a fair judgment
of quality.  I hear it's good.  I'll leave it at that.  
Jamie Lee Curtis reprises her role from the first film as Laurie Strode
(though she's changed her name for security reasons).  She is the sister
of the homicidal maniac, Michael Meyers.  Among other things, I'd like
to know why they have different last names.
Well, poor Laurie is still very upset, twenty years later, and it turns
out she has good reason:  Mike is back in town, and he's pissed!  He's
here to take revenge on his sister, who apparently failed to kill him. 
For some reason, he wastes a lot of time with Innocent Bystanders, and
doesn't even work towards mutilating poor Laurie until the very end of
the film.  When it turns out that she was right about her brother, she
takes it very well, and tries valiantly to murder him with a fire axe.
I guess most sins are exploited in various kinds of films.  Like the
other members of the "teen slasher" genre, H20 is porno for the
violence-obsessed.  It's not quite as shameful as some of the
less-intelligent entries into the genre (there are so many that listing
examples is highly pointless).  Miner is miraculously able to manifest
suspense and menace out of a lot of scenes (the dumbwaiter is a terrific
set piece), and, no matter how many times you look at that imitation of
William Shatner's face, it still looks scary.  I was amazed that I
actually felt suspense at any time during this film -- not even the
Scream films managed to provide suspense for me.
Curtis is very likable here, as she always is.  I think she's a gifted,
funny actress who hasn't gotten a lot of recognition for her talents. 
Her role here feels a bit obligatory, as if the paycheck were a little
more influential than the chance to create something grand and artistic,
but I liked watching her anyway.  What's also nice is that there are
some good scenes between Laurie and her son, John (Josh Hartnett) that
effectively lampoon as character development.  
There are also some nifty turns towards the end, such as an unexpected
final showdown between our heroine and her loony bro.  H20 is a step
above its siblings in acting and directing, but the very fact that it's
a slasher flick keeps it from really getting anywhere.  What would have
made worlds of difference here?  Show me a psychoanalysis of Michael
Meyers.  Or maybe a thermal brain scan.  I'd like to see a nutty
psychiatrist question him in prison, and toy with him in a covertly
sadistic way.  I mean, it's cool and interesting that Mike kills a lot
of people, but aren't the thoughts behind that crazy mask more
interesting?  I'd sit through ten more Halloween films if just one of
them explained just what, exactly, can make a man so insane.

Title
Review for As Good As It Gets (1997)
Director: James L. Brooks
Cast: Jack Nicholson, Helen Hunt, Greg Kinnear, Cuba Gooding, Jr.,
Shirley Knight, Skeet Ulrich
Rated PG-13: Language, nudity, violence
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    I never thought any film labeled as a "romantic comedy" could be
this good. I always associate a certain vocabulary with films commonly
referred to as romantic comedies; words in this vocabulary
include--trite, phony, contrived, dull, formulaic, careful, and shallow.
I was relieved as I watched As Good as it Gets because I couldn't
associate any of these words with this film. In fact, James L. Brooks'
new film is the antithesis of all of these words combined, a moving,
often thought-provoking story about a truly awful individual.
    That individual is Melvin Udall, a racist, gay-hating,
obsessive-compulsive curmudgeon. He's also a novelist and lives in an
upper class apartment in New York. Across the hall is Simon (Greg
Kinnear), a gay artist who is, of course, extremely nice, and has a cute
little dog. Melvin eats lunch every day in the same diner, and his
waitress is always Carol (Helen Hunt), a mother just barely scraping by
because her son is sickly and always needing medical attention.
    One fateful day, Simon is painting a picture of a friend of a friend
(Skeet Ulrich), whose friends are in the other room, stealing all of
Simon's things. When Simon goes to investigate, he gets beaten within an
inch of his life. He loses all inspiration for painting and soon runs
out of money. Meanwhile, Melvin really likes Carol, and despite his
conduct towards her, he pays for real medical care for her son, who soon
recovers completely. Then, the three people unite in a road trip to
Baltimore in order for Simon to get money from his parents, to whom he
hasn't spoken in years.
    The first thing that really struck me about As Good as it Gets are
the risks it takes, in dialogue and ultimately in characterizations.
Melvin, for instance, is not one of those likable old curmudgeons--this
guy is really despicable. In one extremely tense scene, he makes the
mistake of insinuating that Carol's son doesn't have a long time to
live, and her reaction to this is one of complete emotional rage. He
also makes jokes--jokes that aren't really intended to be funny--about
people's weight, religion (he attacks Jews in one scene), and sexuality
(note the almost endless jokes about Simon and his homosexuality).
    Though these moments aren't exactly pleasant, they do help to create
a very solid character. This character is brought to life even more so
by Jack Nicholson's performance--as far as I'm concerned, this is his
best performance since One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest. Nicholson tends
to have that "I'm Jack Nicholson" aura around him when he's playing bad
guys or token characters, but here he gives a deep and convincing
performance as Melvin. Later developments of the character are extreme,
and we can still see the same old Melvin there, but we know he's trying
thanks to Nicholson.
    The supporting performances are of the best this year. Helen Hunt
proves once again that she can effortlessly upstage the sometimes
limited realm of television and gives a truly moving performance as a
strong-minded woman who really loves her son. Kinnear, too, goes way
beyond anything I've ever seen him in (I still remember him from Talk
Soup) and creates this frustrated man with ease.
    There is something truly magical and refreshing about this film--it
left me with a smile on my face that lasted for hours and hours after
the film was over. The mixture of different people is fascinating and
fun to watch. I loved these characters, and I loved their interactions
through Brooks' witty dialogue and realistic situations. I wanted to
believe that these people are alive somewhere in New York, just as
depicted in this film. And when the screen blacks out in the end, I knew
they were going to go right on living, and that everything would be
okay.

Title
Review for Replacement Killers, The (1998)
Director: Antoine Fuqua
Cast: Chow Yun-Fat, Mira Sorvino, Michael Rooker, Jurgen Prochnow,
Kenneth Tsang
Rated R: Strong violence, language
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    I suppose there are different kinds of action films. Some action
films are straightforward, while, at the same time, they mock themselves
in self-consciousness because they know that action films are, by
definition, ludicrous. Films like Die Hard and The Rock fit nicely into
this category. The other significant category of action contains films
like The Replacement Killers and Face/Off--these films utilize
slow-motion, are very arty, very serious, and totally pretentious.
    I don't have a problem with pretentiousness, especially when we're
given actors, like Chow Yun-Fat and Mira Sorvino, who can pull it off. I
had a great time with The Replacement Killers, and the reasons for this
are very simple: it's an extremely well-crafted and energetic piece.
It's also the kind of stylish, Asian action picture that mainstream
American moviegoers don't see very often.
    Yun-Fat stars as John Lee, a deadly assassin. In the early scenes of
the film, a cop (Michael Rooker) is seen killing the son of Terence Wei
(Kenneth Tsang). Wei, in an act of brutal revenge, hires Lee to dispatch
of the cop's son. With the gun pointed at the seven year-old boy, Lee
has a morality attack and refuses to kill the kid. Knowing that his life
is in danger, Lee tries to get back to his family in China, so he goes
to Meg Coburn (Sorvino) who makes fake IDs.
    It doesn't take long for Wei's people to find Lee, and Lee is forced
to bring Meg with him on his adventures. At this point, Wei hires
killers to replace Lee and kill the boy. Meg convinces Lee that he has
to kill Wei and all of his men, or the boy will never be safe.
    Each review I read for this film speaks of an emotional void, a
complete emptiness in anything of substance. My disagreement with this
point is one of my central reasons for enjoying all of the pretentious
flair of the action sequences: in several scenes (like one terrific
moment during which Lee muses in a photo booth as his picture is being
taken), the characters are actually given time to develop. And the two
lead actors do great jobs of playing these people (Sorvino, once again,
gives dimension to a character who would have been less appealing if
played by most other actresses).
    However (and expectedly), I didn't watch the film for the
characters. Director Antoine Fuqua clearly knows what he's doing, and
the action here rivals most scenes staged by the maestro himself, John
Woo (who worked as executive producer of this film). The opening
scene--in which Lee kills a group of culprits in a nightclub--is one of
the better action sequences in recent memory. All of the action in the
film is overflowing with that sharp style, filled with close-ups of
guns, and slow-motion so we can see the graphic deaths and viscera in
all of their detail. The pounding soundtrack also propels the film into
an eclectic state that disallowed me from ever looking away.
    I would have enjoyed this film more if I hadn't been hung-up on the
central irony that was apparently overlooked (or simply ignored) by
writer Ken Sanzel--this is a film about an assassin who takes mercy upon
a young boy, and basically goes through a morality revolution. But
never, in all of the scenes in which he blows away dozens of thugs, does
he ever show any kind of remorse. True, they are trying to kill him, but
in two specific scenes he has the villains at his mercy, and he executes
them anyway. This seems thoughtless to me, and tells me that maybe some
of the more thoughtful elements that I observed in the film were
accidental.
    But who really cares about that, anyway? This is an action film--an
exciting, engaging, and flashy action film. It has Chow Yun-Fat, and
Mira Sorvino, and techno music, and gunfire, and blood, and lots and
lots of slow-motion. It's fun to watch, it got my blood flowing, and I
recommend it based on these very simple criteria.

Title
Review for Summer of Sam (1999)
Director: Spike Lee
Cast: John Leguizamo, Adrien Brody, Mira Sorvino, Jennifer Esposito,
Michael Rispoli, Saverio Guerra, Bebe Neuwirth, Anthony LaPaglia, Ben
Gazzara
Screenplay: Victor Colicchio, Michael Imperioli, Spike Lee
Producers: Jon Kilik, Spike Lee
Runtime: 142 min.
US Distribution: Touchstone
Rated R: strong graphic violence and sexuality, pervasive strong
language, drug use
Copyright 1999 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Before going into Spike Lee's Summer of Sam, I knew that it wasn't
actually about the serial killer who terrorized New York citizens before
his capture in 1977.  It actually centers around a group of people who
lived in the same neighborhood as the Son of Sam, and focuses on the way
they reacted to a feeling of confinement based on fear.  John Leguizamo
and Mira Sorvino star as Vinny and Dionna, a married couple sexually
unsatisfied with one another.  The film emphasizes their relationship,
in addition to Vinny's relationship with his friends in the
neighborhood.
Summer of Sam is an ambitious, visually striking picture.  It reminded
me very much of Lee's previous film, He Got Game, and also has many of
the same problems.  The picture is very unfocused, and often doesn't
seem to have much momentum (it's also needlessly long, and meanders
towards the end).  The focus is distractingly skewed between the
troubles with the married couple and the neighborhood paranoia.  And
there are numerous scenes featuring the Son of Sam himself, and Lee
dramatizes most (if not all) of the killings; I found all of these
sequences unnecessary and gratuitous -- the film isn't a psychological
thriller about the killer himself, and his presence doesn't feel right.
Problematic as it is, Summer of Sam still harnesses an amazing sense of
tension; the film actually features one of the most suspenseful scenes
I've seen in recent years (those who have seen the film will remember
the scene in which we expect both Vinny and Dionna to be killed by the
Son of Sam).  The performances are all very good, with particularly
strong work from Leguizamo and Adrien Brody (as Vinny's punk-rocking
friend).  I liked parts of the movie very much, and I found it to be an
authentic painting of the period, but I left the theater not knowing
entirely what to make of it.

Title
Review for Meet the Deedles (1998)
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
Perhaps the most disturbing thing about a film as painfully awful as
Meet the Deedles is that there are people in this world who thought
conscious members of the human race would enjoy it.  I typically don't
find low humor entertaining, but I can tell when it's been done with a
little bit of intelligence.  Meet the Deedles is not intelligent, nor is
it funny, entertaining, or bearable in even the loosest sense of the
word.  
See, it's about these two brothers, Stuart and Phil Deedle (Paul Walker
and Steve Van Wormer).  They're a couple of surf bums who live in Hawaii
with their rich father.  One day, they get kicked out of school for
missing a day, so their father sends them away to a camp in Wyoming to
make men out of them.
But wait, all of this setup is useless, because when they get to
Wyoming, there's a big mountain man-looking fellow there who claims that
the camp was his but that the government took it away from him.  So,
after an elaborate escape from him, the Deedles end up taking a couple
of women's clothes to wear; at this point, they skateboard down the
mountain and crash land in the offices of Yellowstone park, where they
are subsequently mistaken for the two women whose clothes they stole. 
They are recruited to be park rangers-in-training, and their job is to
solve the prairie dog problem that is consuming the entire park.
See, the prairie dogs are present because a psycho (Dennis Hopper)
hates the head park ranger (John Ashton) and wants to make him look bad
by destroying Old Faithful (a geyser).  Somebody sat down at their
computer one day and said, "I think I'll write a brainless movie about a
couple of surfers who go to camp, but then go to be park rangers."  Meet
the Deedles is the product of this line of thinking.  
The film starts off terrible, with the brothers getting pulled out of
bed on their birthday and then being forced by a bunch of friends to
parasail.  But, when the school police man (the school police in Hawaii
apparently use boats) tracks them down, they outsmart him by flying over
him and making him wipe out.  This moment is poorly filmed and boring,
and pointless, and it's hard to do the stupidity of the stunt justice in
words:  it needs to be seen.
The whole film, really, is as bad.  It never let up, and it never got
funny.  The film also resorts to toilet humor, which I never like in any
situation.  Feces and flatulence should be reserved for . . . anything
other than movies.  The toilet humor makes its way into this film
because the Deedles use a high-powered laxative to get the prairie dogs
out, but it's in gas form so it goes into the air where birds can breath
it, and then quickly dump their waste on the head park ranger.  
Walker and Van Wormer are innocuous, and I can at least say that they
are not to blame for this heinous disaster.  They play their
character-less characters competently, but the material is just too
awful to accept.  A.J. Langer, whom I like, manages to make her lines
sound good, but she is wasted.  And Dennis Hopper, as I'm sure you can
imagine, doesn't give his all as this particular psycho.  
I'm trying to think . . . I know there was one thing I laughed at in
the movie.  Well, I can't remember.  I do remember, however, that writer
James Herzfeld throws in a lot of jokes that only adults who keep up on
current events would understand.  Too bad they aren't funny, but that's
not the real problem--the target audience for Meet the Deedles are boys
between ten and thirteen (I'm guessing).  There were two kids sitting in
front of me in the film, and they were squirming silently the entire
film.  Two guys my age were behind me, and they expressed their distaste
after the film was over.  The only guy laughing also found the bird
feces funny, so he doesn't count.
I thought Disney used to make good films.  The last three I've seen
from them--Krippendorf's Tribe, Flubber, and now Meet the Deedles--are
all bad films.  But they aren't just bad:  they're offensive,
audience-insulting garbage.  Meet the Deedles is a film that should
appeal to no one.  It lacks even a hint of the self-consciousness that
is required for a stupid film to simultaneously be funny and at least
somewhat intelligent.  And, as I said, intelligence is not one of its
strong points.

Title
Review for Butcher Boy, The (1997)
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
I'd like to believe that we all see films that strike us in ways that
we know will not affect every viewer.  I was looking forward to The
Butcher Boy mostly because Neil Jordan is a brilliant artist, and one of
my favorite film makers; he has proved this over and over again, in
films like Mona Lisa and The Crying Game.  But I have a glaring personal
issue with this film --  the main character, Francie Brady, and the
portrayal of him by young Eamonn Owens.  I can say that it's a good
performance, but I'd be misreporting my feelings, because it's also one
of the most intensely annoying performances I've ever had to watch.
But that's not my only problem with The Butcher Boy.  This is supposed
to be a black comedy, but I found absolutely none of it even the
slightest bit amusing, let alone funny.  And it's a crazy picture, full
of misguided energy and expletives, and any kind of meaning that Patrick
McCabe inserted into his novel (on which this film is based) is not at
all clear to me from Jordan's film.  It's ironic, really, the amount of
energy that this film tries to harness, because, for all of the wacky
music and graphic deaths, it left me feeling pretty drab.
The film is about the childhood struggles of Francie Brady, a young
Irish boy who lives with his alcoholic father (Stephen Rae) and suicidal
mother (Aisling O'Sullivan).  He's a loud, obnoxious kid, and seems
fairly unmoved by the unpleasant conditions in which he lives.  His best
friend is Joe (Alan Boyle), and they spend a lot of time in the woods
chasing each other around.  
Francie's nemesis is the evil Mrs. Nugent (Fiona Shaw); he goes to
school with her son, and Francie finds pleasure in torturing the young
boy.  Later, Francie pulls a prank (a vicious prank, I should say) on
Mrs. Nugent, which gets him sent to a boarding school.  Just when
Francie seems to be improving, the head priest at the school turns out
to be a pedophile; Francie, of course, has no idea what this old man's
problem is, but the incident allows Francie to return to his hometown in
Ireland.  
The film doesn't follow strict plotting, nor does it have a truly
cohesive narrative.  I don't mind these elements so much, but in The
Butcher Boy, I was never quite sure what I was supposed to be watching
for.  Clearly the focus is Francie, but both the character and Owens'
portrayal of him are static throughout the picture.  If any child ever
had attention deficit disorder, then Francie is that child, for this is
a boy so out of control, so crazed, so maniacal, that I simply could not
manifest sympathy for him.  I never saw him as anything more than a
sadistic little demon, and this fact simply wrings every bit of comedy
out of the film for me.  
In addition to this, I can't see where Jordan has tweaked the material
to move it over the dubious boundary from serious to funny.  Elliott
Goldenthal's musical score is adequately twisted, but it takes more than
music to make this kind of material funny and engaging.  Jordan has
dabbled in graphic violence in his other films (both The Crying Game and
Mona Lisa have sudden moments of extreme violence), but he never wanted
it to be funny before.  Here, I get the feeling that I'm not supposed to
take it seriously, but there's no incentive to laugh.  So, I took the
movie seriously, and what I got was a rather disengaging biography about
a heinous, unsympathetic child.
The other performances are very good, and probably what I like most
about the film.  Stephen Rae is a terrific actor (and always in Jordan's
films); here, he does a good job of making us care about this man who
has wrecked his son's life through neglect and alcohol abuse.  Fiona
Shaw is an underused and underappreciated actress, and her work here
proves that she needs to make more films; her intense and often
exaggerated performance as Mrs. Nugent is the one element in The Butcher
Boy that I think works with the black comedy-feel that it seems Jordan
was going for.  Unfortunately, she, like the rest of the actors, is
stifled by the handling of the story.
I find great distaste in criticizing Jordan so harshly, since he is
such a fantastic film maker and because I am just a self-proclaimed
critic, but I'm confident knowing that this is the first misstep in his
distinguished career.  As for Eamonn Owens and young Francie Brady, both
are people whom I hope to never meet for as long as I live.

Title
Review for Antz (1998)
Director:  Eric Darnell, Lawrence Guterman, Tim Johnson
Cast:  Woody Allen, Dan Aykroyd, Anne Bancroft, Jane Curtin, Danny
Glover, Gene Hackman, Jennifer Lopez, John Mahoney, Paul Mazursky, Grant
Shaud, Sylvester Stallone, Sharon Stone, Meryl Streep, Christopher
Walken
Screenplay:  Todd Alcott, Chris Weitz, Paul Weitz
Producers:  Brad Lewis, Aron Warner, Patty Wooton
Runtime:  77 min.
US Distribution:  DreamWorks
Rated G  
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
I've never been big on animation, and I'm not sure why.  I've seen some
good animated films (many of which are Japanese, and have interesting
stories in addition to great animation), but I find that my response to
most animated films is the same -- it's interesting at first, and then
my attention begins to dwindle.  I figured that this would not be the
case with Antz, because it has super-ultra-high-tech computer animation,
and also because it has a great assortment of celebrity voices and a
witty script.  In addition, the film clocks in under 90 minutes, and so
it hardly has time to get boring.  
But, for all of its wit and skill, Antz really just reminds me of how
self-centered the human race is:  this is not a story about ants, but a
story about a bunch of miniature humans reacting to an ant-like
existence.  I have an entomologist friend who said the film's science is
well in-place, but that doesn't make me feel better about the fact that
we're not watching ants.  I know, I know, I could go on and on about the
fact that ants don't speak English (puhleez), and that they don't walk
upright on four of their six legs, and so forth.  I'm not so interested
in these little details as I am in the big picture -- I think the film
is a clever cop-out.  It would have been really interesting if the ants
had been more realistically expressed.
Well, I realize I'm subjecting myself to the possibility of getting
labeled as a "lame" critic, because I doubt that anyone out there will
have a similar opinion of Antz.  Don't get me wrong -- it's an enjoyable
film, and often very funny.  Woody Allen voices the main character, a
worker ant named Z.  Z is Woody Allen -- he looks and acts the same way
Allen acts in all of his films.  Z is upset that he's insignificant in
the scheme of his colony, but one day meaning is injected into his life
when he meets Princess Bala (Sharon Stone).  She's engaged to General
Mandible (Gene Hackman), and this greatly upsets Z.  
However, his friend Weaver (Sylvester Stallone) tells him that he can
meet her if he pretends to be in the army.  So, Z takes Weaver's place,
and accidentally ends up in a war with a bunch of termites.  By a stroke
of luck, he's the only survivor, and returns to the colony a hero. 
Soon, however, Mandible realizes that Z is a fake, and Z impulsively
kidnaps the Princess and they head outside, in search of Insectopia,
where ants can live without the constraints of colony life always
keeping them oppressed.  Soon, Z becomes a symbol for liberation in the
ant colony.
If that sounds like a lot of plot for an 80-minute film, you're not
mistaken.  That's one of the nice things about Antz, though -- it never
dwells on anything long enough to deteriorate into mindless boredom or
kiddy-pleasing madness.  In fact, the film is aimed equally at kids and
adults, so parents taking their children to this film won't be left in
the dust (actually, there are a few jokes that will whiz right past the
kids' ears).  On this level, however, there are issues that bother me
about Antz.  First of all, the language is not G-material (several of
the "lesser" expletives, including "bitch" and "crap," pop up
frequently).  In addition, the violence is rather extreme:  the battle
with the termites is disturbingly similar to scenes in Starship
Troopers.  
But I can't deny the film's wry charm, thanks to the array of familiar
voices and a clever script by Todd Alcott and Chris & Paul Weitz.  There
are some terrific cameos, such as a wonderful scene with a couple of
European wasps (voiced by Dan Aykroyd and Jane Curtin).  The film gets
off to a slow start, but everything that happens outside the colony is
very well-done, both in script and in animation.  In the main roles,
Allen is likable as Z, while Stone has fun giving her Princess a little
bit of sass.  Hackman is perfect for the domineering and evil general,
while Christopher Walken is on-hand as the General's right-hand man.  
I'm quite aware that most readers are likely to dub me as a very silly
guy after reading this review, perhaps as the "impossible" critic who
wouldn't have liked the film regardless of the circumstances.  After
all, I liked the film pretty well, and I'm not denying that it's
well-made and overall a worthwhile investment for pocket change.  But it
left me feeling dissatisfied.  I'm not sure what I was expecting, but I
was hoping for something that kind of broke away from the expected
little-humans-pretending-to-be-animals cliche.  If this concept doesn't
bother you the way it bothers me, add a full star to my rating and
kindly resist the urge to send me flaming hate mail.

Title
Review for Meet Joe Black (1998)
Director:  Martin Brest
Cast:  Brad Pitt, Anthony Hopkins, Clair Forlani, Jake Weber, Marcia Gay
Harden, Jeffrey Tambor
Screenplay:  Ron Osborn, Jeff Reno, Kevin Wade, Bo Goldman
Producers:  Martin Brest
Runtime:  180 min.
US Distribution:  Universal
Rated PG-13:  some violence and sexuality, brief strong language
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
The most notable element of Meet Joe Black is its length.  Director
Martin Brest (Scent of a Woman) has made a long movie.  It's a real
problem when you're trying to make a moving, emotionally sweeping love
story, and the most prominent feature of your film is its three-hour
running time.  This film will challenge the endurance of your buttox; it
will also challenge your attention (audience members with ADD are warned
to stay far away from this picture).  Meet Joe Black is so long that it
makes me wonder if anything was left out:  it just might be the first
film ever to be released without being edited first.
Of course, I'm just joking.  But it is way too long.  As we were
walking out of the theater, my friend commented that it might take
twenty minutes to read the script out loud.  In fact, the characters
don't say very much at all; when they do speak, they speak very slowly,
and employ ten seconds of silence between every sentence.  The pacing in
Meet Joe Black is almost disastrous, especially in the last forty-five
minutes, during which the film ends roughly six times and concludes with
an inexplicable event and an overblown fireworks show.  
And yet, Meet Joe Black is an exceptional picture for the first hour. 
The main character is Bill Parrish (Anthony Hopkins), and aging tycoon
and father of two daughters, Susan (Clair Forlani) and Allison (Marcia
Gay Harden).  One night, he's confronted by Death (in the form of Brad
Pitt).  It's Bill's time to die, but Death would like to see the world
first.  So, Bill takes him to dinner with his family, introducing him as
Joe Black.  Susan, who recognizes Joe as a man she had met in a coffee
shop that morning, is confused by his presence.
Well, the subplots take off from there.  Susan is engaged to a man
named Drew (Jake Weber), an executive of Bill's communications company. 
We all know that he's a cold and boring guy, and that Susan doesn't
really love him.  What isn't necessary is the subplot that involves Drew
trying to get Bill fired (his reason for doing this is that he thinks
Joe is a consultant and that Bill is running the business through him). 
The focus of the story, however, is the love affair between Joe and
Susan, and what Bill does to keep it from happening.
The best thing in Meet Joe Black is Hopkins.  He's such a fine actor,
and brings class and dignity to every role he plays.  As Bill Parrish,
he adds a dimension that might not have been present in the script:  we
care about him, and we care about the relationships he has with his
daughters.  Even when the silly corporate takeover plot swings into full
gear, we care about Bill and the way he deals with his loss.  Meet Joe
Black would have been much less of a film without Hopkins, and since
it's already pretty messy, it's a good thing he's here to help.
But the other actors aren't lost.  Pitt has been widely criticized for
this role, but I enjoyed his work.  When he first appears as death, he
shows superb comic timing -- even his wooden execution of the dialogue
is appropriate.  Clair Forlani is quiet and somber, but so what?  Susan
is a quiet and somber character -- it doesn't make her any less
interesting.  Weber is one of the better slimeballs in recent history,
and backup performances from Marcia Gay Harden and Jeffry Tambor (as
Allison's husband) are both very nice.
Brest is a good director, and makes a few effective artistic choices. 
He's a big fan of the close-up, and it works in this picture -- it makes
the characters more personable.  I always got the feeling that Brest is
passionate about his story; he cares about his characters, and he wants
his film to be moving.  I wasn't always taken with the love story, but
it's effective on some levels -- the love scene, for instance, is
touching.  The first half of the film is also very funny -- the
fish-out-of-water stuff with Death in the real world is great fun.  But,
overall, less would have been more:  there are entire subplots that
could have been taken out (such as the corporate takeover), and this
would have helped the pacing immensely.
By the final hour, you might be wondering if the film will ever end. 
It does end -- in fact, it ends several times.  There are so many
revelations, so many scenes in which people say "good bye" to one
another, so many finales that are supposed to be big and important, that
the film really just seems bloated and unrestrained.  Brest should have
sliced at least an hour off of his movie; as it is, Meet Joe Black is an
interesting movie that starts off funny and ends up self-important.  A
good editing job -- and I mean *really* good -- is all it would have
taken to make Meet Joe Black a swift and wholly effective film.

Title
Review for Truman Show, The (1998)
Director:  Peter Weir
Cast:  Jim Carrey, Laura Linney, Noah Emmerich, Natascha McElhone,
Holland Taylor, Ed Harris
Screenplay:  Andrew Niccol
Producers:  Edward S. Feldman, Andrew Niccol, Scott Rudin, Adam
Schroeder
Runtime:  103 min.
US Distribution:  Paramount
Rated PG:  thematic elements, mild language
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
I think the one thing that the general crop of Hollywood films lack
entirely is originality.  Most of them have a glimpse of originality
buried somewhere in them, but it seems to me that the vast majority are
padded with so many cliches and formulas that the films feel familiar
even if you haven't seen them before.  The Truman Show is a film
completely original in both its conception and execution, a picture so
intelligent and entertaining that I'm certain most will hail it as one
of the best films of the decade so far.
But it's not just a well-made movie -- it's an emotionally moving and
profoundly direct film that comes across as an all-new experience.  I
don't recall ever seeing a film that feels like this one.  Certainly
there are movies out there that attack the television industry (the
wonderful Quiz Show, for instance), but none of them do it in a manner
like this.  The image that director Peter Weir has created is seamless
and beautiful, Andrew Niccol's script is subtle and superb, and the
acting -- especially from Jim Carrey -- is perfect.  
Ideally, you should not know what the film is about before you see it. 
The trailers all tell you the big secret, though -- Carrey plays Truman
Burbank, a man who lives in Seahaven, Florida.  What he doesn't know but
the rest of the world does is that he's the star of a television show
that features every moment of his life.  He goes about his daily routine
as if it were a script, saying almost the exact same things to his wife,
Meryl (Laura Linney), that he did the previous day.  He works in a real
estate firm, and his best friend's name is Marlon (Noah Emmerich).
We've all considered the possibility that our lives are staged, that we
are at the center of the universe, that there might be people in white
coats looking at us at all times, that the walls might be illusions and
that we're actually in a laboratory somewhere.  The Truman Show takes
this idea and makes it somewhat pleasant (at least Truman isn't being
studied and probed for fun), but it also makes the concept believable. 
The show was created by Christof (Ed Harris), who is truly wrapped up in
the idea that he's created something wonderful, something pure -- much
more real than anything you can see in the real world.
The way Weir and Niccol set up the film is ingenious, because you don't
know for sure that Truman's at the center of everything (unless you've
seen the previews).  They drop hints though, such as moments during
which we see Truman through the eyes of a strange camera buried in the
bushes (we know it's a strange camera because of the oval matte around
the central image).  Weir allows these hidden cameras to be seen, but
all the hints are subtle (Truman's neighbor, for no particular reason,
carries around a garbage can at eye level, and the camera in the side of
the can is visible, but not obvious).  I can't effectively convey the
sheer completeness of the way Weir has created this fictional little
town, but this is the kind of film that you can watch repeatedly and
still see new things with each viewing.
As the film progresses, Truman starts seeing things that baffle him.  A
stage light falls out of the sky and crashes onto the street in front of
his house.  He examines it as if it were dropped from an alien ship (a
few seconds later he hears a newscast which announces that a passing
airplane had dropped some of its parts).  Soon, though, he sees things
that can't be explained with such ease.  He gets so bent on the idea
that he rushes into a strange building when no one would expect it, and
finds that there are people in a fake elevator eating donuts.  
Quickly he's thrown out onto the street by security guards.
Truman wants to get out of Seaside and go to Fiji, mostly because of a
woman (Natasha McElhone) whom he met in high school.  The woman was
actually an extra who tried to tell Truman that his life was a
television show, but ended up failing.  Truman's attempts at getting out
of the city are not successful, for every time he tries to leave
something strange stops him (random forest fires, sudden traffic jams,
etc.).  He also sees lots of things that are intended to deter him, such
as a poster of an airplane under attack from a giant bolt of lightning,
with the caption, "IT COULD HAPPEN TO YOU!" in block letters across the
top.
Weir's direction is amazing (he should easily be in for the Best
Director nomination), and his work is complemented by the wonderfully
pleasing aesthetics of Seahaven.  Cinematographer Peter Biziou and
production designer Dennis Gassner have done splendid work with the look
of the film; the imagery, such as in all the scenes with Truman sitting
on the beach, is absorbing and immersive, and is matched perfectly with
Philip Glass' score (it's worth mentioning that the musical score is
always flowing lightly in the background).  Even without the script, The
Truman Show is simply a pleasure to look at.
With this film, Carrey proves that he can act.  But this isn't just a
"coming out" performance, or a performance that everyone will adore
simply because he doesn't play himself.  This is a truly great
accomplishment, and deserves to be recognized on higher levels.  Carrey
is complex and subtle, but still manages to be hilarious in a more
realistic way than he has in the past (perhaps the funniest scene is
when Meryl forces a product placement for coffee at a moment when Truman
is very upset).  Carrey never goes overboard, but he's so good at
playing this character that I can't imagine anyone else in the role.  He
has the perfect face and demeanor for the character.
The supporting work is also fantastic, particularly from Ed Harris. 
Harris is a versatile actor (though he's often typecast as the bad-ass
military guy), and here is utterly convincing as a man who truly
believes that he is doing a great thing both for Truman and for the
entire world.  Linney is also perfectly pitched, and her acting is
clever in that she's playing an actress who constantly acts.  Natascha
McElhone, with her gleaming eyes and soft smile, is simply magnetic to
look at (a good casting choice), but she also turns in a great
performance as Truman's true love.
I haven't talked about the fact that the film is uproariously funny. 
This is the best kind of humor -- you have to think before you laugh,
and most of the jokes will only strike if you're paying close
attention.  Some of the humor is over-the-top if you think about it
(watch closely the scene in which Truman sees his father dressed as a
homeless man), but every attempt at humor in The Truman Show hits with
full force.
But this isn't just a comedy.  This is a smart and intelligent film
that actually takes a satirical view of the television industry.  It's
also a moving picture, because Truman is so well-written by Niccol and
well-acted by Carrey -- he's a likable man, and we want him to be able
to succeed and live a real life.  The Truman Show is actually quite
acidic towards the industry, but the message hardly bogs down the story
(note the final shot of the film, though, and then ask yourself what the
point of the film is).  Above all things, though The Truman Show is
original.  It's a new kind of film experience, as intelligent as it is
funny, and perfectly made as it is perfectly acted.  I recommend it
unreservedly to all viewers to love great films.

Title
Review for He Got Game (1998)
Director:  Spike Lee
Cast:  Denzel Washington, Ray Allen, Rosario Dawson, Milla Jovovich,
Hill Harper, Zelda Harris, Jennifer Esposito, Bill Nunn, Ned Beatty
Screenplay:  Spike Lee
Producers:  Jon Kilik, Spike Lee
Runtime:  131 min.
US Distribution:  Buena Vista/Hollywood
Rated R:  violence, sex, drugs, language
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
I think I've said this before (well, I know I've said this before)--I'm
not a sports person.  Sports talk doesn't interest me.  Professional
sports don't interest me.  Football, basketball, baseball -- these
things don't interest me.  I don't hate them, but sports alone can not
hold my attention.  I have the utmost respect for Spike Lee for creating
a film that has a lot to do with basketball and keeping me compelled and
interested through its entire length.
What one must realize when approaching He Got Game is that it's not
really about basketball:  it's about the complicated relationship
between a father and his son.  That's not, by a longshot, all there is
to this film -- Lee takes on a lot of subplots and themes, and the
result is a far-reaching and ambitious picture.  Though it is a
fascinating character study and often very powerful, the film seems to
overflow with messages at times, and Lee never quite finds the right
note for tone and atmosphere.  
The father mentioned above is Jake Shuttleworth (Denzel Washington). 
He's a convicted felon (finding out why is part of the film, so I can't
tell you) serving his sentence in prison; early in the film, he's
approached by the warden (Ned Beatty) with an offer -- he has one week
to convince his own son, Jesus (Ray Allen) to attend Big State
University.  Jesus is the nation's number one high school basketball
player, and he's expected to easily make it into the NBA, and perhaps
end up the greatest player of all time.  
It's a difficult time in Jesus' life, for he has many universities
pressuring him to sign into their program, and he's waiting until the
last possible second to make his decision.  He's also suddenly saddled
with a life of fame, though he still lives in the projects with his
sister, Mary (Zelda Harris).  Jake agrees to the job, and immediately
goes to see his children.  Mary is happy to see him, but Jesus won't
even acknowledge him as his father.  This is where the conflict arises.
The father/son relationship of He Got Game is the central theme, and
Lee handles this aspect of the film with detailed care and respect. 
Washington is superb here (as he always is), and manages to convey the
desperation of a man trapped in an impossible situation.  Midway through
the film, he meets a prostitute named Dakota (Milla Jovovich), whom he
seems to really care for, and this subplot helps to characterize him
further.  Lee and Washington both do a fantastic job creating this
fascinating man.
The other half of the relationship is portrayed effectively by Ray
Allen.  Allen does an excellent job playing a naive high school student
who is suddenly and inexplicably confronted with a chance at greatness. 
His reaction to his father is also very well done, and the scenes
between the two men are engaging -- they dynamics between the characters
work so well that it's impossible not to admire this film for these
scenes.  There are a lot of supporting characters (and a few cameos),
and all of them are colorful and interesting; Jovovich (last seen in The
Fifth Element) really stands out, as does young Zelda Harris.
As well as the central themes in He Got Game work, there just seems to
be a little too much padding, both in story and in execution.  The
cinematography Malik Hassen Sayeed is interesting, but he employs a lot
of strange tricks (fade-to-white is a common one) that are intended to
draw the viewer in, but instead they just distance us from what's
happening on screen.  Aaron Copland's musical score is fantastic, but it
doesn't always fit the mood of the film:  when Jake and Jesus have a
climactic one-on-one game, Copland's heavy strings and
classical-sounding themes made me too aware of the music, and the best
scores blend in and add to the overall image without being distracting.
There's also a lot of sex, and these scenes border on soft-porn
(example -- two college girls are waiting for Jesus when he goes to
visit a university, and . . . you know the rest).  And there's a long,
violent interlude during which a strange individual briefs Jesus on all
of the drugs and sex he'll be missing if he goes away to school.  I'm
not too certain why Lee wanted to be so explicit with the sex and
violence (there are several scenes like the ones described above), but
it seems to detract from what this film is really about.  
And what this film really is about is the relationship between Jake and
Jesus.  Jesus' hatred for his father is deep and potent, and, inversely,
Jake's love for his son is equally powerful -- every scene between the
two is electric and intense.  Spike Lee and his actors pull off this
central relationship so perfectly that the extras on the outside are
only minor detractors.  He Got Game, even in its strangest moments, is a
compelling and engrossing experience.

Title
Review for Payback (1999)
Director: Brian Helgeland
Cast: Mel Gibson, Maria Bello, Gregg Henry, James Coburn, Kris
Kristofferson, David Paymer, Deborah Kara Unger
Screenplay: Terry Hayes, Brian Helgeland
Producers: Bruce Davey, Mel Gibson
Runtime: 102 min.
US Distribution: Paramount
Rated R: strong violence, language, drug use, sex
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
I don't like the concept of theatrical trailers:  they give the
audience unrealistic expectations.  More importantly, though, they tend
to mislead viewers.  This is the case with Payback, an intensely violent
and sarcastic film about a man who just isn't nice at all.  The previews
make Payback look like a piece of cynical fluff, in which Mel Gibson
struts around casting one-liners at his leisure, and occasionally
shooting bad guys in a goofy and trivial way.  The previews may get
people in the theater, but at least ten people at my screening left long
before the credits rolled.  So, consider my warning:  Payback is not a
lighthearted Friday night at the movies.  
With that said, I can admit that Payback is not a bad movie.  True, it
is very dark -- director/co-writer Brian Helgeland clearly has an
aversion to overhead lighting.  And it's often ridiculously violent;
aside from a several sadomasochistic sex segments, we get to see
numerous people undergo violent deaths from multiple angles.  And Mel
Gibson gets his feet crushed by a psycho with a framing hammer.  It's
never a pleasant film:  the characters are more reprehensible than
likable, and most of them enjoy inflicting pain on others.  There are
some funny parts, but it's not a funny film on the whole.  Payback is
well-made, but it left me feeling pretty drab.  
The film is based on a novel called The Hunter, which spawned the 1967
film Point Blank.  In Payback, Gibson plays a crook named Porter (don't
ask about his first name).  The film opens with Porter lying unconscious
on a table, as someone removes a couple of bullets from his back with a
pair of pliers.  "Not many people know what their life's worth," he says
in a voice-over.  "I do.  Seventy grand.  That's what they took from me,
and that's what I'm gonna get back."  That statement basically sums up
the entire film:  Porter does everything he can (and with as much
indifference as possible) to get his money back.
There are a lot of colorful characters we get to meet along the way;
the first one is Porter's wife (Deborah Kara Unger), a heroin addict. 
In a flashback, we learn that she betrayed her husband with the help of
a slimeball named Val (Gregg Henry).  In present time, Porter's main
target is Val, but when he learns that the money Val stole went to a
crime syndicate, Porter must travel higher up the ladder, and eventually
deal with the head guy (Kris Kristofferson).  Porter's love interest is
a prostitute (Maria Bello) with whom he has a seedy past.  Other actors
featured in prominent roles are James Coburn (as one of the many crime
bosses) and David Paymer (as a low-life associating with a couple of
crooked cops).
The rules you can use in detecting the fate of a character are as
follows:  1)  if female, she's a hooker or a drug addict, and will
usually end up beaten severely; 2) if male, he's a crime lord or a drug
dealer who will eventually betray Porter (if he hasn't already) and get
shot multiple times or blown to pieces with lots of explosives.  It's
not meant to be pleasant; it is, after all, a crime thriller about bad
people.  But when your "good" guy is the meanest of a group of really
mean dudes, you need to find his one good trait and exploit it.  That's
the main problem with Payback:  I was never given much of a reason to
like Porter.
The problem isn't in Gibson's performance; in fact, he's really quite
good, and plays the character stone-faced and without a glimpse of
sympathy.  He's a burn-out of the worst kind -- the kind who places no
value on human life.  The subplot with his girlfriend is clearly
intended to make him a little more human; Bello is effective in the
female role, but the relationship never really develops and therefore
doesn't resonate the way it needs to.  It's not that Porter is a
loathsome guy:  there are times when he'll win you over.  It's just the
rest of the time, when he simply shoots people because they're standing
in his way, when you'll think twice about really sympathizing with him
and his financial issues.
The preview does promise comedy, and I'll admit that there are a few
scenes that had me exploding with laughter.  One scene, near the
beginning, has Porter staring into a mirror, practicing his smile so he
can fit in with the rest of the human race.  The scene in which Porter
confronts Mr. Fairfax (the Coburn character) is truly hilarious,
especially when Fairfax finds out that Porter just wants $70,000. 
"Hell, my suits cost more than that!" he shouts as Porter makes his way
out.  There's a superb running joke that Porter keeps having to correct
people about the amount of money he wants (everyone thinks it's
$130,000).  And then there's the S&M subplot, featuring a surly Asian
prostitute (Lucy Alexis Liu) that is both hilarious and brutal.  
But when you're not laughing, you'll probably just be cringing from all
the violence the characters endure.  I read that the test screenings had
people saying the film was too dark, and that Helgeland walked away from
the project when the studio ordered that some scenes be re-shot.  I
can't imagine the picture being more dark than it is, but I suppose it's
also possible that Helgeland's original cut made Porter a more likable
guy.  And even though the theatrical trailers make the film look like an
exercise in action-comedy, the final version isn't a complete failure --
it has most of the right elements, and Helgeland does a great job with
style and tone.  But in a movie where the hero is more terrifying than
the bad guys, there better be a darn good reason to like him.  I gave up
trying about half way through.

Title
Review for Hideous Kinky (1998)
Copyright 1999 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Hideous Kinky gave me the same kind of feeling I always get when it
seems the setting is more important than the characters:  emptiness. 
That's not to say the film is lifeless; on the contrary, Kate Winslet
gives a fantastic performance as Julia, an English mother trying to
raise her two daughters (Bella Riza, Carrie Mullan) in Morocco.  The
central story is a good one, but the plot feels needlessly thickened by
various intrusive elements, including Julia's not-so-moving love affair
with a Moroccan man (Said Taghmaoui) and Julia's underdeveloped
commitment to the local religion.  Winslet, as I said, is a truly
affecting actress, and I was also very impressed with young Carrie
Mullan.  Director Gillies MacKinnon does a nice job with atmosphere, and
the film always feels authentic.  But I got the strange sensation that
the setting and the characters are part of two entirely different
stories, and the movie just isn't very engaging because of this.

Title
Review for Star Kid (1997)
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    As sick as it may sound, my New Year's resolution was to see every
film that opens in 1998. I didn't really think about some of the films I
might find myself sitting through, or what the experience would do to
me. So, imagine my state of mind as I sat alone in a theater, waiting
for Star Kid to begin. As mothers and fathers with their young children
began coming in, I couldn't recall a moment in time when I had felt more
out of place. Lucky for me the theater was very dark.
    But that's irrelevant, I guess. I just wanted to share my theater
experience. A more important note about me is that I tend to deplore any
and all films intended for children. I find them overly silly, banal,
and usually thoughtless about their own subject matter. Star Kid,
although clearly not intended for adults, is quite a surprise. Not only
did I find it somewhat entertaining, but it seems an appropriate kind of
film for today's younger generation (the ones that haven't been exposed
to a lot of violence and gore already). The themes are all in place, and
the simple fact is that it's a pleasant little film.
    Joseph Mazzello stars as Spencer, an intelligent young boy who has
no confidence in himself. He frequently gets harassed by the local
bully, and he can't speak a coherent sentence to a girl that he really
likes. He also has to deal with his father, who spends more time at work
than he does anywhere else, and his mean older sister who threatens him
and calls him names. One night while sitting in his bedroom, he sees a
flash of light and an object crashing into the local car dump. He goes
to investigate and finds Cy, a cybernetic suit that requires a bionic
host to operate. Naturally, he finds this very cool, and jumps right in.
    At first he just uses the suit to get back at the bully and to prove
to people that he is powerful. In the process of doing so he
accidentally destroys two houses because the suit is difficult to
control. Later, though, he uncovers an alien plot--he must stop them
from getting a hold of Cy, or Cy's makers and their planet will be
destroyed, as will Earth in the long run.
    I think what made the film for me is the performance of Joseph
Mazzello. I can't think of a child performance that is more convincing
than this one. Especially in one scene where Cy shows him memories of
his mother, Mazzello proves that he has a rare talent for such a young
kid.
    I also enjoyed the film because it's energetic and creative, which
is just what kids these days need to get the blood flowing. There are,
however, numerous Terminator 2 rip-offs (and some scenes stolen directly
from that film), but they're so blatant that I imagine the writers
intended for fans to notice these things. The sets and costumes are all
well done (except for a really bad-looking B-movie alien), and the film
feels well-made overall.
    It probably won't change your life, but Star Kid has enough in it to
keep your attention as your kids revel in the special effects and the
visual presentation. This is certainly a refreshing entry into the
dubious "kid" genre, and maybe I won't be so wary of a film like this in
the future.

Title
Review for Go (1999)
Director: Doug Liman
Cast: Desmond Askew, Taye Diggs, William Fichtner, J.E. Freeman, Katie
Holmes, Jane Krakowski, Breckin Meyer, Jay Mohr, Sarah Polley
Screenplay: John August
Producers: Matt Freeman, Mickey LIddell, Paul Rosenberg
Runtime: 103 min.
US Distribution: TriStar
Rated R: drug content, sex, language, violence 
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
If there was ever a film that lived up to its title, then Go is that
film.  For one hour and forty minutes, the audience is subjected to a
story that never stops, a movie that never even comes close to slowing
down.  It's not that the film is relentless or action-packed; it's just
a perpetual motion machine, fuelled by skillful direction from Doug
Liman (Swingers) and by a poundingly-appropriate soundtrack.  I didn't
find myself emotionally involved in anything that happens in Go, but I
became curiously entranced with the picture by the end.  It works on a
visceral level, but not on many others.
It also has no obvious narrative, though there are several small
stories that Liman and screenwriter John August skillfully intertwine. 
The first revolves around Ronna (Sarah Polley), a grocery store clerk by
day.  At work, she's approached by Adam and Zack (Scott Wolf and Jay
Mohr), a couple of guys looking for Ecstasy.  She goes out with her two
friends, Claire (Katie Holmes) and Mannie (Nathan Bexton) to find some
drugs, thinking that on the way she can make a few bucks to pay for her
rent.  Another plot involves Simon (Desmond Askew), a Brit who works
with Ronna at the store.  He goes off to Vegas with his friends (Taye
Diggs, Breckin Meyer, and James Duval), and they end up getting into
trouble with a strip-joint owner (Jimmy Schubert) and is father (J.E.
Freeman).  There is also a segment dedicated to Adam and Zack, but that
one has the most surprises and shouldn't be described here.
Go is a film propelled entirely by style and acting, and that's not
necessarily a bad thing.  Liman, as I said, is very good at what he does
(I liked this picture more than the overrated Swingers).  There's a
certain eclectic quality about the scenes in Go, one of unpredictability
mixed with an acute sense of adventure.  August's smartly-crafted
(Tarantino-style) script helps underline this tone; the story overflows
with pop-culture references and ultracool dialogue, and so most viewers
under the age of thirty-five are likely to find Go a fast-paced blast. 
It also helps that most of the performances are so strong and memorable;
Sarah Polley (The Sweet Hereafter) stands out among the crowd, never
failing to give her lines a punch of pointed cynicism.  William Fichtner
(Armageddon, Contact) is brilliant as a cop of a peculiar temperament,
one who is "open to new things."  Breckin Meyer has an incredibly funny
role as a white guy who wishes he were black.  I was impressed with both
Jay Mohr and Scott Wolf for their subtlety.  And Desmond Askew is a
likable kind of flawed hero, and constantly finds himself in
unexplainable situations (one of which involves two naked women and a
conflagration in a hotel room).
There are numerous scenes that don't work at all.  I didn't like the
one that involves a certain young woman getting nailed by a yellow
Miata; it's played for laughs, though it's not the slightest bit funny. 
This is later followed up by a scene in which the drivers of the Miata
attempt to dispose of the body, and it's generally unpleasant.  There
are also some points during which the characters are forced to be
incredibly stupid; when Simon and Marcus steal a Ferrari, I was rolling
my eyes and wondering what possessed them to do such a thing.  The real
problem is that Liman presents the material with such hip sarcasm that I
found it impossible to invest any kind of true feeling for the
characters.  But these aren't fatal flaws; Go is still an amazingly
entertaining film, one that is clearly in tune to the way people like
this think and talk.  And there's certainly no way it can bore you; one
thing you can count on is a whole lot of going.

Title
Review for Horse Whisperer, The (1998)
Director:  Robert Redford
Cast:  Robert Redford, Kristin Scott Thomas, Sam Neill, Scarlett
Johansson, Dianne Wiest, Chris Cooper, Cherry Jones
Screenplay:  Richard LaGravenese, Eric Roth
Producers:  Patrick Markey, Robert Redford
Runtime:  168 min.
US Distribution:  Buena Vista Pictures
Rated PG-13:  brief violence
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
I grew up around horses, but I never paid any attention to them.  That
was for girls, I thought, though my mother and sister frequently tried
to get me to ride their horses.  I would watch them from my bedroom
window on occasion, and the only thing I could ever think about was how
intensely boring it seemed.  The horses certainly didn't look happy, and
the few times I did actually attempt to ride, the only thing I got from
it was a throbbing sensation in places where throbbing sensations are
not welcome.  
I was mildly interested in seeing The Horse Whisperer, but not because
of the horses.  I wanted to see it because of its stars, Robert Redford
and Kristin Scott Thomas.  It turns out, though, that I had developed a
sense of respect for horses through all those years of idly watching
them carry around the female members of my family.  I'm fairly certain
that Redford, who also directed, intended the audience members to
observe the horses in this film as characters.  I think he succeeded,
not only in this arena, but in many others -- The Horse Whisperer is a
visually stunning film, and often a moving human drama.  
The film opens with tragedy:  young Grace MacLean (Scarlett Johansson)
and her friend are riding their horses on the icy countryside outside of
New York; they stumble onto the road, where a truck barrels into them,
killing Grace's friend and seriously injuring Grace's horse, Pilgrim. 
We then meet Grace's mother, Annie (Kristin Scott Thomas) and father,
Robert (Sam Neill), a couple whom, we suspect, are married out of
convenience.  Grace recovers from the accident, but has her right leg
amputated; from then on, she's a somber and extremely depressed girl.
Although Pilgrim's injuries are severe, and the horse seems to have
undergone intense psychological torture, Annie refuses to let the horse
be put down.  She seeks out a man known to do miracles with horses; his
name is Tom Booker (Redford).  She takes Grace and the horse and drives
out to his ranch in Montana, at which point Tom begins working with
Pilgrim, even though the horse seems beyond help.
Perhaps the best thing about The Horse Whisperer is Redford's directing
and imagery.  Even without a story and characters, this film would have
been breathtaking to behold.  The opening credits roll simultaneously
with incredible footage of horses dashing about on what look to be sand
dunes; the colors are dark and full, the horses are silhouettes, and the
moment is beautiful.  Many scenes in the film have this quality -- there
are several shots of things that just look nice and have nothing to do
with the story directly, but add perfectly to the quiet and subtle tone
of the film.  It's a long picture, and Redford's direction is perfectly
paced:  the film never gets boring or loses the audience.
Almost equaling Redford's near-perfect visuals are the performances,
particularly from the two leading females.  Thomas is a beautiful,
commanding actress, and though this is only the second film I've had the
pleasure of seeing her in (the other being The English Patient), she
proves in just two roles that she has the rare capacity to hold an
entire film together by sheer force of talent.  Young Scarlett Johansson
is equally good; this is a fantastic performance, especially when
considering the actress' age.  Redford is also good, though he slightly
underplays his character in parts.  Sam Neill is, unfortunately, not
used to his full abilities (with the exception of one wonderful scene
towards the end in which he has a serious talk with his wife).  
I enjoyed The Horse Whisperer, but my main complaint lies in the
script, which feels sloppy at times.  There are a few scenes here --
like an important moment between mother and daughter -- that seem to
fall flat because of dialogue, or characterizations, or both.  Grace's
dialogue, for instance, is far too sharp for a girl her age; and, at
times, the dynamics between Tom and Annie are nebulous when they need to
be more clear.  The overall focus is also skewed between many things: 
Grace's struggle with Pilgrim, the mother/daughter relationship, and the
Tom/Annie relationship.  All of these are well-developed, but after
leaving the film, I wasn't sure what was supposed to be central.  I am
thankful that Redford steered clear of manipulation (though there are
scenes clearly intended to be tear-jerkers), but the ending seems an
unlikely solution to the situation.
All in all, I highly recommend the film, for I imagine most people will
enjoy it thoroughly.  There is a lot to admire here, from the truly
astonishing imagery to the first-class performances and cast.  It's a
moving film that works on many levels, and just barely escapes the
greatness it might have achieved with a few script changes and a more
objective editing job.  On a personal level, the film forced me to
notice horses in a way I never did while growing up with them, and I
think that many people might get the same feelings I did out of
Redford's insightful vision.

Title
Review for Vie ręvée des anges, La (1998)
The Dreamlife of Angels (1999)
A Capsule Review by Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Copyright 1999 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
        The Dreamlife of Angels features two masterful central performances. 
The first comes from Elodie Bouchez, who plays Isa, a young and friendly
drifter who can't keep a job.  The other performance is by Natacha
Regnier, playing Marie, a slightly more-stable woman who befriends Isa. 
The film centers around the relationship between the two women, and also
their individual struggles; Marie becomes obsessed with a womanizer
(Patrick Mercado), while Isa becomes strangely attached to a young girl
in a coma.  With a strong sense of artistic ambition from director Erick
Zonca, The Dreamlife of Angels is an affecting and sharply realistic
look at two pathetic lives.  My only real complaint is that the movie
comes to a screeching halt in the last twenty minutes, and then putters
to a denouement that comes dangerously close to anti-climax.  Overall,
the picture serves best as a showcase for two amazing young actresses.

Title
Review for You've Got Mail (1998)
Director:   Nora Ephron
Cast:  Tom Hanks, Meg Ryan, Parker Posey, Jean Stapleton, Steve Zahn,
David Chappelle, Greg Kinnear, Dabney Coleman
Screenplay:  Nora Ephron, Delia Ephron
Producers:  Nora Ephron, Lauren Shuler-Donner
Runtime:   115 min.
US Distribution: Warner Bros.
Rated PG:  mild language
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Joe Fox (Tom Hanks) isn't a bad guy -- he's just a rich guy. He, along
with his father (Dabney Coleman), owns one of the more successful
bookstore chains in New York, Fox Books. He knows that business isn't
personal, and that he isn't intentionally putting all of the independent
bookstores out of business. Nonetheless, Kathleen Kelly (Meg Ryan) feels
the effects of Fox Books directly  she owns The Store Around the
Corner, which specializes in children's books and has been in business
for forty-two years. Kathleen takes it personally, and she hates Joe
Fox.
What Kathleen and Joe don't know is that they're having an on-line
e-mail affair with one another. Because they've made a pact to not
divulge personal information through the internet, they have no idea of
each other's true identity. They both feel guilty about pseudo-cheating
on their spouses; Joe's editor girlfriend, Patricia (a wonderful Parker
Posey) is a shallow beast, while Kathleen's relationship with journalist
Frank Navasky (Greg Kinnear) lacks passion. And so begins a surprisingly
funny and touching situational comedy that relies almost completely on
the cuteness factor.
You've Got Mail couldn't have been more perfectly timed. Here we have a
movie about the internet, starring Tom Hanks and Meg Ryan, and directed
by Nora Ephron. It's a money-making machine, guaranteed to rake in
hundreds of millions of dollars. It doesn't bother me that it's a film
built to make money, because it's been built the right way: You've Got
Mail features a bright, thoughtful script, but it also features two
immensely appealing actors playing people that we wouldn't mind knowing
in real life. 
Oh sure, it's gooey and sentimental. There's no doubt that the people
involved really wanted to make us cry. What makes You've Got Mail
different from the typical tear-jerker, aside from being made with a lot
of skill, is that I almost felt inclined to get all teary-eyed at the
end. I really had to fight it off. Any movie that forces me to fight off
tears is worth something.
What You've Got Mail comes down to is how much we love Tom Hanks and
Meg Ryan. Both performers are great at what they do: they've both proven
themselves in numerous dramatic and comedic performances. You've Got
Mail requires a little of everything; Hanks has the difficult role of
making Joe Fox likable, even though he seems at first to be a rich
sadist. Ryan, who is literally too cute for words (and too cute for sex
appeal, I'm afraid) is very funny, and even manages to do a little bit
of acting. Some of the best scenes occur when Joe and Kathleen hate each
other  their first encounter at a caviar party is perfectly timed. 
Of course, there's a lot more to like about the movie, not the least of
which is the spectacular supporting cast. Posey is so perfect as Joe's
superficial girlfriend (although it's surprising to see her in a
mainstream film). Kinnear is convincing and engaging, although he's been
stuck with the role of the boyfriend who gets blown off (the plot device
introduced to keep him from seeming like a loser isn't very effective).
Coleman has some good scenes as Joe's thoughtless father. And Ephron
ties everything together with a nice script and some great romantic
comedy pacing.
What I really liked about You've Got Mail is that it doesn't feel like
an obligatory blockbuster. It has an emotional center and realistic
characters to care about. Joe, for instance, is a troubled man, and
Hanks adds a dimension to the character that might not have been present
in the hands of a lesser actor. In fact, I'm surprised with how much I
liked this movie  it's a perfect family Christmas release, because it
does its job with class and style. And even though you may feel like
you've been dunked in syrup by the end, this particular kind of syrup
tastes pretty good.

Title
Review for Godzilla (1998)
Director:  Roland Emmerich
Cast:  Matthew Broderick, Jean Reno, Hank Azaria, Maria Pitillo, Michael
Lerner, Harry Shearer, Arabella Field, Philippe Bergeron
Screenplay:  Dean Devlin, Roland Emmerich
Producers:  Dean Devlin
Runtime:  139 min.
US Distribution:  TriStar
Rated PG-13:  disaster violence, language
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
A fellow critic, in his review of Godzilla, states his belief that his
opinion will not sway readers' decisions whether or not to see the
film.  I agree with that submission, although I think there will be a
lot of people out there reading reviews of Godzilla, wanting to see how
many critics agree or disagree with their opinions on what is perhaps
this summer's most-anticipated film.  Based on this assumption, I am
going to express my opinion in a manner which will hopefully convey that
I feel passionate about the words I have written here.
I hate Godzilla.  It's a film so bad that words like "incompetent" and
"wasteful" lose their meaning.  Roland Emmerich and Dean Devlin are such
hacks, so devoid of talent and vision, that they simply throw away what
seem to be good ideas for films.  I was hesitant to admit this belief
until now:  Stargate is a mediocre wannabe sci-fi action flick with a
few interesting aspects and a nice cast.  Independence Day, their "best"
film, is exciting for the first half and at least in good humor (even if
it doesn't know it's awful) through the ludicrous and insipid second
half.  Godzilla, however, begins at the bottom of the "mediocre"
category and spirals quickly downward into a wretched pit of bad special
effects, shameless unoriginality, and possibly the worst script ever to
plague a film whose budget could retire the national debt.
In fact, there's almost nothing good to say about Godzilla.  There's
one scene that has Godzilla stomping full speed around the streets of
New York in pursuit of a taxi which contains our heroes; this segment is
a good action sequence.  Some of Matthew Broderick's lines are
fashionably executed, for he seems to be the only actor in the cast who
is fully aware of the fantastically bad dialogue that Emmerich and
Devlin have penned.  That, my friends, is the list of positives.  Seeing
as how the film is well over two hours, and that one scene and a few
lines of dialogue don't exactly fill the entire frame, I must now
explain to you that Godzilla is not just an intense disappointment, but
probably the worst film of 1998. 
Maybe I should begin with a summary (though I have considered not doing
this, for it is apparent that I will have given the film more thought
than the two men responsible for it).  The film begins with an
insightful look at a bunch of lizards getting irradiated.  Later, big
cargo ships and smaller fishing boats are ravaged and pulled
underwater.  So, we are introduced to Nick Tatopoulos (Broderick), a
worm specialist who is called in to investigate some really big
footprints on a tropical island.  Pretty soon, the huge radioactive
lizard is taking his first steps in Manhattan, having fun knocking down
buildings and screaming at things that are, perhaps, too small for it to
see clearly (such as human beings).  Later, it turns out that Nick's
skills as a worm specialist are very helpful, for Godzilla is burrowing
under the city and laying eggs in Madison Square Garden.
That's the story.  It doesn't sound too bad, and I think a pretty
decent summer blockbuster could have emerged from it, as opposed to this
film, which unsuccessfully aspires to be referred to as "incompetent"
and "wasteful."  I suppose it's time to be concrete about all this, so
I'll begin with the least of its problems.  First, the soundtrack is
bad.  The music by David Arnold is not the least bit exciting or
original, and is often very mushy and sentimental in parts that are
supposed to be touching.  
There are no characters, and most of the acting is extremely mediocre
(not that anyone cares about acting in a film like this).  Broderick, as
I said, has his moments, because he understands the awfulness of the
dialogue.  Kevin Dunn is the worst of the bunch, playing the Head
Military Guy who refuses to listen to reason and just wants to shoot
missiles at Godzilla, and ultimately cause more damage to the city than
the creature itself.  Maria Pitillo, in one of the pointless subplots,
plays Nick's ex-girlfriend, and she tries very hard to change her facial
expression on several occasions.  Hank Azaria plays a cameraman and is
far less interesting than he was in any other film he's ever been in. 
Most perplexing is the presence of Jean Reno, who is part of a pointless
and time-consuming subplot regarding the French government (although I
do like it when he says, "Running would be a good idea," with a straight
face).
The rest of the problems with this wad of cinematic refuse are
equivalent in intensity and importance, so I'll just lay into the script
first.  I can't think of a worse screenplay than this one, and that
includes all the low-budget straight-to-video numbers that get aired in
the middle of the night on HBO.  It is humorless (although there are
many failed attempts at humor).  It is not thought-out, and most of the
dialogue sounds like it was written by middle-schoolers still trying to
get a firm hold on the language.  Example:  "They might escape out into
the city!"  Any competent screenwriter would notice that "escape out" is
redundant, and that "They might escape into the city!" would be the
correct statement.  Am I quibbling?  No, because the script is
jam-packed with this kind of sloppy writing.  It makes me wonder if they
proofread the script before filming it.  Better yet, I wonder if they
wrote the script down at any point in time.  Keep in mind that *two*
adults are responsible for this writing.
How about this -- some helicopters have Godzilla targeted with
heat-seeking missiles.  When he dodges them, and the missiles blow up
the Chrysler building (I'm having flashbacks of Independence Day . . . I
can't believe they ripped off their own film), the reason is that he's
colder than the buildings around them.  That must be because he's cold
blooded, because he's a lizard, right?  Well, cold blooded doesn't mean
that he's really cold, for even the smallest snake in the world would
have a higher body temperature than a concrete building in the rain. 
This film, in every aspect, is the result of carelessness and idiocy.  
And here's the final blow:  the special effects just aren't that
great.  The sequence I mentioned above is exciting and fairly
well-crafted, but everything else here is terrible.  Godzilla frequently
looks like a cartoon, such as in the underwater scene that is a direct
rip-off from Alien Resurrection.  There's a lengthy sequence in which
our heroes find the egg room, and this is lifted straight out of
Aliens.  Everything else in the film is a poor remake of Jurassic Park;
Godzilla itself looks just like the Tyrannosaurus, and all the baby
lizards hold striking resemblance to the raptors from that film.  Every
single sequence (note that -- every single sequence) is unoriginal,
complemented by mediocre-to-lousy special effects and drab direction. 
The film is not exciting, and not interesting, and lacks even a hint of
style and energy that even the silliest summer flicks always have.
Godzilla is unacceptable.  It is the worst big budget film of all time,
and it wins this title by a landslide.  Roland Emmerich and Dean Devlin
are con artists, and coning is apparently the only kind of art they have
a handle on.  Understand this:  I love big-budget summer fare.  Recent
films like The Rock, The Fifth Element, and Contact are great
blockbusters that use big budgets to their advantages, and treat their
audience with respect.  Godzilla is a sloppy, boring film that delivers
none of what it promises.  I hate this film, and I hate that people are
going to flock to see it.  Certainly some will enjoy it, and I can't
stop that.  But I predict that most people will be disappointed in this
film.  I'm hoping that Emmerich and Devlin have spewed their last, for
this piece of crap retires all patience I once had for them.  

Title
Review for American History X (1998)
Director:  Tony Kaye
Cast:  Edward Norton, Edward Furlong, Fairuza Balk, Beverly D'Angelo,
Avery Brooks, Stacy Heach, Jennifer Lien, Elliott Gould
Screenplay:  David McKenna
Producers:  John Morrissey
Runtime:  117 min.
US Distribution:  New Line Cinema
Rated R:  Graphic brutal violence, sexuality, nudty, language
Apparently, director Tony Kaye had a major battle with New Line
regarding his new film, American History X.  I don't know the details of
the fight, but it seems that he is not happy with the final product, and
nearly removed his name from the credits altogether.  I've heard about
this kind of thing happening before, and it makes me wonder how much
input a studio has over the films they produce.  As it is, I found
American History X to be an extremely good film, not just because of
Tony Kaye's focused look at the touchy subject of racism, but because of
a powerful, charismatic performance from Edward Norton.
It's hard to believe that it has only been two years since Norton's
fantastic role in Primal Fear, but, here he is now, starring in his own
film and making himself a star.  Norton is one of those performers who
becomes his character, and his work in American History X is one of the
very best performances this year.  He plays a young man named Derek
Vinyard, a skinhead living in Venice Beach with his brother, Danny
(Edward Furlong), mother (Beverly D'Angelo), and sister, Davin (Jennifer
Lien).  The film opens with a flashback, in which Derek brutally kills
two black men vandalizing his car.  We find out that this lands him in
prison, and the film from that point is seen through the eyes of Danny.
In the present-time of the film, Danny is in high school, and eager to
follow the footsteps of his brother.  Much of the film is told in
flashback, and we see the path that leads to Derek's adoption of white
supremacy.  When Derek is released, having served three years in prison,
he finds that his brother is now a full-blown skinhead; Derek, however,
has given up the violence, and tries to get his brother to understand
why racism and the violence that comes with it are bad things.  What
makes this all interesting is that these two young men are not stupid,
thoughtless people -- they are intelligent and articulate, and voice
their beliefs in disturbingly straightforward terms.  
It's hard to make a Controversial movie and not preach, but Kaye has
found the right note for his material.  Because American History X is a
mainstream film, there has to be a redemption phase for our main
character -- some people may think that this is the only way to make him
sympathetic.  I partially disagree with this, because, although I do not
advocate racism in any way, it's interesting the way Kaye presents Derek
-- he is a loud, obnoxious man, but he's also very smart.  The reasons
for why he becomes a skinhead are believable -- his father was
arbitrarily killed by a group of black men.  It's clear that he's
passionate about his beliefs, and that he's not just a punk looking for
an excuse to beat people up.  
Of course, it helps that Kaye has an actor as talented as Norton to
play this part.  It's astonishing how frightening Norton looks with a
shaved head and a swastika on his chest.  In addition to getting the
look just right, he's perfect for this role -- Derek requires
intelligence, depth, and a whole lot of shouting, and Norton does it all
with ease.  Even when he's at his meanest, Derek has a likable quality
to him, and that's a gutsy approach when telling a story about a
skinhead.  What adds depth to the story is a subplot in which the
principal of Danny's school (Avery Brooks) becomes obsessed with purging
the hatred from Danny.  The other performances are all terrific, with
standouts from Furlong, D'Angelo, and Lien.  Visually, the film is very
powerful.  Kaye indulges in a lot of interesting artistic choices, and
most of them work nicely -- lots of slow-motion and strange camera
angles add to a moody atmosphere.
But, like a lot of movies lately, American History X skims past
greatness in the last few minutes.  Although the climactic scene is very
moving, the picture ends with a pretentious, preachy resolution
featuring a brief narration from a character who was killed.  For a
movie so smart a subtle up until that point, it felt like a slap in the
face to be hand-fed a theme in such a simplistic way.  It makes me
wonder what, exactly, Tony Kaye disliked about the final version of his
film.  Perhaps this last scene was the problem.  It's hard to imagine
any director not being at least partially pleased with a film this good
-- in a time when so many movies are timid and weak, American History X
manages to make a compelling argument for racism without advocating it
any way.    

Title
Review for Blues Brothers 2000 (1998)
Director: John Landis
Cast: Dan Aykroyd, John Goodman, Joe Morton, J. Evan Bonifant, Aretha
Franklin, James Brown, B.B. King
Rated PG-13: Exotic dancing, language
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    Lots of movies suck, but few movies suck the way Blues Brothers 2000
sucks. I usually don't resort to using the work "suck," but in this
case, it is so vastly appropriate. I hate this movie. It is two
unbearable hours of meandering pointlessness. Well, no, "meandering"
implies movement, and Blues Brothers 2000 contains no movement. It's a
stagnant, dead-feeling motion picture containing absolutely nothing of
interest. It's highlighted by hundreds of cameos, car chases, gun fire,
and irritating stereotypes.
    Now, I have to be at least partially fair: it's been a long time
since I saw the original, so I wasn't sure what to expect from this.
Also, I have no affinity to the Music that the characters in this film
cherish so much. Maybe I should have rented the original film before
subjecting myself to this; at least then I would not have been
blindsided by the pure, toxic awfulness of this movie. But I didn't. I
watched it cold turkey, and I was blindsided. I was shocked not only by
how bad the film is in general, but how intensely boring it is from
start to finish. Thirty minutes into the film, I felt like I had seen
enough black suits and sunglasses to hold me over into the next
millenium.
    Dan Aykroyd stars as Elwood Blues. Upon getting released from prison
in the beginning of the film, he learns that his brother is dead. So,
the story of Blues Brothers 2000 contains scene after scene in which
Elwood tries to reassemble his old band. There are like thirty people in
this silly band, so there are a lot of scenes in which Elwood has to
convince wary musicians that dodging bullets really is worth the rewards
they get from playing their music. Notable members of the band include
Mac (John Goodman) and Buster the kid (J. Evan Bonifant).
    I'll not bother with the subplots. Like all truly hideous films,
there are countless subplots that clog the film and suffocate the
viewer. I'll just mention that some of them contain nuns, while others
showcase Russian mobsters, Confederate militia men, and a police chase
led by Joe Morton.
    Even though I'm not a fan of the Music, I think I could have enjoyed
the film, had it been made well. Even though I'm not familiar with the
characters, the movie could have still drawn me in and made me
interested. All the best sequels I've ever seen are accessible even to
viewers who haven't seen the originals. I simply saw no point to make
this movie. Well, I take that back--there are two scenes in which Dan
Aykroyd makes anti-drug messages. Knowing Aykroyd's history and the fate
of John Belushi, I can understand why these were included. And I can
respect that. But it doesn't make the film good.
    Each scene plods along and slumps into the next with absolutely no
feeling of progression. Musicals, when done poorly, come across as dull
and contrived, as if there's no reason to have the music at all. I don't
watch musicals often, but I can tell when they feel smooth. This one
doesn't feel smooth. When the characters break out into song, I just
want them to stop and be silenced.
    There was, however one scene that had me laughing--towards the end,
there is a two-minute pileup of police cars. The cars go flying through
the air at ridiculous heights and speeds, and it is entertaining (most
of the car stunts, actually, are so exaggerated that they are
entertaining). I also like John Goodman, though he doesn't do much in
this film. Unfortunately, these two elements don't amount to a hill of
beans when compared to the flat-out wretchedness portrayed in every
other scene.
    I suppose the worst moment is when the Brothers stumble across the
militia men meeting. I don't know if there are really people like this
in the world, but I didn't think it was funny to see them in this film,
and I didn't think it was funny when the Brothers accidentally blow them
up with their own explosives. And the film has no rules--penned by
Aykroyd and director John Landis, the script is a dark creation,
displaying characteristics of musicals, comedies, and farces; but with
each passing scene, the ridiculous factor increases exponentially until
finally there are hordes of people undergoing magical transformations
into rats.
    This is the kind of film that I hate the most. It's a horribly dull,
limp, and insipid attempt at an entertaining and energetic film. I can
see how, if you love the first movie or you just love this Music, that
you might find this entertaining. Like I said before, I don't know much
about blues music. And, because of Blues Brothers 2000, I have no
interest to ever learn anything about it.

Title
Review for Civil Action, A (1998)
Director: Steven Zaillian
Cast: John Travolta, Robert Duvall, Tony Shalhoub, William H. Macy,
Zeljko Ivanek, James Gandolfini
Screenplay: Steven Zaillian
Producers: Rachel Pfeffer, Robert Redford, Scott Rudin
Runtime: 112 min.
US Distribution: Touchstone/Buena Vista
Rated PG-13: strong language
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
A film that is "Based on a true story" is problematic from the get-go: 
real life just isn't as interesting as the movies.  Most of the things
that happen in movies are not things that will ever happen in real
life.  Movies are great because they show us things we haven't seen
before, things we may not have ever considered.  A film that's "based on
a true story" is likely to disappoint simply because the components of
the story are probably too realistic to be cinematic.  
A Civil Action is based on a true story.  It's based on the true story
of Jan Schlichtmann (John Travolta), a personal injury lawyer in a firm
with two partners (Tony Shalhoub and Zeljko Ivanek).  Jan is a cynical
man; much of the early scenes are filled with a witty narration in which
he explains the everyday procedures of winning cases and getting the
most possible money from a settlement.  (The first scene, in which a
group of lawyers beg for a two-million dollar settlement after Jan shows
the jury a child in a wheelchair is devilishly funny.)
Jan, however, decides to take a different kind of case:  over a few
years, several kids had died from leukemia in a small town called
Woburn; now, one of the mothers (Kathleen Quinlan) is trying to get a
lawyer to take their case against a local company who may be
accidentally draining toxins into the city's drinking water.  Jan
discovers that the local company is owned by a much larger company, and
so his motives for taking the case begin as a career move.  Later,
though, his morals change, and he sticks with the case, even though it
takes years to discover that the millions of dollars that his firm sinks
into the case are all wasted.
A Civil Action is one of the most frustrating films I've seen in
months:  here is a movie that begins as a funny, entertaining, cynical
look into the way lawyers operate, and concludes as a muddled, partially
sentimental morality tale with no climax and no real ending to speak
of.  It's made perfectly clear in the beginning that the film is based
on a true story, but I think that in the interest of cinema the last
thirty minutes should have been changed completely.  It almost makes me
mad to see a film with so much potential fizzle into a sloppy
resolution.
After all, I usually find John Travolta deeply unlikable, but A Civil
Action shows a side of him that I wouldn't mind seeing more often.  It
also has a fantastic supporting cast, a lot of sharp humor, and a
direct, insightful narration on the practices of one particular personal
injury lawyer.  Director Steven Zaillian also does a good job with
pacing and overall tone, except in the last thirty minutes, which are so
bad that the film as a whole can be considered no better than mediocre. 
It pains me to see this.
Take, for instance, the first scene, which I mentioned above.  This is
a very dry, very funny scene.  It speaks worlds of meaning with just a
little dialogue and a lot of good acting.  The movie has a similar tone
through much of its running time, and the way Zaillian unfolds the
details of the case is skillfully done:  I was always interested to see
what was going to happen, and who would be to blame for the disaster in
Woburn.  There are also some great supporting performances, the best
coming from William H. Macy (as Jan's high-strung accountant), Robert
Duvall (as a quirky defense lawyer), and Kathleen Quinlan (an actress
who needs her own movie).
I was so ready to love this movie, but it takes such an unexpected,
disastrous turn in the last thirty minutes.  It's nearly impossible to
explain in detail without giving away the ending, but I can say that it
requires us to dislike a bunch of people who seemed likable for most of
the movie.  It also has the most aggravating anticlimax of the decade,
whimpering to a close without awarding its audience the least bit of
satisfaction.  I attribute all of these failings to the fact that A
Civil Action has been based on a true story:  Hollywood endings aren't
always good, but at least they wrap stuff up.  This is a story that
didn't have an ending, and someone should have put it on, even if it
meant changing the facts a little.  As I said, cinema is more
interesting than real life; if you're going to make real life into
cinema, it needs to be made cinematic.

Title
Review for Among Giants (1998)
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Visually interesting but emotionally vacuous, Sam Miller's Among Giants
stars Pete Postlethwaite as a painter who falls in love with a tomboy
(Rachel Griffiths).  Postlethwaite and Griffiths are both good, but the
love story is too inconsequential to gather any kind of momentum (and
the film is far too short to develop the characters adequately). 
There's also an extended scene in the middle that features gratuitous
frontal nudity of both characters, and it's more likely to elicit laughs
than anything else.  But Among Giants is still very pretty to look at,
thanks to Miller's majestic direction, and the colorful group of
supporting characters is at least marginally interesting.  

Title
Review for Happiness (1998)
Director:  Todd Solondz
Cast:  Jane Adams, Jon Lovitz, Philip Seymour Hoffman, Dylan Baker, Lara
Flynn Boyle, Justin Elvin, Cynthia Stevenson, Lila Glantzman-Leib
Screenplay:  Todd Solondz
Producers:  Ted Hope, Christine Vachon
Runtime:  134 min.
US Distribution:  Good Machine
Not Rated:  graphic sexual situations, profanity, nudity
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
If you don't watch Happiness closely, you might think that
writer/director Todd Solondz hates his characters.  It's possible to
dismiss this as a dark, cynical look at a group of morally depraved
nutcases, but Solondz is nicer than that.  In Happiness, he draws an
intricate network of characters who are all messed up in their own ways;
what makes the picture work is the way it draws us in and forces us to
sympathize with people who would typically undergo societal bludgeoning
based on cultural standards.  It's a harsh, shocking film, but it's also
touching and often funny.  In short, it's one of the boldest films of
1998.
Like many independent films, Happiness doesn't center around one
character or storyline, but cuts frequently among a group of people who
are all related in some way.  One of the most prominent characters is
Joy Jordan (Jane Adams), a neo-hippie who can't hold a steady job or a
steady boyfriend.  She's an incredibly nice woman, and very pretty, and
really just wants to make a living by playing the guitar and singing. 
She has two sisters:  Trish (Cynthia Stevenson) and Helen (Lara Flynn
Boyle). 
Trish is married to Bill Maplewood (Dylan Baker), and has two sons,
Timmy (Justin Elvin) and Billy (Rufus Read).  Bill is a psychiatrist,
but he's also deeply disturbed:  aside from having fantasies about
killing innocent people in a park, he's a pederast who masturbates with
the aid of teen magazines.  One of Bill's disturbed patients is Allen
(Philip Seymour Hoffman), a pathetic man who describes himself only as
"boring"; he gathers sexual enjoyment by calling up random women and
verbally raping them.  
If this sounds like a colorful band of hateful people, then my
descriptions aren't doing them justice.  Indeed, they are all people
with severe problems, but Solondz observes his characters with
sympathy.  Take Joy, for example:  she's such a nice woman.  She may be
a little naive, but I never wanted anything bad to happen to her.  But
bad things keep happening to her -- she gets used by a Russian taxi
driver, an ex-boyfriend commits suicide because of her, her family
thinks of her as a failure (just to name a few things).  Every time
something bad happened to her, I wanted to give her a hug.  Adams is so
perfect for this role -- she has a kind, sweet face, and demure
mannerisms.  And she hangs in there, even when everything goes wrong.
But Joy is one of the easier characters to take.  It's harder to find
sympathy in Allen, because the prank calls he makes are so malicious. 
Hoffman is a superb, versatile actor -- you might not even recognize him
from some of his previous films (including Twister, The Big Lebowski,
and Next Stop Wonderland); his portrayal of Allen, with that gravelly,
fluctuating voice and squinting eyes, is simultaneously grating and
endearing.  Through Hoffman's subtleties, we are able to understand
Allen.  One of Solondz' greatest moments is halfway through the film: 
just when we think Allen is as pathetic is they come, he introduces us
to a large woman (Camryn Manheim) who falls for him.
In fact, all of the performances are first-rate, even in the smaller
roles.  Ben Gazzara and Louise Lasser, as the sisters' parents, convince
us perfectly of a couple who have been married forty years.  Lara Flynn
Boyle is wonderful as the pretentious artistic sister, and Stevenson is
also dead-on as the wife who thinks she has everything.  The most
important performance in the film, however, comes from Dylan Baker.  I
was deeply moved by his performance as Bill Maplewood:  here is a man
that, by society's standards, is nothing but a monster -- he rapes young
boys.  This is all most people need to hear in order to hate someone.  
But Solondz, while observing the act as a sickness, doesn't exploit it
by making Bill a monster.  He loves his son, and cares about his
family.  But he can't help himself, and while we don't excuse him for
that, we forgive him.  Ironically, that's where the controversy over
Happiness is coming from -- the picture makes us uncomfortable by
affirming the humanity of a man who does horrible things.  Baker's
performance is perfect -- he hints at his problem without making it
obvious to his family, but we always know that it's right there, fueling
everything he does.
Unfortunately, Happiness escapes greatness in the last ten minutes. 
Inevitably, Bill Maplewood is caught and disgraced.  But Solondz shows
us a scene in which Bill explains his crime to his son; this scene is
deeply affecting, but in the wrong way -- it reveals things about both
characters that I don't find believable, and it requires a conversation
to take place that doesn't seem realistic.  In fact, the entire
storyline is hindered by this scene.  Then, in an epilogue that feels
tacked-on, we are exposed to some gratuitously low humor that seems like
it belongs in There's Something About Mary.  But most of the film is so
good and insightful that any complaints I make seem largely
insignificant.  Todd Solondz' Happiness admits that real people have
severe problems, and by making us like his characters despite their
failings, he shows us in a very subtle way how nice it would be if were
were all more tolerant of one another.

Title
Review for She's All That (1999)
Director:  Robert Iscove
Cast: Freddie Prinze Jr., Rachel Leigh Cook, Matthew Lillard, Paul
Walker, Jodi Lyn O'Keefe, Kevin Pollack, Usher Raymond, Elden Henson,
Kieran Culkin, Anna Paquin
Screenplay: Lee Fleming
Producers: Peter Abrams, Richard N. Gladstein, Robert L. Levy
Runtime: 95 min.
US Distribution: Miramax
Rated PG-13: profanity, sexual innuendo
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Okay, stop me if you've heard this one:  the Coolest Guy in School gets
dumped by his bimbo girlfriend.  His best friend -- the second-coolest
guy in school -- dares him to take the class nerd out on a few dates and
turn her into the prom queen.  The Coolest Guy has a few reservations
about this, because he's also the Nicest Guy in School.  Nontheless, he
convinces the school nerd to go out with him, and, slowly-but-surely, he
realizes that he's in love with her.  We are then treated to a grand
climax at the senior prom, where suspense is generated from wondering
who is going to be crowned queen of the prom.
If you're looking for an original plot, you won't find it in She's All
That.  The problem with the high school comedy/drama is that every
possible scenario was explored by John Hughes in the 80s.  Nowadays,
just about the only thing anyone can do to make a watchable high school
comedy is to make it extremely authentic (Can't Hardly Wait) or so
patently absurd that one simply can't deny its charm.  This is the case
with She's All That:  here is a film bored with its own story, and
manages to give us a lot of laughs and a few interesting characters by
not focusing on the plot too much.  The result is a pleasantly pointless
and satisfyingly surreal teen comedy.
The Coolest Guy to whom I referred earlier is Zach Siler, played by a
surprisingly funny Freddie Prinze Jr.  His best friend (the
second-coolest guy) is played by teen dream Paul Walker (who failed to
show us his stuff in the unwatchable Meet the Deedles).  Laney Boggs is
the school nerd, and is embodied by Rachel Leigh Cook.  Laney is not
actually a nerd by all standards -- she does get good grades, but that's
irrelevant (Zach did, after all, get into Dartmouth).  She's mostly just
a recluse; she works all the time to help out her father (Kevin Pollack)
and brother (Kieran Culkin), and when she's not working, she's painting
abstract art or acting in abstract stage productions.  
The plot and story is certainly just an amalgamation of every high
school farce ever made.  What sets She's All That above most films of
the genre is director Robert Iscove's tonal approach.  The film is
excessive and exaggerated, and paints a truly ludicrous vision of high
school.  It's not unrealistic, it's just cinematic hyperbole.  The film
takes place in Beverly Hills, so all the kids are rich (except for
Laney's father, who is a self-employed pool man).  All these wealthy
characters provide for numerous sets and locations that are huge (my
senior prom did not take place in a three-story hotel lobby) and
well-kept (my high school looked more like a giant bathroom than a
summer retreat on Maui).  
But Iscove, writer Lee Fleming, and the actors all take the perfect
tone to make She's All That a ridiculously fun film.  One of the best
scenes in the film is early on:  Laney is in art class, and a goth queen
(played by the Clea "I'm So Dark" DuVall) approach her and say, "Most
artists of your type are only appreciated posthumously."  Laney looks at
her, confused.  She continues:  "So, we think you should commit
suicide."  This scene isn't totally relevant to the story, but it's
funny and offbeat in the same way much of the film is.  The subplot
involving Zach's ex-girlfriend (Jodi Lyn O'Keefe) and her new boyfriend
(a super-self-absorbed member of MTV's The Real World, played by Matthew
Lillard) is absolutely hilarious.  Then there are the charming little
details, like the father who watches Jeopardy! only to miss every single
question.
The acting is dead-on from most of the cast; Prize Jr. stands out as a
likable leading guy, and Cook wins our sympathy early on with her
lovable dorkiness.  Walker makes a good one-dimensional villain, and
Kevin Pollack steals his scenes as Laney's father.  
No one expects depth from a movie like this.  In fact, I'd say that
She's All That is about as good as a movie like this can be.  Based on
recent entries into the teen comedy genre, it seems that coming up with
an original idea is basically out of the question.  But She's All That
proves that a few big laughs and a little bit of silliness can revive a
plot even as tired and played as this one.  

Title
Review for Hush (1998)
Director:  Jonathan Darby
Cast:  Jessica Lange, Gwyneth Paltrow, Johnathon Schaech, Debi Mazar,
Alice Baring, Hal Holbrook
Screenplay:  Michael Cristofer, Jonathan Darby
Producers:  Douglas Wick
Runtime:  95
US Distribution:  Sony Pictures/TriStar
Rated PG-13:  violence, language, sex
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        When I watch films like Hush, I wonder what kind of pitch the film
makers made to the producers to make the project look appealing.  I
think about what the intended target audience is, and what the intended
genre is, and how much money they expected to make with the film.  I
think about these things because the film itself does not answer the
questions.  
        It's a film staring a talented actress who appeals to adults (Jessica
Lange), a beautiful babe who appeals to younger males (Gwyneth Paltrow),
a hot hunk who would probably appeal to most women (Jonathan Schaech),
and stuffs them into an overblown, tedious thriller about a crazy
Southun' mom on a sunny Connecticut horse ranch.  The highest paid
lawyers in the country shouldn't have been able to sell this premise,
but someone did, and the film was produced.
        Of course, lousy test-screenings caused TriStar to change the name from
less interesting titles including Bloodline and Kilronan (one of which
is generic, the other senseless to those who haven't seen the film). 
Apparently, the movie has been sitting on a shelf somewhere for over a
year, just waiting to be released to suspense-thirsty audiences.  And
now, thank heavens, it is here!
        It's about Helen (Paltrow) and Jackson (Schaech).  Jackson takes Helen
out of New York for a weekend to meet his mother, Martha (Lange) in
Connecticut; she lives on a huge horse-breeding ranch called Kilronan
(now you know what that other title means!).  As the all-powerful
audience, we know immediately that Martha is jealous of Helen, but
neither Helen nor Jackson notice this until much, much later in the
film.  The weekend ends, and they return to their home in New York.  
        Helen gets pregnant.  Jackson asks her to marry him.  Someone breaks
into the apartment and attacks Helen.  Helen gets upset and wants to
move to Connecticut so they can fix up the ranch and have a child in the
nice, country atmosphere.  And Martha slowly goes crazy as she begins to
develop delusions about Helen's child being her own.  From there, the
film is unthinkably absurd (up to that point, it is imaginably absurd).
        The movie is just poorly made.  The script is disorganized; as I
watched, I noted that it felt like a first draft of a practice script. 
I would not have structured the film in this clumsy, back-and-forth
manner (from New York to Kilronan to New York to Kilronan, over and over
again).  There isn't even any suspense; Martha is clearly insane from
the get-go, and we all know what's going to happen just from seeing the
preview.
        The story itself is not pleasant.  Writer/director Jonathan Darby
apparently wanted to make a film that observes the complicated bonds
between a mother and her son, and what happens when that bond is in
jeopardy, but there is no depth in this story.  Everything here is for
shock value, and what isn't intended to be shocking is boring.  The
story lends itself to only one kind of conclusion (which we can all
guess because this is a mainstream film), and it just doesn't ring true.
        Gwyneth Paltrow almost holds the film together with her no-nonsense
approach, but one actress typically can't counter an entirely bad script
and execution.  She plays her part well, but Helen is a flat, often
unbelievably mean character, and what concern I manifested for her
spawned only from my liking of the actress.  Schaech, who I last saw in
the loathsome The Doom Generation, is bland an unnoticeable here.
        Lange is the strangest part of the film.  Her performance is
overwrought, but often mildly amusing to watch.  The character she plays
is so deeply psychotic that I just wanted to grab her by the shoulders
and shake her violently, screaming, "Why are you so crazy!?"  When
Martha coolly tells her lies, It seems that she actually believes what
she says.  As an observer of a character whom I've known for
approximately thirty seconds, I would like to think that the characters
in the film--who have supposedly know her for years--would be able to
read her just a little bit.  No, Jackson is not very observant.  In
fact, he's totally in the dark until the very last scene.
        I understand why TriStar procrastinated with the release of Hush.  It
is a bad film.  It has very little to offer anyone, mostly because it's
the wrong kind of story from which to make a thriller.  Unfortunately,
it really doesn't matter when a film this bad gets released, because
almost no one will go see it anyway.  Thrillers should contain serial
killers or deep mental anguish, and they should never, ever take place
on a sunny horse ranch in Connecticut.  

Title
Review for Primary Colors (1998)
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        I don't care whether or not Jack Stanton, the character portrayed by
John Travolta in Primary Colors, is supposed to be Bill Clinton.  I've
read that he is, but it doesn't really matter.  I certainly don't care
about the book written by "Anonymous" (supposedly the author is
ex-Newsweek writer Joe Klein).  
        I think the entire situation is intensely silly.  If someone is going
to make a semi-biography about how our President got to where he is, why
not just do that?  Why all this secrecy?  Oh, I suppose that Clinton
wouldn't like a film to be made about him while he's still in office. 
Maybe this is just an easy way to tell the story without dealing with
whatever legal boundaries that needed to be crossed.
        In any event, this conspiracy stuff didn't give me a positive outlook
on Primary Colors before seeing it, although I expected to enjoy the
film.  But I didn't.  This film is profoundly uninteresting and
feigned.  It's phony in almost every scene, and painfully artificial in
each second of dialogue spewed out of Travolta's mushy, distracting,
Clinton-spoofing voice.  I despised almost every moment of this film,
and not necessarily because of Elaine May's script, but because of the
execution:  director Mike Nichols fails on a fundamental level to
explain the point of his film.  Is it an Intelligent and Cynical
satire?  Is it supposed to be a realistic account of how political
campaigns work?  Is it intended as a character study of Bill Clinton?  
        I don't know, and because Nichols goes in so many different directions,
the film is ultimately reduced to a soup of scenes that clash because of
their strikingly varied tones.  Some of these scenes work alone, but
many don't, and none of them work herded together in this disaster. 
This fact is not enhanced by the heinous, radically annoying performance
by John Travolta, a performance that has permanently made me cautious of
any film in which he may appear in the future. 
        The film is about Governor Stanton's efforts to win the Democratic
nomination for the Presidential race.  The story is told through the
eyes of Henry Burton (Adrian Lester), a young, ambitious man who is
recruited by Stanton and his wife, Susan (Emma Thompson), to manage a
large part of the campaign.  Henry believes that he's working for a
great man, and his loyalty is tested through numerous trials, most of
which involve accusations that Stanton sleeps around at every given
chance.  A subplot, which becomes the focus towards the end, involves
Kathy Bates as Libby Holden, an old friend of the Stantons who is hired
to see what kind of dirt the press is going to be able to dig up on
them.
        Much of the film is supposedly about the relationship between Stanton
and his wife.  The relationship the audience gets to see is about as
watered-down as the relationship the American public sees between Bill
and Hilary Clinton.  Every intimate discussion, each moment when there
might be a word that isn't politics-related, is absent from this film. 
This is clearly intentional on Nichols' part, because I imagine he's
trying to imitate, to an extent, the kind of view we have of the
President and his personal life.  
        This isn't to say that we see nothing of his personal life, because we
do.  We see that he gets "upset" when his wife finds out that he
probably had sex with a teenage girl (does anyone else find the thought
of this action deplorable?); similar reserved displays of emotion are
scattered throughout the film, but none of them paint a picture any
more-defined than the one we all have of Clinton.  Perhaps, if the point
of the film is specifically to document the details of a political
campaign, then my qualms with the handling of Stanton's character would
be invalid.  But if the point is just to show the campaign, then why go
to all the trouble to make Stanton a replica of Clinton?
        I'm not a fan of Clinton myself, but that's irrelevant.  Every single
scene that features Travolta--with the exception of none--is totally
plastic and insincere.  I didn't believe a word he said at any point
during the film.  When he gives his speeches to the uneducated masses
(apparently, the majority of the American public can not read and
continuously get fired from their factory jobs), each word Travolta
utters singed my nerves in a way no performance ever has.  Clinton
himself does not irritate me the way Travolta does in this film.  When
Travolta has scenes with Thompson, I feel like he's lying to her.  When
he's supposed to be "frank" and "honest" with the people around him, I
still feel like he's lying.  
        And again, if Nichols' point is to satirize the way we all think
politicians constantly lie, then hats off to him.  But he's created a
character and a situation, both of which we are clearly intended to care
about, and we do not, because 1) we don't know the guy, and 2) he
irritates us.  It simply doesn't work.
        In addition, many of the scenes in the film are frustrating and
peripheral to the story.  Billy Bob Thornton, for instance, plays a
character named Richard Jemmons who has nothing to do with the film, and
provides only a few scenes that develop his own pointless character. 
And the subplot involving Bates' character ends predictably--this entire
portion of the film, which is inserted to show the potential viciousness
of the Stantons, is routinely manipulative, and serves simply as
somewhere to end the film.
        Whatever minimal points I obligingly and generously give this film go
to the other actors:  Thompson is wonderful, and not given enough screen
time;  Lester is also very good, and plays his part convincingly; and
Bates is charismatic as always.  None of these actors can escape the
shadow of Travolta's tremendously wretched mockery of Clinton, however.
        I've heard that to criticize a film is to create a new one, but I can't
think of what might have made Primary Colors acceptable, or even
watchable, for that matter.  Wag the Dog, which was another political
film that I didn't enjoy, was at least consistent and thorough in its
endeavors.  Primary Colors wants to be intelligent and insightful, and
maybe it is when it comes to politics.  But it has so much extra stuff
for us to consider that it leaves us battered and confused as to what
it's trying to prove.  Films this inept and incoherent should be
illegal.

Title
Review for Virus (1999)
Director: John Bruno
Cast: Jamie Lee Curtis, William Baldwin, Donald Sutherland
Screenplay: Dennis Feldman, Jonathan Hensleigh
Producers: Gale Anne Hurd, Mike Richardson
Runtime: 
US Distribution: Universal
Rated R: sci-fi violence/gore, language
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
The most interesting thing about Virus is that the title of the film
does not refer to the clunky robotic animals that try to kill our
heroes.  Alas, it refers to our heroes!  As it turns out, the alien race
that sends a computer virus to earth (via the Mir space station) thinks
of the human race as a virus -- perhaps even a cancer -- that needs to
be eradicated before it spreads any further.  After all, we have taken
up this entire planet, and if they let us live for another billion years
or so, we might advance beyond our solar system and into the next one.
But the human race doesn't have much to worry about.  After all,
there's a woman named Foster (Jamie Lee Curtis) out there stopping the
computer virus.  She's the chief navigator on a sea vessel; travelling
with her is Captain Everton (Donald Sutherland), Steve Baker (William
Baldwin), Woods (Marshall Bell), Squeaky (Julio Oscar Mechoso), and
Richie (Sherman Augustus).  They're all sailing in a typhoon one lovely
evening when they stumble across an enormous, abandoned Russian
satellite ship in international waters.  Lucky for us, we already saw
that the computer virus has taken over the ship and eliminated everyone
on board.
The evil Captain Everton thinks he's going to take the ship in and get
a reward; he convinces his crew that there's going to be big money, so
they try to salvage the ship.  Soon, however, when it's apparent that no
one is on board and that the ship has no power, they realize that
something bad must have happened.  Finally, they meet Nadia (Joanna
Pacula) who explains their situation:  a computer virus has taken over
the ship!  It's creating bio-mechanical life-forms to eliminate the
human race!
Virus is a truly dumb action thriller, one of negligible intelligence
and innovation.  When considering the entire film, you will realize that
it lacks a single original scene.  It's a direct rip-off of nearly every
James Cameron film (Aliens, The Abyss, and the Terminator films are the
most plagiarized); more importantly, it's basically the same movie as
last year's Deep Rising.  I liked Deep Rising simply because it's funny
-- it knows it's silly and derivative.  Virus takes itself seriously. 
And, in the most serious manner possible, it steals from every good and
bad film of the genre, showing you countless familiar scenes, and
sporting a cookie-cutter plot that any film of the sci-fi/horror genre
could fit with a little trimming.
But what is so amazing about Virus is how poorly the whole thing has
been thought out.  Okay, let me get this straight -- the alien race
(which is never really explained) is basically sentient electricity. 
They need to make themselves physical, so they use a space station to
get onto a ship (which is surrounded by water, but who cares about
that).  On the ship, they make a bunch of clunky, immobile robots that
somehow kill three hundred people.  After that, they start using the
dead people to create half-human, half-machine creatures that look like
the Terminator but are much worse at walking around.  
The leader, of course, is a big creature.  Every film like this has a
big creature at the end, but the big creature in Virus is so big that it
has to tear down the walls to move around.  Virus is indeed a cliched
film, but the central flaw lies in the fact that the computer virus just
isn't very threatening.  It's established that they can simply turn off
the power to stop it, but the virus has sealed the power room by the
time our heroes get there.  
On one level, Virus is almost passable fun.  It's really gory, and a
few of the scenes have interesting camp appeal (the director, John
Bruno, worked on a lot of Cameron's films).  There's also a nice array
of actors, even though none of them do any acting (except for Donald
Sutherland, who does a lot of very bad acting).  The bottom line,
however, is this:  Virus is a bad movie.  It rips off a lot of good
movies that are worth seeing.  In that order, I recommend that you rent
any one of the Alien films, simply to admire the qualities of a creature
that actually threatens our heroes.

Title
Review for Spice World (1997)
Director: Bob Spiers
Cast: Melanie Brown, Emma Bunton, Melanie Chisholm, Geri Halliwell,
Victoria Adams, Richard E. Grant, Alan Cumming, George Wendt, Roger
Moore
Rated PG: teen-oriented themes
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    I have had almost no exposure to the Spice Girls. Going into this
film, I was convinced that I wouldn't know a single song of theirs (I
found out later that I actually had heard one before seeing the film).
They just seemed like five ditsy British girls that dance around and
make lots of money. I was anxious to see Spice World because I knew my
favorite actor has a cameo in it. Aside from this, though, I expected to
deplore this film.
    And now that it's over, I still want to deplore it. But I can't. I'm
i...in...fected bbbby the SPICE GIRLS! No, but seriously, Spice World is
a terrible film that, regrettably, is also entertaining. Sure, it's
really goofy, and very stupid, and the film ultimately is awful, but
it's harmless and funny. And Bob Hoskins is in it for ten seconds. In
theory, that's all I need.
    Naturally, the story is nothing to write home about. It centers
around the Girls (Melanie Brown, Emma Bunton, Melanie Chisholm, Geri
Halliwell, Victoria Adams) and their manager (Richard E. Grant) who are
on their big bus heading towards their first live show. Along the way,
there are subplots: a crew tries to make a documentary about the Girls
(led by Alan Cumming); a couple of evil men try to smear them by having
a guy follow them and take pictures at inopportune times; and some
Hollywood producers try to get in on the fun with high-minded concepts
for films that the Girls can star in.
    Spice World, first and foremost, is a disorganized mess of a film.
It jumps around from subplot to subplot and never really becomes
engaging as a story. Scenes are rapidly thrown at the audience (it jumps
from the Girls to the various subplots frequently) with little to no
warning, so concentration in this case is nearly impossible. You'll find
yourself blindsided by big, colorful images at high speeds.
    What is probably the worst thing about it is that, leaving the
theater, I knew nothing new about the Spice Girls. Everything in this
film is fabricated and phony. Take, for instance, the scene where they
remember a time before they were famous, singing in the local diner. I
read somewhere that there were auditions to be in the Spice Girls, so
this scene was obviously made up for the film. Knowing that the Spice
Girls likely hate each other in real life didn't help as I watched;
every attempt at "friendship" in the film seems completely forced.
    The most inherently silly thing about the Spice Girls are the
so-called "identities" that they all have. Having seen the film, I would
still have to go searching for their five identities. The only ones that
stuck out were the girlish antics of Baby and the stuck-up,
materialistic Posh. I can see the rest of their faces, but what they
are, and what they do in this film, is still a mystery.
    Aside from the film as a whole being really bad, it goes for the
unexpected and turns out really funny. Some of the sequences here are
clever and hilarious, like a Speed rip-off in which the Girls are
trapped on the bus with a bomb. Every time Richard E. Grant opened his
mouth, I laughed. I also liked the nightmare sequence in which they make
fun of themselves (a judge dooms their next album to debut at number 176
on the Billboard 200, only to drop off the next week). And the film is
so frantic and exasperating that boredom is impossible. Spice World may
be a terrible movie, but it's so terrible that I just couldn't help but
enjoy myself.

Title
Review for What Dreams May Come (1998)
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
I've seen films that deal with death and afterlife, but I don't think
I've seen any that conquer the subject with such unrelenting
determination as Vincent Ward's What Dreams May Come.  It's so
refreshing to see a Hollywood production that succeeds by ignoring all
the standard conventions and cliches of the genre.  This film is
profound and deeply interesting -- it handles disturbing subjects with
unflinching sincerity.  And though it has its roots in many other works
-- from Dante's Inferno all the way up to the films of Bergman -- it
still manages originality and uniqueness.
But these aren't the elements that will stick with you, for What Dreams
May Come is one of the most visually astounding films I've ever seen. 
It's a wealth of truly beautiful sets and special effects, seamless and
visionary images of things that can't exist in our world.  That's what
makes this such a memorable film experience -- it takes you places you
have never been, and shows you things you can't see anywhere else.  In a
time when most films don't exhibit the even lowest degree of creativity,
here is a film that registers as art and serves its purpose both in
sensation and perception.  Your eyes and your mind will feed on all that
Ward's film has to offer.  
At the same time, however, the film's flaws are almost as obvious as
its virtues.  It suffers from a terribly disjointed narrative -- the
chronology is difficult to understand, and there's not always a strong
sense of momentum.  As a whole, the film may not have you feeling
absorbed as much as you may feel trapped -- at times, it's so visually
arresting that it seems like you're living the nightmare.  This is a
positive attribute to a point, but this film comes inches away from
being intolerably depressing.  I'll elaborate on all this later.
The film stars Robin Williams as Chris Neilsen, a doctor who, at the
beginning of the film, meets his true love, Annie (Annabella Sciorra). 
They get married and have two children, Ian (Josh Paddock) and Marie
(Jessica Brooks).  The family is shattered one day when the kids are
killed in a car accident.  The film then jumps ahead four years, when
Chris, too, is killed in another car accident, leaving Annie without
anyone in her life.
Chris suddenly finds himself watching over Annie as she grieves for
him.  His status is explained to him by a guide named Albert (Cuba
Gooding, Jr.).  Soon, Chris allows himself to proceed into Heaven, where
his world is created with the paint that his wife used to paint the
pictures he loved when he was alive.  Soon, however, it turns out
Annie's soul is in trouble, and Chris must journey through the afterlife
to find and save her.
I've left a lot out, and that's because there are many subplots, and
many flashbacks that show small portions of Chris' and Annie's life
before and after their kids get killed.  Because it deals with such
morose themes, What Dreams May Come is inescapably dark, even in the
bright and wonderfully colorful world that Chris first creates for
himself.  There's always an underlying sense of malaise and frustration,
an element that makes us feel like nothing is ever right, even when the
characters seem at least momentarily placated.  
The biggest problem with the film, however, is the lack of fluency in
the narrative.  This isn't Ward's fault -- in fact, it's hard to say if
there is any one person at fault.  The way the film is constructed lends
itself to this kind of storytelling technique -- flashbacks and the like
-- and, since it explains a world with which none of us are familiar,
it's necessary for Chris to have a guide to explain him everything
(Dante had Virgil, didn't he?).  I don't mind that this explanation is
necessary, but the first forty-five minutes of the film are spent
watching Chris reject his placement in Heaven.  Then, all the way up
until the end, the film exists on two timelines -- one in the present
tense, showing Chris on his journey, and the other showing Chris and his
family when they were alive.  The result is a story that never quite
convinces us that it's actually happening -- the whole thing feels too
much like a wicked nightmare.
And, if you stop and think about it, it's all pretty absurd.  Ron Bass'
script isn't bad; the characterizations are solid, and the themes are
well-established.  But, on a technical level, it seems a bit sloppy:  I
could poke holes through its logic all day, although I'm not sure where
that would get me.  In addition, the film isn't as moving as I was
expecting; I cared about the characters and their respective fates, but
none of the dramatic elements in the film really took hold of me the way
I was hoping they would.
Okay, so it has some big problems.  Overall, though, What Dreams May
Come is a satisfying picture, even if it misses a few opportunities for
sound logic and effective drama.  Vincent Ward is a truly gifted artist,
and this film is proof of my statement:  there are moments in What
Dreams May Come that are literally breathtaking, moments that are so
visually immersive that you won't even be able to blink, let alone look
away from the screen.  There are little things that Ward repeatedly uses
that add depth to the scenery -- lots of running water and reflections,
concrete stairways, walls that stretch up to seemingly infinite
heights.  It's the kind of imaginative world that we so rarely get to
see in films.
The acting is superb; Williams, who is often a difficult man for me to
watch, is wonderful here (although a bit heavy on the pathos).  Gooding,
Jr. is a demanding screen presence, and is very good in the role of the
Explainer.  Max von Sydow, who plays another guide whom Chris meets
halfway into his journey, is perfect for his role.  Most interesting,
however, is Annabella Sciorra, who delivers her best performance (and,
hopefully, her breakthrough role) as Annie.  Sciorra's work is complex
and shaded both emotionally and physically; she spends a lot of the film
crying, but she manages to make what could have been a token part into a
real character.
As flawed as it is, I have to recommend What Dreams May Come
enthusiastically, simply because it really is an effective film.  True,
it could have been much better, and maybe it goes a bit overboard in its
attempts to make us feel bad for the characters, but I can't think of a
film in recent history that is more visually amazing.  Vincent Ward has
created a film so beautifully original that I doubt it could be ignored
or forgotten by anyone who sees it.  It's also a film that latches to
its themes and pursuits with admirable dignity and persistence, and at
least partially succeeds.  Nowadays, it's nice to see anything that
qualifies as art, but something done with as much conviction as this is
a film to be cherished, in spite of its flaws.

Title
Review for Wings of the Dove, The (1997)
Director: Iain Softley
Cast: Helena Bonham-Carter, Linus Roache, Allison Elliott, Elizabeth
McGovern, Michael Gambon
Rated R: Sexuality
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    The Wings of the Dove is a vicarious experience, a film that
instigates more thought than outward reaction. It's a tale of lost love
and death, a film about unhappy people who become even more unhappy in
desperate attempts to make themselves feel better. The characters are
quiet, and they don't always tell each other what they're thinking. It's
a subtle, touching movie, enhanced by some of the best acting of the
year, and by director Iain Softley's striking artistic eye for scenery
and human emotions.
    Helena Bonham-Carter stars as Kate Croy, a young Englishwoman who
lives under the wing of her rich Aunt Maude (Charlotte Rampling). Kate's
life is clearly not what she wants it to be--her idea of fun has nothing
to do with socializing at large, exquisite gatherings at which the
richest individuals in society get drunk and have grand conversations.
She's in love with Merton Densher (Linus Roache), a journalist who
doesn't mesh well with her own social status. Maude insists that they
don't see each other, but Kate can't live with this.
    It's not long before she meets Millie Theale (Allison Elliott), a
dying American heiress. The two become friends, but Kate's intentions
far exceed friendship--her plan includes convincing Merton to seduce
Millie and get her to fall in love with him so that she will leave him
all of her money. This will leave Merton a rich man and therefore in the
appropriate social class for Kate to marry him.
    Carter gives a deep, brooding performance as Kate; her struggles are
what makes this film such a ponderous experience. Here we have a woman
who loves a man so much that she implores him to do something that, at
first glance, is a truly awful piece of manipulation. The trick is that
Kate actually cares very much for Millie, but her love for Merton is
much stronger. Kate is not a hateful woman, but she is as unhappy as
they come. Her love for Merton is all that keeps her going, and this
plot she contrives serves not to make her better, but to hurt the people
involved. Carter's work here is strikingly good; she evokes the kind of
sexual and emotional passion that is rarely associated with this
seemingly serene time period of the early 1900s, and the outcome is a
character who is somehow always sympathetic, even in her worst moments.
    Linus Roache is very strong as Merton, though his character is the
one who speaks the least. His intentions and thoughts are not always
apparent, but little subtleties in his language and facial expressions
tell the audience exactly what it wants to know. Allison Elliott gives
the film's best performance as the rich American girl, an person so
frayed and ruined by her disease that pity is the last thing she
wants--she doesn't even tell her friends that she is sick. The
relationships between these people are always under examination, and
constantly changing. What they go through is nothing short of mental
torture.
    Softley's direction, mixed with the John Beard's breathtaking
production design and Eduardo Serra's cinematography, make The Wings of
the Dove one of the most attractive pictures of the year; it's a film
seamless in period detail and mood. Softley also does some subtle things
with the camera--watch carefully the final scene between Kate and
Merton. Moments like this are what I love to see in movies. The Wings of
the Dove is one of those films that makes you think for a long time
after it's finished; only then can the power and depth of this story and
these people be completely understood.
